
MGA Capitulo 1 – Outer Court Disciple
Night. The round moon was hanging high and stars filled the sky.
However, within the river of stars, there were 9-coloured lights lingering amongst them and they were especially dazzling.
"Abnormal signs appear in the sky, which means a Divine Body will descend."
On the summit of the Imperial City in the Nine Provinces. An old man in golden clothes stood with his hand behind his back and he was looking up into the night sky.
Behind him were tens of thousands of Imperial City experts. All of them were half-kneeled as if waiting for some command.
*bzz*
Suddenly, the lights condensed and formed into 9-coloured lightning. It came striking down from above the river of stars and the heavens.
At that instant, the black night became a white day. Even before the strike of the lightning, the ground was already rumbling and fiercely trembling.
But that 9-coloured lightning. The moment it collided with the land, it did not do any terrifying damage. Rather, it completely disappeared.
At the same time, the world was enveloped by the night once again. The originally bright night sky darkened quite a bit, as if some important essence was removed, and the former senere days were restored.
The old man's eyes were abnormally bright and his excited body was even trembling. He pointed towards the location in which the lightning had landed, "Within the borders of the Azure Province, bring all the infants that were born tonight back to the Imperial City!"
"Yes sir!"
The thunder-like response resonated past the horizon and tens of thousand Imperial City experts headed towards the Azure Province. They swore to look for the Divine Body and give it to the imperial court for use.
Time passed. 5 years elapsed with a blink and although people still remembered the frightening scene that year, no one knew the actions of the imperial court.
Within the borders of the Azure Province of the Nine Provinces. Amongst the countless of schools, the Azure Dragon School was one of them.
Today, once again, it was the annual recruitment of disciples for the Azure Dragon School. There were oceans of people outside of the school.
Every time, the busiest people were the outer court disciples. All the responsibilities of the admittance for the school were all pushed onto their heads.
Outer court disciples. They were the ones that did the hard and thankless tasks. Not only were their position lowest in the school, they were even looked down upon by outsiders.
The reason was very simple. If they were an outer court disciple, it meant that their aptitude was horrible and in their entire life, it would be very hard for them to have any big achievements, so naturally. they were despised upon.
"Oi, what's with this attitude? Do you know who I am?" A lady who wore gorgeous clothes had a boy with her as she pointed and loudly yelled at a young man.
"I am very sorry. It is already late now and the school will close soon. Please come back tomorrow." The young man's delicate face was still young and tender, but between his eyebrows, he had a bit of heroic spirit.
He was called Chu Feng. He was 15 this year and he was one of the tens of thousands of outer court disciples in the Azure Dragon School.
Although he was an outer court disciple, Chu Feng was different from all the others. He did not feel inferior to others and he did not degrade himself. He did not feel afraid or scared while treating others and he was very calm.
"Come back tomorrow...You think I'm an idiot? These are the mountains! Where are you even going to let us sleep?"
"You must arrange a place of residence for me, or else I'll go find your elders for reasoning." The lady did not listen and did not care. She even grabbed onto Chu Feng's clothes.
"Chu Feng, have you met with trouble?" But just at that time, a sweet voice could be heard.
Looking at that direction, a young female who wore purple was walking over. Although there was a faint smile on her mouth, her eyes were fierce and they tightly stared at the lady.
As she saw the young female, the colour of the lady's face instantly changed and a strong expression of fear gushed out.
It was not because of anything else. It was just because the young female was wearing the purple robe, and that was a mark of the inner disciples.
The lady hiddenly cursed. She originally thought she could use her status to make things difficult for the young man in front of her.
Who would have thought that the unremarkable young man in front of her had the support of an inner disciple? The inner disciples were an existence that she couldn't offend.
"It's nothing it's nothing, I was just inquiring some things from him." The lady explained while smiling.
The young female glared at her and only said one word, "Scram."
At that instant, the lady's body couldn't help but tremble and her face was already ashen.
But she did not hesitate at all. She pulled the boy and quickly left, and under the panic she even tripped, which made her look very rough.
Seeing that, Chu Feng helplessly shook his head and said politely to the young female next to him, "Thank you very much Chu Yue."
"No need to be so polite, we're family right?" Chu Yue was a bit displeased.
She was correct. They were indeed family. They came from the same family, Chu.
Chu Yue was Chu Feng cousin, from Chu Feng's father's brother line and she was only 1 year older than Chu Feng.
However, Chu Yue already passed the inner disciple exam 3 years ago and became an inner disciple. She was now in the 4th level of the Spirit realm.
"We need to follow the school rules." Chu Feng said with a brilliant smile.
[TN What he meant by following the school rules was being respectful to elders, as inner court disciples &gt outer court disciples]
Looking at Chu Feng behaving like that, Chu Yue's heart ached, "Chu Feng, are you still not going to participate in this year's inner disciple exam? Or is it that you still haven't reached the 3rd level of the Spirit realm?"
Chu Feng did not respond and a faint smile still hung on his face. No one knew what he meant.
Seeing that, Chu Yue took off a bag from her waist and put it in Chu Feng's hands, "Refine it. Perhaps it'll help you break through the 3rd level."
Chu Feng opened the bag and instantly, strong spiritual energy was emitted from it. A bright, sparkling, transparent Saint Spirit Grass that was the size of a finger laid within.
"Chu Yue. This is too precious, I can't take it." Chu Feng hurriedly returned it back to Chu Yue.
Saint Spirit Grass. It was like a panacea for martial training and it was extremely precious. It had endless usefulness for those within the Spirit realm.
To increase their training speed, the Chu family would supplement one Saint Spirit Grass to the Chu family members every year.
Chu Yue was also supplemented by the family, but she didn't use it and gave it to Chu Feng. It really moved Chu Feng, so he really couldn't accept it.
"When I say I give it to you, you should take it. You are my little brother after all." Chu Yue was slightly irritated.
"Oh? When were you so generous and even started to give Saint Spirit Grasses to people?"
"Look, I am your little brother as well, and coincidentally, I will almost have a breakthrough into 4th level of the Spirit realm. How about you give the Saint Spirit Grass to me?"
A young man around the age of Chu Feng walked over and he was also wearing clothes of the inner court disciples.
He was called Chu Zhen and he was also from the Chu family. Five years ago, he entered the Azure Dragon School at the same time as Chu Feng. However, he became an inner disciple 2 years ago.
"Chu Zhen, you've already broke past the 3rd level of the Spirit realm and successfully condensed spiritual energy. Even if you don't have this Saint Spirit Grass you can rank up quickly."
"But Chu Feng has not condensed spiritual energy yet, so this Saint Spirit Grass is more important to him." Chu Yue forcibly put the Saint Spirit Grass into Chu Feng's hands.
"Yep, you are correct, but sadly he doesn't want it." Chu Zhen spread his hands open and sneered.
Who said that I didn't want it?" But then, Chu Feng lightly smiled and unrestrainedly put the Saint Spirit Grass in his pocket before saying, "Chu Yue, I will borrow this Saint Spirit Grass. On a later date I will return them back twofold."
"Mm, okay." Seeing that Chu Feng accepted it, Chu Yue was already happy, so she just randomly responded and didn't care whether Chu Feng would return it back or not.
"If you're taking it then why return it? Giving you this Saint Spirit Grass for you to use is such a waste." Chu Zhen's face had a really ugly look on it.
Chu Feng just smiled and ignored him. He then said to Chu Yue, "Chu Yue, I will participate in this year's inner disciple exam."
"Hmph, you? If you can pass the inner disciple exam, I'll give this year's supplemented Saint Spirit Grass to you." Chu Zhen looked at Chu Feng with contempt.
"Is that true?" Chu Feng didn't really believe it.
"Chu Yue will be the witness. But what if you can't pass it?"
"Then the Saint Spirit Grass I get this year will belong to you." Leaving that sentence behind, Chu Feng continued to throw himself into the work of outer court disciples.
"Chu Zhen, we are family. Why do you always need to make things so hard for Chu Feng?" Chu Yue looked at Chu Zhen with annoyance.
"Family? Chu Yue, you should know that that Chu Feng isn't part of our Chu family."
"After entering the school for five years, he still hasn't passed the inner disciple exam. He is absolutely the disgrace of our Chu family."
"In the entire Chu family, which one likes him? Only you treat him nicely and you even give your own Saint Spirit Grass to him for use." Chu Zhen really did not understand.
"You are truly stupid." Chu Yue was a bit angry and after glaring at him for a moment, she walked away.
On the other hand, Chu Zhen smiled. He really was happy. Although he didn't get Chu Yue's Saint Spirit Grass, he knew that this year, Chu Feng's Saint Spirit Grass would certainly be his.
A bit into the night, in the resting area for the outer court disciples. It was complete darkness.
After being busy for the entire day, everyone was very tired and they slept very early. Only Chu Feng's room was still lit up by light.
He sat on the front of the bed, took out the Saint Spirit Grass that Chu Yue gave him and muttered, "I hope this Saint Spirit Grass can make you full."
After saying that, Chu Feng closed both his eyes, clamped the Saint Spirit Grass between both his palms and did a strange hand seal.
At that instant, the spiritual energy inside the Saint Spirit Grass started to enter Chu Feng's body through his palm and it converged into his dantian.
[TN Dantian]
At the same time, chewing sounds came from Chu Feng's dantian as if something was having a meal.
If you looked through his skin, you would discover in the deep part of Chu Feng's dantian, a lump of lightning was occupying there.
That lump of lightning had nine colours and every colour was like a huge lightning beast. It emitted a terrifying aura that did not belong to this world.


MGA Capitulo 2 – Beauty Elder
Chu Feng wasnt really from the Chu family. He was an adopted son by "Chu Yuan", the fifth oldest in the Chu family.
That caused Chu Feng to be pushed aside and to be humiliated at a small age. If it wasn't for Chu Yuan's protection, he would have already been kicked out of the Chu family. Because of that, Chu Feng was very thankful towards Chu Yuan, and swore to become the pride of Chu Yuan and to win back some honor.
Five years ago, Chu Feng was exactly ten years old and it was the best age to train in the martial arts.
The him at that time had many expectations for training, because he felt that the time to prove himself had arrived.
However, he never would have thought after entering the Azure Dragon School for one month, lightning would strike his body and enter his dantian.
At first, Chu Feng even thought it was good luck, because when he started training, his speed of improvement was astonishing. In two short months, he arrived at the 2nd level of the Spirit realm.
That speed was completely abnormal, and because of that, Chu Feng didn't dare to tell it to anyone so he hid his strength and continued training.
But the good scene did not last long. Just as Chu Feng thought he became a genius, change happened within his body.
Because of that change, it made it so his cultivation stopped and did not move forward, and he was labeled to have the most horrible talent of a lifetime.
*bzz*
At that time, the Saint Spirit Grass in Chu Feng's hands was being refined and absorbed by his dantain.
His refining speed was extremely fast and it exceeded common sense. Normally, with Chu Feng's strength, it would take at least one month to refine the Saint Spirit Grass.
However, looking at it now, it was already half-way refined just after a short while, and Chu Feng's dantian that felt like a never-ending cave also had a feeling of being full.
*bzz* Suddenly, light floated over Chu Feng's hand and the other half of the Saint Spirit Grass instantly disappeared.
Also, at the same time, everything changed in Chu Feng's dantian.
The nine lightning beasts interwove with each other. It was hurriedly moving, and it was actually condensing. Finally, it turned into a pill-like object.
After the pill formed itself, endless spiritual energy surged out from it like a tide washing Chu Feng's body. Very soonly, it permeated through his entire body.
*whoosh*
Chu Feng suddenly opened his eyes, and there were traces of lightning in them! An indescribable expression hung on his face.
"I succeeded. After five years, I finally succeeded." Chu Feng was incomparably joyful. He jumped down from the bed, and as he walked around, he sized up his body.
In the journey of martial cultivation, the known realms were the following
Spirit, Origin, Profound, and Heaven. Those were the four big realms, and every realm was divided into nine levels.
The 1st level of the Spirit realm. The main point of it was to train the physical body with special methods, and to increase strength.
But after reaching the 2nd level of the Spirit realm, one must use ways to condense spiritual energy. Only people who successfully condensed their spiritual energy in their dantian could truly start their path in martial cultivation.
Chu Feng's body changed and it made it unable to condense spiritual energy. The Divine Lightning in his dantian were like nine hungry wild beasts. The spiritual energy that Chu Feng condensed would always be engulfed by that Divine Lightning.
But he didn't give up. It was because he found out that although the Divine Lightning did engulf his spiritual energy, there was a limit. As long as he kept on providing spiritual energy towards his dantian, he could fill it up one day.
And today, he finally succeeded.
"This is a really strong feeling. Endless amounts of spiritual energy is surging into my body, as though it was going to break through my body."
This feeling was inconceivable to Chu Feng. He never would have thought that the Divine Lightning would directly condense into a pill and occupy a place in the dantian. The spiritual energy that the Divine Lightning was giving off was very dense and it was beyond imagination.
He knew that even with his five years of non-stop cultivation, he could not condense such strong spiritual energy. The reason why he could was because of that Divine Lightning.
*bzz* But just at that time, Chu Feng's body suddenly became stiff, and his expression also changed greatly.
The Divine Lightning was changing. His power instantly increased by several times, and he suddenly broke through again and stepped into the 4th level of the Spirit realm.
"Have the hard times stopped and the good times come?"
Chu Feng tightly clenched his fist and he felt that the explosive power in his body was worth his five years of suffering.
Suddenly continuously breaking through two levels, the unexplainable method of becoming strong finally returned.
He used a severe gaze to look towards the direction of the inner court and muttered, "Chu Zhen, I'll be taking your Saint Spirit Grass."
The Azure Dragon School's disciple recruitment only happened once a year and every time, it lasted for ten days.
After ten days, the annual inner disciple exam would start. This time, Chu Feng who had been silent for five years would also participate.
The exam location was a huge underground palace. Within the main hall of the underground palace, the number of people were like oceans and mountains and there were most likely over ten thousand people.
Most of the people there were at the 3rd level of the Spirit realm because everyone knew that the inner disciple exam required one to be at least in the 3rd level to pass.
However, there was also a small portion of disciples at the 2nd level and they wanted to try to pass it within the confusion. There were people like that every year, but most of them ended with failures.
The thing worth mentioning though, was that there were also a small portion of 4th levels there. They were not mediocre people who trained slow, and in fact, some of them were even geniuses.
They intentionally waited until they were at the 4th level of the Spirit realm before participating in the inner disciple exam. The reason? For the reward.
When one reached the 3rd level, they could start training martial skills.
Martial skills were very strong attacking methods. Not only could they thoroughly display strength, they could also make people gain power that exceeded the limits of their body.
Because of that, martial skills were very precious, and even the rich and powerful families that has been existing for generations didn't have them. That was the reason why all sorts of families had to send their young generations into various schools for cultivation.
In every school, there were a large amount of martial skills, and within the Azure Dragon School, as long as you become an inner court disciple, you could start cultivating the martial skills.
Martial skills were also divided into ranks, and from the weakest to the strongest, there were nine ranks.
Within the inner court, the best martial skill book was only a rank 3 one.
But, within the annual inner disciple exam, the first person to pass it would get a rank 4 martial skill book.
That was why those people would rather train in the outer court and not enter the inner court. It was for the rank 4 martial skill book.
"Look, isn't that Yang Tian Yu?"
"Waa, it really is him. He's already at the 4th level of the Spirit rank by the age of thirteen. It seems like first place in this exam will be him."
In the ocean of people, one young man grabbed people's' attention. To be more precise it was a boy.
There were dozens of thousands of disciples in the outer court and most of them were unknown characters. However, the focal figures that people paid attention to were mostly geniuses, in which this Yang Tian Yu was one of them.
"That may not be so. No matter how much aptitude Yang Tian Yu has, he is, at the end, a child. It would be very hard for him to get first."
"There are many unknown talents in Azure Dragon School, and sometimes geniuses may not be able to beat the mediocre. For example, that Duan Yuxuan." Another outer court disciple pointed with his fingers at a cold young man.
That person was called Duan Yuxuan. He has been in the Azure Dragon School for 6 years and he was also originally an unknown character.
But a few months ago, he unexpectedly defeated an inner disciple who was in the 4th level of the Spirit realm. Because of that, his name was widespread and he became the focal character of the outer court.
"Silence." Suddenly, a loud and clear sound echoed.
Looking at the source, everyone couldn't help but stare blankly. They saw a dozen or so silhouettes appear on the high platform in the hall.
Most of them were aged, old people, and they were the outer court elders. But not only was the leader young, she was even a beautiful female.
The female was wearing a red, skintight dress and it outlined her alluring curves. Especially under the dress, there were two straight, snow-white legs, and it could be said that they were perfect.
Not only was her body attractive, her appearance was also extremely lovely. With round eyes, red lips, and an oval face, it was just like a fox face.
She was the famous beauty elder of Azure Dragon School, Su Rou.
Su Rou was a top-class character. She entered the Azure Dragon School at the age of 10, entered the inner court at the age of 12, and became a core disciple at the age of 15.
But just as everyone were optimistic and thought that she would become Azure Dragon School's 1 disciple, she suddenly became an elder.
No one had the inside information about this change, and up to today, it was still a mystery and it was discussed enthusiastically by people.
"Waa, it's Su Rou! Wasn't she supposed to be an elder in the inner court? Why did she come to the outer court?" With the appearance of Su Rou, all of the male disciples opened their mouths and some even drooled.
The outer court disciples were very young. Most of them were teenagers and some were even children. To them at their age, a mature female like Su Rou had the most charm.
Su Rou didn't have the air of the elders as she charmingly smiled towards the crowd and said gently, "The exam rules are very simple. Enter the gate behind me and come out from the other gate. With that, you pass the exam."
"The only difference is that the first person to pass will get a rank 4 skill book. You can't even get this in the inner courts."
"But something worth mentioning is that the person who is first this year will get another special reward."
"Depending on ones perspective, this reward could be even more precious than the previous one~" After saying that, Su Rou intentionally lengthened the intonation. The enchanting air filled the entire hall.


MGA Capitulo 3 – The Start of the Examination
"What would it be?" Someone asked curiously.
"Elder Su Rou is giving her body?" Some were even shameless and had lewd thoughts.
Although Su Rou was an elder, she was only 20 years old. Compared to the old antiques, she was a lot more easy-going. Because of that, a lot of people didn't worry at all when they talked like that.
Su Rou only smiled charmingly in response to the guesses of the crowd. She raised five slim fingers, then said, "Five Saint Spirit Grasses."
"What? Five Saint Spirit Grasses?"
"I didn't hear wrong did I? The reward are Saint Spirit Grasses, and five?" With those words, the main hall went into chaos and everyone could not remain calm.
Saint Spirit Grasses were extremely precious and even the Chu family could only give each person one per year.
To ordinary people, Saint Spirit Grasses were priceless treasures and some had not even seen it before.
Seeing that the Azure Dragon School could take out five of them, it was a huge temptation to the outer court disciples.
But for most of the people, they could only dream about it because they knew that they had no chance in getting those Saint Spirit Grasses.
However, to the disciples who were aiming to be the first, they were all eager to give it a try and they got even more excited.
Su Rou nodded with satisfaction as she saw the high-spirits of the disciples. Then, she waved her hand.
Behind her, rumbling noises came. The gate that was dozens of feet tall slowly opened.
"What are you waiting for? Don't want to pass the exam?" Su Rou smiled beautifully as she looked at the disciples who were staring blankly.
"Go~~~~"
At that moment, endless cheers resonated and the tens of thousands outer court disciples were like wild horses who got rid of its reins as they all rushed towards the huge gate.
Chu Feng went along with the flow of people and continued forward. Finally, they entered a deep cave.
The cave was very vast but it was very dark in there. The field of vision was extremely low and people knew the danger of traps that could be triggered at any moment.
"Go! For the rank 4 skill, for the five Saint Spirit Grasses, go~~~"
But of course, there were some people that cared about money and didn't care about their life. They knew that there was danger but they still went ahead by themselves and didn't even look back. There was even quite a few of people who were like that.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
But after going ahead for a hundred meters, whooshing sounds came in front and endless amounts of silver needles were shot out from the wall, and they shot towards the crowds as if it was rain.
"Ah~~~~~~"
"Waa~~~~"
In an instant, all sorts of cries echoed. The disciples that rushed in front were caught off guard and over half of them fell.
Regardless, people still continued forward and they did not have any traces of retreating. They madly ran deeper into the cave.
Although the silver needle was strong, it wouldn't kill, and they knew that. After all, it was only a mechanism and to the people at the 3rd level of the Spirit realm, they could dodge it as long as they were careful.
As they continued to go in deeper, the silver needles also got denser and denser and the people that they hit were usually caught off guard.
In situations like those, the crowds quickly distanced themselves. The people who were running at the front were no longer people who came hoping they would pass in the confusion. They were strong people such as Yang Tian Yu and Duan Yuxuan.
It had to be mentioned that those people were indeed not ordinary.
As they walked in the storm-like needles, they needed to be extremely careful.
But it was as though they were leveling the ground with their shoes and it didn't look like they were running through mechanisms at all. They were simply people in a running race.
Chu Feng was always behind them in the Spirit realm army that consisted of people at the 3rd level. He did that for two reasons.
Firstly, he didn't want to stand out.
Secondly, his situation was very special and he didn't want to show his true strength too early.
That was why he was waiting for a chance where he could surpass everyone when no one was looking.
"Duan Yuxuan, you're already so old yet you can't even win a child like me in a race. Don't you think it's a bit embarrassing?"
"Hmph. Little brat, in the journey of martial cultivation, age doesn't matter. Only strength does. If you want to boast then do that after you win."
Let us travel through time a bit. There were only two shadows left in the very front. They were Duan Yuxuan and Yang Tian Yu.
Both of them were at the 4th level of the Spirit realm. One of them had outstanding talent, the other had plenty of experience. The two of them were fairly even and the tension between them got stronger and stronger.
It was because they knew that their largest competition was each other. As long as they win over their opponent, the prize for being first would belong to them.
"Huu~" Suddenly, a breeze of wind came from the front.
The two of them were surprised as they looked closely and they couldn't help but slow down their paces. It was because dense fog appeared in front of them.
The cave was already dark, and with the fog it meant that their vision would be even poorer. With that, it also greatly increased the difficulty of dodging the mechanisms. Even if it was them, they needed to treat it carefully.
"Good chance."
Just as everyone was slowing down, Chu Feng secretly rejoiced. He went forward in huge strides, and with a whoosh, his entire body was like an arrow leaving a bow as he flew forward.
*whoosh*
At that time, Duan Yuxuan was concentrating on dodging the silver needles. Suddenly, a black shadow flashed past him. Without giving any time for him to react, that person disappeared once again.
"Did I imagine it?"
With that, it made Duan Yuxuan feel quite a bit of shock. He thought it was Yang Tian Yu at the start, but he noticed that Yang Tian Yu was not far behind him. Then, he was distracted with his thoughts.
The person who successfully left everyone behind, Chu Feng, didn't care about them that much as he increased his speed to the maximum.
After that long running, he didn't feel any fatigue. The spiritual energy within his body was endless to take and it continuously surged from his dantian.
Not only that, his speed and strength, hearing and vision power all surpassed the people who were at the same level than him. At least it greatly surpassed Duan Yuxuan and Yang Tian Yu.
Chu Feng wasn't too surprised at that chance because it was something special about him.
He already seen this specialness five years ago. From now on, his specialness returned and it gave him incomparable self-confidence because there was no one who could call themselves a genius in front of him anymore.
As he ran with flying speed, Chu Feng finally left the mechanism stage, exited the dark cave, and arrived in the middle of a wide hall.
At the end of the hall, there was a tall platform made out of stone. On top of the stone, there were several items. It was the rank 4 martial skill book and the five Spirit Saint Grasses.
Seeing those things, Chu Feng was a bit emotional. However, he didn't not rush ahead. Rather, he looked at the stone doors on the side of the hall.
"So behind those are the legendary Fierce Beasts?" Chu Feng's mouth curved up in expectation.
He knew that this exam just only started. The creatures that he was going to face were terrifying, blood-thirsty, ruthless creatures, called Fierce Beasts.
"Elder Su Rou look, this is too astonishing."
"I've been guarding here for so many years, but this really is the first time that I've seen a disciple that passed through with such a speed."
Within a mysterious stone room in the underground palace, an old elder was staring at a disordered stone and astonishment filled his gaze.
That was not a normal stone. It was a mechanism within the underground palace. The stone only disordered itself after a mechanism got triggered.
Looking at it, the entire stone was disordered. Which only meant one thing. Someone already passed the mechanism stage.
The fastest person to clear the mechanism stage took two hours from the past examinations. But currently, only one hour had passed.
This change grabbed everyone's attention. The dozen or so elders in the stone room all gathered around and they were all very startled.
"It seems that there's an interesting character within the outer court disciples this year."
Su Rou also gathered over, and as she looked at the disordered stone, she nodded with satisfaction, "Since it's like this, we can't let him pass so easily. Let me make it more interesting."
After saying that, she looked above the stone. There were three round stones embedded in the wall.
Suddenly, she smiled strangely, and hit the three stones with three bangs.
"Don't touch it!" Seeing that, all of the elders there were alarmed.
But it was too late. At that time all three stones were already pressed by Su Rou.
"What? Didnt you tell me that these stones would release the Fierce Beasts?" Looking at the elders in panic, Su Rou also felt that something was wrong.
"Those three stones do indeed release the Fierce Beasts, but they cannot be pressed at the same time."
"If they are pressed at the same time, they will release all the imprisoned Fierce Beasts at the same time."
"That would be thirty rank 2s, nine rank 3s, and one rank 4." After saying that, Elder Li's face was already pale and his voice was trembling a bit.
The elders that guarded there understood the Fierce Beasts very clearly.
They were ruthless and terrifying creatures, and they were many times stronger than the people who were at the same level.
Seeing so many Fierce Beasts being released at the same time, a round of slaughter could not be avoided.
To think of the tens of thousands of disciples in the underground palace being slaughtered by the Fierce Beasts was not a pleasant thought.
"Why did you not remind me earlier?"
At that time, Su Rou's face also changed greatly. Her body rose and became the wind. When the stone doors opened, she already disappeared.
"Elder Li, what should we do?" Everyone's gazes landed on this aged elder.
"What else can we do? Hurry and go help!" Elder Li bellowed angrily and rushed out.


MGA Capitulo 4 – Even Fiercer than the Fierce Beasts
Chu Feng had heard of the infamous Fierce Beasts.
They were a type of creature that could cultivate. They were divided into nine ranks according to their strength, and they corresponded to the nine levels of the martial cultivators in the Spirit realm.
However, from rumours, the strength of a rank 3 Fierce Beast was far stronger than a martial cultivator who was in the 3rd level of the Spirit realm, and rank 3 Fierce Beasts could even be compared to cultivators at the 4th level of the Spirit realm.
That was why even if it was Chu Feng, he didn't dare to be arrogant. He knew that there was a mechanism in the main hall, and when it was triggered, the Fierce Beasts would appear.
*bang* Suddenly, a heavy noise resounded and the stone doors that locked the Fierce Beasts started to open.
"Strange. I didn't even enter the main hall. Why did the stone doors open?" Chu Feng was astonished.
*bang bang bang bang bang...* But quickly after, the 40 stone doors at the side of the main hall all opened.
That completely stunned Chu Feng. It was because in the darkness behind those stone doors, pairs after pairs of blood-red eyes opened and a heavy bloodlust filled the entire main hall.
"Damn, this isn't a joke is it?" Chu Feng cursed. He clearly heard that in the last round of every exam, there would be one Fierce Beast. But what was this situation?!
Waaa~~~ Chu Feng didn't have much time to think about it too much because in front of his eyes, densely packed shadows leaped out from the stone doors and entered the main hall.
He could clearly see that the shape of those creatures were similar to tigers but double their sizes.
Their entire body was jet-black and you could see their blade-like claws and ivory, as well as their pairs of blood-red eyes.
There were a total of 40 Fierce Beasts, and since their appearances were not too different, they should be of the same kind. But upon closer inspection, Chu Feng found out that there were strange lines on their forehead. Clearly, it was the mark of their rank.
Waa~ Just at that time, one of the Fierce Beast growled and cast its gaze towards the high platform in the deeper parts of the main hall.
Simultaneously, the gazes of all the Fierce Beasts were cast towards the high platform and they started to drool.
"Damn, you robbers." Seeing that, Chu Feng was angered. How could he let these Fierce Beasts take the precious treasures? With a curse, he rushed towards the platform.
Waa~ Just as Chu Feng entered the main hall, it quickly attracted the attention of the Fierce Beasts.
That was quite good for him. A total of forty Fierce Beasts all concurrently gave up on the Saint Spirit Grasses, and they all surrounded Chu Feng and attacked him. It was as if to them, the blood and flesh of humans was more attractive than some spiritual medicine.
"Move." One rank 2 Fierce Beast attacked head-on. But with a punch from Chu Feng, he blew off its head. It was unable to even survive a single strike.
However, also at the same time, quite a few Fierce Beast surrounded him and attacked. The terrifying killing intent was enough to make one's entire body tremble.
But Chu Feng did not panic. He was as vigorous as a monkey, jumping left and right as he went back and forth within the crowd of Fierce Beasts. Every time he attacked, there was at least 1 Fierce Beast that died.
At that time and moment, compared to the cruel Fierce Beasts, Chu Feng was an even scarier monster. Every part of his body was like an indestructible sharp weapon. Despite the rough skin and thick flesh of the Fierce Beasts, they could not withstand a strike from Chu Feng.
At that moment, Chu Feng could feel that not only was the endless spiritual energy surging in his body, there was also the 9-colored Divine Lightning that he loved and hated. It was this Divine Lightning who gave him such strong power and forged a perfect body for him.
*grr* Just as Chu Feng was killing furiously, a sharp growl came from behind.
When he turned around to look, he couldn't help but be surprised. The sharp claws of a huge Fierce Beast was heading towards his head.
That huge claw was different from the others as it was quite a bit stronger than the other Fierce Beasts. If he got caught in it, his brain would certainly shatter.
*whoosh* Chu Feng reflexively jumped back as he attempted to dodge the huge claw.
But the claw's speed was really too fast. Although Chu Feng's brain dodged the damage, the claws still landed on Chu Feng's chest.
"Ahh~~" Five bloody wounds were torn into his chest and the fatal pain made Chu Feng cry out loud.
"I will tear you apart." Other than feeling the pain, Chu Feng was even more angry.
He already saw that there were four lines on the forehead of the Fierce Beast that attacked him, indicating that it was a rank 4 Fierce Beast.
If he was some other person, then without a doubt, that person would turn around and run. Who cared if they were in the same level of cultivation? The power of the Fierce Beast would undoubtedly be stronger than the human's.
But not only did Chu Feng not escape, he even crazily pounced towards that Fierce Beast. The movement which had no care of his life made even the unintelligent Fierce Beast hesitate subconsciously.
*clang*
As the Fierce Beast hesitated, Chu Feng solidly landed a punch on its forehead.
But there wasn't the explosion of blood as expected. Rather, there was a loud sound, as if steel and iron collided.
Even Chu Feng felt a wave of achiness from his fist, and it was as though the punch didn't land on the head of the Fierce Beast, but rather landed on a copper and iron wall.
Waa~
Chu Feng's punch was no small matter. The Fierce Beast wailed and it even backed off a few steps. It was obvious that it also felt the pain.
"Die for me."
Seeing that his attacks had some effect, Chu Feng didn't hold back anymore. Swinging his arms, the after images of the punches filled the air flew in all directions and his heavy fists were like a storm. They continuously punched the body of the Fierce Beast.
It had to be mentioned that Chu Feng's exploding strength was too strong. Under the insane attacks, the Fierce Beast that was a few times larger than him was pushed back. The other Fierce Beasts that wanted to launch a surprise attack on him also undoubtedly received a punch, and got killed just like that.
At the end, all forty Fierce Beasts were completely killed by Chu Feng. Large amounts of bodies and heads were in strange areas, and their death were extremely wretched.
The body of the rank 4 Fierce Beast was still intact. However, its huge brain was deflated by Chu Feng as it was alive.
Hu..huhu The current Chu Feng was standing in a pool of blood and he was deeply gasping for air.
After that bloodbath, more frightening wounds appeared on his body but they werent enough to kill him. Other than the attack of the rank 4 Fierce Beast, the wounds caused from all the others were only simple bruises and they didn't even scratch him.
"How strong is this fearful body?"
It was a question that Chu Feng asked himself. Compared to those Fierce Beasts, he felt that he had steel for tendons and iron for bones.
That body exceeded the limits of humans, and once again, he recognized his specialness.
After looking around with his eyes, Chu Feng leaped on the tall platform. Without even looking at them, he took the martial skill book and the Saint Spirit Grasses.
After doing that, Chu Feng didn't plan to open the huge closed door. He went back towards the direction in which he came from and reentered the mechanism stage.
Before Chu Feng left for long, within the stone room that closed the Fierce Beasts, a dozen or so shadows walked out. The one who led person was Su Rou.
At that moment, whether it be Su Rou or the aged elders, their expression were very strange.
They only saw Chu Feng continuously hitting the already dead rank 4 Fierce Beast.
But to think that so many strong Fierce Beasts were only killed by one youth, it was unimaginable.
"Elder Li, who is that child?" Su Rou inquired.
Elder Li did not respond. He looked at the other elders behind him, but all the elders shook their head.
"You don't know what the name of such an outstanding disciple is?" Su Rou's brows wrinkled, showing some displeasement.
"There are simply too many outer court disciples. If he was hiding his strength, then we..." Elder Li's face was full of helplessness.
"Whatever. Hurry up and find out about his background then tell me."
"Also, if he doesn't want to expose his strength, then leave it as he wishes and don't let him know that we are trying to understand his power." Su Rou instructed.
"As you wish." Elder Li and the others respond respectfully. While facing this inner court elder, they didn't dare to be unrespectful.
Su Rou looked deeply and meaningfully at the direction in which Chu Feng left in, and only then did she enter the stone room while contemplating.


MGA Capitulo 5 – Azure Dragon Founder
After Su Rou and the other left, the main hall sunk into silence.
A moment later, rapid stepping sounds could be heard from outside of the hall and one disciple quickly ran over.
That person was Duan Yuxuan. But compared to the him before, it was like they were two completely different people.
Messy hair, full of sweat, panting heavily, and running towards the high platform as if he was crazy.
"Haha! At the end, I am the first! You little child Yang Tian Yu, you want to fight me?"
"I secretly endured in the outer court for 6 years. What was it for? I'll tell you right now, it's for these!"
Duan Yuxuan ran and cheered, as though he was possessed by a demon. His eyes were tightly glued to the tall platform and he didn't even notice the corpses of the Fierce Beasts in the hall.
*whoosh* He leaped and stably landed on the tall platform.
But just as he was full of smiles, after looking down, it was like a lightning in a clear sky, and he was instantly shocked.
It was because on that tall platform, it was completely empty! There wasn't even a single strand of hair!
"Damn, what's this?"
After a long while, he refocused. Only then did he noticed that fresh blood was everywhere and the corpse of forty Fierce Beasts were scattered in the hall.
The death of every Fierce Beast was very soul-shaking and extremely bloody.
That scene completely frightened him. With a poof he sat on the tall platform. He turned around and looked, but he discovered that the door to pass the exam wasn't opened.
"What is happening?" Duan Yuxuan didn't know what to think and his thoughts were all scrambled.
*tatata...* Just at that time, Yang Tian Yu also ran over, but just as he arrived at the entrance of the hall, he stopped.
After looking at the scene in the hall, he looked at the Duan Yuxuan on the platform. He stared with a blank face, "This...You did this?"
Duan Yuxuan lightly chuckled, then said bitterly, "If I said no, would you believe me?"
"Of course I would believe you. It would be impossible for you to have such strong strength." Yang Tian Yu shot him a glance and entered the hall. He examined the corpses of the Fierce Beasts, "God, there's even a rank 4 Fierce Beast here. Who's work is this?"
After observing for a good while, they couldn't find out the answer. They never would have knew that someone with so much power was within the outer court.
At the end, they even suspected that it was a situation planned by the elders and the elders took the reward for being first.
But when the level 3 Spirit realm disciple army arrived, the dramatic scene happened.
Everyone thought that it was Yang Tian Yu and Duan Yuxuan who killed the Fierce Beasts and the two of them divided the reward between them.
But then funny thing was, as they were facing the gazes of admiration from the crowd, Yang Tian Yu and Duan Yuxuan did not deny it. Just like that, they magically became first.
The huge door opened behind them opened and the cheers also came. Everyone was very happy because when they walked out of that huge door, they would become inner court disciples and a new life would come.
But just as people were cheering, a youth walked over and he attracted everyones attention.
He was completely naked and he was even crying. He cursed while filled with grievance, "Who the hell is so cruel? Not only did they knock me out, they even took my clothes! What is this madness?!"
As they looked at that scene, people were astonished. Only Chu Feng smiled and he slowly left the crowd while looking at his perfect, undamaged clothes.
The inner court exam had ended. There were over ten thousand people who participated, but there were only two thousand people who passed the exam. However, that was no small amount.
You only become a real Azure Dragon disciple after entering the inner court. At the same time, you would also receive a more preferable treatment.
To welcome the new disciples that entered the inner court, the elders even specially set up a banquet.
The round moon hung high up in the night sky. There was plenty of singing and dancing in the inner court, and that raised the happy mood to the highest point.
But Chu Feng did not join in the feast. He stayed within his new residence and he looked at his wound on his bare upper body.
The wound was healing and the healing speed was extremely fast. If it continued at that speed, it only needed a few days for it to make a full recovery. The healing power was given by the Divine Lightning.
"What are you? Why did you choose me?"
It wasn't the first time that Chu Feng asked it that question. He asked countless number of times before, but he never got an answer.
He still remembered the night five years ago. The sky of the Azure Province was enveloped by the 9-coloured lightning.
The sky was as bright as the day and the lightning dancing was like a dragon. The thunder in the sky roared and the ground trembled. People even thought that the world was ending and everything was in disarray under the panic.
But the Chu Feng who was only ten years old couldn't help but run out the door and he headed towards a spacious land.
Even until now, he did not know why he did that. It was as if there was some magic attracting him to go over to that place.
After that, the Divine Lightning attached onto his body.
No one saw it, but he knew the 9-coloured lightning that shook the entire world was inside his dantian.
That Divine Lightning gave Chu Feng such a strong body. However, Chu Feng did not understand why such a powerful thing was attached onto his body.
"Whatever, if you don't answer, I won't ask. You and me are one after all."
Chu Feng smiled with relief. It was luck and not misfortune, and if it was misfortune than he couldn't avoid it. If this Divine Lightning really wanted to do anything bad to him, then with his current power, he had no chance of resisting.
But up until now, the Divine Lightning had only brought benefits so he didn't bother thinking about it anymore.
Chu Feng put his clothes back on and cast his gaze at the book on the head of the bed. On the book, there were three big words. "Three Thunder Styles".
Chu Feng picked up the book and started to flip through it. It was the first time that he got in touch with a martial skill book so he was a bit excited in his heart.
"Rank 4 skill, Three Thunder Styles. Created by the Azure Dragon Founder."
"After mastering Lightning speed. Thunderous power. As strong as a rank 5 skill."
After looking at the short description, Chu Feng took in a breath of cold air and said surprisingly, "This is a skill that was created by the ancestor who founded this school!"
The Azure Dragon Founder was the founder of the Azure Dragon School. A thousand years ago, he was unrivaled as he travelled around the world. He had powers to fly in the sky, escape in the ground, move mountains, and fill oceans. He was a real expert in martial cultivation.
In that era, the Azure Dragon School that was lead by the Azure Dragon Founder could be said to be the 1 school in all of the Nine Provinces.
The only one who could resist against the Azure Dragon School was the current overlord of the Nine Provinces, the imperial court.
But the good scene did not last for long. After the Azure Dragon Founder passed away, the Azure Dragon School started to decline and it quickly fell from the ranks of the top schools of the Nine Provinces.
Today, even within the borders of the Azure Province, they were only a second class school. However, that really emphasized the personal strength of the Azure Dragon Founder.
The skill he created would certainly be quite a fine product within skill books. You could not get it with begging, but rather by chance instead.
As he was being excited, Chu Feng quickly read the training methods and swore to succeed in practicing the Three Thunder Styles.
Chu Feng did not sleep at all, but at least he understood the ways to train the Three Thunder Styles.
First style was form. The second style was intention. The third style could create lightning. All in all, to train in the Three Thunder Styles was extremely hard, but Chu Feng wanted to give it a try.
After some washing his face and rinsing his mouth, Chu Feng didn't feel sleepy so he headed towards the inner court's Martial Skill Building.
First of all, the Martial Skill Building had the facilities for training martial skills. Also, because he couldn't expose that he was training in the Three Thunder Styles, he needed to train in another martial skill to fool people.
"This is quite lively." He walked into the Martial Skill Building, and suddenly, there was a huge opening. It was overcrowded in the vast main hall of the Martial Skill Building.
But that was reasonable. After all, there were two thousand or so disciples that joined in the inner court yesterday. Those new disciples probably wanted to cultivate some martial skills.
The Martial Skill Building was divided into six floors. The 1st floor for choosing rank 1 skills, the 2nd floor for choosing rank 2 skills, the 3rd floor for choosing rank 3 skills, and for floor 4, 5, and 6, they were areas for cultivating the martial skills.
Chu Feng kept on going up. He found out that the 1st floor was packed with people. The 2nd floor was a lot better, and as for the 3rd floor , there were very few people.
That was all within expectations. Although it was said that the different ranks of the martial skills had different powers, the training difficulty was different as well.
That was why a lot of people who entered the inner court would start training in the rank 1 skills, then after they mastered it they would choose the rank 2s, then lastly the rank 3s.
But Chu Feng's goal was very clear. Even if the martial skill was only for defense, Chu Feng had to choose the strongest.
"Young man, I recommend that you don't bite off more than you can chew. The skills in here are not suited for you." But just as Chu Feng stepped onto the 3rd floor, an aged voice entered his ears.


MGA Capitulo 6 – Don't Tell Me It's Him?
He looked over towards the source of the sound. At the entrance of the 3rd floor, an old man who had white hair, white brows, and a white beard was staring him.
Chu Feng knew that he was an elder who guarded the Martial Skill Building. Although he seemed to be almost a hundred years old, the elder's strength was very strong.
"Thank you for your reminder, but I have my own plans." After respectfully saluting to the elder, he walked in.
[TN By saluting, it meant the Chinese salute of cupping one hand over the other.]
"Ahh, another arrogant disciple." The elder who was guarding shook his head with disappointment.
He had seen many disciples just like Chu Feng and most of them ended in failure. The ones that failed lightly fixed their ways, but the ones that failed heavily completely walked on the wrong path and forfeited their good future.
But even so, when the elder saw a new face coming in, he would kindly remind them to avoid any more disciples going on the wrong path.
Chu Feng walked around on the 3rd level, and he quickly picked a skill book that he liked and brought it up to the elder to register it.
"Are you sure you want to train in this Illusionary Palm?" The elder looked at Chu Feng with doubt.
"Mm." Chu Feng smiled and nodded.
"Did you look over the description of this skill?" The elder continued to ask.
"I have seen it." Chu Feng smiled once again.
"Yet you still choose it? This is the hardest one in the entire Martial Skill Building." The elder really did not understand.
"This is exactly the one that I want to train in." Chu Feng still hung his smile on his face, but his gaze was abnormally resolute.
"Sigh, the youth these days really don't know their limits." The elder sighed, but he still registered for Chu Feng. After giving back the skill book, he added, "Remember to know what point to stop."
Chu Feng nodded, representing that he accepted the advice. Although the elder was always doubting Chu Feng, Chu Feng had a very good impression of him and he felt that he was a responsible elder.
"Hm?"
But just as Chu Feng turned around, a familiar body rubbed his shoulder and passed. It was Duan Yuxuan and his face was extremely ugly.
Chu Feng did not know him well, so he didn't think any more about it. But just as he prepared to leave, he heard whispers behind him, and then he also understood why Duan Yuxuan was depressed.
"Isn't that Duan Yuxuan? I thought he already had a rank 4 skill book, so why is he here choosing another skill book? Or is the rank 4 skill book on Yang Tian Yu?"
"You don't know? In the feast last night, the inner court elders reminded them that the rank 4 skill book cannot be shared and only one person could train in it. "
"After they heard the elder say that, the both of them just looked blank. Then, they finally confessed to the crowd. It turned out that they werent first in the exam and there was another person that killed the forty Fierce Beasts."
"So something like that happened. But why did they admit in doing it at the start?"
"Ahh, who knows. Maybe they wanted face, but this time they really lost all of it."
"True. But who was first? I don't recall that someone was so strong in the outer court?"
"Forty Fierce Beasts...And there was even a rank 4 in one of them. It really is unimaginable on how tough that person would be."
As he listened to that, Chu Feng smiled and shook his head while walking to the next floor. He really wanted to start training.
The 4th floor was the same as the 1st It was also overcrowded. The new disciples were currently choosing the skill books so these were the older disciples.
Chu Feng looked over. Although it was said to be a floor, it could be better said to be a martial arts training ground. There were at least a thousand people training with mechanisms and their yelling extended in all directions. It was quite spectacular.
Also, other than the thousands of mechanisms in the main hall, there were countless private rooms which were also for training.
It was a pretty good design. The ones that liked to be lively could join in with the people in the main hall and they could help each other as they sparred.
The ones who enjoyed the silence could choose a private room and train there by themselves. After the stone door closed, they would be isolated from all the disturbances.
Chu Feng did not join them and he went straight to the 6th floor. It was similar to the 3rd floor but it was a lot more quiet. There were also a lot more places for training.
Chu Feng entered a private room. After closing the stone door, he bowed to the mechanism pillar because he knew that the pillar was going to be ruined by him.
The mechanism pillar was made out of steel and wood so it was extremely sturdy. If it was attacked, it would automatically dodge.
The dodging speed changed according to the opponent's attacking speed. Unless one perfected in cultivating a martial skill, it was very hard to damage it, thus it was the best equipment for training.
"Illusionary Palm. Using the power of the wind from the palm to formlessly control the enemy."
Chu Feng looked over the cultivating method for the Illusionary Palm. Then, he went in front of the mechanism pillar.
*whoosh whoosh* He suddenly extended his hands and he saw that his palm created two traces. They attacked towards two points on the mechanism pillar.
*swoosh swoosh* But just as they were going to land, the pillar swayed left and right, dodging Chu Feng's attack with lightning speed.
At that instant, Chu Feng couldn't help but be at a slight loss, but then he quickly smiled with relief, "Interesting."
From that day forth, other than eating and sleeping, Chu Feng would always be in the Martial Skill Building and he trained non-stop.
The Three Thunder Styles, created by the founder of the Azure Dragon School. Although it was extremely mysterious, it was also extremely hard to cultivate in.
As for the Illusionary Palm, there was a reason why the elder called it as the hardest skill to train in the entire Martial Skill Building.
However, after training for a while, Chu Feng slowly understood the nature of the two skills.
The Three Thunder Styles. It was extremely tough and fierce. It was as fast as lightning, and as strong as thunder. Every move and every style could take the life of the enemy, and it was very mighty.
The Illusionary Palm. It was actually the complete opposite. Replacing the reality and attacking when they get caught off guard.
Although it wasn't as valiant as the Three Thunder Styles, it was still quite the skill and they were different in their own ways.
After a good ten days of minimal meals and sleeping, Chu Feng finally grasped the two types of skills.
Although it couldn't be said that he perfected the Illusionary Palm, there wasn't much difference to it. On the other hand, he only successfully trained in the first two style of the Three Thunder Styles.
But even so, when Chu Feng successfully used the 2nd style, he was shocked by the strong power.
On the 3rd floor in the Martial Skill Building. The elder who guarded was still the same and Chu Feng was returning the Illusionary Palm.
"What, did you reach a dead end?" The elder looked at Chu Feng with a bit of mock in his eyes and the corner of his mouth showed that he was a bit proud of himself.
Chu Feng did not reply and just smiled. But in the elder's eyes, Chu Feng's smile meant that he silently confirmed it.
"Go to the 1st floor and start from the rank 1 skills..." Taking back the skill book, the elder reminded with goodwill.
"Thank you elder." Chu Feng saluted and took his leave.
"He knows when to back off, so he still understands a bit." Looking at the departing back of Chu Feng, the elder nodded.
The Martial Skill Building was not open for the entire day. When the sun setted, the Martial Skill Building would close, and at that time, all the elder guards would need to check the skill books and the mechanisms.
"What's this fuss about that needs me to personally go and see?"
"Elder Ouyang, you have to check this out. I haven't seen such a strong disciple in such a long time."
On the staircase, a middle-aged man was leading a white-haired elder and they were heading towards a private room on the 6th floor.
Within the private room, the indestructible mechanism pillar was full of dents and it was almost able to be scraped.
As he saw at the mechanism pillar, the white-haired elder's face became extremely heavy and he looked at it carefully.
"This is..." But as he found out that there were shallow palm marks one after the other on the mechanism, he couldn't help but be astonished.
With his experience, he could instantly tell that the pillar was damaged by the Illusionary Palm. But in the inner court, there were very few disciples that could train the Illusionary Palm to that degree.
Also, those who were able to already left to experience the outside world and pretty much none of them remained in the Martial Skill Building to train.
After some deep thinking, the eyes of the elder suddenly lit up and he said with shock, "Don't tell me it's him?"


MGA Capitulo 7 – Spiritual Medicine Hunt
It turned out that this Ouyang elder was the elder that registered for Chu Feng.
However, he also had another identity. The director of the Martial Skill Building.
He felt that the one who damaged the mechanism pillar like this could have been Chu Feng, but then after some careful thinking he felt that it wasn't right.
After all, Chu Feng had only trained the Illusionary Palm for ten days. After only ten days, it was impossible to be able to use it to such degree.
"Elder Ouyang, look at this." Just as he was thinking hard and unable to understand, a call came from the private room right next to his.
But the pillar just now wasn't even the important part. Ouyang was astonished once again, because the mechanism pillar in the adjacent private room was completely destroyed.
"Three Thunder Styles, the 2nd style."
"No one from the outer court can train in this skill." This time, Ouyang's face became serious.
Three Thunder Styles. It was a skill that only the core disciples could train in. Now it appeared in the outer court, which more or less meant that there were core disciples that leaked this skill to the outer court.
But after some more precise thinking, he felt that it was impossible. The rules of the Azure Dragon School were very strict. If someone privately leaked the skill book out, it could be found out very easily. The core disciples wouldnt be so foolish to do those kinds of things.
"It is possible that..." Finally, Ouyang found a trace of possibility. He said to the elder behind him, "Request for Elder Su Rou."
At the same time, Chu Feng was cultivating in his own room.
After two hours of refining, he continuously refined three Saint Spirit Grasses. If someone saw that scene, they would certainly be speechless.
Even for masters, to refine one Saint Spirit Grass required at least one day, but Chu Feng didn't even need one hour.
Also, the Saint Spirit Grass the Chu Feng refined would all be absorbed by the dantian and nothing would be wasted.
Even martial cultivating masters couldn't do that. It was said that if a normal person refined a Saint Spirit Grass, it was already very good if they could absorb 50% of the spiritual energy.
"It seems like the price for getting your power is extremely huge." But even so, Chu Feng was a bit helpless.
It was because after refining the three Saint Spirit Grasses, he didn't even feel a single trace of having a breakthrough. He even felt that his dantian was empty!
If he was a normal person, and he if completely absorbed the spiritual energy from the three Saint Spirit Grasses, he would have pretty much went from the 4th level of the Spirit realm to the 5th level of the Spirit realm.
That indicated a problem. Although the Divine Lightning gave Chu Feng strength that exceeded normal people, to rise in cultivation levels, Chu Feng also needed to pay the cost that exceeded normal people.
Spiritual energy. Although Chu Feng could condense it, but even with months of non-stop cultivation would not be as good as a the spiritual energy contained in a single Saint Spirit Grass.
This showed the price that Chu Feng had to pay if he wanted to raise his cultivation level. It would also be a huge problem in his future.
"Ahh, is this the so-called ‘There are detriments to all advantages'?"
Chu Feng really wanted to refine the two Saint Spirit Grass as he looked at them on the head of his bed. But, he didn't do that because he prepared to give them to Chu Yue.
"Chu Yue should be stepping into the 5th level of the Spirit realm soon. These two Saint Spirit Grasses should give her a hand." After some hesitation, Chu Feng put away the Saint Spirit Grasses, blew the candle and slept.
The morning on the next day. Chu Feng already woke up early, so he pocketed the Saint Spirit Grasses and wanted to find Chu Yue.
But sadly, the inner court was really too big and the amount of inner court disciples was rumoured to be even more than the amount of outer court disciples. There was at least a hundred thousand inner court disciples.
Within the vast group of palaces that filled the eye as far as it could see, to try to find a person here was like fishing a needle from an ocean.
"Brother. Say...Do we join an alliance or not? This is the Spiritual Medicine Hunt, and more power comes from more people."
"Once you enter an alliance, it's really hard to get away from it. In the future, if the alliance has troubles, we would get dragged into together."
"That is true. Whatever, let's register at the plaza first." Two young males that seemed to be brothers passed Chu Feng, but their conversation made Chu Feng very happy.
"Seniors, you just said that the Spiritual Medicine Hunt's registration is starting?" Chu Feng went up and asked.
"That's right. Every year, the time of the hunt is always different so this year's was earlier than last year's."
"You seem to be a new disciple this year? If you want to register, come with us." That senior was fairly friendly.
"Sorry to trouble you two." Chu Feng politely smiled and he was quite joyful.
The so-called Spiritual medicine was medicine that contained spiritual energy. There were different types, and spiritual medicine was divided into low quality, medium quality, high quality, and top quality. The Saint Spirit Grass that Chu Feng had was a high quality spiritual medicine.
The Spiritual Medicine Hunt was a welfare for the inner court disciples by the Azure Dragon School.
In a certain area on the Azure Dragon Mountain Range, there were large amounts of spiritual medicine, and that area was called the Spiritual Medicine Mountain.
Spiritual Medicine Mountain. It was originally the forbidden lands of the Azure Dragon School, but every year, they would open it up and all inner court disciples could register and join.
It was called the Spiritual Medicine Hunt because the Spiritual medicine had spiritual natures. They could hide in the ground, run away with extreme speed, and they even had strong attacks so it was quite difficult to pick them.
The current Chu Feng needed spiritual medicines the most, and the more the merrier. Conveniently, the Spiritual Medicine Hunt started, and it could be said to be an enormous good news.
"Junior, it seems that you haven't joined in an alliance yet. Are you preparing to hunt by yourself?" One of the brother was looking up and down at Chu Feng.
"Is there anything wrong with that?" Chu Feng didn't understand.
"I'll be honest. This hunt is not something that can be done by one person, so I suggest that you join in an alliance." The two brothers kindly gave him advice.
The so-called alliance was an organization created by the inner court disciples. Because these organizations could pull the relationships closer between disciples, the Azure Dragon School did not oppose it, and instead, they encouraged it.
"I've just joined in the inner court, so I don't understand the things about alliances too well. I wonder which alliance in the inner court are strong?" Chu Feng asked with curiosity.
"Haha, you've asked the right person. Us two have done a lot of investigation on many of the inner court alliances."
"According to our investigation, there are around a thousand or so alliances and the title of the strongest belongs to the World Alliance and the Sword Alliance."
"The World Alliance has the most amount of members, reaching at least five thousand people. Over there, there are a few people that have ‘World' behind their back and they are members of the World Alliance."
"There are less members in the Sword Alliance, but there are still at least a thousand people. The sword alliance is a bit special. If you want to join them, you must have trained in the martial skills that use the sword as power. The people over there who have a black iron sword behind their back are members of the Sword Alliance."
"They are called the strongest not only because they have a lot of people. The important part is that the founders of the two alliances are well-known in our Azure Dragon School."
"Those two people became core disciples ten years ago. The core disciples these days are very well-known people, and with them as support, very little people dare to act against the people from the World Alliance and the Sword Alliance."
"Brother, you're a bit wrong. Although the World Alliance and the Sword Alliance have strong power, I think that the strongest is the Wings Alliance." Just as the elder brother was describing vividly and colourfully, the younger brother had an opinion and interrupted.
"Although the Wings Alliance are strong, they have too little people. ‘Two fists cannot fight four hands', and if there really was a conflict, they could not be the opponent of the World Alliance and the Sword Alliance." The elder brother shook his head.
"That may not be so. Although the Wings Alliance have little people, they are like dragons within men and they have the ability to attack a hundred with one. I feel that even if the World Alliance and the Sword Alliance joined hands, they might not be able to defeat the Wings Alliance." The younger brother retorted.
"What is this Wings Alliance?" Seeing as the two of them did not rest in their debates, Chu Feng got more and more curious as he listened.
"Junior, listen to me. The Wings Alliance are the legends in our inner court." Seeing that, the younger brother held onto Chu Feng and started to narrate as his saliva splattered everywhere.


MGA Capitulo 8 – Coincidentally Meeting Chu Yue
"The Wings Alliance rarely recruit members, but when they do, the people they recruit are like the dragon within men."
"Although the Wings Alliance only has thirty-two people, within the inner court, they are very well-known people."
"Also, their hearts are one, and they look at each other like an extension of their hands and feet. Whoever dares to make a move against the members of the Wings Alliance, no matter who it is, they will have their revenge."
"Two years ago, a third-rate school in the Azure Province harmed a member of the Wings Alliance. The one that exterminated the school was also the Wings Alliance."
"That strong?" Listening to that point, Chu Feng was also astonished. Although a third-rate school could not be compared to the Azure Dragon School, it still had quite some power. To be able to exterminate them showed that the Wings Alliance were very strong.
"Also, although the founders of the World Alliance and the Sword Alliance are very strong, but compared to the founder of the Wings Alliance, there's a huge difference."
"According to the rumours, the founder of the Wings Alliance entered the inner court at the age of 11, became a core disciple at the age of 14, and was the 1 disciple at the age of 16 in the Azure Dragon School."
"But sadly, he is no longer in the Azure Dragon School. In the year that he was sixteen, he left this place and no one knew where he went." As he talked about things like that, the younger brother seemed to be rather regretful.
"Who was that person called?" Chu Feng was amazed even more. Core disciples were important figures of the Azure Dragon School and every one of them could be said to be geniuses in martial cultivation.
The founder of the Wings Alliance became the strongest within the core disciples at the age of 16. How outstanding was that person?
"His name is Zhang Tianyi." The younger brother said his name one word at a time.
"Zhang Tianyi." Chu Feng remembered that name because he was qualified to be remembered by Chu Feng.
"That's right, I heard that our inner court beauty Elder Su Rou is also one of the members of the Wings Alliance, and she is also one of the strongest within the core disciples."
"Also, other than Elder Su Rou, within today's core disciples, there are a lot of people who belong to the Wings Alliance. All of their achievements are not inferior to the founders of the World Alliance or the Sword Alliance. Isn't the Wings Alliance strong?" The younger brother continued saying.
"If you say it like that, then this Wings Alliance is really strong. Are there any special symbols for the members of the Wings Alliance?" Chu Feng was getting more and more interested in this Wings Alliance.
"It's rare to see anyone from the Wings Alliance, but on their chest, they would wear a small badge, and a pair of wings are on that badge."
The three of them chatted as they walked, and soon, they arrived at the plaza that was filled with people. It was the place to register for the Spiritual Medicine Hunt.
Actually, the so-called registration was writing your own name on a wall scroll then taking a token. There were no elders there.
"Junior, the Spiritual Medicine Hunt starts tomorrow. So, I'm thinking that you should join in an alliance and request for shelter."
"Ill give you a word of advice. Don't think of joining an alliance like the Wings Alliance because we won't even have a single chance in our lifetime."
"No need to even mention the Wings Alliance. The World Alliance and the Sword Alliance are not easy to enter as well."
"So, if you want to join an alliance, you need to keep your eyes open." After registering, the two brothers started to take advantage of the mood again.
"Please give me some pointers." Seeing that the brothers were so friendly, Chu Feng couldn't bear to not give them face.
"Although the stronger alliances are harder to enter, you cannot choose a weak one. For example, you should never enter those who say how good their alliance are to one person after the other. Those alliances could not even protect you and you would only get bullied."
"Like that girl who's giving bamboo sheets to everyone. With a glance, you could tell that she's from some weak little alliance and they're here to trick the new disciples." Saying that, the elder brother pointed towards a purple-clothed young female from nearby.
Looking over to the direction that he was pointing at, Chu Feng couldn't help but look blankly. That purple-clothed young female was Chu Yue.
"Chu Yue!" Seeing her, Chu Feng yelled excitedly.
After hearing Chu Feng's yells, Chu Yue turned her head to look. When she saw Chu Feng, she also was joyful and as she waved, she yelled, "Chu Feng!"
Chu Feng wanted to find Chu Yue, but he never would have thought that they would meet at a place like that. So, he hurriedly walked over to Chu Yue.
"Ahh, hes finished. Another idiot has been tricked. We've wasted our time after talking to him for so long." Seeing that, the pair of brothers looked at each other with their four eyes and shook their head.
"Chu Feng, you've finally entered the inner court, this is great! We can finally start training together." As she looked at Chu Feng's purple clothing, Chu Yue was so happy that her heart could jump. From the bottom of her heart, she was happy for Chu Feng.
"Chu Yue, what are you doing?" Chu Feng was fairly curious as he gazed at the bamboo sheets.
"Oh, you still don't know huh? Chu Wei created an alliance in the inner court called the Chu Alliance."
"All the people from the Chu family are in this Chu Alliance. But even so, there are still too little people in our alliance."
"So, taking advantage of this year's new disciples that are entering the inner court, I want to try to pull some more people to enter our Chu Alliance and increase our power. After all, if the Chu Alliance has a good development, in the future, it will help our Chu Family greatly." Chu Yue explained while smiling.
The Chu Wei that Chu Yue mentioned was a young elder brother in the Chu family. He was twenty years old this year, and ten years ago, he entered the Azure Dragon School.
However, Chu Feng did not have a good impression on that Chu Wei, as Chu Wei was one of the people that bullied him a lot when he was younger.
"I'll help you." Although he didn't like Chu Wei, Chu Feng didn't want Chu Yue to work too hard.
"It's fine, it's really fine. You don't understand the situation in the Chu Alliance so I can do it myself." Chu Yue smiled while declining, then asked with concern, "That's right. Chu Feng, did you register in the Spiritual Medicine Hunt?"
"Look at this." Chu Feng smiled, and took out the token for the Spiritual Medicine Hunt.
"That's great! This time, I can go with you and catch the spiritual medicines. I'll tell you this. Catching the spiritual medicine is a battle of wits and bravery and it's very interesting." As she mentioned the Spiritual Medicine Hunt, Chu Yue seemed to really look forward to it.
"Chu Feng, I'll be getting busy. At night, come and find me. I have something that I want to say to you so you have to come."
Chu Yue saw another new disciple walking pass, so she quickly stuffed a bamboo sheet into Chu Feng's hands and walked over to that new disciple and introduced the Chu Alliance to him.
Seeing Chu Yue insisting like that, Chu Feng didn't force the issue. On that bamboo sheet, the location of Chu Yue's residence was written on it.
Walking in the plaza and scanning through the crowds, he found out that there were quite a few people who were like Chu Yue that advertised their alliance.
But very little people cared about them. Since everyone wasn't an idiot, unless they couldn't enter the stronger alliances, very little people would choose to join small alliances like that.
The so-called Chu Alliance only had Chu Yue herself recruiting members. Even the founder, Chu Wei, did not appear. It showed that only Chu Yue thought about the Chu family.
Night came so Chu Feng went to Chu Yue's residence as planned. Chu Yue was walking back and forth outside the residence and it was obvious that she was waiting for someone.
When Chu Yue saw Chu Feng, she put both of her hands behind her back while skipping and jumping her way over.
Although Chu Yue was one year older than Chu Feng, she was still at the prime of her youth. Not only was her appearance beautiful, her character was also lively and cheerful.
In the Chu family, Chu Yue could be said to be a clown. No matter if it was the old or young, they all liked this little strange girl.
As she arrived in front of Chu Feng, Chu Yue opened her hands and said while laughing, "Hey, hurry and pick it up."
Between her two white palms was a Saint Spirit Grass.


MGA Capitulo 9 – I Testify for Him
"Chu Yue, this..." Chu Feng was speechless.
"Yes, this. This is for you from me, and its my supplement for this year." As Chu Yue spoke, she forced the Saint Spirit Grass into Chu Feng's hands.
"If it's like that, I can't have it. Did you forget that I still owe you two Saint Spirit Grasses?" Chu Feng pushed the Saint Spirit Grass back, and as he said that, he pulled one out from his pocket.
"Chu Feng, you didn't refine the Saint Spirit Grass?" Looking at the intact Saint Spirit Grass, Chu Yue thought that it was the one that she gave Chu Feng.
"Mm, I've already broke through so I don't need it for now. I might as well return it back to you."
"How can I take your Saint Spirit Grass? These are yours, so hurry up and take it."
"Chu Yue, I said that I would return two, so I will return two. Didnt you promise as well? You're making things very hard for me when you're like this."
"But you didn't even use the Saint Spirit Grass that you gave me, and instead, you give me yours. Isn't that just me taking advantage of you?"
"Chu Yue, I understand your kind meanings. In the entire Chu family, besides my elder brother and my father, you treat me the best. Just view this as a younger brother showing you respect."
That was said from the bottom of Chu Feng's heart. Everyone in the Chu family pushed him aside, so it really moved him when Chu Yue could treat him with kindness.
Seeing that Chu Feng was so determined, on Chu Yue's face, colours of shame emerged on her face as she said quietly,
"Chu Feng, you doing this really makes me feel very ashamed. Actually...This Saint Spirit Grass isn't from me. Chu Guyu asked me to represent him to give it to you."
"My brother?" Chu Feng couldn't help but look blankly for a moment.
Chu Guyu was Chu Yuan's blood-related child and he was Chu Feng's elder brother.
He was training in the "Lingyun School", the 1 school in the Azure Province. He was at the 6th level of the Spirit realm at the age of seventeen and he was the strongest person in the Chu family's young generation.
Although Chu Feng wasn't Chu Yuan's blood-related child, Chu Guyu still treated him as his own younger brother, and he was one of the most respected and loved people by Chu Feng.
"He was afraid that you would be burdened, so he instructed me to not say that it was from him. But now, I have to say the truth." Chu Yue's face was red, and it could be seen that she was really ashamed.
"Chu Yue, even so, I still have to thank you. Although this Saint Spirit Grass may not be from you, your feelings from all these years towards me are. Like I said, just take it as your younger brother giving respect to you by giving these two Saint Spirit Grasses to you."
"Besides, you're going to enter the 5th level of the Spirit realm soon so this Saint Spirit Grass is more important to you. Because of that, don't refuse this Saint Spirit Grass." Chu Feng still firmly continued to put the Saint Spirit Grass in Chu Yue's hands.
"In that case, I'll only look at this as me borrowing a Saint Spirit Grass, but I can only borrow one because I can only afford to give one back." Seeing Chu Feng so insisted, Chu Yue gnashed her teeth and she could only take one of the Saint Spirit Grass.
In reality, what Chu Feng said was correct. Chu Yue was going to enter the 5th level of the Spirit realm soon and at that moment, it was a crucial stage. This Saint Spirit Grass was indeed very important to her.
"Done." Chu Feng smiled.
"That's right. Chu Feng, Chu Guyu had a letter that he wanted me to give to you." Chu Yue took a letter out from her waist.
As he accepted the letter, Chu Feng felt a burst of emotions. He hadn't returned to the Chu family in five years, which meant that he hadn't seen his father and his elder brother in five years. He did not return because he felt that he was too shameful to see them.
But in the five years, his brother and his father would write him a letter almost every single month. It showed how those two thought of Chu Feng.
"Okay, read the letter when you get back. Hurry up and follow me because today is a good day!" Chu Yue grabbed Chu Feng's arms and pulled him towards the residence.
But before even getting close, Chu Feng started frowning. He heard lots of familiar sounds in the residence and those were all people that he did not like.
Indeed, in the instant that the door to the residence opened, there were thirty-two faces there. A large portion of them were familiar faces, and almost all the members of the Chu family who were disciples of the Azure Dragon School were here.
As for the few strangers, Chu Feng could guess where they came from. They must be the new members of the Chu Alliance.
"Everyone! See who's here!" Chu Yue yelled happily.
When the gazes of the crowd were cast over to that direction, Chu Feng could feel that they was filled with disdain and hate.
"Oh, I wondered who it was. Isn't it the person who performed outstanding deeds to our Chu family?" One youth walked over to Chu Feng.
It was Chu Cheng, and he was Chu Zhen's elder brother. He entered the Azure Dragon School at the same time as Chu Yue, and he was also in the 4th level of the Spirit realm.
"Chu Feng, you've done the deeds. You know that?" Chu Cheng pointed at Chu Feng and his gaze was not kind.
"Chu Cheng, what are you talking about? Today is a rejoiceful day so don't speak nonsense." Chu Yue quickly spoke.
"What's wrong Chu Yue? You're not letting me talk about all his deeds?" Chu Cheng shot Chu Yue a glance, then looked at Chu Feng, "Chu Feng, did you know that youve done the deeds? Damn. You've done great deeds."
"You've stayed as an outer court disciple for five years in the Azure Dragon School and you have disgraced the Chu family. But even so, you still have face to join in this Chu Alliance gathering. How thick is the skin of your face?"
"Chu Cheng, shut up." Chu Yue was a bit angry, but before letting her say anymore, Chu Feng pulled her.
Chu Feng's face did not change, but at the end he lightly smiled and said, "You're thinking too much. I have no interest in your gathering. I am demanding a payment here today."
"Payment? What payment?" After hearing those words, Chu Cheng's face instantly changed.
"That's quite funny. A person taken in my Chu family is actually demanding a payment from the Chu family. Do you not know who gave you what you have right now?"
"That's right, too shameless." At the same time, the people from the Chu family started criticizing Chu Feng.
Chu Feng ignored the words of the crowd, and as he walked into the residence, he said,
"A few days ago, a certain person made a bet with me, and bet that I wouldnt pass the inner court disciple exam. He even said if he lost, he would give the yearly supplemented Saint Spirit Grass to me."
"Chu Zhen, you didn't forget about that right?" Chu Feng stopped in front of Chu Zhen.
Chu Zhen was sitting on a chair while chewing on some fruits in his mouth. However, the corner of his mouth twitched and his face was extremely ugly.
Of course, Chu Zhen did not forget the things that he said that day. Since he was afraid that Chu Feng would mention that matter, he honestly stayed here. Or else, with his temper, he would have searched Chu Feng out for trouble already.
"Chu Feng, you need evidence for your words." Just at that time, a young man next to Chu Zhen opened his mouth.
In the residence, most of the males and females were as old as Chu Feng, but this young man was not. Indeed, he was Chu Wei.
"Chu Wei is correct. If you made a bet with Chu Zhen, you need to pull out the evidence or else you are only spitting out false accusations." Chu Cheng yelled out first because he was Chu Zhen's elder brother.
"That's right, take out the evidence, or else don't think of walking out here today." After Chu Cheng, pretty much everyone from the Chu family in the hall started yelling.
Even the non-Chu family members also joined in. Although they were not be part of the Chu family, they could tell that Chu Feng's position in the Chu family was very low. If his own family was looking down on him, then naturally, they would as well.
"I testify for Chu Feng." But just at that time, Chu Yue who did not speak for a long time suddenly spoke.


MGA Capitulo 10 – Failing to Honor a Debt
At that instant, the hall went into complete silence and all the gazes were cast towards Chu Yue.
"Chu Yue, what did you say? You cannot speak such nonsense to testify."
As Chu Wei said that, his dense gaze was filled with implications of warning. His meaning was very clear and it was to make Chu Yue say the truth.
"I am not speaking nonsense. That day, when Chu Zhen and Chu Feng made the bet, I was there and it was even Chu Zhen who let me be a witness."
After that, Chu Yue was not afraid of Chu Wei at all. She stood next to Chu Feng, as if hiddenly telling the crowd which side she was standing on.
At that moment, not only Chu Zhen, even Chu Cheng, Chu Wei and most of the Chu family's faces were starting to change.
They never would have thought that Chu Yue would do this for Chu Feng and she was even willing to go against the entire Chu family crowd.
In reality, even Chu Feng felt a bit surprised since by doing this, Chu Yue would offend a lot of people. But other than that, Chu Feng felt moved.
"Chu Zhen, are you failing to honor your debt?" Chu Feng continued to pressure him. With Chu Yue as a witness, he did not believe that Chu Zhen would deny it.
‘"I..." Chu Zhen's face was extremely ugly and he did not know how to reply.
Every year, the family only supplemented one Saint Spirit Grass. Other than the one, they did not have any other chances to get such a good spiritual medicine.
He just got his supplemented Saint Spirit Grass and Chu Zhen was preparing to use it to make a breakthrough into the 4th level of the Spirit realm. How could he give it up to someone?
"Hmph, so what if it's true?"
"You entered the Azure Dragon School at the same time as Chu Zhen. He already entered the inner court two years ago and you are a full two years late."
"What, after using that much time to enter the inner court, you're still arrogant? You want to extort Chu Zhen's supplement?" Chu Cheng coldly smiled and cunningly argued. As Chu Zhen's elder brother, it was obvious that he wouldn't let Chu Feng take away his brother's supplement.
"Don't tell me that. Your brother should know what is happening."
"If you are failing to honor your debt, just admit it. I can forget about it. But you need him to personally admit that his words are like fart and they are absolutely untrustable." Chu Feng did not let him go.
"You..." With those words, Chu Zhen was really gnashing his teeth out of anger yet he could not refute him since it was true.
"Haha! Jokes! Failing to honor a debt? Have I ever mentioned anything about that?"
"You can have Chu Zhen's Saint Spirit Grass, but you need to admit in front of the crowd that you are a useless garbage. An idiot that needed five years to enter the inner court."
"Everyone, am I correct?" Chu Cheng yelled loudly.
"That's right, Chu Cheng is right."
"That's right, if you want to take the Saint Spirit Grass, you need to admit that you are garbage. As long as you admit it, then we'll just give it as pity to a beggar." Chu Cheng raised his hands and yelled, and naturally, everyone yelled in response.
In the Chu family, excluding Chu Yuan, Chu Guyu and Chu Yue, pretty much no one liked Chu Feng and they all wanted him out of the Chu family.
So no matter how excessive it was, as long as it was related to Chu Feng, they would support it. They all wanted Chu Feng to feel horrible.
"Chu Cheng, don't create trouble without a reason. This is a private matter between Chu Zhen and Chu Feng so all of you are not qualified to interrupt." Chu Yue scolded.
"We are not qualified, yet you are? You are the elder sister of Chu Zhen, but even so, you supported an outsider. Are you still even part of the Chu family?" Chu Cheng maliciously and fiercely refuted.
"I only look at the case and not the person. In any case, Chu Feng is not an outsider. He is part of the Chu family."
"You clearly know whether or not he is part of the Chu family. However, I can tell you that Chu Zhen is your own brother."
"You don't even bother to reason!" Chu Yue was so angered by Chu Cheng that her entire body was trembling.
But just at that time, Chu Feng put his hands on Chu Yue shoulders, and moved her behind him.
Although the current Chu Feng had the same smile as always on his face, his gaze became serious and he said calmly,
"I will only ask you one question. Will you give this Saint Spirit Grass to me or no?"
"Ho.. Chu Feng, don't say that we are making things hard for you, but you really are not qualified to take Chu Zhen's Saint Spirit Grass."
"How about this... I'll give you a chance. Duel a bit with Chu Zhen. If you win, that shows that you are qualified to take away this Saint Spirit Grass."
"Chu Yue, don't say that I'm not speaking reason. I'll even take my own Saint Spirit Grass out. If Chu Feng can win, then these are all his." While saying that, Chu Cheng put the Saint Spirit Grass from his pocket onto the table.
Also at the same time, Chu Cheng shot a glance at Chu Zhen. Chu Zhen instantly understood and he also put his Saint Spirit Grass onto the table.
"Chu Zhen, you've entered the inner court for two years, and you've also cultivated two skills."
"On the other hand, Chu Feng just entered the inner court. Don't you feel ashamed dueling with him? You just aren't willing to give it up." Chu Yue still felt that it was unfair towards Chu Feng.
"Shut up. You don't have any part in this." Chu Cheng threateningly pointed at Chu Yue, then narrowed his eyes and looked at Chu Feng,
"But, if you lose, bring your Saint Spirit Grass out. Do you dare?"
At that instant, all the eyes landed on Chu Feng and they were waiting for his reply.
If Chu Feng refused, they could humiliate Chu Feng and say that he was a coward. If Chu Feng agreed, Chu Zhen could openly give Chu Feng a lesson.
No matter what, Chu Feng was in a dangerous spot. They only wanted to see how Chu Feng would be humiliated.
"Why wouldn't I dare?" Chu Feng smiled and agreed.
"Good, you have the guts. But let's say this first. Fists and kicks don't have eyes, so you cannot complain about any injuries." Chu Cheng's smile became even more despicable.
"Enough with the rubbish. Come at me." Chu Feng put his own Saint Spirit Grass on the table, then walked to the middle of the hall.
"Chu Feng..." Chu Yue pulled on Chu Feng, and those flickering eyes were urging him not to duel with Chu Zhen.
But Chu Feng pushed away Chu Yue's hands with a smile and said, "Trust me."
Seeing that, Chu Yue couldn't help but have a blank look. For some reason, she had a feeling that Chu Feng would undoubtedly win this round.
Chu Feng and Chu Zhen walked towards the middle of the hall and everyone surrounded them. They didn't want to miss out on Chu Feng's humiliation.
"Chu Feng, it seems that you want the riches but not your life."
The Chu Zhen that hadn't spoke in a long time finally had a smile on his face, but his smile was very evil.
Being forced into the embarrassing situation by Chu Feng made him very unhappy. Since he had a chance to teach Chu Feng a lesson, obviously, he wouldn't restrain himself.
"Hoho." Chu Feng lightly smiled then said, "I just wanted to say those words to you."
"You talk too big. Today, I'll let you know how weak you are."
Suddenly, Chu Zhen's left feet stepped forward. One could only hear a boom before his entire body ran with flying speed.
Both his arms were moving and his punches were flying everywhere. Powerful aura came from his body and he was like a wild Fierce Beast as he headed towards Chu Feng.


MGA Capitulo 11 – Self Ridicule
"Rank 1 skill, the Hundred-Armed Fists reached the point of mastery!"
Cries of surprise sounded in the hall and everyone could see that Chu Zhen was able to fully use that skill.
Although the Hundred-Armed Fists was only a rank 1 skill, if it was mastered, it would be very strong as well.
If they were on the same level and if there wasn't an appropriate skill to counter it, he would have no chance. That was why everyone knew that Chu Feng, without a doubt, would lose.
Chu Yue frowned and secretly walked 2 steps forward. She wanted to stop Chu Zhen's evil schemes.
"Chu Yue, observers cannot help. You should know this rule right?"
But just at that time, she heard a sound next to her ear. She turned around and she saw that Chu Cheng was smiling and staring at herself.
Chu Yue knew that the situation was not good since she never thought that Chu Cheng would have his eyes on her.
However, because of that, it meant that the two brothers would not easily let Chu Feng go and that made her even more worried.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
The afterimages of the fists filled the air and almost completely blocked Chu Feng's line of sight. With the sound of breaking through the air, he suddenly attacked.
Chu Feng could feel that Chu Zhen's fist was not ordinary and he did not restrain himself in any way. It showed that he was very ruthless.
But Chu Feng was not afraid at all and he stood still. He did not dodge nor escape, and he only silently waited for the attack.
"Is this Chu Feng stupid? Why isn't he dodging?"
"He wants to dodge, but could he? With his power, he probably can't react in time."
"That's true. He is, after all, the trash that stayed in the outer court for five years."
Seeing that Chu Feng did not dodge, they even thought that Chu Feng was scared stiff by Chu Zhen's might and their faces revealed the smiles of seeing others in misfortune.
*huu*
But just as Chu Zhen got near, Chu Feng suddenly waved his sleeve and an extremely huge aura exploded from inside his body.
When that aura pounced at Chu Zhen, he was suddenly at a loss because within that aura, he felt killing intent.
*whoosh*
Just as Chu Zhen was staring blankly, Chu Feng suddenly stuck his palm out. The speed was extremely fast, and before anyone reacted to it, he already blasted it onto Chu Zhen's chest.
*boom* With the strike of the palm, Chu Zhen instantly felt that his Qi and blood were raging as a wave of pain came from his chest.
*swoosh swoosh swoosh* But before he even had time to think, Chu Feng already sent a few more palms and they all struck Chu Zhen.
"Ahh!" Chu Zhen cried out loud. Both his legs went numb and he directly kneeled in front of Chu Feng, then fell on the ground without power.
"This..."
The scene widened everyone's mouth. They would have never thought that Chu Feng would have such an explosive power!
However, they didn't even know that it was the result of Chu Feng restraining himself. Or else, with only one palm, he could have killed Chu Zhen.
"You are at the 4th level of the Spirit realm?" At that time, Chu Wei opened his mouth. Both his eyes tightly stared at Chu Feng and they were filled with astonishment.
"What? 4th level of the Spirit realm?"
With those words, everyone came to their senses. To beat someone at the 3rd level of the Spirit realm without using martial skills meant that they required the power of the 4th level of the Spirit realm.
However, trying to connect "4th level of the Spirit realm" with Chu Feng was unimaginable and it was hard to accept by the crowd.
Not only them, even Chu Yue had her eyes wide open. Her small mouth slowly opened and her face was full of surprise.
Chu Feng didn't care about the crowd. He directly walked in front of the table, took the three Saint Spirit Grasses, and walked towards the door.
"Stop right there. This is an exchange between family members, yet you attacked so heavily. Where is your heart?" Just at that time, someone suddenly yelled out.
Looking over, Chu Cheng was holding Chu Zhen by the arm and lifting him up while his face was full of anger. It was not endurable when his younger brother got beaten up by someone to this extent.
"What? When did you see me as part of the your family? I don't recall you saying that before?" Chu Feng lightly smiled then said, "Even you said it. Fists and kicks don't have eyes, so you cannot complain about any injuries. What are you doing right now? You can't take the loss?"
"I can't take the loss? It's obvious that you intentionally heavily attacked." Chu Zhen bit his teeth to endure the pain and loudly lashed out. As the victim, he was very clear that Chu Feng's first palm already defeated him. But Chu Feng continued to bombard him with more attacks so it was obvious that it was intentional and he wanted to humiliate him even more.
As he listened to that, Chu Feng smiled again, "I just entered the 4th level of the Spirit realm so I don't understand my strength that much."
"And before, your skill seemed so strong, so naturally I didn't dare to underestimate it and I used my full strength to answer your attack."
"But who would have thought that you were just like a paper tiger, so weak that you couldn't even take one hit. I overestimated you a bit."
"You..." After listening to Chu Feng's words, Chu Zhen's face was pale. He was so angry that every breath he was taking made huge sounds and he almost spit out his own liver out from all the puffing.
Not only was he defeated by the "garbage", he was even mocked in front of the crowd. It was extremely hard for him to accept that.
But, even if he wasn't willing to, he could say nothing about it because the rules just now were made by him and his brother.
"Chu Feng, don't be too arrogant. If you have the guts then let's go right now." Just at that time, another person from the Chu family stood up.
"Oh? You want to duel me as well? That's fine. Just bet a Saint Spirit Grass. Do you dare?" Chu Feng stretched his hand towards that person.
"You..."
That person was the same as Chu Zhen, as he also entered the Azure Dragon School at the same time as Chu Feng. However, his strength was not strong as Chu Zhen.
He did dare to duel Chu Feng, but he did not dare if he had to bet the Saint Spirit Grass.
"What's wrong? If there's anyone else who wants to go, you can come right now as long as you don't mind parting with your Saint Spirit Grass."
Chu Feng scanned his gaze at the crowd, but not one of them dared to look at him in the eyes. They were not afraid of Chu Feng, they just didn't dare to take the Saint Spirit Grass as a wager because those were their lifeline.
"Chu Feng, don't be excessive." Finally, Chu Wei talked.
"What's this? Chu Wei, you also want to go? If I'm not mistaken, you are five years older than me right?"
"If you don't mind people saying that you are bullying the young, I don't mind. After all, if I lose, I won't lose face, and if I win I'll earn big, right?"
As he listened to those words, Chu Wei clenched his fists, but he said nothing more.
It was because Chu Feng was correct. Chu Wei was not like Chu Cheng or Chu Zhen since there was not much of an age difference between them and Chu Feng.
However, Chu Wei couldn't because he was not a youth anymore. With his age, even if he defeated Chu Feng, he would be ridiculed by others, so that was why he could not attack.
Seeing that most of the people in the hall lowered their heads, Chu Feng suddenly laughed. He laughed very happily, but before turning around and leaving, he said,
"I'll give everyone here a two phrases before I leave. The first is "thinking that you are infallible", the second is "self ridicule". As for the meanings behind them, all of you can comprehend them by yourselves." After saying that, Chu Feng forced a door open and left elegantly.
At that instant, the atmosphere in the residence became very awkward. Originally, the Chu family wanted Chu Feng to be humiliated, but now, they got humiliated by Chu Feng in front of several outsiders instead. That really made them feel that they had no more face.
But the most unacceptable thing was Chu Feng's strength. Originally, they thought that Chu Feng was the garbage of the Chu family. But now, Chu Feng was at the 4th level of the Spirit realm and he surpassed many people. That made them feel a lot of shame.
Chu Feng walked out of the residence and he felt refreshed in his heart. Pretty much from his younger times until now, he was bullied by those people, and finally, he bullied them back today.
Actually, that wasn't bullying. Chu Feng was only forced by them. But no matter what, Chu Feng felt extremely refreshed.
"Chu Feng." Before Chu Feng even walked far, a sweet call came from behind him, and it was Chu Yue.


MGA Capitulo 12 – Fierce Character
"Chu Yue, why did you come out?" Chu Feng asked confusedly.
Chu Yue ran to Chu Feng's side while laughing, and using her white hand, she lightly punched Chu Feng's chest and said happily,
"You're quite good! I was saying why you were so calm when you were in the outer court. But now, after a day, you already caught up to me."
Chu Feng embarrassedly shook his head, "Chu Yue, I've given you troubles today and it seems that your Chu Alliance gathering has to end unhappily."
"Don't worry, giving them a lesson is good or else they would bully you all day."
"That's right. Chu Feng, let's go together in the Spiritual Medicine Hunt tomorrow! Those things are very hard to catch alone."
"You know my relationship with them. Even if I was willing to join the Chu Alliance, they wouldn't be willing to." Chu Feng shook his head.
"Don't worry about those things and just leave it to me. Just come and find us here tomorrow." Chu Yue gave another bamboo sheet to Chu Feng and on there was the gathering location for the Chu alliance tomorrow.
"Fine." Seeing Chu Yue being so persistent, Chu Feng could not bear to refuse it.
After appeasing Chu Feng, Chu Yue jumped and bounced back to the residence. She was really happy today because Chu Feng gave her a huge surprise.
Everyone in the world respected strength, and seeing that Chu Feng revealed unordinary strength, she felt that perhaps people from the Chu family would start to accept Chu Feng.
To unify the Chu family without discrimination was her biggest wish.
"Chu Wei, you guys..." But just as she arrived in front of the residence, Chu Yue found out that all the Chu Alliance members already left.
"Hmph." Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen fiercely glared at Chu Yue, said nothing and left.
"Chu Yue, it's not like I want to say it, but today you sided too much with that Chu Feng."
"Now you've done it. Not only did Chu Feng take two Saint Spirit Grasses from us, we even got insulted by him. Now everyone left in anger. Are you happy now?" Chu Wei reprimanded strictly.
"Chu Wei, just view it as my fault and don't blame him. In any case, Chu Feng is still part of our Chu family."
"Look, you've seen Chu Feng's strength. He isn't the trash in your eyes. Also, our Chu Alliance needs people now, so why not let him join?"
Listening to Chu Yue say that, Chu Wei's face instantly changed. But, as he was going to say something, a strange flicker appeared in his eyes, and at the end, he sighed helplessly,
"Ahh, I can't do anything about you."
"Fine, I'll give Chu Feng another chance. Bring him tomorrow."
"That's great! Youre the best." Chu Yue jumped excitedly and her smile was especially splendid.
"Okay, hurry up and rest early." Chu Wei shook his head and walked towards his own residence.
"Chu Wei, you should also rest early." Chu Yue smiled and waved at Chu Wei, then followed Chu Wei with her eyes as he left.
Chu Wei allowing Chu Feng to enter the Chu Alliance made Chu Yue happy beyond her expectations. But, what she didn't see was that the moment Chu Wei turned his body around, a sinister smile was formed by his mouth.
"Senior Chu Yue, the one called Chu Feng concealed himself quite deeply. I've stayed in the outer court for so long but I've never even heard his name before. It seems like he was aiming to be the first in the disciple exam."
Just at that time, a young man walked over. He was the same as Chu Feng, also being a new disciple this year. He just joined the Chu Alliance today.
"You're correct. Chu Feng must have stayed in the outer court for the exam reward. I wonder if he got it or not..." Listening to what he said, Chu Yue also suddenly realized that.
"Senior Chu Yue, you're thinking too much. A fierce character appeared in this year's outer court and that person got first place."
"Although Chu Feng has quite some strength, he cannot even be compared to that person." The young man smiled and said.
"Fierce character? How fierce?" Chu Yue curiously asked.
"Extremely fierce. One rank 4 Fierce Beast, nine rank 3 Fierce Beasts, thirty rank 2 Fierce Beasts were all slaughtered by that person within a blink."
"When the genius disciples of the outer court arrived, they only saw the Fierce Beasts' corpse that filled the ground. Isn't that amount of strength fierce?"
"That strong?" At that instant, Chu Yue's face was filled with shock.
She also passed the inner court disciple exam, so she knew the power of the mechanism stage. She also knew about the terrifying Fierce Beasts.
To be able to kill that many Fierce Beasts before people even arrived really made her imagine how strong that person was. It would require a person of at least the 5th level of the Spirit realm to do that.
"Who's that person called?" After being shocked, Chu Yue also wanted to know the name of this fierce character.
"Ahh, I want to know as well..."
"But sadly, that person intentionally hid their identity. After taking the reward, that person did not open the door out of the underground palace. Instead, that person concealed themself so no one knew who that person was." The young man shook his head and left.
"That person is quite strange. So strong, yet so low-toned. Perhaps that person has a secret that cannot be told to other people?"
At that instant, Chu Yue got more and more curious towards the so-called fierce character.
It was because she knew that it might represent another genius disciple rising from the inner court.
"Oh no." But suddenly, Chu Yue was suddenly alarmed because she thought of a strange scene that just happened.
When Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen left, they did not head towards their own residence. The direction that they headed towards was the same road as Chu Feng.
With that, Chu Yue knew that something was wrong and quickly headed towards the same direction as Chu Feng.
The inner court was extremely huge and there was quite some distance between Chu Feng and Chu Yue's residence.
However, Chu Feng did not rush nor panic and he slowly walked. He kept on going until he arrived to a desolate location, then he stopped there.
"Don't be so sneaky and come out." Chu Feng's gaze was cast towards a corner in the darkness.
"You are quite alert. It seems that I've really underestimated you." Before even finishing his sentence, two familiar bodies walked out of the shadow. They were the brothers Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen.
Chu Zhen's face was a lot better, but his anger did not decrease in the slightest. He even had thoughts of killing Chu Feng.
"Chu Feng, I'll give you a chance. Hand over the three Saint Spirit Grasses, kneel in front of my brother, kowtow and apologize. Then perhaps I'll forgive you." Chu Cheng glared at Chu Feng and absolute confidence filled his tone.
"What, you two want to rob me?"
"So what if we rob you?"
"You need strength to rob."
"Strength? I'll tell you right now what strength is."
Chu Cheng's body moved and strong wind rose behind him. In a blink, he arrived in front of Chu Feng. His hand was in a claw state and he directly attacked Chu Feng's throat.
It had to be mentioned that Chu Cheng's strength was several times stronger than Chu Zhen, and he was not weak even within the ranks of the 4th level Spirit realm.
However, his opponent was Chu Feng, the fierce character that bare-handedly killed a rank 4 Fierce Beast.


MGA Capitulo 13 – Kneel Down and Beg For Forgiveness
*whoosh* Chu Feng dashed to the side and dodged Chu Cheng's attack.
At the same time, one of his foot touched the ground. He suddenly spun, and after one rotation, his foot was retracted.
Seeing that, Chu Cheng's face slightly changed and he hurriedly backed off. But sadly, not only were Chu Feng's feet abnormally quick, his positioning was accurate and there was no way to dodge it.
As he panicked, Chu Cheng could only put both his arms together and forcefully block Chu Feng's attack.
*bang*
*tatata*
After the sweep of the leg, Chu Cheng was forced back several steps and a numbing feeling continuously came from his arms.
At that instant, Chu Cheng frowned slightly. No matter what, he did not think that Chu Feng would have such powerful strength.
That strength completely exceeded his expectations so he had to treat the fight seriously.
"You know your stuff, but with only a body of brute strength, at the end, it is impossible to become useful. I'll let you experience the might of the martial skills."
*papapapa*
"Haa!"
Chu Cheng continuously hit the acupuncture points of his body and he suddenly yelled out loud. In a instant, his body expanded quite a bit and his fists increased were also increased in size.
Also, his skin turned from white to purple and veins emerged. It was quite frightening.
"A strengthening skill."
Chu Feng squinted his eyes and he could tell that Chu Cheng used some sort of strengthening skill.
That kind of skill would not change the amount of skills one had, but their entire body would receive an upgrade.
After cultivating to a certain point, one's body would not be invaded by the elements, nor can swords or spears pierce through the body. Their entire body would like a lethal weapon.
He saw Chu Feng's change in expression so Chu Cheng was instantly proud of himself. Although Chu Feng's strength was unexpected, he knew that Chu Feng's biggest weakness was that he did not cultivate any martial skills.
The skill that he used was called Body of Steel. With that skill, one would be almost invincible while physically battling a person of the same level, so he had absolute confidence that he could defeat Chu Feng.
"Chu Feng, you can kneel down and beg for forgiveness, or..."
But not even letting him finish his words, Chu Feng's body flashed, and disappeared.
When Chu Feng reappeared, he arrived in front of Chu Cheng. A strong, heavy fist got bigger and bigger before in his eyes.
Seeing that Chu Feng dared to battle with him physically, Chu Cheng sneered and he also threw his fist out at Chu Feng's fist.
*clang*
With the collision of the two fists, a sound rang out, as if it was the collision of steel.
But after that exchange, Chu Cheng got pushed back a few steps. The numb feeling did not decrease but rather increased on his fist and he looked at Chu Feng who did was not even pushed half a step back.
"How is this guy's body so strong?"
Chu Cheng finally realized that something was wrong. With his current cultivated skills, there was pretty much no one that dared to meet his force with force in the same cultivation level.
But right now, in front of his eyes, not only did Chu Feng meet force with force, he even had the advantage. That really made him feel that the situation was not good.
*whoosh*
Suddenly, Chu Feng's body dashed in front and he struck out with a single palm. He directly attacked Chu Cheng's right in front of him.
Chu Cheng who had two previous lessons did not forcefully accept it. Instead, he aimed at Chu Feng's wrist and grabbed it.
"This..."
But it still wasn't time for Chu Cheng to be happy. He surprisingly found out that his hand grabbed onto nothing, and the palm that was heading straight for him also disappeared in the air.
*thump*
"Ah!"
As he was surprised, an extremely powerful palm fiercely landed on his chest.
Chu Feng's palm had a lot of power. Chu Cheng got pushed back beyond ten meters then fell on the ground while spraying out a mouthful of blood.
That scene made the observing Chu Zhen widen his eyes and mouth. No matter what, he wouldn't have thought that even the Chu Cheng that was in the 4th level of the Spirit realm would be defeated by Chu Feng's hands.
That already exceeded his bearable boundaries. After all, before, Chu Feng was a useless person that could not be more useless.
"How did this happen..."
At that time, on Chu Cheng's face, other than pain, most of it was shock.
He could not understand. He could not understand why he wasn't able to grab onto Chu Feng's wrist and got hit by him instead.
"Did he train in a skill?"
"Impossible. Absolutely impossible. He's only been in the inner court for ten days. How is he able to use skills?"
Chu Cheng felt that what Chu Feng showed could not be martial skills, because within ten days, it was impossible to learn a martial skill.
But if he knew that not only did Chu Feng use martial skills, it was even the strongest skill in the inner court, the Illusionary Palm, who knew how he would feel.
"Brother." Just at that time, Chu Zhen ran over, supported Chu Cheng and wanted to escape.
He was really panicking. He only thought that if Chu Cheng could not defeat Chu Feng, he could only think of escaping.
"No need to leave so quickly you two."
But just at that time, Chu Feng appeared without even making a sound and blocked their path.
"Chu Feng, what are you doing?"
Chu Zhen had a calm face on the surface, but he could not cover the fear in his heart.
It was because the current Chu Feng was completely different from the Chu Feng in his memories. It was as though he was a completely different person. That change really terrified him.
"I'm not planning on anything, just take out all the things on you, kneel and beg for forgiveness, then I'll let you go." There was a small smile that hung on Chu Feng's face, but that smile made them even more frightened.
"Chu Feng, don't be excessive." Chu Cheng said while grinding his teeth.
"I'm excessive? You all said with your mouths that I'm garbage. Humiliating and insulting me in front of others."
"You even followed me sneakily, and you wanted to rob me and beat me up. Now you say I'm excessive?"
"I know that you don't see me as part of the Chu family, but that doesn't matter, because I have never seen you as family either."
"Insulting me is fine, but to treat Chu Yue like that is intolerable, because Chu Yue is family to me, and she is one of the few people I want to protect."
After saying that, Chu Feng's face suddenly turned cold and he extended his hands. With two sharp "bangs", two clear slaps landed on Chu Chengs and Chu Zhen's face.
Those two slaps were very powerful and the two of them rigidly fell on the ground. After that, Chu Feng suddenly extended his leg and fiercely kicked Chu Cheng's chest.
"How's your mouth now? Weren't you able to force your logic? Weren't you very threatening?"
"Why aren't you saying anything? Talk. Say...please forgive me." While Chu Feng was speaking, he slapped Chu Cheng two more times.
After those two slaps, both of Chu Cheng's cheeks were left with two red palm marks and a trace of blood flowed from his mouth.
"For me to beg to trash like you, you wish." Chu Cheng seemed very unyielding.
But Chu Feng only smiled, and started waving both his arms. Several slaps continuously landed on Chu Cheng's face.
In that situation, Chu Cheng's cheeks quickly started swelling, and his head became a pig's head.
"Chu Feng!" Seeing that his own elder brother was cruelly hit by that, Chu Zhen finally exploded.
"Move." Just with a wave of his huge sleeve, and with a slap, Chu Zhen laid on the ground without even having strength to climb back up.
That instant, Chu Zhen truly understood the difference between him and Chu Feng. So it turned out he really couldn't even take one attack from Chu Feng.
"Chu Feng, kill me if you dare!" Chu Cheng revealed a sinister glare and started bellowing.
"You think I don't?" As he said that, Chu Feng took a dagger from Chu Cheng's waist, aimed it at his dantian and said,
"I will count to one. If you don't beg for forgiveness, I'll destroy your dantian and you won't be able to cultivate anymore in your life."
"You dare?!?" Hearing Chu Feng words, Chu Cheng face instantly changed. There was no more sinisterness, and replacing that was incomparable fear.
He felt the same as Chu Zhen. He also thought that the Chu Feng in front of him was completely different from the Chu Feng in his memories.
He could really not be sure whether or not Chu Feng would destroy his dantian, or whether or not he would kill him.


MGA Capitulo 14 – Elder Brother's Letter
Chu Feng smiled, but his smile was very malicious. He raised the dagger up high and spit a single word out very faintly,
"One."
*whoosh*
Before he even finished speaking, Chu Feng's dagger suddenly descended.
"I was wrong!!"
"I was wrong, Chu Feng I was wrong. Please forgive me, please...don't destroy my cultivation, please don't..." Chu Cheng yelled out as if he was crazy and his sounds carried some sobbing noises.
With that, Chu Feng also stopped his movements with a bit of shock and smiled while looking at the current Chu Cheng.
He discovered that Chu Cheng had his eyes closed, 2 rows of tears were rushing out, and his mouth kept on asking for forgiveness.
Not only was his expression painful, his entire body was trembling, and underneath, there was even a huge puddle with a nasty smell emitted from it.
Chu Feng threw the dagger on the floor, searched around Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen's body, and finally he found five low quality spiritual medicines, "Ground Spirit Grass".
After doing that, Chu Feng went in front of Chu Cheng, lightly patted his face, and said,
"Look at yourself. Who is the actual garbage? You should now know that clearly in your heart."
"Haha..." After saying that, Chu Feng laughed and left gracefully.
After Chu Feng left, Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen supported themselves and stumbled into the darkness of the night.
But before they left for long, a beautiful face walked out from the darkness. It was Chu Yue.
However, Chu Yue's sweet face was already filled with astonishment.
After quite a while, she muttered to herself, "Chu Feng, what kind of person are you, and what kind of strength do you have..."
Suddenly, she closed her eyes and she remembered the young Chu Feng.
No matter how much people mocked him, he never mocked back.
No matter how much people humiliated him, he never attacked back.
A smile was always on his face and it made people feel pity. It made people feel sorry for him. It made people want to protect him.
Finally, Chu Yue opened her eyes and she suddenly smiled,
"Perhaps we were wrong by looking at you as a weak person."
"Perhaps this is the real you. You don't need the protection of others, because you are strong enough to protect others."
At that moment, Chu Feng already returned to his own residence. He took out the three Saint Spirit Grasses and the five Ground Spirit Grasses out.
Although the Ground Spirit Grasses were only low quality spiritual medicine, they were still precious items for cultivation. Chu Feng felt that by taking them away, it was enough to make Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen feel pained.
When he thought of the brothers who always humiliated him just got a lesson given by him, Chu Feng felt extremely refreshed.
"It seems that there's a correct saying. &8216Against an evil person you need a grindstone for an evil person. To talk reason to an evil person requires one to use their fists."
Chu Feng smiled, but didn't rush and start cultivating. He took out his elder brother's letter.
He opened the letter and rows of familiar characters appeared in front of him. It was Chu Guyu's handwriting.
"Brother, five years has passed since you entered the Azure Dragon School, and we haven't met each other in five years as well."
"After a few more days, the annual family gathering will arrive, and this year, the head of the family will retire from his position."
"With his retirement, we need to elect the new head of the family, and father is one of the candidates."
"To father, this is an extremely important day, so I hope that you can return in this year's gathering and cheer for father along with me."
Although there were only a few lines of words, the meaning was passed on. Chu Feng thought deeply about the letter's contents.
Every year, in the family gathering, the young generation of the Chu family would have a martial exchange competition to test the results of their cultivation.
Although it was only test on the surface, in reality, it showed the potential of the younger generation and it also decided the position of the older generation in the family.
This time, Chu Yuan was able to get the qualifications as a candidate, because not only did he have strong power, he also had an absolute relationship between Chu Guyu.
Chu Guyu. Within the young generation of the Chu family, he was the only person able to enter the Lingyun School.
He pretty much was able to get first in all the family competitions. His potential was very huge, so naturally, it affected Chu Yuan's position.
After some thought, Chu Feng found a pen and paper, then started to write the reply letter to Chu Guyu.
The content was very simple. This year, he would go the family gathering, because Chu Feng also wanted to help out in his father's election.
He wanted to demonstrate his abilities in the family competition and at least get a decent position. That way, he could let everyone know that both of Chu Yuan's sons were not mediocre.
Or in other words, Chu Feng felt that the time to prove himself had arrived.
After writing the letter, Chu Feng completely refined the three Saint Spirit Grasses and the five Ground Spirit Grasses.
That time, Chu Feng finally felt a full feeling in his dantian. With his estimation, after refining another twenty Saint Spirit Grasses, he may be able to have a breakthrough.
However, those twenty Saint Spirit Grasses would cost an astounding amount. Therefore, he put all his hopes in tomorrow's Spiritual Medicine Hunt.
The next morning arrived and the sky just started getting bright. But in the huge plaza at the north of the Azure Dragon School, over ten thousand people were gathered there. It was one of the entrances to the Spiritual Medicine Mountain.
Chu Feng carried two bags. One was full of food, the other was completely empty. He was looking all around in the crowd and trying to find Chu Yue.
"Chu Feng, here."
He heard a familiar sound and Chu Yue was indeed nearby. She was happily waving her hands at Chu Feng.
Compared to Chu Feng's equipment, Chu Yue was a lot simpler. She only brought a waist purse and she had the same as the clothing as yesterday.
"Chu Yue, you're not bringing food? The Spiritual Medicine Hunt spans for a whole ten days. What are you going to eat?" Chu Feng had a face of confusion on.
"Idiot. Don't forget that we are an organization. I'm only responsible for chasing the spiritual medicine. Rough work like carrying food would of course be done by other people."
As Chu Yue said that, she pointed to some place. The members of the Chu Alliance were there and Chu Feng had seen them yesterday.
Indeed, three of them carried a huge bag, and those must have been for food.
"Chu Feng, there are different teams for hunting the spiritual medicine. After entering the mountain we split into 3 groups."
"In every group, some are responsible for carrying food, some are responsible for surrounding the spiritual medicine, and I am responsible for hunting the spiritual medicine."
"The division of work was determined by strength, and the division of spiritual medicine was also divided like that." Chu Yue explained in detail to Chu Feng.
With that, Chu Feng had a deeper understanding in spiritual medicine hunting and he also learnt the benefits of group hunting.
Before being picked, the spiritual medicine had their spiritual nature so they could escape. Without an absolute strength, it was really too hard to try and catch spiritual medicines by yourself.
That was also why a large portion of the disciples would choose to enter an alliance. It was because with strength such as theirs, the group power was indeed stronger than their personal power.
After describing the methods of hunting the spiritual medicine, Chu Yue brought Chu Feng to the crowd of the Chu Alliance.
After getting near, Chu Feng found out that there was one less person than yesterday. That person was exactly Chu Cheng.
Yesterday, Chu Cheng was beaten extremely badly by Chu Feng. His entire face became a pig head, so he must have had no face to see anyone. That was why he abandoned his chance in the rare Spiritual Medicine Hunt.
Other than Chu Cheng, Chu Feng also saw another familiar person, and it was Chu Zhen.
But, the current Chu Zhen did not have the former arrogance. He lowered his head and said nothing, seemingly having received a huge blow and it seemed extremely depressing.


MGA Capitulo 15 – Dragon and Tiger Brother
"I, Chu Feng, am present as the last member here."
"Everyone welcome Chu Feng. Clap."
*papapa*
After Chu Yue brought Chu Feng there, she cheered and clapped.
Seeing that, the several Chu Alliance members who were not part of the Chu family also clapped to welcome him and nodded at Chu Feng.
They had seen Chu Feng's strength yesterday, and no matter how the Chu family saw Chu Feng as, at least they approved of Chu Feng in their hearts.
But, other than Chu Yue and the others, the Chu family disciples did not do anything and their gazes towards Chu Feng were extremely ill.
"Chu Yue, what are you doing? You brought an outsider like him to our Chu Alliance? Hurry up and get him lost!" Chu Wei suddenly angrily yelled.
"That's right, the Chu Alliance does not welcome him. Get him lost!" At the same time, the other people also started yelling.
Their voices were very loud, as if they were intentionally doing that to let everyone around them hear it. Indeed, they really did attract the attention of the people around them.
At that instant, Chu Feng frowned. He never would have thought that Chu Wei would ‘welcome' him like that.
How was that even welcoming? It was obvious to humiliate him, especially in front of all the disciples around him.
"Chu Wei, what are you doing? Didn't you say yesterday..." At that instant, Chu Yue panicked, and she didn't know what to do.
"Chu Yue, shut up. What I say in this Chu Alliance goes. I can accept anyone, but absolutely not Chu Feng." Chu Wei didn't even give Chu Yue the chance to finish talking.
"Chu Wei, I never would have thought you..."
"Fine, since you don't accept me, I will back out."
Chu Yue finally got herself together. She knew that she was used by Chu Wei to cause Chu Feng to be in such a difficult situation.
"Chu Yue, I'm afraid that you have no say in this. Unless you want to leave the Chu family, you cannot leave the Chu Alliance." Chu Wei coldly smiled, as if he already guessed that Chu Yue would have this reaction.
"You...You are simply..." Chu Yue was grinding her teeth in anger, yet she didn't know what to do. She could only helplessly cast her gaze at Chu Feng, "Chu Feng, I..."
"Chu Yue, no need to explain. I know that this can't be blamed on you." Chu Feng's face was very calm, and as he scanned over Chu Wei and the others, he said,
"Your Chu Alliance isn't accepting me right? Fine. That's fine. Remember what you said today. I guarantee that one day, I will make you regret everything that you've done today."
"Hahaha, what a joke. You think you're some big shot? We will regret? You think you're worth something for us to regret over?"
"That's right, who do you think you are? Shameless."
They didn't even put Chu Feng's words into their hearts. In their eyes, Chu Feng was only a useless person, because from when he was little, they already imprinted a mark like that on Chu Feng.
"This place is quite lively." But just at that time, a clear voice suddenly resounded.
Everyone looked over, and they only saw two young men slowly walking over.
They were a pair of twin brothers. Their purple long sleeved clothing were very dirty, and it was so dirty that you could even see the oily shine.
The two of them were holding sugar canes, and while chewing, they continuously made ear-piercing noises and it was really annoying.
However, when everyone saw the badges on their chest, not one of them was not surprised.
On the badge, there was a pair of wings. It was the symbol of the strongest alliance in the inner court, the Wings Alliance.
"It's the Dragon and Tiger brothers of the Wings Alliance." At that moment, many people recognized those people, and all sorts of cries endlessly rang out.
The male disciples revealed a respectful expression, while the female disciples were screaming like they loved those two people. Even Chu Yue's face became heavier.
"Chu Yue, you recognize them?" Chu Feng asked curiously.
"Mm, their names are Bai Long and Bai Hu. They are the same age as me, sixteen years old."
[TN "Bai" is white, "Long" is dragon, "Hu" is tiger.]
"They entered the Azure Dragon School at the same time as me, but they passed the inner court disciple exam at the age of twelve and they even placed first at that exam."
"According to rumours, they've already entered the 6th level of the Spirit realm one year ago. They are real genius disciples."
Chu Yue had a solemn expression while talking about those two and it showed that those two were very important in Chu Yue's heart.
"6th level of the Spirit realm at the age of sixteen!"
After hearing Chu Yue's words, Chu Feng also reevaluated the Dragon and Tiger brothers because he knew that his elder brother Chu Guyu entered the 6th level of the Spirit realm at the age of seventeen and was considered to be a genius.
Those two were a whole year younger than Chu Guyu and it really showed that the members of the Wings Alliance were not ordinary people. No wonder they were viewed as the alliance of legends.
"They...They seem to be walking towards us. We...We...didn't offend them did we?"
As they saw that their target was them, everyone in the Chu Alliance started getting nervous and Chu Wei was no exception.
After all, the names of the brothers were too well-known. Even without their status of being in the Wings Alliance, their shine could not be covered.
They did not dare to offend those kinds of people, because if they did, it meant that they were sentenced to death in the inner court.
But as they got closer, the crowd finally breathed a sigh of relief because they found out that their target was Chu Feng.
"You are Chu Feng?" Bai Long looked up and down at Chu Feng.
"Problem?" Chu Feng calmly replied.
"Oh?" Hearing Chu Feng's response, Bai Hu couldn't help but frown and also started to judge Chu Feng.
"This is great. The Dragon and Tiger brothers were looking for Chu Feng."
"Hmph, he just entered the inner court and he offended the brothers. Well deserved."
"Let's see how he's going to die this time."
At that instant, the members of the Chu family were all happy. They all wanted Chu Feng to offend some big shot and then get killed by them.
Who would have thought that Chu Feng actually did offend the Dragon and Tiger brothers? It really made them quite joyful.
However, the next words that the brothers said instantly astounded them.
"Chu Feng. Interested in joining the Wings Alliance?"


MGA Capitulo 16 – Refusing to Join
"Wait, I think I heard that they just said..."
"Impossible, you must have heard wrong."
The words from the Dragon and Tiger brothers astonished the observing crowd and all sorts of complicated expressions surged onto their faces.
At that instant, the people around them would rather think that they heard wrong than believing that the words were true.
They could not understand why the Wings Alliance wanted to recruit Chu Feng. Just now, Chu Feng was even rejected by a small alliance. How could such a person get the respect of the Wings Alliance?
"Chu Feng, are you willing to join the Wings Alliance?"
They knew that the crowd was suspicious, so Bai Long forcefully added another sentence and emphasized the tone.
"Is...Is this real? The Wings Alliance is actually recruiting that guy?"
"Where did he come from to get the invitation from the Wings Alliance? Isn't the Wings Alliance called the gathering of geniuses? Why are they recruiting such an ordinary person?"
"Not understandable. Really not understandable. Does he have a certain special area? But I really can't see anything. Even a small little alliance isn't welcoming him. How can he be someone strong?"
With that, discussions instantly exploded everywhere like frying oil and all the gazes concentrated on Chu Feng. They all tried to find what was different about him to be able to be invited by the Wings Alliance.
But no matter what, they could not see how that youth was different. But even so, everyone still endlessly admired Chu Feng.
The Wings Alliance. The place that countless amounts of disciples looked forward to and also where countless number of geniuses were refused. It was absolutely the sacred land of the hearts of the inner court disciples.
The Wings Alliance. The dreams of endless number of disciples. It was a dream that could only be imagined and unaccomplishable.
But at that instant, there was a person that entered the sacred land and completed the unachieveable dreams of others. How could they not envy him?
"How is this possible, Chu Feng, he actually..."
But, the ones who had the ugliest faces and the people that could not accept that the most were the people from the Chu family.
Especially Chu Wei. It was as if he got hit by a heavy hammer. His entire brain was buzzing as he was completely bewildered.
Chu Yue was also like that. She stood next to Chu Feng, opened her little mouth, and her pair of eyes were flickering non-stop while surprisingly staring at Chu Feng.
Towards the reactions of the crowd, the Dragon and Tiger brothers smiled since they were pleased, then they cast their gaze towards Chu Feng.
Compared than the reactions of the crowd, the brothers looked forward to Chu Feng's reaction more. They wanted to see Chu Feng celebrate as if he was crazy and as if he entered a dream.
But Chu Feng obviously disappointed them. He was not overjoyed by ecstasy. Rather, he did not show any expressions, and his face was as calm as the water. The more surprising thing was Chu Feng's words that came out next.
"Thank you for your good meanings, but I do not want to join in any alliances for now." Chu Feng said calmly.
"What? I did not hear wrong right? He refused?!"
When Chu Feng's words came out, the crowd that was already like a boiling pot of oil instantly rose to the extreme. The good thing that countless of people wished to have in their dreams was refused. It was absolutely unthinkable.
After getting that reply, the Dragon and Tiger brothers also frowned and their faces were obviously displeased.
"Chu Feng, if you join our Wings Alliance, you will only have benefits in your future development in the Azure Dragon School. Are you really going to refuse?" Bai Long advised and asked.
"I am very sorry." Chu Feng's reply was firm.
"You..."
Bai Hu was a bit angry, but before letting him break out, he was stopped by Bai Long's extended hands.
Bai Long reevaluated Chu Feng once again and said, "Chu Feng, I hope that you can reconsider this."
After that, Bai Long turned around and left. After a fierce glare by Bai Hu, he also left in huge strides.
"That guy really refused the invitation of the Wings Alliance. Is he stupid?"
"Looking at him, you can tell that he did not even think about it, so he must not know the big name of the Wings Alliance. Ahh, what a shame."
"I'm guessing in the future, when he understands the strength of the Wings Alliance, he would be extremely frustrated.."
"Future? If you offend the Wings Alliance, from what I can tell, this guy is not far from death."
In that instant, everyone widened their mouths and the sounds of all sorts of discussions continued without end.
Even Chu Yue had a full face of confusion as she asked, "Chu Feng, did you know what you just did? That was..."
"I know, it was the Wings Alliance, the organization of legends within the inner court."
"You knew yet you still refused, you..." Chu Yue was absolutely speechless.
"I will not enter an alliance that I don't understand anything about. I'm afraid that the Wings Alliance are no exception."
Chu Feng smiled and his smile was abnormally calm. Not caring about the astonished gazes from all around him, he elegantly blended into the crowd, as if he never even put the Wings Alliance in his eyes.
Chu Yue kept on looking at the place where Chu Feng disappeared at. Her expression was extremely complicated, and after a good while she muttered, "Chu Feng, it seems that I am able to see through you less and less..."
Actually, Chu Feng was also surprised by the Wings Alliance's invitation as well, but because it was unexpected, he firmly refused. After all, there was a secret that others could not know in his body.
The 9-coloured lightning. The scary thing that almost destroyed the continent. If people knew that the thing was inside Chu Feng's dantian, who knew what the experts of the world would do to Chu Feng? It was even a possibility that he would get his stomach cut open.
After a short while, in a mysterious place outside of the plaza, the Dragon and Tiger brothers were standing there with a depressed expression. In front of them was a young female.
The girl had fair skin, sharp eyebrows, large eyes, a small mouth which was as red as a cherry. Although her face was a bit young, it could be said that she was a beautiful person and a person that just slightly undeveloped.
But, at that moment, the young female's eyebrows were frowning as she asked the brothers, "You are saying that he refused to join the Wings Alliance?"
"Senior Su Mei, everything that we said was true." The brothers replied at the same time.
"There is actually a person that dares to refused the invitation of our Wings Alliance. He must be tired with living." The girl was biting her lips, and there were traces of anger that surged within her beautiful eyes.
"Senior Su Mei. To be honest, we don't even know which part that boy was outstanding at. But, he was ‘mentioned' by those two and they told us to invite him. If we do anything bad to him, I'm afraid..."
"What's there to be afraid of? We are already giving him face by inviting him to the Wings Alliance. But now he dared to refuse. We gave him face but he just didn't take it."
"If we don't let him taste a bit of pain, where's the honor of our Wings Alliance? I'll hand this issue to you two. Don't worry, with my elder sister, I guarantee that nothing will happen to you two."
"Eh...Fine." The Dragon and Tiger brothers didn't dare to retort a single bit while in front of the beautiful young girl.
"Also, I'll say it for the last time. Don't call me as senior. My age is no order than yours." After casting a gaze to the two people, she left.
The brothers silently watched as the young girl went farther and farther away all the way until she was completely gone. Only then did they exhale deeply as if a weight had been lifted.
"This little girl is too hard to serve. She is treating us like slaves..." Bai Hu complained as he wipe the sweat on his forehead.
"Whatever. We can't do anything about her special family status. Ignoring her family background, it would be enough just by looking at her elder sister's inner court influence." Bai Long bitterly said.
"On that topic, I like her sister better. At least she's a lot more gentle."
"Gentle? You just haven't seen her when she gets violent. It's even more scary than Su Mei."
"Ahh, the combination of these two sisters are called ‘Roumei'. Theres the beauty, but I haven't found the gentleness. But what should we do now? Do we really need to take care of that Chu Feng?"
[TN The "Rou" (from Su Rou) means gentle, and the "Mei" (from Su Mei) means beauty.]
"Let's give him an appropriate warning, but we can't be too excessive. After all, other than the sisters, that person also spoke." After saying that, Bai Long couldn't help but sigh deeply.
Yesterday, in the rare Wings Alliance gathering, two big shots showed up without being invited.
Also, those two gave the same request, and it was to have the Wings Alliance invite Chu Feng.
Although they were not willing to, the Wings Alliance still agreed because those two people were existences that they did not dare to offend.


MGA Capitulo 17 – Acquaintances
The Spiritual Medicine Mountain was a forbidden land. The entire mountain had layers of seals.
Unless one had flying abilities, they could only enter the Spiritual Medicine Mountain from the entrance.
There were eight entrances in the Spiritual Medicine Mountain and all eight entrances had elders guarding there. Only at the time of the Spiritual Medicine Hunt would they be opened.
At that instant, all eight entrances opened. The inner court disciples who had a token could enter and almost a hundred thousand disciples came in from all directions.
"This Spiritual Medicine Mountain is quite the mysterious place."
Chu Feng wandered around in the Spiritual Medicine Mountain. His gaze was attracted to the huge, sky covering trees and the dense bushes.
It was the first time that he saw such beautiful plants. Even the fragrances of the flowers were very dense and the otherworldly scene intoxicated him.
"Ground Spirit Grass?" Suddenly, Chu Feng saw a strange plant.
It had a height of five inches with four leaves, entirely green, and it was covered with faint light. It was the low-rank Ground Spirit Grass.
*puu* But before even getting close, the Ground Spirit Grass contracted and prepared to escape.
*whoosh*
Seeing that, Chu Feng suddenly leaped, but he was one step too slow. The Ground Spirit Grass already burrowed into the ground when he arrived.
"These things really do have a spiritual nature." Chu Feng dryly laughed, but he was not impatient. He scanned around with his gaze.
He knew that the Ground Spirit Grass could escape underground, but after a certain distance they must return to the surface, and the escaping direction was usually straight.
So, Chu Feng felt that as long as he confirmed the escaping tracks of the Ground Spirit Grass, it was not difficult to catch them with his speed.
*whoosh*
Just at that time, a light flashed, and a Ground Spirit Grass came out of the ground. It was obviously the same one that just escaped.
But just as the Ground Spirit Grass revealed itself, it suddenly burrowed back into the ground and continued escaping.
Chu Feng rejoiced, and he strided over several steps, then leaped into the air like a sly rabbit. His hands formed into an eagle's claw, and he grabbed at the empty space in front of him.
*whoosh* Just as Chu Feng predicted, as he landed on the ground, the Ground Spirit Grass came out from the ground again.
But this time, Chu Feng was faster than it. He did not give any chance for it to escape. Chu Feng's big hands tightly grabbed onto its branches and pulled it out of the ground.
*jijiji*
When the Ground Spirit Grass disconnected from the ground, it started making ear-piercing noises and a wave of strong struggling power kept on coming from it.
But that struggle only lasted for a short while before it got weaker and weaker. At the end, the Ground Spirit Grass's glow flashed, then it started to decrease in size. At the end, it was almost as big as a finger.
"This thing is really quite strange."
When the spiritual medicine left the soil it would lose its spiritual nature, and the spiritual medicine that had no spiritual nature would have a very small body.
But those were only rumours. When a Ground Spirit Grass which was five inches long changed into not even half an inch long, anyone would feel surprise when they saw that in front of their face.
*hmm*
After taking care of the Ground Spirit Grass, Chu Feng layered his hands and did a hand seal. Strong absorbing power surged from his dantian, and within a blink, it completely refined the Ground Spirit Grass that was in his palm.
"Hehe, these things arent even enough for you to fill the crack in your teeth."
Chu Feng bitterly smiled. The Ground Spirit Grass was only a low-rank spiritual medicine and the spiritual energy inside it was several times worse than the Saint Spirit Grass. He would need quite a terrifying amount if he relied on it to feed the Divine Lightning.
As it couldn't be helped, Chu Feng continued wandering and went straight into the deep parts of the mountain forest.
The Spiritual Medicine Mountain was divided into the inner-circle, middle-circle, and outer-circle.
The outer-circle had the low quality spiritual medicines, the middle-circle had the medium quality spiritual medicines, and the inner-circle had the high quality spiritual medicines.
Chu Feng was more familiar with the high quality spiritual medicine Saint Spirit Grass. But he also knew that the Saint Spirit Grasses were not kind when they still had their spiritual nature.
Not only did they escape when they saw people, they even had extremely strong attack power. According to rumours, one Saint Spirit Grass was comparable to a rank 6 Fierce Beast. It also meant that without being in the 6th level of the Spirit realm, you would not be able to defeat it.
That was why the inner-circle was viewed as a forbidden area and very few people dared to enter it. Chu Feng also didn't plan to hunt those scary guys, so his goal was the middle-circle.
The medium quality spiritual medicine was the Sky Spirit Grass. According to legends, it could stick to and quickly run across the ground. It even had the ability to become invisible so it was very hard to catch. But, luckily, it didn't have any killing power.
Although the spiritual energy that it contained was incomparable to the Saint Spirit Grass, it was still far away from the Ground Spirit Grass. So that was why catching it was Chu Feng's best goal for this time.
He kept on going, and all the Ground Spirit Grasses that Chu Feng saw along the road were not able to escape his demonic grasp and they were even refined at the scene.
When it was noon, he finally reached the middle-circle and he quickly found one Sky Spirit Grass.
However, the Sky Spirit Grass was very impressive. Not only could it change its route of escape, it really did have the ability to become invisible.
Although the invisibility only lasted for a short while, Chu Feng always suffered when it did.
Straight until the sun started setting in the west, Chu Feng saw at least a dozen of Sky Spirit Grasses, but he didn't even catch one.
"I do not believe that I will lose to a medium quality spiritual medicine."
Although Chu Feng was still vigorous even after running for the entire day, he was helpless when his stomach started drumming so he could only stop to fill himself up.
As he ate the rations, he did not forget about his ridicule by the Sky Spirit Grasses, and he swore to catch the Sky Spirit Grass and to refine them.
"Like I said, don't come to the middle-circle. These Sky Spirit Grass aren't something that we can catch."
"Miss, no need to rush. I've already slowly grasped onto the escaping patterns of the Sky Spirit Grass. Give me one more day and I'll guarantee that we can catch it."
"One day? In one day, how many Ground Spirit Grasses can we catch in the outer-circle? You are simply wasting our time."
Just at that time, broken words came from the forest and Chu Feng could feel that at least ten people were coming close.
"Heh, it looks I'm not the only one who's suffering."
Chu Feng chuckled, but didn't even raise his head to look and ate the rations in his hands with huge bites.
"Miss look, that seems to be Chu Feng." But when a surprised, yet also full of mock voice sounded, Chu Feng knew that he met a damn acquaintance.
He raised his and looked. Ten silhouettes were staring at him and all of them were familiar faces.
The young female that was leading was called Chu Xue. She was one year younger than Chu Feng, and she could be said to be Chu Feng's cousin.
Although Chu Xue was not as sweet and beautiful as Chu Yue, she still had a few points of looks. Especially her snow-white skin which matched her name.
[TN "Xue" means snow.]
But she was the same as Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen. She didn't like Chu Feng from when they were young and she belonged to the enemy force.
Behind Chu Xue were nine people. Although they had the surname of "Chu", strictly saying, they weren't part of the Chu family.
They were the servants of the Chu family, but because their parents had some status in the Chu family, they entered the Azure Dragon School at the same time. But the funny thing was even those people looked down at Chu Feng.
"Oh! It's you Chu Feng."
The repulsive voice sounded again and it turned out that the person who spoke was a tall and skinny youth that stood next to Chu Xue.
Chu Feng also recognized that person. He was called Chu Gao, and from when he was young, he liked to stick next to Chu Xue. He was Chu Xue's shadow.
The thing worth mentioning was that although Chu Gao had the status of a servant, his talent wasn't bad and he entered the Azure Dragon School at the same time as Chu Yue, and he was also level 4 in the Spirit realm as well.
In Chu Xue's group, Chu Gao's strength was decent, so it was obvious that he was the main power in this group.
But that guy was not reliable. Seeing as he brought Chu Xue and the others into the middle-circle, one could tell that he was a person who bit off more than he could chew.


MGA Capitulo 18 – The Scream in the Forest
"I say, Chu Feng, you're no good either. You don't even have anything after a full day." As she saw Chu Feng's dried out bag, Chu Xue sneered and digged at the hardships.
"Is that so? With the ten of you all together, it doesn't seem that you are any better than me?" Chu Feng scanned with his gaze, and seeing the same dried out bags on Chu Xue's side, he mocked,
"I really don't understand what Chu Wei is thinking. He put the ten of you useless people in one ground, and the ten useless people ran to the middle-circle. Are you guys here for camping? You have enough rations?"
"Nonsense." Hearing Chu Feng's words, Chu Xue got agitated and angered. The nine other servants on the side were also not in a good mood.
Especially that Chu Gao. He even pointed at Chu Feng and yelled, "If you dare to be any more unrespectful to my family's miss, I'll cripple you."
"If you feel you can, then come and try." Chu Feng cast a glance of disdain at Chu Gao, then looked down and continued to eat his rations.
"You think I don't dare?" As Chu Gao spoke, he aggressively ran over to Chu Feng. Swirling wind rose from under his feet and swept the huge leaves up. He completely displayed the power of the 4th level of the Spirit realm.
But just as Chu Gao got close to Chu Feng, Chu Feng suddenly raised his head, and a pair of chilling eyes shot out like a sharp knife as if stabbing into Chu Gao's eyes.
*ta*
At that instant, Chu Gao immediately stopped walking and also quickly retreated two steps back. The instant that he saw Chu Feng's gaze, he felt something. The power of deterrence.
That deterrence made Chu Gao feel a chill in his spine. He panicked in his heart because he had felt that deterrence before, and someone who was able to make him feel something like that was an extremely scary person.
Although he also felt that it was unimaginable when it came from Chu Feng who was also at the 4th level of the Spirit realm and just entered the inner court, that deterrence told him that he could not fight with Chu Feng.
*gu*
After deeply swallowing his saliva, Chu Gao instantly turned around and ran back.
That scene really made Chu Xue and the others not know what to do. Why did he return without even fighting? Wasn't that a bit too embarrassing?
If they knew that Chu Gao was scared by Chu Feng's eye expression alone, they would have felt that they lost even more face.
"Chu Gao, what happened to you?" Chu Xue lashed out angrily.
"Miss, I..." Chu Gao didn't know how to respond.
"Useless trash."
Looking at Chu Gao's weak look, Chu Xue angrily bit her teeth, but she didn't know what to do. At the end, she could only fiercely say to Chu Feng,
"Chu Feng, you've really grown up. Did you forget that you got beaten up by Hongfei when you were young?"
"Let me warn you. You better never return to the Chu family, or else I'll have Hongfei beat you up even more."
After hearing Chu Xue's words, Chu Feng suddenly clenched both his hands, and the rations in his hands were completely crushed into powder. A gale with him as the core started swirling, and it blew Chu Xue and others continuously back. Even Chu Gao had difficulty resisting.
Chu Hongfei. A person that heavily humiliated Chu Feng before. Chu Feng would never forget, the him who was only eight years old was beaten up by the ten year old Chu Hongfei to the point in which he couldn't stand up. Chu Feng had stay in bed for an entire half a month.
The important thing was later on when Chu Guyu went and found Chu Honfei, even Chu Guyu was beaten badly. That thing became a thorn in Chu Feng's heart. A thorn that would always be painful if it was not pulled out.
Chu Feng slowly raised his head and a dense, cold aura spread from his pair of eyes. He said with an extremely cold tone to Chu Xue,
"Chu Xue, tell Chu Honfei that I will return in this year's gathering. Make sure that he does the preparations for kneeling and begging."
"And now, you all better immediately disappear from my sight, or else I will make you regret it."
If they were under normal circumstances, Chu Xue would certainly talk back to Chu Feng. But now she did not have that courage to do that. At that moment, the aura that Chu Feng was emitting was enough to make her legs weak and body tremble. She knew that this feeling was called fear.
At the end, Chu Xue did not say anything back and turned around then went further into the mountains and forest. As for Chu Gao and the others, they also quickly followed, because they were the same as Chu Xue, as they were unable to resist against Chu Feng's aura.
After Chu Xue and the others left, Chu Feng plainly packed up and continued.
He knew that Chu Hongfei was not a oil-saving lamp. Not only was he best at fighting within the Chu family back in the days, even today, he was barely behind Chu Guyu.
Chu Hongfei was from the Chu family, and other than Chu Guyu, he was the only other person who was able to get into a first-rate school. To be able to get accepted by a first-rate school already showed his talent in martial cultivation.
Ever since Chu Hongfei entered the school, he hadn't returned back in the Chu family so no one knew what kind of strength he had.
However, Chu Feng felt that this year, Chu Hongfei would likely return back. After all, his own father was one of the candidates.
As for Chu Hongfei's talent, even if he didn't reach the 6th level of the Spirit realm, he would be at least the 5th level. So, Chu Feng must quickly raise his strength and at least reach the 5th level of the Spirit realm.
"Ah! Don't touch me~~~~"
But before Chu Feng walked far, a sharp scream came from the forest. That voice belonged to Chu Xue.
At that instant, Chu Feng frowned, and after some hesitation, he ran towards the direction of the sound.
At the same time, in an empty area in the mountains, an unbearable scene was happening.
Chu Gao and the other nine people were shivering while standing on the side with faces full of fear. In the empty space in the middle, Chu Xue was being toyed around by three men.
Those three people were aged twenty or so and their faces were extremely vulgar. But behind their body, a black iron sword was on their back. They were members of the Sword Alliance.
"Junior, no need to be afraid. We have no ill intentions and we just want to chat a bit with you."
One of the males who had a full face of pockmarks was pulling on Chu Xue's purple clothes. One sleeve was already torn by him and it revealed her snow-white skin.
"Hehe, this is quite white, I like tender girls like this."
The other two were also touching Chu Xue's body. Their eyes shined and they were already drooling from their mouth.
"We are from the same school. Aren't you afraid that the elders will punish you if you treat me like this?" Chu Xue's face was already full of tears as she struggled without strength.
"Junior, we are protecting you. The elders don't even have enough time to praise us so why would they even punish us?"
"That's right, following useless people like them will only land you in more danger. It's still better to follow us, and when the hunt ends, we will give you some rewards. Hehe..."
It was already night and the three of them were extremely lonely. Just at that time, they found a little sheep like Chu Xue. How could they let that chance go?
"Seniors, please let our family's miss go." Chu Gao begged while trembling.
*whoosh*
Before even finishing his sentence, one of the Sword Alliance members pulled out his black iron sword, waved it at Chu Gao, and a strong wind flew in front Chu Gao's body.
*poof*
After that strong wind, a bloody wound appeared on top of Chu Gaos legs and with a poof, he kneeled on the ground.
"5th level of the Spirit realm."
Seeing that, the Chu family crowd backed away from fear. To be able to use the wind as a blade and to defeat Chu Gao in one strike was, without a doubt, the cultivation power of the 5th level in the Spirit realm.


MGA Capitulo 19 – I'm Called Justice
"Get lost right now and I'll let you live."
When that person pointed the cold, glittering iron sword at Chu Gao and the others, killing intent was revealed in his tone.
As they faced the life threats, the Chu family and the others feelings were shook and some people even started moving back.
Although Chu Xue was their master, and they had mountains of favours towards the Chu family, their choice was actually very simple when the decision related to their own life.
"All of you..." Chu Xue's heart had some unspeakable bitterness when she saw the servants thinking about abandoning her. From a young age, they were people that stayed by her side and followed all of her the orders since then.
She wanted to scold, yet she was so helpless because she knew that she was already done for.
In the Azure Dragon School, she had no influence nor power, and against the people that she could not offend, even if she was tainted, she could only endure it since she still didn't want to die.
*whoosh*
But just as Chu Xue was despairing, a shadow leaped out from the forest like a monster and landed in front of Chu Xue.
*bang bang bang*
After landing, that person attacked with lightning speed. Countless afterimages of the palm brought killing intent with them and they flew straight towards the three people from the Sword Alliance.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
It surprised the three Sword Alliance members when they saw such a sudden change. They tapped the ground with the tip of their toe and suddenly leaped back.
They focused their eyes and the three of them discovered that the person who surprise attacked them was a young man.
But the person who was the most astonished was Chu Xue. She would have never thought when the people whom she trusted the most had thoughts of abandoning her, Chu Feng would be standing in front of her while ignoring his own safety.
"Who are you? You dare to interrupt my good occasion?" The Sword Alliance member who had a full face of pockmarks pointed at Chu Feng while angrily yelling.
"You are not fit to know my name, but you can call me justice." Chu Feng faintly smiled.
"Justice? Ha!" The pockmark male moved the iron sword in his hands and countless of wind blades flew at Chu Feng.
Seeing that, Chu Feng pushed with one of his palms and a warm force pushed Chu Xue out of the way.
After that, he quickly dodged, and after dodging the attack, he ran straight at the male and struck out with one Illusionary Palm.
"Brat, you're looking for death."
Seeing that Chu Feng even dared to counterattack, the other two Sword Alliance members also pulled out their iron swords from their back and stabbed at Chu Feng with some strange sword style.
*whoosh whoosh*
Not only did Chu Feng not dodge, he changed his attacking style, and all three Illusionary Palms stuck at the same time making the three iron swords collide into each other.
*clang clang clang*
Three heavy sounds resonated, and the four people stepped back a bit. But, from Chu Feng's palms, a numbing feeling came from it. Chu Feng also frowned and his expression became more heavy.
He knew that the three of them were experts of the 5th level of the Spirit realm and they didn't even use their full power.
The three Sword Alliance members also frowned. They already found out that Chu Feng was in the 4th level of the Spirit realm.
But, when a little child who was in the 4th level was able to knock the three of them back, it meant that they could not underestimate the strength of the little child.
"Boy, we are complete strangers. You don't need to offend our Sword Alliance for some people you don't know."
"That's right. I see that you have quite some talent. As long as you are a bit understandable, we can give an introduction for you to join the Sword Alliance. I guarantee that your future will be bright." Seeing that Chu Feng wasn't as easy to take care as they thought, the three of them wanted to rope Chu Feng into their own alliance.
Chu Feng didnt react as he listened to those words, but Chu Xue instantly got more nervous.
She and Chu Feng had deep history and Chu Feng didn't really even have any reason to help her. Now that the Sword Alliance opened such conditions, she was really worried that Chu Feng would put her to the side and abandon her.
But, she also knew that hoping Chu Feng would protect was beyond reason. However, the Chu Feng in front of her was her only hope.
"Sword Alliance? I think it's better that it be called as the Beast Alliance. Trash like you want to rope me into your alliance? Ha!" Chu Feng fiercely spit a mouthful of saliva.
"You are forcing this upon us." Seeing that the attempted roping failed and they got humiliated instead, the three of them got angry and while holding the iron sword, they all started to attack Chu Feng.
It was obvious that the three people used their true strength this time. The sword didn't even arrive yet the wind did. Even Chu Feng had to narrow his eyes and treat this seriously.
"What are you looking at? You don't want to leave? Don't affect my evil extermination power."
Chu Feng yelled at Chu Xue and the others first. Only then did his body move, and with the waves of the arms, countless invisible palms filled the air and attacked the three people.
"It's the Illusionary Palm, careful."
One of them recognized Chu Feng's martial skill, and at the same time that he was shocked, his sword style changed accordingly. A cold glitter surged out, and the three people displayed the exact same techniques and surrounded Chu Feng within it.
"Chu Feng..."
As she saw Chu Feng battling with three experts at the 5th level of the Spirit realm, Chu Xue's emotions were extremely complicated. She knew what that meant. It meant that Chu Feng was risking himself for her, and that risk might very well cost him his life.
"Still not gone?" Just as Chu Xue was hesitating, Chu Feng bellowed again.
"Miss, let's go." At the same time, the Chu family people also came and dragged Chu Xue into the forest.
"Leave me." Chu Xue flung away those people and deeply looked at Chu Feng with meaning.
Seeing the Chu Feng that was surrounded by afterimages of the swords and doing his best to struggle, Chu Xue gnashed her teeth as if doing a very difficult decision.
"Leave!" Chu Feng bellowed once again.
At that instant, Chu Xue's frail body couldn't help but shake, and two sparkling tears fell from the corner of her eyes. After saying a "thank you", she went back into the forest.
"Brat, you dare interrupt my good occasion. I will cripple you today."
Seeing the fat meat that was right in front of their mouth escaping, the three of them burned with anger. The points of their swords were aimed at critical body points and they wanted to kill Chu Feng.
"It'll depend on your strength."
Although Chu Feng's face showed that he was holding on, he also felt the pressure. Against three people who were a whole level above him really strained him.
Those three people. Although they were not extraordinary people, not only was the sword in their hands strong, the martial skills that they cultivated made it so that the sharp weapon in their hands was used to the extreme. In addition with them three combining their powers, Chu Feng had quite some difficulty going against them.
The most important thing was that Chu Feng didn't want to expose his Three Thunder Styles so he decided that he didn't want to mess around with them three anymore.
*whoosh whoosh*
Thinking to that point, Chu Feng faked a move, then leaped into the air and jumped out like a lightning out of their three-man circle.
"You three trash, try and catch me." After jumping out, Chu Feng taunted them and smiled, then leaped into the forest like a monkey.
"Want to escape? Chase."
Seeing that Chu Feng was escaping, how could the three people let him go? They quickly chased after him.
But they still underestimated Chu Feng. Even though they used their spiritual power to the maximum and used all sorts of martial skill, they had no way of chasing up to Chu Feng. There was always a distance between them.


MGA Capitulo 20 – Thousand Bone Graveyard
"Damn. Is this guy the reincarnation of a monkey? How is he so fast?"
"This boy isn't simple. He has so much strength at such an age and he can even escape from our sword formation. He must have extremely high talent."
"That's right. This is the first time that I've seen someone using the Illusionary Palm to this level. If he continues to develop, he would be completely unimaginable."
"Because of that, we cannot let him leave this place alive or else he will cause endless troubles."
The more the three people understood Chu Feng's strength, the colder their heart became. They already slowly decided to kill Chu Feng in the Spiritual Medicine Mountain.
"The speed of those three are very fast, I can't even get rid of them"
At the same time, Chu Feng was speechless from the strength of those three people. Although his strength was way higher than the people from the same level, against people who were a whole level higher made him feel a bit weak.
But luckily, Chu Feng had plenty of spiritual energy in his dantian. He believed if he continued running, the three of them would stop chasing because of their stamina.
However, Chu Feng was considering another problem. The power of the Sword Alliance was not small. In the future, after leaving the Spiritual Medicine Mountain, it would be troublesome if those three used the power of the Sword Alliance to harm him.
That was why Chu Feng was hesitating whether or not to "Don't do it or don't rest". So, he was either going to display his Three Thunder Styles and silence the three people or he was not going to anything at all.
But at the end, he batted that thought away. After all, killing people from the same school was a huge crime, and if any traces were discovered, there might be a chance that the entire Chu family would be affected as well.
*hmm*
But just at that time, Chu Feng discovered with astonishment that white rays appeared all around him.
Because the sky was already dark, when the light rays appeared, they seemed abnormally dazzling and they were extremely strange.
"This is..."
That light became stronger and stronger, and it lit up the forest as though it was day. But what stunned Chu Feng was the countless amounts of white bones that surrounded him.
The vast area of white bones were densely piled into the forest. They were as boundless as the ocean.
Those bones were very special. Not only were they as clean white as jade, every bone was emitting a heavy aura.
Chu Feng felt a choking feeling as he was pressured by countless auras like those as they were stacked upon one another. His steps became heavy and his entire body lost its strength.
"What is this place?"
Chu Feng was very surprised. The special bones were not owned by ordinary people which meant the owners of the white bones must have been quite a master.
Only after reaching a certain realm in cultivation could one die without their bones decaying. Not only were they as white as jade, they still contained a certain amount of pressure to deter other people.
There were things that Chu Feng couldn't understand. Not only did he not understand where so many experts came from, as it was beyond common sense to have so many white bones appear here, the Spiritual Medicine Mountain was a forbidden land. Virtually every day, the elders would patrol around. How could they leave so many white bones here and not care about them?
Other than surprise, Chu Feng was starting to panic. The more he thought about it, the more it seemed that it wasn't right. The more he thought about it, more chills were sent down his spine. After all, he was only a fifteen year old young man. When trapped in such a dark forest area, of course he would feel fear in his heart.
"That is..."
Suddenly, Chu Feng's eyes lit up. He discovered in shock that there was a silhouette from afar calmly walking within the white bones.
He could vaguely see that it was an aged old man. The old man was as clean as snow. He was wearing a blue robe, and on the robe there was the mark of the eight trigrams. The old man was holding a very strange fly whisk in his right hand.
The old man's face was smiling and he was slowly walking towards Chu Feng's direction. He was not even affected in the slightest by the white bones.
But the thing that shocked Chu Feng the most was the old man's skin which was like jade and the faint glow that his entire body was emanating. That type of special aura was like a saint descending into the world.
"Lord. Is that...the Thousand Bone Graveyard from the legends?!"
Just at that time, the three people from the Sword Alliance also ran over. However, they had no more thoughts of attacking Chu Feng as they were completely astonished by the scene in front of their eyes.
Compared to Chu Feng's panic, one word was clearly written on the faces of the three people. Fear.
"Thousand Bone Graveyard? What kind of place is this?" Chu Feng's heart contracted, and just with that name, it made him feel uneasy.
"Damn brat, you've killed all of us. You actually brought us to a place like this! This Thousand Bone Graveyard is a danger spot." That pockmark male said with a trembling voice.
"Danger spot?"
"That's right. It's the real danger spot. No, it was a legend. One of the legends of the Spiritual Medicine Mountain."
"According to legends, there's a Thousand Bone Graveyard that was unreal, unsearchable, and it appeared in the Spiritual Medicine Mountain at unscheduled times."
"But this place is really the absolute danger spot. The legends say that those who step into this place will not leave alive. Even the people who kept their lives would become insane."
"I never would have thought that the scary legend was true. We've stepped into the Thousand Bone Graveyard."
The other two were also extremely afraid. As they spoke, some words were nonsense, and it showed how fearful they were in their hearts.
"If I may ask, is this really the Thousand Bone Graveyard?" Chu Feng cast his gaze towards that mysterious old man who was holding a fly whisk.
Although he couldn't feel anything from the old man's body, just by looking at his exterior, Chu Feng could tell that he was extraordinary. Without a doubt, he must be some big shot in the Azure Dragon School.
But the thing that confused him was that the old man was obviously looking at him yet he didn't even open his mouth to speak. Rather, with the corners of his mouth, they formed a strange smile.
"Oi, who are you talking to?"
"Damn brat, don't try to deceive us."
But the unexpected thing was that after listening to Chu Feng's call to the old man, the faces of the three Sword Alliance members instantly paled without a single trace of colour.
"Can't you see that I'm talking to this person?" Chu Feng pointed at the mysterious old man who was standing nearby.
"What person? You brat, you're really looking to die." That pockmark male held his sword and wanted to attack Chu Feng.
"Don't bother with him. Something's wrong with this guy and we should quickly leave this place." But before even letting him attack, the other two pulled his shoulders and started to drag him away towards the path in which they came from.
*jijiji*
But just at that time, an ear-piercing noise came from all directions. That noise was very strange, extremely horrifying, and it was as if millions of souls were howling and screaming about injustice.
At the same time, Chu Feng found out with shock that on the white bones all around him, dark green gas was floating and that strange screaming came from the gas.
But the thing that made Chu Feng the most uneasy was that the strange, dark green gas was floating towards Chu Feng and the others...


MGA Capitulo 21 – Change
"Hurry and run."
Seeing that the situation was not good, the three Sword Alliance members started to escape.
*jijiji*
However, their running didn't matter. The strange gas that filled the air was as though they found their target, and with lightning speed, it flew towards the three people.
"Shoo!"
As they faced such strange substances, the three of them started crazily waving their iron sword in their hands, but it was useless towards the gas. It was not affected by it in any way, and at the end, the gas entered their brains.
"Ah~~~~~"
At that instant, the faces of the three people already changed greatly. They threw away the iron swords in their hand, covered their head, then started painfully wailing.
Chu Feng could clearly see that their faces went from white to green, from green to purple, and they were kneeling on the ground at first, but then they started rolling around. One could tell that they were suffering from huge waves of pain.
But the painful wailing only lasted for a moment. Very quickly, the three of them breathed no more, and with the limp of their legs, they died. Their death faces were extremely abnormal.
Their faces were swelled, bled from the seven facial orifices, their eyes bulged out, and even their hair started to fall. It was as terrifying as it could get.
*jijiji*
But the more terrifying thing to Chu Feng was the strange gas.
After the torturous death of the three people, the gas that went into their brains went back out. At the same time, the strange gas from all around started slowly floating towards Chu Feng.
"Please save me."
As he panicked, Chu Feng cast his gaze towards the mysterious old man because he found out that the gas was floating all around except for the area around the old man. Which meant, more or less, the mysterious things were afraid of the old man.
But not only did Chu Feng's cry of help not gain the sympathy of the old man, it even agitated the strange gas all around him and at that moment, they attacked Chu Feng with lightning speed.
"Damn."
Seeing that the situation was not good, Chu Feng's body moved and he madly ran towards that old man. He wanted to use the guy to escape the calamity. However, he underestimated the speed of the strange gas.
Just after running for a few steps, Chu Feng felt a wave of pain from his brain as if something entered his consciousness and was tearing his brain apart.
"Ah~~~"
Quickly after, the pain kept on increasing and Chu Feng already knew that a large amount of the strange gas entered his brain. Those things were like eating his body and they brought unbearable pain.
Under those circumstances, Chu Feng had no way of resisting and very quickly, he fell to the ground. He started rolling back and forth just like the three Sword Alliance members from before while loudly wailing.
As he looked at that scene, the mysterious old man was not moved at all. However, the strange smile that was on his face slowly dimmed down and replacing it was a disappointed curve.
"Ah~~~~~"
But just at that time, Chu Feng suddenly started snarling. A white ray spread out from his head like a whirlpool and started swirling around it. In an instant, all the strange gas within a circumference of several meters got blown away like dust and smoke.
After snarling, Chu Feng laid on the ground without power and went unconscious. But that white ray whirlpool kept on swirling with him as the core.
Under the protection of the swirl of light, the strange gas from all around did not dare to get any closer to Chu Feng. Even the ear-piercing noises from before became a lot deeper and lower as if they were scared.
"Hm?"
Facing that change, the expression of the mysterious old man changed and a pleasant surprise surged from both of his eyes. After that, he waved his big sleeve and a strange wave spread everywhere. All the gas went back into the white bones.
When the strange gas disappeared, the swirl of light around Chu Feng's body also slowly went back into Chu Feng's brain.
"After waiting for almost a thousand years, I finally met a mouldable person. I hope that you don't disappoint me." The old man's body moved, floated in midair then slowly glided in front of Chu Feng.
After that, his fingers extended and he pointed at Chu Feng's chest. Several firefly-like glowing objects flew out from his fingers and shot into Chu Feng's chest.
When those glowing objects went through Chu Feng's clothes and entered his body, the clothes were undamaged, but his chest started to have several dots of glow.
The old man silently stared at Chu Feng until the glow disappeared from Chu Feng's chest, then he slowly closed his eyes.
Suddenly, with the old man in the middle, a fierce dark green hurricane started swirling around and the hurricane had dots of essence which contained incomparable, terrifying pressure. Instantly, it engulfed the mountain forest.
The strange thing was that the hurricane did not rise up into the air, rather, it started going down into the ground. Finally, it went deep into the soil and the vast white bones also disappeared.
After the violent hurricane, all the flowers, grass and trees in the forest were not changed in anyway and the night sky also covered the land again.
The only change was the fainted Chu Feng and the three dead members of the Sword Alliance.
A gentle wind passed and brought slight bits of chill. That chill also made Chu Feng recover his senses as he slowly opened his eyes.
"Mm, what happened? Was I dreaming?"
Chu Feng sat up, and while he massaged his aching head, he scanned around. He found out that the scary scene from before completely disappeared, and it made him feel that the previous experience was only a dream.
"This isn't right."
When Chu Feng's gaze landed on the three Sword Alliance members, he suddenly stood up. As he looked at the horrifying death conditions, he knew that the previous events really did happen.
"That's too scary. Why is there such a strange place in this Spiritual Medicine Mountain?"
"Thousand Bone Graveyard. Where did that come from? Who is that mysterious old man?"
Chu Feng was completely shocked. Everything that happened up to this point was unimaginable because everything that happened already exceeded his bearable range.
*shashasha*
Just at that time, Chu Feng suddenly heard the sound of footsteps and he knew that people were coming close.
Looking at the situation, Chu Feng turned around and escaped deeper into the forest.
He needed to leave because he could not let people know that he was connected to the three Sword Alliance members or else he would have no way of explaining it.
He couldn't say that they entered the Thousand Bone Graveyard from the legends, and then the three got killed while he was not even scratched right?
It was too strange, and even if he told people, no one would believe it. Even if people did believe it, Chu Feng would become a strange person in the Azure Dragon School so he needed remove all connections.
As Chu Feng ran, he quickly found out that something was different about him. He felt that his senses were extremely clear. Even the grass moving from the wind was detectable by him. He never had that feeling before.
"Is my head so sensitive because there is too much spiritual energy in this Spiritual Medicine Mountain combined with the silence of the night?"
Chu Feng tried to find out why he had better senses, but he suddenly stopped his footsteps. Instantly, both of his eyes lit up and a surprised look emerged from his face.
He felt a strange energy moving, and although it was still fairly far, he could confirm that it was a Sky Spirit Grass.


MGA Capitulo 22 – The Great Battle Between the Girl and the Monster
"I'm...not imagining this am I?"
Chu Feng was shocked to be able to feel where the spiritual grass was located at, and of course, Chu Feng knew what that meant.
If that feeling was real, it meant that in the Spiritual Medicine Mountain, he was like a fish in water.
*whoosh*
Thinking to that point, Chu Feng did not hesitate and walked towards the direction in which he felt something from. He wanted to completely investigate it.
As he got closer, Chu Feng got more happy because the movements of the Sky Spirit Grass in his brain was getting stronger and stronger, which more or less meant that his feeling was not an illusion.
When Chu Feng passed another bush, he saw a red plant in front of him. It was the Sky Spirit Grass.
The Sky Spirit Grass was quite a bit better than the Ground Spirit Grass. The red branches and trunk emitted a red glow and it looked like it was on fire. It seemed especially beautiful during the night.
"Little thing, after toying around with me for a whole day, I'll see if you can escape me this time."
As he saw the Sky Spirit Grass, Chu Feng did not stop and instantly rushed forward. He concentrated his spiritual energy at the bottom of his feet and his speed doubled in an instant. Within a blink, he arrived in front of the Sky Spirit Grass.
*hmm* But, before Chu Feng even extended his hands, that Sky Spirit Grass disappeared and was not to be seen.
"You want to run, but can you?"
Seeing that the Sky Spirit Grass wanted to escape by invisibility, Chu Feng formed a cold smile on the corner of his mouth. He stepped forward, grabbed the air in front of him, and then, he heard a sharp cry. One Sky Spirit Grass was grasped within Chu Feng's hands.
When the Sky Spirit Grass was caught by Chu Feng, it instantly lost its invisibility and started to madly struggle. The power of it was several times stronger than the Ground Spirit Grass, but it was useless as it was in Chu Feng hands. At the end, it could only obediently lose its spiritual nature and become a half-inch red-coloured spiritual grass that laid in Chu Feng's palm.
"It seems that this is certainly not an illusion."
Chu Feng threw the Sky Spirit Grass into the bag and he was insanely happy in his heart. Although he didn't know where the special sense came from, to Chu Feng, he could rely on it strongly.
"Unless..."
But with a thought, it was not hard for Chu Feng to think where the power came from. After all, it was formed after he entered the Thousand Bone Graveyard, and the target of the strange gas was the brain.
Which meant it was logical even if it was the attack of the strange gas that made Chu Feng's senses stronger.
"Hehe, another thing dropped right at my doorstep. "
Just at that time, his eyes lit up once again. Another Sky Spirit Grass entered his detection range.
Under such a strong detection power, virtually no Sky Spirit Grass was able to escape Chu Feng's hands. Any escaping methods were wasted efforts.
Chu Feng did not sleep for the entire night and when it was day, he already caught dozens of Sky Spirit Grasses. A harvest like that would certainly make people go crazy.
If someone found out about it, even robbing Chu Feng was a possibility. After all, within the Spiritual Medicine Mountain, the number of battles and thievery between disciples were not few.
However, Chu Feng's detection power was not only limited to Sky Spirit Grasses. Even if a human entered a certain range, they would be detected by Chu Feng so almost no one could find traces of Chu Feng.
Another day passed, and when the night arrived, Chu Feng's bag was almost already full. This time, Chu Feng did not continue hunting and he found a hidden place to start refining the Sky Spirit Grasses.
Chu Feng's refining speed was top-class, and after only four hours, the bag that was full of Sky Spirit Grasses were completely refined by him.
With that, his dantian also got more and more full. That made Chu Feng joyful, and although the Sky Spirit Grass was not comparable to the Saint Spirit Grass, if he had this amount every day to refine, he could breakthrough within ten days.
From that day forth, Chu Feng spent all day in the middle-circle of the Spiritual Medicine Mountain and hunted Sky Spirit Grasses without restrain until deep into the night. He refined all the Sky Spirit Grasses that he hunted that day, then after resting for four hours, he continued to hunt insanely.
It cycled like such, and after nine days from the time in which Chu Feng entered the Spiritual Medicine Mountain, he felt a great change in his dantian. The Nine Lightning Beasts changed once again, and Chu Feng finally broke through the 4th level of the Spirit realm into the 5th.
"With this power, I should be able to battle against people that are on the 6th level of the Spirit realm."
Feeling the strength that was improving many times, Chu Feng was speechless himself. The him who had the Divine Lightning really had power that was way stronger than others.
Especially his Three Thunder Styles. If he used it, even experts at the 6th level of the Spirit realm could not defeat him.
Level crossing battles were already defying common sense. Although the geniuses who had extremely high talent could do it, those were geniuses. If those things happened on a person people knew, everyone would be shocked.
After raising his power, Chu Feng went hunting for Sky spirit Grasses again. This time it was a lot easier. With merely half a day, he already filled up his bag. Since the bag of rations was almost empty, that bag also became Chu Feng's tool for storing spiritual medicine.
However, the current Chu Feng was not only thinking about Sky Spirit Grasses. He wanted to head towards the inner-circle and he wanted to check the Saint Spirit Grasses that were rumoured to be no weaker than a rank 6 Fierce Beast.
"This aura..."
But before entering the inner-circle for long, Chu Feng felt two types of auras and they were both extremely strong.
The first one were the spiritual medicines. The densely filled, evil aura was obviously from the Saint Spirit Grasses that had spiritual natures. There were a lot of them, almost a hundred.
The other aura was from a human. It was also extremely large, so it should be an expert of the 7th level of the Spirit realm.
At that moment, the two auras were blended together. It was obvious that the person was having a great battle with the Saint Spirit Grasses. But that person's aura was not stable so they must have entered a trap.
"Who dared to challenge so many Saint Spirit Grasses by themself?"
With a heart of curiosity, Chu Feng decided to observe the outcome. When he leaped over the layers of trees, he was stunned by the scene in a distance.
A three meter tall huge plant, filled with purple thorns had its mouth open which was full of teeth. It was emitting an oppressing aura from its body and it didn't even look like a Saint Spirit Grass. It looked more like a monster.
However, rather than the scary Saint Spirit Grasses, Chu Feng's gaze concentrated on the petite figure because that figure not only went through the formation of near a hundred Saint Spirit Grass, it was a beauty that matched her name.
That elegant long hair, that delicate face, that snow-white skin, those eyes that were not fearful in front of danger and were instead unyielding deeply attracted Chu Feng.
That girl was undoubtedly the most beautiful person Chu Feng ever saw. But the reason why Chu Feng was attracted to her was not only because of her appearance. It was also the power that she had at her age.
"Careful below."
Suddenly, Chu Feng yelled loudly because he felt that a Saint Spirit Grass was hidden under the feet of the girl.
"What?"
The girl didn't even notice Chu Feng, so after hearing such an unexpected yell surprised her. She subconsciously tapped the ground with both her feet and leaped into the air.
In the instant that she left the ground, a huge Saint Spirit Grass drilled out from the ground with its fangs and claws bared.
That unforeseen event created lingering fear in that girl. If it wasn't for the reminder of that voice, she would have certainly had paid a huge cost. With gratitude in her heart, she cast her gaze towards Chu Feng.
But when she saw Chu Feng, her delicate face instantly froze and she said with shock, "It's you?!"


MGA Capitulo 23 – Not One in Ten Thousand
"You know me?"
Chu Feng carefully evaluated that beautiful girl and after looking up and down three times, he found out that not only was the girl beautiful, she was also very young, obviously being younger than him.
Also, there was a badge on the chest of the girl that showed that she was a member of the Wings Alliance. Although that girl shocked Chu Feng, he really did not recognise the girl.
"Who knows you? Hurry up and leave, this isn't a place where you can come." The girl glanced at Chu Feng, then continued to throw herself into the huge battle against the Saint Spirit Grasses and it seemed that she was extremely angry at Chu Feng.
Although Chu Feng did not know why the girl was so angry, Chu Feng already knew that the girl was surrounded by the Saint Spirit Grasses. She wanted to escape, but she did not have that chance.
If that continued, the girl would not able to continue because of her physical strength and she would die there.
As a man, how could Chu Feng let such a beautiful girl be eaten by those monsters? He could not ignore something like that.
So, while thinking about that, Chu Feng jumped in without hesitation. But just as he entered, he regretted it a bit. A large amount of monsters felt his presence and started attacking straight at him.
"It seems that I have to go all out."
Life was hung by a thread, so Chu Feng didn't hold back anymore. The spiritual energy in his dantian started to move and it went along the veins. The top of his toes touched the ground, and with a boom, his entire body leaped into the air like lightning.
As he was landing, Chu Feng suddenly started spinning. A whirlwind started to rise, and his entire body was like a human blade as it fiercely thrust into the hundred of flowers underneath.
*bang*
As he was landing, the flowers scattered. The moment he landed, the ground formed a deep hole with cracks all around it. One Saint Spirit Grass was killed on scene by Chu Feng and became as big as his finger.
He displayed the first two styles of the Three Thunder Styles, yet he only killed one Saint Spirit Grass. That was unexpected to Chu Feng. After all, it was his strongest trump card.
He thought that with those attacks, "the sky would be frightened and the ground would sob" and a large number of Saint Spirit Grasses would die under his feet. But the result in his eyes had too much of a difference from his imagination.
However, Chu Feng didn't think too much about that. Almost at the same time that he landed, he suddenly jumped up again because he felt that there were at least three Saint Spirit grasses that attacked from behind.
"Do you want to die?"
Feeling the change in the Saint Spirit Grass's attack formation and the wailing sounds from nearby, the girl knew that Chu Feng jumped in.
But when she cast her gaze towards Chu Feng's direction, she couldn't help but be astonished. No matter what she thought, she never would have guessed that Chu Feng could come and go as he wished within the army of Saint Spirit Grasses that even she was fearful of.
Even without seeing the attacks of the Saint Spirit Grass, he could still accurately dodge and attack. Although she did not recognize the skills that Chu Feng used, she could still tell from the power that it was at least a rank 4 skill.
"This guy. He just entered the 5th level of the Spirit realm and he can already use rank 4 skills?" The girl was deeply attracted towards Chu Feng's performance.
"Careful on the left!" Just as the girl was in a daze, Chu Feng suddenly yelled.
Hearing that, the girl was suddenly alarmed and quickly turned her body. With one palm, she grabbed her left and grabbed onto the thorny vine.
After grabbing on the vines, the girl clenched with her fist and broke the vines into pieces. Another palm swept out like a blade, and with a cold flash, she chopped the Saint Spirit Grass into two. It wasn't even like a palm. It was more like a iron blade.
After accurately chopping the Saint Spirit Grass, the girl was even more shocked. Chu Feng was clearly facing her with his back, so how could he see that there was a Saint Spirit Grass attacking on his left? Unless...
*whoosh*
Just at that time, Chu Feng brushed next to the girl like lightning. At that moment, he was covered with sweat, and bloodstains also appeared on his clothes.
The Saint Spirit Grasses were too strong and there were too many of them. Although Chu Feng had the strong detection power and his incomparably strong Three Thunder Styles, the him who was in the 5th level of the Spirit realm was a bit weak towards them.
"Oi. If you want to get out alive, listen to my instructions." Chu Feng said to the girl.
"You want me to listen to you? In your dreams!" The girl was extremely displeased.
"Say, are you even making sense? I came in here to save you, and this is how you treat me?"
"Also, didn't you notice that these Saint Spirit Grasses are a bit strange? They don't attack blindly and they have a strict coordination. If you're going to go head on with them, you will only get tired."
"Rubbish. That's obvious. I already knew that."
Although she said that on the surface, in her heart she just understood that. If it wasn't for Chu Feng's reminder, she really wouldn't have noticed that.
With her strength, killing Saint Spirit Grasses was not hard. But it was obvious that she was helpless against this crowd of Saint Spirit Grasses. There were very small chances of a straight-up confrontation and she always needed to dodge the attacks from them.
"Its fine if you don't want to listen since I can leave this place alive." Chu Feng coldly snorted and prepared to leave.
"Oi, don't..." Seeing that Chu Feng was leaving, that terrified the girl. She already saw Chu Feng's ability, so she had no doubts that Chu Feng could successfully escape. However, she could not, so she immediately said, "I'll listen to you."
"Heh." Seeing the cute obeying look of the girl, Chu Feng chuckled then said, "That's better."
Seeing Chu Feng so proud of himself made the girl's mouth twitch. Although her strength was above Chu Feng, she knew that if she wanted to escape, she needed to rely on Chu Feng.
The two of them tried their best to coordinate, and under Chu Feng's command, the strength of the girl was truly exhibited. The near a hundred Saint Spirit Grasses were completely annihilated by the two people with only an hour.
After the huge battle, Chu Feng started cleaning up the battle field. Of course he had his part in the Saint Spirit Grass that filled the ground. Although the main force was the girl, he was the main brains.
"Did this guy train in the Mysterious Techniques?" Seeing the Chu Feng that was happily picking up the Saint Spirit Grasses, the coarsely breathing girl who was sitting on the side started muttering.
At first, for self protection, Chu Feng was continuously using rank 4 skills. Although rank 4 skills were strong, they consumed a lot of spiritual energy. Most people could only use it a few times before they exhausted their spiritual energy.
However, after using it for so long, Chu Feng didn't even have any feeling of exhaustion. In addition, being able to use his 5th level of the Spirit realm power to defeat the Saint Spirit Grass that was equivalent to a rank 6 Fierce Beast indicated a problem. It was that Chu Feng might have trained in the Mysterious Techniques.
Mysterious Techniques. They were mysterious techniques. Cultivators were able to gather more spiritual energy, refine spiritual medicine quicker, causing the spiritual energy in the dantian to be more rich and the battle abilities were several times stronger than normal people.
But there were very little Mysterious Techniques, and even the Azure Dragon School only had a few. They were only provided to the core disciples for cultivation and inner court disciples had no way of even touching them.
Chu Feng being able to cultivate in the precious Mysterious Techniques naturally made the girl see Chu Feng in another light. However, she didn't know the reason why Chu Feng's spiritual energy was so strong wasn't because of some Mysterious Technique. It was because of the Divine Lightning in his dantian.
"It seems that not only is your Spirit Power impressive, you have plenty of spiritual energy as well." The girl stood up and walked over to Chu Feng with both of her hands behind her back.
"What Spirit Power?" Chu Feng stared blankly.
"Still playing dumb? If you didn't have the Spirit Power, how could you clearly see the attack of the Saint Spirit Grasses?" The girl looked blankly back at Chu Feng.
"You're talking about my detection power?" Chu Feng was startled as he knew what the girl meant.
"Detection power? My Gods, you called the Spirit Power the ‘detection power'? You really are a bumpkin." The girl's gaze towards Chu Feng became more and more disdainful.
"It's normal to not know. Would you know if you were male or female when you were born?" Chu Feng coldly snorted and continued to pick up the Saint Spirit Grasses all around them.
"Oh? Your temper is quite short." The girl sweetly smiled, caught up to him then chuckled, "Did you know that not even one person out of ten thousand have this Spirit Power?"


MGA Capitulo 24 – Do You Dare To Marry Me?
"You seem to really understand this Spirit power?"
Chu Feng's heart tightened. He just started using the so-called Spirit power so he didn't understand it too much.
But he also knew that it was likely true when the girl said there weren't even one within 10 thousand that had the Spirit power. It was very obvious that this extremely talented girl didn't have it.
In addition, her treatment towards him turned 180 degrees, showing that this Spirit power was quite an impressive thing which ordinary people did not have.
"But of course. The Spirit power is the favour of the heavens, it is brought by nature and unobtainable by cultivation."
"Those who have Spirit power can be said to be a dragon within men. Not only would their cultivating talent be extremely strong, their observation would be unrivaled. No wonder my elder sister looked at you and asked our Wings Alliance to invite you."
"Your elder sister?"
"I forgot about the self-introductions. I am called Su Mei, 14 years old. And you certainly know my elder sister. She is called Su Rou."
"You are Elder Su Rou's sister?" Chu Feng did not expect that. The girl in front of him was pure and sweet, but that Su Rou was extremely charming. Although the two of them were very beautiful woman, they were not similar.
But after some more precise looking, Chu Feng found out that the girl in front of him looked a tiny bit like Su Rou. Right now, the girl was still a bit young, but in a few years she would certainly be a stunning beauty.
What surprised Chu Feng was that he was not related to Su Rou in anyway, so why did Su Rou try to pull him into the Wings Alliance for no reason? Was it that his strength was already exposed on the day of the exam?
After some more careful thing, there was that possibility. After all, Su Rou's strength was unmeasurably deep and there were layers of mechanisms in the underground palace. He may have been able to deceive the disciples, but to deceive the elders would really have quite some difficulty.
"Is it so surprising? But there's actually nothing that surprising. My sister saw that you were a talented person so she wanted to develop you a bit."
"From my observations, you do have the qualifications to join the Wings Alliance. As one of the members of the Wings Alliance, I hereby officially invite you to join." Speaking to that point, Su Mei squinted her eyes and gave Chu Feng an incomparably sweet, clean, pure smile.
At first, Su Mei extremely disliked Chu Feng, and the reason was obviously because Chu Feng refused the invitation of the Wings Alliance. Chu Feng was the first ever person in history to refuse the invitation of the Wings Alliance.
But knowing that Chu Feng had the extremely rare Spirit power, she also knew that the place that Su Rou had her eyes on were naturally the Spirit power.
From what she knew, in the entire outer court, not one person had the Spirit power and it was just like a legend.
In short, any person that had the Spirit power would have unlimited accomplishments in the future and were destined to be an extremely strong person. So, to a person like Chu Feng, she obviously could not let him go and did everything she could to attract him.
Seeing Su Mei's sweet smile, Chu Feng knew that the girl wanted to pull him in the alliance with her looks. It was impossible for Chu Feng's heart to not be moved in front of such a beauty, so he smiled at first, but then firmly said, "I refuse."
"You bastard." Hearing Chu Feng's words, Su Mei was so angry that she jumped up. The previous gentleness instantly disappeared and she bit her teeth in anger while pointing at Chu Feng while angrily saying,
"Chu Feng, who do you think you are? How many people wish to join in the Wings Alliance yet are refused by us? Today I personally invite you yet you still refused. Is your brain wedged by a door?"
"So what if you have the Spirit power? At the end you're just at the 5th level of the Spirit realm. It's not even comparable to the people in the Wings Alliance."
Facing Su Mei's fierce cursing, Chu Feng did not get agitated nor angry and completely ignored her. He continued picking the Saint Spirit Grasses on the floor, and the ones he could pick up he did. Suddenly he had a blank look.
He discovered with astonishment at a not so distant place, a purple bead appeared. That bead was the same size as a pearl, but it contained extremely strong spiritual energy.
"What's this?" Chu Feng picked up the bead and carefully assessed it.
"Waa, is it? It's a Spiritual Bead!" Seeing that purple shiny bead, Su Mei hurriedly ran over and her eyes were lit up.
"You recognize this thing?" Chu Feng asked curiously.
"Of course I do. It's the top quality spiritual medicine, the Spiritual Bead."
"From several hundred Saint Spirit Grasses, only one would form into a Spiritual Bead. You cannot refine the Spiritual Bead, but if you directly swallow it, it would form into spiritual energy and be absorbed by the dantian. That's why the Spiritual Bead is extremely precious. The price of one of them is equivalent to 100 taels of gold."
"I've been wandering around the inner-circle of the Spiritual Medicine Mountain for all these days just for this Spiritual Bead. I never would have thought that I would get it before leaving. I'm too fortunate." Su Mei said emotionally.
"So this thing is a top quality spiritual medicine that doesn't require refining. It is indeed a good thing." Chu Feng chuckled and didn't put the bead in the bag. Rather, he put it in his own pocket.
"You want to keep it to yourself?!" Seeing that, Su Mei angrily yelled.
"Of course not, in a while, I'll give you a few more Saint Spirit Grasses."
"These Saint Spirit Grasses were originally mine, and it's already pretty good that I'm willing to give you half. In any case, the Saint Spirit Grass are only high quality spiritual medicine. How could they even compare to the top quality Spiritual Bead?"
"You can't say it like that. If it wasn't for me, then you would have already been divided into two by those Saint Spirit Grasses. How could you even be standing here and be dividing these Saint Spirit Grasses with me?"
"You..."
Su Mei tightly bit her teeth in anger, yet she was helpless. Although Chu Feng's actions were very scoundrelly, she still wanted to get Chu Feng into the Wings Alliance, so she could only endure.
After that, Chu Feng counted a bit, and except for the Spiritual Bead in his pocket, he gathered a total of 78 Saint Spirit Grasses. It was absolutely an unimaginable number. Also, the spiritual energy contained in these Saint Spirit Grasses were very rich. They were very high quality, and they were a lot better than the ones Chu Feng refined before.
Chu Feng only took 30 and left 48 for Su Mei. He could feel that the spiritual energy in his pocket were equivalent to at least 50 Saint Spirit Grasses. So even if it was divided up like this he still gained a lot.
But Chu Feng did not expect that Su Mei only took 40, and with that, Chu Feng had 38. Su Mei's meaning was very clear. She was cursing Chu Feng to be "3-8″.
[TN "Three-eight" is an insult.]
Chu Feng could only call her actions as childish. Giving up 8 Saint Spirit Grasses for cursing was really something a wasteful person would do as the price of one Saint Spirit Grass was equal to one tael of gold.
One tael of gold was equal to 100 taels of silver. It was enough for an ordinary family to pass their lives without worries for clothing or food.
"Girl, what are you following me for? You didn't fall for me did you?"
After dividing the Saint Spirit Grasses, Chu Feng decided to leave the Spiritual Medicine Mountain. The 10 days were up, and they needed to leave the inner-circle before the sky turned dark. But, Chu Feng did not expect that Su Mei would be following him.
To be honest, having such a beautiful person that walked with him was a very satisfactory thing. But, as they walked, they met a lot of people.
When all sorts of gazes of hate were cast towards Chu Feng, he didn't feel easy. He felt that Su Mei was intentionally bringing hatred towards him.
"I have indeed fallen for you. Do you dare to marry me?" But when Su Mei said those words while laughing, Chu Feng was instantly in chaos.


MGA Capitulo 25 – The Furious Su Mei
Chu Feng never would have thought that the little girl seemed so pure, yet was so unreserved. No matter what you say, she was still a little beauty, so how could she say such things out of nowhere?
"Marry you? Why wouldn't I dare?"
But Chu Feng did not back off. He stopped his steps, put his hand under his chin, looked up and down with his eyes, and seriously evaluated the beauty in front of him.
Only then did he discover that Su Mei's age may not be big, but her development was quite nice. It really heated people up with her good convexes and her beautiful curves.
"You...You dare marry, but I don't. Damn hooligan."
Being looked by Chu Feng's scoundrelly gaze, Su Mei could not keep up with that face. She finally discovered that she was too inexperienced in acting shamelessly with Chu Feng, and just with a few words from Chu Feng, she became completely frantic.
"Oh? That's great if you don't marry, you really aren't my type." Chu Feng faintly smiled, as if a huge burden had been released and continued walking.
"You...you bastard." Su Mei's angry voice came from behind him.
To have revenge on Chu Feng, Su Mei did not leave Chu Feng no matter what and she kept on sticking next to him. As they walked, Chu Feng attracted plenty of enmity.
Chu Feng really was helpless against Su Mei's actions. On the topic of power, he was far from Su Mei, and even if he was stronger than Su Mei, there was no need to use fighting to drive the little beauty away right?
Since he was helpless, Chu Feng might as well enjoy it a bit instead. Once in a while he admired Su Mei's looks, once in a while he provoked her a bit, and that made her angrily stamp like thunder. She grabbed on Chu Feng's arm and bit, madly hammered on Chu Feng's back, and all along the road Chu Feng was quite injured.
There were very few people that recognized Su Mei, but with her beauty she could even be called as 1 in the inner court. Seeing Chu Feng bully a beauty like Su Mei, there were countless of young males that walked up and tried to fight for justice and pull a "hero saving the beauty".
But what they got was Su Mei's cursing, and there were even two people that had their ribs broken by Su Mei. When they saw the Wings Alliance badge on Su Mei's chest, all of them could only curse their luck.
The two of them continued walking, and all the observers would focus their attention on them. Just like that, they became a strange scene. When they walked to the outer-circle, a large amount of people were gathered there and they became the focus point of people's attention.
"Look, isn't that Chu Feng?"
"There seems to be a person behind him, isn't...isn't that Su Mei?" Two bodies came out of the crowds, and it was the Dragon and Tiger brothers. Those two people were very afraid of Su Mei so they wanted to turn around and escape.
"Bai Long Bai Hu, help me stop this bastard." But when Su Mei called out to them, they knew that they couldn't escape.
"Brother, what should we do?"
"Since it's like this, we can only follow up and give that Chu Feng a bit of suffering. Or else Su Mei would not forgive us."
The two of them looked at each other's eyes and remembered Su Mei's orders from all those days ago. They couldn't help but grind their teeth and leap towards Chu Feng's direction as they wanted to block him.
Chu Feng already noticed those two, and seeing as they were leaping towards him with unkind faces, he knew that they were going to attack him.
Indeed, the brothers arrived in front of Chu Feng and stuck out with one fist and one kick aiming towards Chu Feng's stomach and leg.
Those two were in the 6th level of the Spirit realm, and although they didn't use any martial skills, their strength and speed were top-class. If it was several days ago, Chu Feng would have no way of taking their attacks. But it was no longer hard now.
*whoosh* Chu Feng did not back off and he went forward instead. With one foot touching the ground, his body suddenly spun and he went between the two people like the wind.
"This aura, Spirit realm, 5th level?"
The brothers felt Chu Feng's aura, but they were surprised because of that. How could he dodge the attacks of the two while only being in the 5th level of the Spirit realm? It did not make any sense.
At that instant, the two brothers felt that they had no more face. Even though Chu Feng was a talented person, the two of them were not ordinary either. How could they let a little person, who was only in the 5th level of the Spirit realm, toy with them, who were in the 6th level of the Spirit realm, in front of the all the eyes of the crowd?
Thinking to that point, the hearts of those two became colder. They changed their styles, and several palms stuck out at the same time. Countless of wind palms that was visible by the naked eye started flying towards Chu Feng. Those wind palms were densely compacted and there was almost no way of dodging them.
"These two guys."
Seeing that the two of them actually used a rank 3 skill, Chu Feng started to frown. He was already unable to dodge against those skills, so he had to use his own skills to counter. But, there were too many observers, so if Chu Feng really used his skills, his true strength would also be exposed.
After some thought, Chu Feng bit his teeth and poured the spiritual energy within his body onto his skin. He shifted towards the thinnest wind palms and he wanted to forcibly take on the attack.
*bang bang bang*
After some heavy sounds, Chu Feng got hit by three continuous palms. Although a wave of numbing pain came from his back, he did not suffer from any internal injuries so the Dragon and Tiger brothers did restrain themselves.
But, to fake the real, he threw himself forward, and at the same time that he landed on the ground he intentionally bit his lips and spit out some watery blood.
It terrified the brothers as they saw that Chu Feng fell on the ground and even spit out blood. They only wanted to get back some face and they did indeed restrain themselves. After all, they did not want to anger the person behind Chu Feng.
Although they were afraid in their hearts, they saw Su Mei coming up so the two of them did not lend a hand towards Chu Feng and could only put on a face of evilness then said while pointing at Chu Feng, "Chu Feng, this is the price of offending Su Mei."
"Su Mei?!"
"The sister of Elder Su Rou, Su Mei?"
Hearing the name "Su Mei" shocked the observing crowd. The name Su Mei were not unfamiliar to them because it was an extremely talented person that everyone knew.
It was said that Su Mei was an exceptional beauty and only entered the Azure Dragon School this year, so that was why very few people recognized her.
But because Su Mei was extremely talented, being in the 7th level at the age of 14, she was directly accepted as a inner court disciple as an exception. On the same day that she entered the inner court, she entered the Wings Alliance.
After comparing Su Mei's appearance and the Wings Alliance badge on her chest, everyone was more certain about her identity. At that moment, the crowd exploded because Su Mei's name was really too well-known.
"Ahh, who's that boy? I see he's dead if he offended Su Mei."
"I think I heard that the Dragon and Tiger brothers say that he was Chu Feng. Seeing his face, he should be that idiot. He really must not know how high the sky or how deep the ground is."
At that instant, pretty much everyone thought that Chu Feng was dead. Because of Su Rou's existence, Su Mei's position in the inner court was not low.
Also with her beautiful appearance, she already became the spouse of choice for all sorts of geniuses within the inner court. Whoever dared to offend her was looking for death.
Su Mei arrived in front of Chu Feng, and as she looked at him who was slowly climbing back up and also the pool of watery blood in front of them, her face changed greatly.
She suddenly spun around, and slapped the Dragon and Tiger brothers with two bangs then loudly bellowed, "Who let you hit him? Are you looking to die?!"


MGA Capitulo 26 – Chu Feng is a Fierce Person
"Damn! What happened?"
The two slaps from Su Mei were extremely clear. Not only did it completely confuse the Dragon and Tiger brothers, she even stunned the observing crowd.
Wasn't Su Mei trying to catch that Chu Feng? Weren't the brothers trying to help Su Mei? What is this situation, and why did Su Mei hit the brothers? She even looked like she cared about Chu Feng and it completely scrambled everyone's minds.
"What are you looking at? What's there to look? If you keep on looking I'll scoop your eyes out."
Just at that time, Su Mei suddenly turned around. The cuteness from her beautiful face was no longer there and her pair of eyes shot two cold rays out, completely scaring the crowd back.
"Oi, are you fine?" After terrifying the crowd, Su Mei walked towards Chu Feng.
"I'm fine, this is nothing." Chu Feng stood up and used his fingers to wipe away the blood on his lips. A small bite wound also appeared.
"You...You bastard." At that instant, Su Mei suddenly understood. He wasn't spitting blood from the attacks, it was just him acting for his own entertainment. And that acting was so real that it even tricked her.
At that time, at that instant, Su Mei really wanted to jump over and scratch Chu Feng's face until it was full of flowers, but she still wanted to rope him in so she endured. She turned around, looked at the brothers then said, "Follow me." After that, she quickly walked out of the surrounding crowd.
"Hmph."
That moment, the Dragon and Tiger brothers were full of anger. However you say it, they were still famous people in the inner court, and after Su Mei's slap in front of the crowd, their faces were non-existent.
But because of Su Mei's status, they didn't dare to do anything to Su Mei. Their strength was far from her as well. So, at the end, they could only coldly snort and obediently follow.
After arriving at an empty place where there were no people, Su Mei sighed and said with an apologetic face, "Sorry for just now, it's just that Chu Feng has his special areas. I also just found out about it so we can't offend him."
Su Mei wanted to tell the brothers that Chu Feng had the Spirit Power and he very likely had cultivated in the Mysterious Techniques, but after considering that those were Chu Feng's secrets, she did not say the completely truth.
Hearing Su Mei's words, the brothers deeply thought at the same time. Where did that Chu Feng excel to gain Su Mei's good impression?
And after Su Mei and the two brothers left, Chu Feng was very bored. So, he tidied up his clothes and left the crowd. He did not want to attract any unneeded troubles.
"Chu Wei, that was..."
Just at that time, 10 people walked out from the crowd. It was Chu Wei, Chu Zhen and the others. Two of their bags were full and it could be said that they had a great harvest, but those were only low quality spiritual medicine.
They also saw the scene that just happened, and at that moment they were very astonished.
It seemed that Chu Feng being invited by the Wings Alliance was not only a coincidence, and there was indeed an unexplainable relationship.
"You've also heard that in this year's inner court disciple exam, there was a fierce person that killed 40 Fierce Beasts by themself right?" After some thought, Chu Wei opened his mouth.
"Of course we've heard of it. That guy was really strong, and he's a character that is heatedly discussed in the inner court. But he hid himself too well so no one knows who he is." There were no ends of praise as everyone mentioned that person.
"Then if the Wings Alliance was choosing a new member within the new disciples, who do you think would become their target of invitation?" Chu Wei asked.
"Of course it would be that fierce person." The crowd had the same thoughts.
"Chu Wei, do you mean?" Suddenly, a person reacted to it. After all, until today, the only new disciple that the Wings Alliance invited was Chu Feng.
But to connect the Chu Feng in their impressions to that idol-like fierce person was almost impossible to them.
So, that was why there was a person that rejected that, "Impossible. How could Chu Feng be that fierce person?"
"Do you truly understand Chu Feng? Ever since entering the Azure Dragon School, you've only teased Chu Feng because he couldn't enter the inner court. Who would know his true strength?"
"We..."
With Chu Wei words, everyone was mute and could not say anything because his words were the truth. Ever since when they were small, they looked down on Chu Feng and felt that he was not part of the Chu family. Yet, he hung the title of being part of the Chu family and they saw him as shameless.
Other than humiliating Chu Feng and degrading him, no one truly knew him.
"I agree with Chu Wei's words." Just at that time, the silent Chu Zhen finally spoke, "We all underestimated Chu Feng and because of that, my brother Chu Cheng paid the price. I hope that you guys don't offend Chu Feng anymore or else you will certainly regret it."
After saying that, Chu Zhen left first. Chu Wei and the others also sank into deep thought because they also knew the reason why Chu Cheng did not participate in the Spiritual Medicine Hunt.
After some hurrying on the road, Chu Feng finally walked out of the Spiritual Medicine Mountain and arrived at the plaza at the entrance. At that moment, there were already large amounts of inner court disciples gathered there.
A lot of people's harvest were not bad, and the plaza was very lively as people talked about the interesting things that happened in the Spiritual Medicine Mountain.
"Chu Feng." A familiar voice came, and Chu Yue's ground was looking at him from nearby.
Chu Yue's group had 11 people, and other than Chu Yue and two other Chu family members, the rest were the people that joined into the Chu Alliance at a later time.
Those people were very polite to Chu Feng, so Chu Feng's impression on them were not bad. Since he saw them, naturally, he would go over and greet them.
"Oh? Chu Feng's harvest is not bad, you actually got two full bags."
"Yeah, it's quite impressive that one person got more than all of us. We didn't know which ones were spiritual medicines, so for face we have some weeds here.. Haha..."
But just as Chu Feng got closer, the two other Chu family members were speaking sarcastically at Chu Feng's bag. They did not believe that Chu Feng was able to gather more than the 11 of them by himself.
Seeing that, Chu Yue wanted to scold, but not even letting her speak, Chu Feng said first, "Chu Yue, you will almost break through to the 5th level of the Spirit realm right? Take these as a younger brother's respect."
As Chu Feng said that, he put his hand into his bag, and when his hand came out, a bunch of spiritual medicine came out as well and he stuffed all of them onto Chu Yue's arms.
"Chu Yue, I have things to do so I'll leave first."
Chu Yue was stunned by Chu Feng's sudden movements. When she came back to her senses, Chu Feng already walked far. She could only see that the people around her were surprisingly staring at her arms and their eyes were filled with admiration.
She looked down, and instantly, Chu Yue was stupefied. Within her arms, there were 13 red spiritual medicines. Those were not the low quality Ground Spirit Grass. They were the medium quality Sky Spirit Grasses.
No one could stay calm as they thought about Chu Feng's bags that were possibly full of these Sky Spirit Grasses.
Of course, if they knew that in Chu Feng's other bag was full of Saint Spirit Grasses, many people would even have thoughts of dying.


MGA Capitulo 27 – Strange Marks
"Chu Yue, it seems that your harvest is not bad." Chu Wei's sound came and his group also slowly came over as well.
"This...You guys went and hunted Sky Spirit Grasses, and you even got so many!" When Chu Wei and the others came and saw the Sky Spirit Grasses in Chu Yue's arms, they were completely shocked.
The price of one Sky Spirit Grass was equivalent to 20 Ground Spirit Grasses. So the 13 Sky Spirit Grasses in Chu Yue's arms were already more precious than everything Chu Wei and the others had.
"No, these weren't hunted by us. They were given to me by Chu Feng." As Chu Yue said that, she stuffed the 13 Sky Spirit Grasses into her waist purse.
When she did that movement, almost everyone drooled from admiration. Especially the two people that humiliated Chu Feng before. They even had the heart to die from tofu collision.
[TN Not meant to be literally translated, but it sounds funny.]
It was because their provocation to Chu Feng just now were like beggars with two copper coins boasting their wealth to a rich person with thousands of coins on their waist. It was extremely laughable.
"Chu Yue, you're saying that these were given to you by Chu Feng, is it possible that..."
Chu Wei and the others lost all colour from their faces as they suddenly remembered Chu Feng's bags that were extremely full.
"Chu Wei, Chu Yue, something happened, Chu Feng he..."
At that time, Chu Xue and the others quickly ran over and her face was extremely ugly.
"Chu Xue, what happened? Did Chu Feng bully you?"
As they saw Chu Xue's appearance that seemed like she lost her soul and also Chu Gao's injuries on his leg, everyone from the Chu Alliance surrounded them and they even thought that it was Chu Feng who bullied Chu Xue and the others.
And when Chu Xue described the events that happened, everyone went silent.
According to what Chu Xue said, to save her, Chu Feng was surrounded and attacked by three level 5 Spirit realm experts. He should have been in danger, and even if he did not die he would have been crippled.
But they saw Chu Feng just now. Not only was he not even scratched, he was full of liveliness. How did that even look like a person that was injured?
And what did that mean? It meant that Chu Feng could not lose against three experts of the level 5 Spirit realm, or he could at least retreat with everything intact.
How did Chu Feng have that kind of strength? They didn't even want to continue thinking about it, because as they did, they got more afraid.
"Chu Yue, you said that Chu Feng is fine?" Chu Xue asked with a full face of emotions, and at the same time she felt that it was inconceivable.
"Mm, Chu Feng is fine. We just saw him." Chu Yue nodded and said.
"That's great, Chu Feng is fine, that is really great...sob..." Her extreme happiness instantly turned into sorrow, and Chu Xue threw herself into Chu Yue's arms, cried while saying,
"Chu Yue, I was wrong, we were wrong, only you were right...Chu Feng isn't our enemy, he is the bravest one in our Chu family...If it wasn't for Chu Feng, then I would have...sob..."
Facing that scene, Chu Yue felt even more gratified, as it seemed that Chu Xue really looked at Chu Feng in a different way.
"It seems that we've really looked at Chu Feng wrongly." Chu Wei sighed and there was a bit of shame on his face. Knowing Chu Xue's experience, everyone looked at Chu Feng at a different way.
And when all the disciples left the Spiritual Medicine Mountain, a group formed by elders can be the middle-circle of the Spiritual Medicine Mountain.
At that moment, Su Rou, the master of the Martial Skill Building and various elders gathered there. They were looking at the nearby corpses of the 3 disciples while frowning.
But, with their position, they could only look and did not have the right to speak.
Because next to those corpses, a person wearing a white robe was carefully observing. That person was very significant in the Azure Dragon School, and even core elders had to be careful around him.
That person's white robe was very special, as it was full of strange marks and special patterns. The white robe was very large as well. Not only did it conceal the person's clothing, it even concealed his face and tightly covered the entire person.
"After all these years, he has reappeared at last." Finally, an aged voice came from the white robe.
"Elder Zhuge, you're saying...it's the Thousand Bone Graveyard?" Su Rou went up and asked.
"What else could it be other than the Thousand Bone Graveyard?"
"You inner court elders really neglect your duties too much. You only report in after the Thousand Bone Graveyard appears. Do you know that you all delayed a lot of things?"
"Simply a bunch of rice buckets. All of you are garbage. Why do I even need you?" After Su Rou's question came the white robe old man's angry scolding. Everyone could feel the anger of that person.
"Hmph" After that scolding, the elder waved his big sleeve and disappeared without even leaving a single trace of him.
After he left, everyone relaxed and deeply exhaled. In front of that person, they really did not even dare to breath deeply, and no one dared to go up and ask a question like how Su Rou did.
"This old guy. Is he not a bit too excessive? This Thousand Bone Graveyard was already like an illusion, and even the spells that he set up could not detect it. How should we know when it would appear!" Su Rou said while fuming.
"Be a bit quieter. It was really too hard for our Azure Dragon School to get this person. Not only us, even the sect head had to be extremely respectful. We really can't offend this person." Ouyang went up and dissuaded Su Rou, and he was afraid that she would offend that white robe old man.
"Hmph, I see that he only ungenuinely joined the Azure Dragon School. Searching for the treasures of the Thousand Bone Graveyard would be his real goal." Su Rou coldly snorted and did not accept that.
"It's said that the Thousand Bone Graveyard contained treasures, but those were only rumours. Today, anyone who enters would die so it could not be confirmed whether it's the truth or lie."
"The Thousand Bone Graveyard is already seen as a danger spot, and everyone's feelings are anxious about that. If Zhuge can break this Thousand Bone Graveyard, then so what if the treasures are given to him?"
"Just afraid that he isn't up for it." Su Rou curled her lips.
"Girl, speak one less sentence." Ouyang was obviously helpless while facing the stubborn Su Rou, "That's right, did the Wings Alliance invite that boy?"
"Ahh, that boy really makes my head hurt. I heard Su Mei say that he refused the invitation." Su Rou sighed as they mentioned Chu Feng.
"Oh?" Ouyang got distracted for a bit, but then smiled and said, "This boy is quite interesting."
Chu Feng returned to his residence, and the first thing he did was to take a bath comfortably. But just as he took off his clothes and before even entering the path, Chu Feng's face changed greatly.
"This...This is..."
Looking at his own chest, Chu Feng's gaze flickered and his face was extremely ugly.
Because on his chest, a strange pattern appeared. The reason why it was strange was because those patterns were created from countless symbols.
Every symbol were as if they were alive. They were moving around in Chu Feng's skin, and it was extremely horrifying.
Chu Feng used his hand and powerfully rubbed his chest a few times and tried to wipe away the strange patterns, but no matter what, those symbols were like living under his skin and he had no way of getting rid of them.
Seeing those dense symbols that were swimming back and forth in his own skin, Chu Feng was incomparably depressed, yet he could do nothing.
"It seems like I haven't gotten rid of the curse from the Thousand Bone Graveyard."
Suddenly, Chu Feng smiled in relief. He knew that this was the souvenir that the Thousand Bone Graveyard left him. No matter if that thing was good or bad, the current him was helpless either way, so he could only leave it up to fate.
Since he could not do anything about it, Chu Feng didn't bother thinking anymore. Might as well pretend that nothing happened. So, he jumped into the bath and enjoyed his current life.


MGA Capitulo 28 – The Change in Attitude
Time proceeded and with a blink, several days passed. In those few days, Chu Feng did not even take a step outside. Other than studying the 3rd style of the Three Thunder Styles, he was refining spiritual medicine.
In a short few days, Chu Feng went from a wealthy person to a poor person with nothing. But, luckily, his dantian was filled up quite a bit, and with his estimations, he could breakthrough once more after another Spiritual Bead.
But, the Spiritual Medicine Hunt only happened once a year and the Spiritual Bead was a top quality spiritual medicine. If he didn't rely on Su Mei, how could Chu Feng have picked up such a deal? So he also knew that wanting to breakthrough again was not easy.
Without him feeling it, the day of the Chu family gathering also arrived. On that day, 3 familiar people came and visited.
"Chu Yue, Chu Xue, Chu Wei?"
Chu Feng was a bit caught off guard when he saw the 3 people outside. It wasn't that strange for Chu Yue to come visit. But, he never would have thought that Chu Xue and Chu Wei could come as well.
"Chu Feng, the gathering is almost here. Come with us and we can return together." Chu Yue smiled and said.
"Oh?" Chu Feng looked at Chu Wei and Chu Xue with a bit of hesitation.
"Chu Feng, let's go back together. Everyone's waiting for you!" Chu Xue also spoke, and other than sincere in her eyes there was also deep regret.
"Chu Feng, we may have misunderstood some things, but in the end, we are still family. I hope that you don't put the past in your heart." Chu Wei was also chuckling and there were some hints of admitting his errors in his tone.
Chu Feng thought for a while, but still said, "That's fine."
Chu Feng was not a narrow-minded person, or else he wouldn't have saved Chu Xue that day. In any case, he was also planning to return to the Chu family, so it wasn't bad to be able to chat with Chu Yue along the road.
They arrived at the gate of the Azure Dragon School, and indeed, the Chu family members were there waiting for Chu Feng. As they looked at Chu Feng, their gazes did not contain the past enmity. Rather, there was a bit more respect, and other than the respect there was also some embarrassment and some shame.
Although it was not confirmed, many people knew in their hearts that Chu Feng was likely the fierce person that slaughtered the 40 Fierce Beasts. He also got the recognition of the Wings Alliance, so how could they dare to offend Chu Feng when he was like this?
Chu Feng didn't think too much about their change. After all, in Chu Feng's heart, he viewed himself as a member of the Chu family. To get along with his family was naturally something that he yearned for.
But he also knew that it was his strength that caused their change in attitude. But why did that matter? After all, the world is as such. Even if it was family, seniors and juniors were divided by strength.
In the middle area of the Azure Province, there was a small town that was built against a mountain, and it was called the Leaning Mountain Town. The Chu family was the overlord of the Leaning Mountain Town, as they had control over the circumference of dozens of miles of land and resources.
The imposing gates of the Chu family were in front of their eyes. Fast horses arrived, and several impressive, young males and females jumped down. They were Chu Feng and the others from the Azure Dragon School.
"Look, the young masters from the Chu family have returned."
"Purple-coloured robes. Those are the symbols of the inner court disciples of the Azure Dragon School right? Impressive. They are indeed from the Chu family."
"That's right. Talent is the most important thing on the road of martial cultivation. Old Yang, the boss of the east side of the town used up all his fortune to get his grandson into the Azure Dragon School. But after entering for a full 10 years, he was only at the 1st level for his martial cultivation. It is simply incomparable to the Chu family's young masters."
"That may not be so. I hear that there's a person called Chu Feng in the Chu family, and even today he's still an outer court disciple. Because he had no face to see anyone, he didn't return home in many years."
"Then you don't know the full story. Although that Chu Feng has the status of a young master, he is not technically part of the Chu family. He was picked up by Chu Yuan, so it's normal even if his talent isn't equal to the other young masters."
"Shh, you can't randomly talk about that, or else you'll have bad luck if you let Chu Yuan hear that."
The arrival of Chu Feng and the others attracted countless observers from the town's citizens. To them who had nothing to do with martial cultivation, anyone who cultivated were their idol.
"Young masters, you've returned."
After entering the courtyard, the servants of the Chu family all surrounded them, and at the same time, it attracted many of the Chu family's younger generations.
There were a lot of young people in the Chu family, but they all entered all different types of schools. So, when they knew that the people from the Azure Dragon School returned, all the other people from the other schools wanted to see what point Chu Wei, Chu Yue and the others reached.
"Oh? Isn't this Chu Feng? You've finally entered the inner court for the Azure Dragon School?"
A sharp, unkind voice could be heard, and several young males and females walked over. The leading person was a handsome young man.
He was called Chu Xun, and he was the disciple of the second-rate Thousand Wind School. He was 18 years old this year and he had the cultivation of the 5th level of the Spirit realm. Same as most of the Chu family members, he had also been hostile towards Chu Feng since he was small.
"If I remember correctly, you also entered the Thousand Wind School inner court at the age of 15 right?" Chu Feng lightly smiled and said.
"Hmph, you are correct, but after entering the inner court for a short 3 years I reached the 5th level of the Spirit realm. Do you think you can even compare to me?"
"Hehe. Entered the Thousand Wind School at the age of 10, but only stepped into the 5th level of the Spirit realm at the age of 18. Such slow improvement, yet displaying such arrogance. Can't you be any better?"
"You're looking down on me? Do you want to spar a bit?" Chu Xun's face was very ugly, and he was really impatient to give Chu Feng a lesson.
"You aren't even fit to spar with me." Chu Feng shot him a glance of disdain and walked deeper into the Chu residence.
"Damn! Who gave him that confidence and dared to be so arrogant? He better not participate in the family's competition or else I would beat him to death." Looking at Chu Feng's back, Chu Xun gritted his teeth in anger.
"Chu Xun, I advise that you don't go and anger Chu Feng." Just at that time, the brothers Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen walked over.
"What is your meaning? You think that I can't beat him?" Chu Xun got even more angry.
Seeing that he was so stubborn, Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen were too lazy to pay attention to him and they went towards their own residence.
"Two pieces of garbage. How did they become so spiritless after one year?" Chu Xun glared at the two with disdain.
"The two of them are very correct. As your elder brother, I will also give you a few words of advice. That Chu Feng isn't as weak as you think. I won't say the specifics, so understand it as you wish." Chu Wei also went up and patted Chu Xun's shoulders.
After that, Chu Yue, Chu Xue, Chu Gao and the others also said some words with Chu Xun. Although it was very hidden, there were strong warning messages.
"These people. Have they gone stupid in the Azure Dragon School? No need to speak about Chu Yue, but why are Chu Wei and the others so cowardly?" Looking at the leaving backs of Chu Wei and the others, Chu Xun was a bit lost.
"That's right. Didn't Chu Wei and the Cheng Zhen brothers annoy Chu Feng the most? And also that Chu Xue. What happened to them?" At the same time, the people behind Chu Xun had confusion on their faces.
They could not understand. Chu Wei and the others were always humiliating Chu Feng without restraint last year. They left nothing behind and declared Chu Feng's ugly things in the Azure Dragon School. Why did it seem that all of them completely changed?


MGA Capitulo 29 – Meeting of the Father and Son
In a certain residence hall in the Chu family, a middle-aged male and a young man were sitting.
The young man wore a white robe. He had a handsome face and his entire body was emitting a special aura.
That person was Chu Feng's elder brother. He was an inner court disciple in the 1 school in the Azure Province, the Lingyun School, Chu Guyu.
As for that middle-aged male, he was Chu Guyu's and Chu Feng's father, Chu Yuan.
*creak~* As the two of them were chatting, that tightly closed door was slowing being opened.
"Who said that you could enter without knocking? Leave."
As he was talking happily with his son, there dared to be a person that intruded without permission. Chu Yuan angrily slammed the table and yelled. But, when the door completely opened and a thin, weak silhouette entered, and Chu Yuan's angry expression was instantly frozen.
"Heh, father, brother." Chu Feng scratched a bit and entered the hall while chuckling. These two people were the closest people to him.
"It's you brother?" After seeing Chu Feng, Chu Guyu was extremely happy. With a few steps he arrived in front of Chu Feng and hugged him, "Brother, you're finally back. I've missed you so much!"
"I've also missed you brother." Chu Feng also hugged Chu Guyu strongly.
"I haven't seen you in 5 years. You've grown tall and more handsome. I almost didn't recognize you." Chu Guyu carefully assessed Chu Feng and his eyes were filled with joy.
"But I am still not as tall as you." Chu Feng said while laughing.
"You are only so old. In a few more years, you will certainly be taller than me." Chu Guyu lovingly rubbed Chu Feng's head.
"Why didn't you even greet me when you came back?" Chu Yuan also walked over, and a unconcealable happiness was hung on his face. Although the Chu family members didn't view Chu Feng as part of the Chu family, in Chu Yuan's heart, Chu Feng was his son, and he was no different from Chu Guyu.
Seeing Chu Feng's purple robe, Chu Yuan asked again, "You've entered the inner court?"
"Mm." Chu Feng smiled as he nodded.
"Good. I was saying that my son Chu Feng wasn't that bad." Chu Yuan loudly laughed, and his laughter was unusually happy.
The three of them haven't seen themselves in 5 years and they had an endless amount of things to say. They chatted for a good half day and didn't even eat lunch.
"Mr. Chu Yuan, the master has asked for you and for young master Guyu to go over." When it was afternoon, there was a call from outside of the residence.
That voice came from Chief Zhao, an outstanding minister for the Chu family. Although he was not part of the Chu family, his position was very high. So, at that moment, Chu Feng, his brother, and his father walked out of the residence.
"Chief Zhao, do you know why he has asked for us to go there?" Chu Yuan asked politely.
"It's about the family gathering. All the members of the Chu family have went there." Chief Zhao who had white hair smiled and said that.
"I see. Guyu, Fenger, let's go." Chu Yuan looked at Chu Guyu and Chu Feng then prepared to walk towards the Chu family's conference hall.
[TN "Er" can mean "son", but when it is added behind a name, it doesn't mean too much other than a sign of a close relationship and as a filler character. (Sounds a bit better when you have "Fenger" compared to just "Feng")]
"Mr. Chu Yuan, the master only told you and young master Guyu to go." Just as they were going to move, they were stopped by Zhao.
"What is this?!" Hearing that, Chu Guyu got very angry.
"Sigh..." Chief Zhao was quite calm, and he faintly smiled as he said, "This is the meaning of the master. I am just spreading the word."
At that instant, not only Chu Guyu, but Chu Yuan's face was very ugly was well. They said it was a family meeting, but they didn't call Chu Feng. The meaning was very clear.
"Father, brother, you two go quickly. Don't make grandfather unhappy." Just at that time, Chu Feng spoke while smiling. His smile was very calm and his emotions were not even affected in the slightest. After being in the Chu family for so many years, he was already used to things like that.
And seeing Chu Feng like that, Chu Yuan's heart felt like it was being twisted by a knife. He also felt that he wasn't a qualified father, and he said while patting Chu Feng's shoulder,
"Fenger, I will guarantee that the next family meeting will include you." After saying that, Chu Yuan went towards the conference hall with Chu Guyu.
"9th level, Spirit realm." Chu Feng was overjoyed. He poured a thread of aura into Chu Yuan's body just now, and what he felt was the aura of the 9th level.
Chu Feng knew what that meant. In the entire Chu family, except for the old generation, there was no one that reached the 9th level of the Spirit realm. So, it was the biggest hand that Chu Yuan had as a candidate.
9th level, Spirit realm. With only one more step, one could enter the Origin realm.
In the Origin realm, you no longer used spiritual energy. You used the Origin power.
It was a power that was far above spiritual energy. A realm that completely exceeded the Spirit realm. The current master of the Chu family, "Chu Yuan Ba" was only one who was at the 1st level of the Origin realm.
Chu Yuan was able to reach the 9th level of the Spirit realm at this age. The distance to the Origin stage was only the width of a string, so Chu Feng was truly happy and excited for him.
"Mr. Chu Yuan, something happened!"
Just at that time, an aged voice echoed and a large person ran in with a face of panic.
"Uncle Zhang, what happened?" Chu Feng recognized that person. He was one of the servants for the Chu family.
"Are...Are you young master Chu Feng?" Looking at Chu Feng, Zhang revealed a different face.
When Chu Feng left the Chu family, he was only a child that was 10 years old. There was a huge change with 5 years, but Zhang still vaguely recognized Chu Feng.
"That's me." Chu Feng smiled and nodded.
"Young master Chu Feng. Fierce Beasts appeared in the ore mine behind the mountain." Zhang said in panic.
"Fierce Beasts?" Chu Feng's heart tightened, and he ran with flying speed to the back mountain without even thinking.
The ore mine behind the Chu family's mountain was a very important source of income for the Chu family. But, the miners in the ore mine were mostly ordinary citizens. Even if there were people that knew a bit of martial arts, their power was very low.
Fierce Beasts. Chu Feng had saw them before. Even if it was the weakest rank 1 Fierce Beast, those miners could not take care of them. Chu Feng didn't even want to think what would happen if the miners met the Fierce Beasts.
But just after Chu Feng left, the corners of Zhang curled up into a smile as his conspiracy prevailed.
"Uncle Zhang, thanks for your work." Before Chu Feng left for long, Chu Xun walked over and gave Zhang some silvers.
"Hehe, just doing what I should." Zhang took the silvers and said, "Young master Chu Xun. The Fierce Beasts were always in deep parts behind the mountain. How did you get them near the mines?"
"That's a secret."
"Young master Chu Xun, that's really a good method. But, those Fierce Beasts seemed to gather more and more, and they were more and more terrifying as they came. I think that we should quickly go over." Zhang's hairs stood up straight as he thought about the Fierce Beasts that he saw near the mines.
"What is there to be afraid of? The strongest ones would not pass rank 3, and Chu Feng did train in the Azure Dragon School for 5 years. If he can't even take care of a few Fierce Beasts then he's better off dead."
Chu Xun coldly snorted. The reason why he did all that work was to make Chu Feng suffer a bit. How could he go and save him?
"But, young master Chu Xun, if something really happens to Chu Feng and if Mr. Chu Yuan investigates it, then I'm afraid that it won't be too good." Zhang was still a bit worried.
"Fine. We'll go and take a look." After some thought, Chu Xun felt that Zhang was not incorrect. If Chu Feng died, then he died. But if Chu Yuan found out that Chu Feng's death was related to him, then that would not be good.
As Chu Xun and Zhang entered the back mountain and before even arriving at the mines, they discovered that Chu Feng was surrounded by a huge group of miners and they were walking towards the two. The miners were even carrying some huge monsters. With a closer look, they were Fierce Beasts.


MGA Capitulo 30 – Monster
"Young master Chu Xun, you've come as well."
"Ahh, those Fierce Beasts were too scary, but luckily, young master Chu Feng arrived just in time, or else I really wouldn't even dare to imagine the ending." Seeing Chu Xun, several miners ran over with lingering fear on their faces.
"Oh?" Only in that instant did Chu Xun find out that there were a total of 9 Fierce Beasts. Five rank 1s, three rank 2s, and one rank 3.
Those Fierce Beasts were nothing to him, but he felt that Chu Feng shouldn't have been able to deal with them. Was it possible that Chu Feng already reached the 4th level of the Spirit realm?
But even if Chu Feng had the strength of the 4th level, it wasn't possible to finish off so many Fierce Beasts at such a short period of time right?
"Chu Xun, thanks."
As Chu Xun was in a state of confusion, Chu Feng smiled to him, and within the smile, there was actually few bits of gratitude.
At that instant, Chu Xun was thoroughly stupefied. Hiddenly, there was an uneasy feeling that spread across his heart, and without even thinking, he quickly ran over towards the ore mine.
"Young master Chu Feng, you killed all of these?" Zhang saw the Fierce Beasts that did not breathe and felt that it was unbelievable.
He clearly heard that Chu Feng was a piece of garbage that stayed in the 2nd level for many years. Even if he entered the inner court of the Azure Dragon School, at most he would be at the 3rd level. How could he kill so many Fierce Beasts with such a fast speed?
"So what?" Chu Feng put away his smile and looked at Zhang. Not only did he not have the previous gentleness, there were even some cold intents.
"No...No...Nothing. Just randomly asking." Being stared by Chu Feng like that, Zhang backed off a few steps in fear and cold sweat came out from his forehead.
"Uncle Zhang, you've been in the Chu family for so long. Why are you getting more muddled as you get older?"
"Remember, as a servant, the things that you should ask, you should. The things that you shouldn't ask, you shouldn't. The things that you should do, you should. The things that you shouldn't do...It is better not to do."
There were meanings within meanings behind Chu Feng's words, and Zhang had a pale face from fear. He could not say anything in that instant and his body was uncontrollably trembling.
Chu Feng coldly smiled as he saw him like that. That proved that his guess in his heart was correct.
"Young master Chu Feng, what should we do with these Fierce Beasts? Do we take them back to the Chu residence?" Dozens of miners surrounded him.
"No need to trouble the people in the residence with merely a few Fierce Beasts. Just bring them back home and eat them." Chu Feng waved his hand as if it didn't matter then walked towards the Chu residence.
"Thank you young master Chu Feng." The miners were bursting with happiness. Fierce Beasts were strange monsters that could cultivate. Although their outer shell was as strong as steel, their meat was very delicious. It was said that after eating, not only would it strengthen one's body, it would even make their lives longer. Everything was a treasure from top to bottom and it was an object of considerable cost.
But, Chu Feng gave such precious Fierce Beasts to them. How could they not be happy? And when they saw Chu Feng bare-handedly kill all the Fierce Beasts in an instant with their own eyes, the miners respected Chu Feng even more.
Near the mines, Chu Xun arrived at the place where he found the Fierce Beasts at first. After seeing that no one was around, he walked up to a huge tree and leaped up. When he fell back down, there was an extra wooden box in his hands that was full of small holes.
"Teacher was indeed correct. This thing can attract Fierce Beasts, but they cannot find this box. This is really a good thing to bait Fierce Beasts."
"But to be able to attract the Fierce Beasts within the deep mountains... Other than a Spiritual Bead, normal spiritual medicine really cannot do the trick."
As he said that, Chu Xun opened up the wooden box. But, when he opened it up, the colour of his face instantly changed greatly. He discovered with shock that the wooden box that originally contained the Spiritual Bead was empty.
"How did this happen? Where's the Spiritual Bead?" Chu Xun fell on the ground with a poof, and his face was completely pale without colour.
Although the wooden box was passed down by his teacher, the Spiritual Bead was bought by his father with an extremely high price. His father was prepared to use it to break into the 9th level of the Spirit realm. If he let his father know that the Spiritual Bead was lost because of him, his father would undoubtedly strip his skin right off.
"Was it..." Suddenly, Chu Xun remembered the scene in which Chu Feng thanked him and he suddenly understood something. As he held onto the wooden box, he grinded his teeth and said, "Chu Feng, I'm not done with you."
At the same time, Chu Feng already returned to his own room. He closed the door and took out a bead that had spiritual energy lingering around it from his pocket as he had an evil smile on his face.
"Chu Xun, thank you very much. After walking in such a huge circle, after wasting so much effort, you did all that just to give me this treasure and to help me break into the 6th level. Hehe, you are quite generous as an elder brother."
Chu Xun would never have thought that Chu Feng had the Spirit power. Although the wooden box would confuse the smelling sense of the Fierce Beasts, it could not confuse Chu Feng's Spirit power.
The moment that Chu Feng arrived, he immediately discovered that wooden box which contained the Spiritual Bead, and he determined that it was a trap created by humans.
While he was going back down the mountain and seeing Chu Xun and Zhang's surprised expression, Chu Feng was even more sure that those two worked together and wanted to harm him. But they never would have thought that they weren't able to harm and rather they suffered themselves.
*gulp*
After entering the stomach, the Spiritual Bead instantly became huge spiritual energies. But, before the huge spiritual energy even got the chance to spread, it was sucked by the dantian.
At that instant, Chu Feng could faintly hear the chewing sounds that were like a hungry wolf from his dantian.
When that sound disappeared, huge change happened in his dantian. The 9 Lightning Beasts growled and transformed once again.
When everything returned to normal, spiritual energy that was several times stronger than before surged out from his dantian and it filled every part of Chu Feng's body.
"6th level, Spirit realm" Chu Feng opened his eyes and a happy smile was on his face.
A person that entered the 6th level of the Spirit realm at the age of 15 would already be considered to be a genius. A person that went from the 2nd level to the 6th level under two months could only be described with one word——Monster!
Time flew, and with a blink, the day of the Chu family's gathering arrived.
This so-called gathering was not simply a conference within the Chu family. It was also a display of the Chu family's strength to the outside.
It was overcrowded in the Leaning Mountain Town's martial arts training ground. Not only did it attract the town's rich to come and watch, it also attracted many nearby powers.
Within these outside powers, some came with invitations, some came because of admiration, but their goals were all the same, and it was to see the current strength of the Chu family.
So when the main members of the Chu family appeared, the liveliness instantly rose to the boiling point.
"Look, it's the master of the Chu family, Chu Yuanba. "
The person that everyone's gaze first landed on was the old man who was leading. Although he was quite old, his back was like a tiger and his waist like a bear. As he walked, wind rose. And under those snow-white sword-like eyebrows, there was an imposing wave hiddenly emitting from it and it made people somewhat fearful.
That person was the grandfather of Chu Feng and the others, master of the Chu family, Chu Yuanba. The only person in the Chu family that stepped into the Origin realm.
"Behind Chu Yuanba are the 6 sons of the Chu family right? All of them really do have out of the ordinary imposing and impressive presence. I wonder who the new master of the family will be."
"What's the rush? I hear that in today's Chu family gathering, he will officially announce his retirement and the new master will also be selected."
"Which means it's going to be quite interesting today."
As they thought of the most important part of today's Chu family gathering, everyone was already unable to endure their excitement.


MGA Capitulo 31 – Uninvited Guests
"This place is quite lively."
But just as the Chu family members entered the martial arts training ground, another group of people walked in majestically.
"It's the Xu family from the Pear Tree Town."
"Aren't the Xu family and the Chu family on bad terms? How do they still dare to come here at this time?"
Many people knew where the group of people came from. It was the biggest hostile fraction of the Chu family, the Xu family.
The Xu family was the overlord of the nearby town, and because of the fighting over natural resources, there were no small amounts of conflicts between them and the Chu family. A lot of people felt that sooner or later, there was going to be a big battle between the Chu family and the Xu family.
Just at this time, the Xu family brought so many people and appeared, so the first thought of countless people was that the Xu family arrived to look for trouble.
"Xu Qiang, today is my Chu family's gathering. What are you here for." Seeing that, the eldest of the 6 Chu family sons, Chu Wei's father, "Chu Renyi" brought a group of people and faced them.
"Chu Renyi, why are you so tense? We're just here to make things more lively." The male called Xu Qiang looked at Chu Renyi with disdain, and in that gaze, it didn't even put Chu Renyi in his eyes.
Xu Qiang was also the eldest out of the Xu family sons, but he was different from Chu Renyi. He was already set to be the future master of the Xu family and he was even an expert of the 9th level of the Spirit realm.
So, in his eyes, Chu Renyi was not even equal to him. The only person who was suited to talk to him was the current master, Chu Yuanba.
"Xu Qiang, our Chu family gathering does not welcome the Xu family." Just at that time, Chu Yuan also walked over.
"What, there's no one left in the Chu family? You think it's your turn to talk to me?" Xu Qiang's face changed, and the pressure of the 9th level of the Spirit realm engulfed without restraint towards Chu Renyi and the others.
Chu Renyi frowned at that instant. The him that was only at the 8th level was not able to withstand that pressure. But, during that hard time, Chu Yuan stepped forward and coldly said, "I, Chu Yuan, am enough against people like you."
At the same time that his voice rang out, Chu Yuan's strong pressure shot out from his body. That pressure not only canceled Xu Qiang's pressure, it even forced its way into the Xu family.
That change happened too fast and Xu Qiang didn't even have time to react. The crowd behind him were pushed back by Chu Yuan's pressure and only Xu Qiang was able to resist.
"9th level of the Spirit realm?" Xu Qiang had a face of shock. No matter what, he never would have thought that Chu Yuan also reached the 9th level of the Spirit realm, and that pressure was only stronger than his, not weaker.
"9th level of the Spirit realm. The 5th of the Chu family, Chu Yuan, is at the 9th level of the Spirit realm!"
"Impressive. At that age he already reached the 9th level of the Spirit realm. It seems that the position of the master of the family will belong to none other than him." Feeling Chu Yuan's pressure, cries of surprise sounded outside of the martial arts training ground.
Even the face of Chu Yuanba who was sitting changed slightly and surprised happiness surged into this eyes.
"5th bro, when did you breakthrough?" Chu Renyi asked emotionally.
"Big bro, I only broke through a few days ago." Chu Yuan lightly smiled and replied. Chu Yuan was always respectful towards this elder brother.
"That's good that's good, breaking through is good. It seems the spot of the master will truly belong to none other than you." Chu Renyi smiled and patted Chu Yuan's shoulders as he was truly happy for Chu Yuan.
Normally, the eldest would be the person to sit in the position of the master of the family but he didn't care about that. He only cared about the strength of the Chu family.
"Big bro, it seems that those words are said a bit too early." Suddenly, another level 9 Spirit realm pressure came from Chu Renyi's back.
Turning their heads and looking, Chu Renyi and Chu Yuan's face couldn't help but change.
Behind them, a white-faced middle-aged male was slowly walking over. That person was the 6th son of the Chu family, and also Chu Honfei's father, Chu Nanshan.
"6th bro, you've also stepped into the 9th level?" Chu Renyi's already happy face got even more happier.
"Big bro, it's just the 9th level of the Spirit realm so no need to get too emotional. My goal is the Origin realm." Chu Nanshan calmly smiled and proudness was emitted from his entire body.
"So the 6th son of the Chu family is also in the 9th level. It seems that the position of the master is undecided."
"Hehe, it seems that today we'll get to see some good shows."
The ones that were there for the liveliness yelled, but the faces of the nearby powers were very ugly. They were extremely clear what it meant with the sudden appearance of two experts in the 9th level of the Spirit realm.
Even that arrogant and rude Xu Qiang was also frowning and the corner of his mouth twitched. It was not a good thing for his Xu family.
"The ones that arrive are guests. Renyi, let the Xu family here and sit." Just at that time, a sound that was clear as thunder rang and it was Chu Yuanba who spoke.
At that moment, Chu Yuanba was full of smiles. Chu Yuan and Chu Nanshan were his two youngest sons, and if they entered the 9th level of the Spirit realm at that age, then entering the Origin realm was only a matter of time.
Which also meant that his Chu family had qualified successors, so how could he not be happy? Because he was that happy, he didn't care what Xu Qiang and the others came here for and even invited them to sit.
"Everyone from the Xu family, this way." Hearing his father's words, Chu Renyi didn't say anymore and brought the Xu family crowd towards the seats.
Chu Yuan wanted to follow up, but just at that time, Chu Nanshan went over to him and asked in a low voice, "5th bro, who do you think father will choose? You or me?"
"Go ask him yourself." Chu Yuan shot him a glance and quickly walked over.
Although they were brothers, Chu Yuan always disliked Chu Nanshan's methods of handling things. If Chu Yuan was asked who he didn't want the master to be the most, then without a doubt he would say Chu Nanshan.
"Hmph." Just after Chu Yuan turned around, Chu Nanshan's smile on his face instantly retracted and a cold gaze shot from his eyes.
But compared to them, the three other Chu family candidates had frowning and worried faces. Their opportunity for the master of the family was lost already and it really made them feel bitter. But the most depressed one was still the 4th son of the Chu family.
The 4th son of the Chu family had the cultivation of the 8th level in the Spirit realm. If it wasn't for his son "Chu Xun" who lost the Spiritual Bead in which he spent a sky-high price to buy, at the current instant, he may have been at the 9th level of the Spirit realm as well. Perhaps he could have been like Chu Yuan and Chu Nanshan and showed himself in front of all the guests.
The more he thought the more angry he got, and he was so angry that he was grinding his teeth, cutting his lips, and smoke was coming out of his 7 facial orifices. He hiddenly decided after the gathering, he would whip his son Chu Xun a few more times or else he would never get rid of the hatred in his heart.
"It's over. Father's gaze can already kill. After the gathering I need to quickly return to the Thousand Wind School and I cannot let father catch even my shadow."
In a certain corner outside of the martial arts training ground. Chu Xun was secretly observing the expression of his father. He thought about the punishment that day and he couldn't help but touch his eyes which were sticking out. Instantly, a fiery-hot sharp pain came and he said while grinding his teeth, "Chu Feng, I will return this debt back to you."
"Sigh, isn't it Chu Xun? What happened to your face? Who turned you into a bird?" But just at that time, he heard a familiar sound.
As he raised his head and looked, Chu Xun's face greatly changed. From nearby, the culprit that made his father beat him up was looking at him and on his face, there was even a smile that took joy in his misfortune.


MGA Capitulo 32 – I Concede
"Chu Feng, I'll kill you."
When the incomparably depressed Chu Xun saw Chu Feng, he was like a bomb that met fire. The fiery anger that was piled in his heart instantly exploded.
He spread his pressure which was the 5th level of the Spirit realm out, and ignoring the gazes of others, he raised his fist and rushed over to Chu Feng. With his power, he really wanted to kill Chu Feng in one punch.
"Who dares to touch my brother."
But before Chu Xun even got close, he heard an angry yell in his eardrums. At the same time, a strong wind pounced towards his face and kept on blowing him back, nearly making him fall on the ground.
"Chu Guyu!"
Looking over, Chu Xun was alarmed because next to Chu Feng was a handsome young man It was Chu Feng's elder brother, Chu Guyu.
In that instant, the fire that Chu Xun lit was instantly extinguished. He could not be more familiar with Chu Guyu because he was recognized as the 1 person in the Chu family's younger generation and he was not a person that he could offend.
"Chu Xun, listen up. I will cripple you if you dare to attack my brother anymore." Chu Guyu pointed at Chu Xun and warned.
Chu Feng's heart was warmed by that scene and it was the same as when he was young. Anytime someone bullied him, the first person that would stand out to protect him would be his elder brother Chu Guyu. Looking at him today, his elder brother just seemed even more reliable.
"Hey, such an imposing manner! You two brothers got a lot more arrogant in the few years that I haven't seen you."
Suddenly, a sharp voice rang. Turning their heads to look, they saw several young generations of the Chu family walking over. The one who was leading was a youth that had a white and an extremely sinister face.
Seeing that person, Chu Feng and Chu Guyu's faces both changed and waves of anger were stirred up in their hearts.
Although they haven't seen each other in many years, Chu Feng still recognized him with one look. He was the person that beat them down to the ground and humiliated them heavily, Chu Hongfei.
"Chu Hongfei. You really did come back, and I think it's time to even out some debts from that year." Chu Guyu said coldly and anger was hiddenly flickering in his eyes.
"Ahh, staying in the Linyun School for a few years made your temper a bit too poor. You think that you really are 1 in the Chu family's young generation? You think you can beat me?" Chu Hongfei looked at Chu Guyu with contempt.
"You will know whether I am the 1 in the young generation in the Chu family or not." Chu Guyu's voice got colder and colder. People could even feel the chill emitting from his body as he was forcefully enduring the anger in his heart.
"Not bad, you have spirit. Then how about you Chu Feng?" Chu Hongfei looked at Chu Feng, "I hear that you stayed in the outer court for 5 years at that second-rate Azure Dragon School?"
"How stupid are you to stay 5 years in that horrible place? Even if you aren't from our Chu family, you still have the name of the Chu family. Don't you feel shameless losing our Chu family's face?"
"I'll warn you. You two better not meet me in the competition or else I will beat you until you can't crawl back up just like 7 years ago."
"I will also tell you that the position of master will belong to my father, Chu Nanshan, because he has an excellent son like me, Chu Hongfei."
After saying that, Chu Honfei brought the group of people over to the competition registration.
Chu Guyu originally wanted to go up and say something, but he felt that someone tugged on his clothes. He looked back, and it was Chu Feng.
"Brother, there's no need to say too much to these kinds of people. Getting him to lie on the ground in the competition is the best way." Chu Feng said calmly.
Looking at that Chu Feng, Chu Guyu couldn't help but stare blankly. There was an indescribable feeling in his heart and he felt that his brother was different. As for the specifics, he didn't know where, but it seemed that his entire person changed into a deep and unpredictable person.
After Chu Yuanba said some polite words, the young generation of the Chu family stepped into the martial arts training ground. The first competition started just like that.
Taking the number that he drawn, Chu Feng went up onto the 5th stage. The moment he went on the stage, some humiliating voices also came along.
"That's Chu Feng right? Isn't that the person who stayed as an outer court disciple for 5 years in the Azure Dragon School? He finally entered into the inner court this year?"
"Even if he entered the inner court he is still garbage. How dare he enter the competition? He really doesn't know how high the sky or how thick the ground is."
"Isn't this great though? This will give him a good lesson and also let Chu Yuan know whether his son is garbage or not."
Most of the people who knew Chu Feng were from the Chu family, and the people who dared to humiliate Chu Feng were also people that had some status in the Chu family. Not only did they want to embarrass Chu Feng, they wanted to embarrass Chu Yuan even more.
"Chu Feng, it's you." Just at that time, another person went onto the stage.
Chu Feng was speechless as he saw the person from nearby. It was an old enemy, Chu Zhen.
But compared to Chu Feng, Chu Zhen's face was extremely ugly. The corner of his mouth was twitching and he cursed his bad luck on how he met Chu Feng in the first round.
"Chu Zhen. If remember correctly, I think that this guy entered the 4th level of the Spirit realm 2 days ago. It seems that Chu Feng will receive some suffering."
The Chu family members that didn't know the true situation saw that Chu Zhen was going against Chu Feng and they were secretly delighted. They all felt that it was a piece of cake for Chu Zhen to take care of Chu Feng.
The Chu Zhen brothers didn't like Chu Feng since a small age. They all believed that if Chu Zhen attacked he would not restrain himself. So, they were all expecting the scene in which Chu Feng got harshly beaten up.
"I concede!"
But just at that time, the Chu Zhen on the stage raised his right hand and yelled out loud. He gave up.
"Chu Zhen you brat, what are you saying? You didn't even start yet you conceded?" A fierce yell came from nearby, and it was Chu Zhen's father.
Facing his father's sharp gaze, Chu Zhen's expression fluctuated, but at the end he clenched his teeth, turned around, and walked down the stage.
"What...What is this?"
That scene shock everyone. Conceded? That was something that you didn't see in the Chu family competitions often, and the one conceding was Chu Zhen, and his opponent was Chu Feng?
How was that possible? Was Chu Zhen an idiot? Were there problems with his brain? What happened?
The Chu family members that did not know the truth were speechless. Although they didn't know why Chu Zhen did that, his actions really surprised them quite a bit.
Even Chu Yuanba was drawn towards Chu Zhen's actions. He frowned, and from his aged gaze, one could tell that even he was confused.
"Chu Feng wins this round."
But no matter what, Chu Feng really did win. Although it gave people an unfathomable feeling, Chu Feng really did become the first person to achieve victory in the competition.
After the first round, Chu Feng was quickly arranged to another stage. When he clearly saw, on the stage, a person that he just recently beat, even Chu Feng couldn't help but smile.
That person was Chu Zhen's elder brother, Chu Cheng.
At that moment, Chu Cheng had a pale face and green lips. He cursed in his heart "Us two brothers really have the bad luck of 8 generations. How did we meet this fiend?"
Although he was extremely unwilling in his heart, he suffered too much from Chu Feng and he didn't want to exchange any blows with him. After some thought, he did an action that stupefied the Chu family.
"I concede!!!"


MGA Capitulo 33 – Chu Feng vs Chu Xun
"Damn! What is this situation?"
This time, not to mention the Chu family, even a lot of outsiders that didn't recognize Chu Feng cast their gazes towards him.
"Who is this young man? He actually made continuous opponents to concede."
"I don't know, but looking at his clothes he should be the inner court disciple of the Azure Dragon School, but I don't think that he showed up in the past Chu family gatherings."
"He is not simple. Absolutely not simple. Without even exchanging blows he made the opponent scared. With this kind of deterrence, what would his future be like?"
Some of the observing crowd started focusing on Chu Feng, and hiddenly, they felt that Chu Feng was quite an impressive fellow.
"Ha! What are you even thinking about. This is the trash of the Chu family." A Chu family male that extremely loathed Chu Feng said that unhappily.
"Oh? You know this young man?" A big person questioned.
"Of course I know. I am from the Chu family so I clearly know that this boy is useless person."
"Have a look. This boy must have bribed the Cheng Zhen brothers and he is simply bluffing. I guarantee that he will lose in the next round." That Chu family male said with confidence.
"Ho, you must have already have some opinion on that young man right? No offence, but you are already an adult, so why lower yourself to a child?" That big person smiled and said.
"What? You're saying that I'm slandering him? I am saying only the truth." That Chu family male was extremely angry.
"Then how about this, I'll make a bet with you. If it is as you said, and that young man will lose next round, then these silvers will belong to you. If not, hehe, you understand..." That big person took out a tael of silver.
"Why not bet? I was just afraid that you wouldn't." Seeing that there was free money, why wouldn't that Chu family male not take it? Very quickly, he also took out a tael of silver.
"I concede." But just at that time, another yell came from the middle of the martial arts training ground.
Focusing their gaze, the Chu family male couldn't help but be shocked. Again, it was Chu Feng's stage, and the one who conceded was Chu Gao.
"Damn it. This bad luck." That Chu family male was speechless and his mind was a bit chaotic.
"Hehe, sorry that you lost." Seeing that, the big person helped himself and took the tael of silver from the male's hand with a smile.
Looking at his tael of silver that he paid to the rivers, that Chu family male felt a wave of pain and he said, "Do you dare to bet anymore? This time, I'll bet 3 taels of silvers."
[TN Paying to the rivers = throwing money away]
"Why not, just afraid that you wouldn't." That big person quickly responded.
"Ahh, count me in as well. I bet on the victory of that young man."
"Count me too. I also bet on the victory of that young man!" At the same time, some meddling people around also joined in.
"Come come come, everyone come! Who else? I'll keep you all accompanied!" That Chu family male panicked, and he just straightforwardly took his entire money bag out. Inside, there were dozens of taels of silver and he poured it all out.
Following the continuous conceding of Chu Cheng, Chu Zhen, and Chu Gao, the observes were all disarrayed.
Not to mention the Chu family, but even the outsiders stared at him blankly. More and more people started to try and guess who that Chu Feng was.
They heard of Chu Guyu, and they heard of Chu Hongfei. After all, those two were the young geniuses that entered a first-rate school. But where did this Chu Feng come from?
As the people could not guess the answer, Chu Feng was also helpless. He wanted to use the gathering to show off his moves, but he never would have thought that something like this happened.
Just as Chu Feng was depressed, a beautiful person walked up to the stage. After fixing his gaze, he saw that it was Chu Xue.
"Chu Feng, congratulations on your 4 continuous victories." Chu Xue smiled sweetly and said.
"Chu Xue, no need to jest..." Chu Feng dryly laughed, but quickly found out that something wasn't right, "4 times? It was only 3 times. Chu Xue, you wouldn't..."
Chu Xue smiled mischievously while looking at Chu Feng's stupefied expression, then she yelled to the old person off the stage, "I also concede."
"Hu~~~"
At that time, the entire martial arts training ground was completely stunned. Even some younger generations of the Chu family couldn't help but cast their gaze at Chu Feng and their gazes were filled with shock.
They were filled with questions and they could not understand what was happening.
Only those people who were from the Azure Dragon School sighed in relief and felt that they were lucky by not meeting Chu Feng. Or else they would have done the exact same choices.
"Haha, thank you very much."
"You do stick to your words."
"You are the best person that I've ever seen!"
Also at the same time, in a certain area in the observing crowd, a huge group of people were surrounding the Chu family male and took away the silvers in his hand without restraint. With a grab, it became empty.
That Chu family male even wanted to cry as he looked at his empty bag. He deeply felt that he was being tricked.
Why did all the Azure Dragon School disciples concede when they saw Chu Feng? There was definitely something fishy, but he couldn't think what Chu Feng gave them to make them concede so obediently.
*bang*
"Ah!"
On another stage, Chu Yue was falling down from the battle stage. If it wasn't for the Chu family elders who were off stage that caught her just at the right time, she would have certainly been heavily injured.
"Chu Yue, there seems to be nothing great about the Azure Dragon School's martial skills." Chu Xun walked down from the stage and a mocking smile was hung on his face.
"Chu Xun, your cultivation level is higher than me. If I was also at the 5th level then I wouldn't necessarily have lost." Chu Yue said with a face of bitterness.
"That is correct, but my cultivation is higher than you and that also relied on my ability." Chu Xun coldly smiled and said.
"You..." Chu Yue angrily grinded her teeth and there was an unspeakable grievance in her heart. She already reached the peak of the 4th level of the Spirit realm, and if the gathering was a few days later, she certainly would have broke into the 5th level of the Spirit realm. But since she lost, she lost and she didn't want to defend anything.
"Chu Xun, if I'm not mistaken, then you are one year older than Chu Yue. As an elder brother, you won against the younger sister. Is that even worth being proud of?" Suddenly, a voice sounded.
Looking over, Chu Yue was delighted. She saw that Chu Feng was calmly walking over under the lead of some Chu family seniors.
"Chu Feng, you are my next opponent?" Seeing Chu Feng, Chu Xun was obviously very happy because the person he wanted to give a lesson to the most was Chu Feng.
"Scared? You can give up if you're scared!" Chu Feng lightly smiled and said.
"Ha! If I don't beat the crap out of you, then it just means that you took a clean dump yesterday." Chu Xun coldly snorted and leaped onto the stage. He pointed at Chu Feng and said, "Get up here."
"Chu Feng, are you confident?" Chu Yue was a bit worried because she felt that Chu Xun wanted to harm Chu Feng greatly.
"Don't worry. I only need to attack once against people like him." Chu Feng faintly smiled and was going to walk towards the stage.
But just at that time, Chu Yue pulled Chu Feng's hand and asked quietly, "Chu Feng, did you get first in the inner court disciple exam?"
Chu Feng hesitated a bit, but seeing Chu Yue's gaze that longed for the answer, he couldn't bear to lie to her. He could only nod his head, and after that he leaped and landed onto the stage.
At that instant, Chu Yue's expressed solidified. Her pair of beautiful eyes constantly flickered and even her heartbeat quickened a lot.
Although she already had the answer in her heart, she still felt that it was inconceivable after receiving the confirmation from Chu Feng.
She raised her head and looked at the Chu Xun who was determined to win and the corners of her mouth raised to form into a sweet smile. For some reason, she felt a touch of sympathy for Chu Xun.


MGA Capitulo 34 – Stunning Everyone
"The chance has finally come."
Seeing that Chu Feng's opponent was Chu Xun, the depression of the Chu family male was instantly swept away into the air. Replacing it was an extremely happy face.
Obviously, he knew what kind of strength Chu Xun had. He was in the 5th level of the Spirit realm, and he was able to be in the top 5 in the Chu family's young generation.
After seeing Chu Xun's confrontation against Chu Feng, he could tell that the two of them were not on kind terms. Chu Xun would certainly not concede, so he was sure that Chu Feng would lose.
"Ahh, do you all dare to bet more?" That Chu family male yelled his throat out.
"Of course, but do you still have money?" The people that won all the silvers from the Chu family male laughed and said.
"Hmph. Are you looking down on me?" The male coldly said that and took out two Saint Spirit Grasses from his pocket, "As long as you dare, then I will play with you until the end."
Seeing the Saint Spirit Grasses in his hand, a lot of the surrounding ground were speechless. Saint Spirit Grass was a high quality spiritual medicine, and one of them could sell for a tael of gold. That was equivalent to 100 taels of silver!
Seeing that the Chu family male took out 2 in one go, many people weren't even qualified to bet with him. But, by simply looking at his bet, he was confident that he would win.
That was why a lot of people envied him but didn't dare to bet with him. It was because a lot of people couldn't afford to lose such a huge wager.
"You are quite bold. I'll play with you one more time." But that big person actually took out 2 Saint Spirit Grasses and showed it in front of the Chu family male's face.
"Heh, nice." Seeing that, the Chu family male was extremely pleased. The pit that the big person dug was not shallow and the chance for revenge was right in front of his eyes.
"Quickly look, the show's going to start." Just at that time, someone loudly yelled out.
Looking on the stage, Chu Xun already started the fierce attacks towards Chu Feng.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
Chu Xun arrived in front of Chu Feng and attacked with both his fists but didn't use his feet. One attack was faster than the other, and one fist came right after the other.
Wind was created from the punches of his fists and they were not ordinary attacks. It was a fierce boxing technique, a rank 2 martial skill.
Chu Feng swayed left and right away from the attacks that were like the howling wind and storm. He was hiddenly surprised that Chu Xun was able to use the rank 2 skill to that proficiency. It was not injustice that Chu Yue lost.
Sadly, skills like these to him were like a hundred loopholes that couldn't take even one hit.
*ta* Suddenly, Chu Feng stopped his retreating steps and didn't dodge anymore. He was just silently waiting for Chu Xun's attack to come.
"Good chance." Seeing that, Chu Xun even thought that Chu Feng made a mistake. He clenched his fist and started to throw his punch towards Chu Feng's face.
At that instant, the people who worried for Chu Feng dripped a drop of cold sweat. They were afraid that Chu Feng wouldn't be able to take that attack because if you were a human, you could feel that Chu Xun's power in his punch was not little.
As for the people who hated Chu Feng, they were rejoicing. They had been waiting for that instant for way too long and they wanted Chu Xun to kill Chu Feng with that one punch.
But of course, Chu Feng was going to disappoint those people!
"Ha!"
Suddenly, Chu Feng yelled out and boundless pressure exploded out from his body. His one punch was like lightning and it went straight towards Chu Xun's punch.
*crack* The two fists collided, and the sound of bones breaking resonated.
"Ah!" At the same time, Chu Xun cried out and he hugged his own right arm. He rolled down the stage and starting howling in pain.
"6th level, Spirit realm" At that instant, be it outside or inside the training ground, everyone was shocked.
Even Chu Yuanba couldn't help but widen his eyes and surprise surged onto his face.
As for Chu Feng's father Chu Yuan, he suddenly stood up and his body trembled emotionally.
In the instant that Chu Feng attacked, almost everyone could feel that Chu Feng's pressure was a genuine 6th level of the Spirit realm.
"How did this happen? Wasn't Chu Feng the trash of the Chu family? How can he have the power of the 6th level? Isn't he the same as Chu Guyu and Chu Hongfei?" Within the crowds of the Chu family, voices of shock endlessly resounded. They could not possibly accept that.
"Chu Feng, he..."
Actually, even Chu Yue, Chu Wei, Chu Xue, Chu Cheng, Chu Zhen, Chu Gao and the others...The people from the Azure Dragon School were also shocked.
They knew that Chu Feng was extremely strong, as he could kill 40 Fierce Beasts by himself and became the fierce person that was 1 in the inner court disciple exam.
But they only guessed that Chu Feng had the power of the 5th level of the Spirit realm. They never would have thought that he was on the 6th level.
6th level, Spirit realm. In his generation, he could already be considered to be a genius. Chu Feng was only 15 that year, and being on the 6th level of the Spirit realm at the age of 15 meant that he had unlimited potential.
"Hu~~~~~~"
Not only did the Chu family sigh, the entire martial arts training ground yelled in surprised as they were stunned by Chu Feng's strength.
A 15 year old that was on the 6th level of the Spirit realm appeared in the Chu family. It was an explosive news, and in a way, Chu Feng's strength was even more shocking than Chu Guyu's and Chu Hongfei's.
After all, Chu Feng was a good 2 years younger than the two of them. In the time of 2 years, with Chu Feng's strength, it was not impossible for him to break through into the 7th level of the Spirit realm.
"Genius. It's a real genius. The Chu family was hiding such a genius. It's really hard to believe it."
"It seems that the Chu family have a qualified successor, and the talented people appear from talented people. Their future achievements will not only be limited to this little Leaning Mountain Town."
The people from different powers admired endlessly. The future of the Chu family was showed by Chu Feng's and the other's performance. But their own family did not have such an excellent young generation.
"So he had that kind of strength." The Chu Guyu who was still on the stage was also attracted by Chu Feng's power. Unconcealable happiness surged onto his face.
"How is that possible..How did this happen...This...this...this is simply..."
But compared to the shock of other people, in a certain area, a Chu family male sat on the ground limply.
In that instant, he finally knew why Chu Xue, Chu Gao, Chu Cheng, and Chu Zhen would continuously concede. They did not do that randomly. It was because they already knew that Chu Feng had that absolute power.
"Thanks a lot." That big person walked over and took the 2 Saint Spirit Grasses away.
Seeing that his Saint Spirit Grasses were taken by someone, the Chu family male had a lifeless look in his eyes as if he was completely disheartened.
Suddenly, he moved his arms and slapped his own face two times then yelled in a low voice, "Idiot."
The surrounding people could understand his movements. Although there were no poor people here, they were not extremely rich people either. Having 2 Saint Spirit Grasses taken away was a huge blow to anyone.
Understanding was understanding, but no one sympathized for him. As a senior in the Chu family, he slandered a person of the young generation from the same family. In the eyes of others, it was called reaping what he sown. Well deserved.
People outside of the training grounds were yelling because of Chu Feng's strength. At that time, he already stepped onto another stage.
But, in that instant, Chu Feng's face was very ugly. It was because his opponent in front of his eyes was his elder brother, Chu Guyu.


MGA Capitulo 35 – Xu Tianyi
On the battle stage, the two brothers were looking at each other with their 4 eyes.
Chu Feng's face was extremely ugly, while Chu Guyu's had a smile.
The two of them did not say anything as if using their gazes to transmit their emotions.
Chu Guyu was happy for Chu Feng. Since he was able to reach the 6th level of the Spirit realm at that age, it meant that his talent exceeded his own.
Suddenly, Chu Guyu's mouth slightly opened, and he turned his head and started to speak towards the Chu family seniors that were off the stage.
"I concede." But when those two words rang out, Chu Guyu's smile was instantly frozen. Although those words were the words that he wanted to say, they were not said by him.
"Brother you..." Chu Guyu looked towards Chu Feng and his gaze was filled with anger. He originally wanted to give the chance to Chu Feng, but Chu Feng was a step faster.
Chu Feng face was already a lot better as he calmly walked next to Chu Guyu, smiled and said, "Don't mind it. I just feel that as both of you are disciples of a first-rate school, you are more suitable to be his opponent."
"Defeat him and wash away our shame from that year. Beat him and let him know who is the 1 person in the Chu family's young generation!"
After saying that, Chu Feng elegantly left the stage. But, his actions undoubtedly set up another huge wave.
Some people thought that Chu Feng was affectionate and gave his elder brother a chance.
But there were also some people that felt that Chu Feng knew his limits. He knew that he wasn't the opponent of Chu Guyu or Chu Hongfei so he gave up.
No matter what the other people thought, Chu Guyu's heart was very clear on what his younger brother meant in his words.
The competition entered the final stages when Chu Feng conceded. Chu Guyu and Chu Hongfei. Both of them were at the 6th level of the Spirit realm, and both of them entered a first-rate school. Without any more suspense, they became the final opponents.
The most exciting moment of the competition was also reached. Almost everyone's gaze concentrated on the bodies of the two young people and the battle for the strongest of the Chu family's young generation started.
*whoosh whoosh*
The two of them exchanged blows and all sorts of dazzling martial skills were used by them without restraint.
They were indeed the disciples of a first-rate school. Not only where their skills strong, their battle techniques were also top quality.
As the magnificent skills and strong wind were flying up and down on the stage, the two of them presented a visual feast for everyone.
"Brother, you must win."
But when most of the people were in a mood of appreciation, Chu Feng only hoped that Chu Guyu would win.
This battle was not only for the title. It was also representing whether Chu Feng and Chu Guyu's humiliation marked by Chu Hongfei that year would be wiped away or not.
"Ah~"
*bang*
But when Chu Guyu flew off the stage with a mouthful of blood by Chu Hongfei's heavy punch, all of Chu Feng's hopes instantly disappeared along with the dust.
"Brother."
Chu Feng ran as if he was insane towards Chu Guyu and he was deeply afraid that his elder brother was injured greatly.
When he arrived in front of Chu Guyu, he found out that Chu Guyu was silently looking at him with two streams of tears falling. He said with an extremely ashamed tone, "Your elder brother is useless and I've disappointed you."
After saying that, Chu Guyu closed his eyes and fainted away. Seeing that his brother's injuries were so heavy, Chu Feng instantly panicked.
"Hehe, like I said, in the competition, you brothers better not meet me or else I'll hit you until you can't get back up."
"So? Didn't I do what I said?" The Chu Honfei that was on the stage coldly smiled and looked at Chu Feng. His tone was filled with mock.
"Bastard, I'll destroy you!" Seeing that, Chu Feng was like an angry tiger. He wanted to leap onto the stage and decide who was superior.
"Fenger, stop." But before Chu Feng even leaped up, a strong hand tightly grabbed onto Chu Feng's shoulder. He turned around and looked. He was his father, Chu Yuan.
"The round is already set. Don't be seen as a joke by others." Although Chu Yuan's tone was calm, Chu Feng could tell how angry Chu Yuan was from his gaze.
That was correct. Which father would not be angry when they saw their son being beaten up like that? But in situations like this, he had to control his emotions.
"That's right. Obedient one, listen to your father or else your father will lose the chance for the position of the master." Chu Hongfei continued mocking.
"Hongfei, I suggest that you speak with a bit of propriety." Facing that arrogant Chu Hongfei, Chu Yuan's face couldn't help but turn cold.
"5th uncle, where am I wrong? The so-called ‘Winner is the king, loser is the thief'. As the winner, I can insult the loser. That is with my right." Chu Hongfei said disapprovingly, "That's right 5th uncle, I'm thinking that you already lost your chance on the position of the master."
"No need to be angry. If you want to blame someone, then you can only blame your two sons. If they could have beaten me then the position of the master would have been yours."
"But what a shame. The one who won is me, Chu Hongfei and not your two sons. Haha..." Chu Hongfei brought his mad laughter away as he walked.
At that instant, Chu Feng's anger was burning but he could only endure. The debt that Chu Hongfei left, sooner or later, he would give it all back with interest. But he could not right now because he could not break the rules of the gathering.
Especially now. It was his father's critical moment in the choosing of the family master so he could not burden Chu Yuan in any way.
Just like that, the curtains of the competition fell. Chu Hongfei became the victor of the competition, and with the approval of the public, also the 1 person in the Chu family's young generation.
Naturally, Chu Hongfei and his father Chu Nanshan became the biggest victors of the gathering. Everyone felt that since Chu Honfei got first in the competition, Chu Nanshan's chance of getting the position of the master of the family was even larger.
In reality, it was indeed so. Chu Yuanba personally gave the reward for being first in the competition to Chu Hongfei. He even let Chu Hongfei sit next to him to watch the rest of the details of the gathering. His eyes were drowning in love.
"The juniors from the Chu family do have some skill, but sadly, it is only limited within the Chu family." But just as the Chu family declared the end of the competition, a voice filled with ridicule suddenly rang out.
People focused their gazes and everyone couldn't help but stare blankly. In a certain area in the observing crowd, a young man was standing up.
The young man was only 17 or 18 years old but his pair of eyes were very serious. He was currently using that gaze to stare at the Chu Hongfei who was next to Chu Yuanba.
"Who are you? How dare you behave so atrociously in my Chu family?!" Someone asked loudly.
"I am the inner court disciple of the first-rate Hundred Change School. Xu Tianyi, son of Xu Qiang from the Pear Tree Town's Xu family."
"Also, I am not here to behave atrociously. I just want to spar and learn a bit from my peers from the Chu family." Xu Tianyi publicly challenged the young generation of the Chu family causing the elders from the Chu family to be extremely displeased. One after another they criticized Xu Qiang.
"Why are you all so nervous? My son said it very clearly. It's just some learning from sparing and not some life and death battle."
"But, if you are not confident and feel that your Chu family's young generation doesn't have the ability to win against my son Xu Tianyi, we can leave at this instant." Xu Qiang faintly smiled and said.
Those words completely trapped the Chu family. If they didn't accept the challenge, they would be reduced to a laughingstock in the future. So, there was only one road in front of them to choose.


MGA Capitulo 36 – I Will Accept the Challenge
"Hongfei. Are you confident?" Chu Yuanba looked at the Chu Hongfei who was next to him.
"Grandfather, I can settle people like this in 10 moves." Chu Hongfei said as he was full of confidence.
"Very good. Go, let this Xu family know the strength of our Chu family's young generation." Chu Yuanba smiled with satisfaction.
"Yes sir." Chu Hongfei ran as if he was flying then suddenly leaped. After a beautiful flip in the air he landed on the stage.
"Trash Xu family, let's see if you can take 10 of my moves." Chu Hongfei immediately attacked and displayed a set of beautiful boxing techniques as he madly charged at Xu Tianyi.
However, Xu Tianyi did not even dodge. Contempt was filled in his eyes, and only until Chu Hongfei got close, he stepped forward, raised his hand and slapped.
*bang*
With that slap, one could see a graceful flower of blood in the horizon. The Chu Hongfei that was strong as tiger before instantly became like a kite with its string broken. He flew back through the air and fiercely landed on the ground.
One move. He only used one move!
The 1 person in the Chu family's young generation, the Chu Hongfei who was at the 6th level of the Spirit realm, was not even able to take one move from the Xu family's young man. That loss was really tragic.
"Impressive. That young man called Xu Tianyi is at the 7th level of the Spirit realm."
"Reaching that stage at this age. Wouldn't he break all common sense in the future? He is the true genius!"
At that instant, everything was in disorder. All sorts of yelling continued without stop as they were shocked by Xu Tianyi's power. To be able to defeat Chu Hongfei in one slap revealed his bare strength.
"Xu Qiang's son has such talent?"
Chu Yuanba's face was pale and the corners of his mouth was twitching. Not only did Chu Hongfei lose, he lost so thoroughly. With that, everyone knew the Chu family generation was unable to beat the Xu family young generation. They couldn't even take one attack.
That made Chu Yuanba feel that his face was non-existent. He lost all his face, but what could he have done? He couldn't blame his grandson's lack of talent right? After all, his Chu family did not have any precedent people that were so overpowered.
"Hahaha, the Chu family young generation is only so-so."
Xu Qiang brought his arrogant laugh and the Xu family group towards Xu Tainyi's stage.
"Is there anyone in the Chu family that dares to battle with me?" Xu Tianyi did not let anyone go. He cast his gaze of disdain towards the young generation of the Chu family.
At that instant, although everyone from the Chu family was extremely angry, no one dared to take up the challenge because they knew that they weren't able to beat Xu Tianyi. If they still went up despite of that, it would just mean that they were disgracing themselves and people would have a lower opinion on them.
"Just leave it Tianyi. No one in the Chu family's young generation can beat you. Just let them go." Xu Qiang laughed and said, and it was extremely mocking.
"Hmph" Seeing that they had their way, Xu Tianyi coldly snorted and prepared to leave with Xu Qiang.
"I will accept the challenge."
But just at that time, a thunder-like yell suddenly rang out. At the same time, a body leaped into the air and firmly landed on the stage with a beautiful curve.
"Chu Feng!" Seeing the body on the stage, everyone was shocked.
"Fenger come back." Chu Yuan quickly yelled out because he was afraid that Chu Feng would be in the same situation as Chu Hongfei.
"Really embarrassing." Chu Yuanba's face turned green. He felt that Chu Feng's actions would only lose more face for the Chu family.
"Boy, you think you can win?" Xu Tianyi disdainfully looked at Chu Feng and didn't even put him in his eyes.
"You'll know when you try." Chu Feng calmly smiled and said.
"Very well." Xu Tianyi leaped forward and instantly a blast of wind was stirred. In a blink, he arrived in front of Chu Feng. He still used that slap and he still aimed at that spot. He wanted Chu Feng to lose as miserable as Chu Hongfei.
In that instant, some Chu family members turned their head and couldn't bare looking. They didn't feel sorry for Chu Feng, but they didn't want to see Chu Feng who was going to lose even more of the Chu family's face.
*whoosh* But just as people thought that Chu Feng would certainly lose, his body leaned slightly to the side and he easily dodged Xu Tianyi's attack. After that, Chu Feng aimed to do a backhand slap at Xu Tianyi's face.
"This..." Chu Feng's speed was simply too fast, and the Xu Yianyi who was underestimating him was instantly shocked. He immediately took his other hand and wanted to forcefully block Chu Feng's slap.
But just as Xu Tianyi's hand was going to touch Chu Feng's hand, Chu Feng's hand fluctuated and eventually disappeared.
"Damn it, this is a profound martial skill." Xu Tianyi was able to react to that with his experience. But it was too late because Chu Feng's illusionary palm already firmly hit Xu Tianyi's chest.
*bang*
*ta ta ta*
The palm landed and Xu Tianyi got pushed back a few steps. The strong power almost made him fall off the stage.
"Look, Chu Feng actually landed a hit on Xu Tianyi."
"What a strong technique. He was able to get a small advantage from a person at the 7th level of the Spirit realm."
Cries of surprise sprung up everywhere and everyone felt that it was unimaginable. Even the Chu family members that hated Chu Feng couldn't help but widen their eyes with traces of shock surging onto their faces.
The slap that defeated Chu Hongfei in one strike. Not only did Chu Feng dodge it, he even landed a hit on Xu Tianyi. What did that mean? At least, it meant that Chu Feng's power was a lot stronger than Chu Hongfei's.
Not to mention others, but even the Chu Yuanba who felt angry before paid more attention and astonishment was filled in his gaze.
"A bit skillful, but I won't go easy on you this time."
*bang* Xu Tianyi suddenly stepped forward and even the stage trembled a bit by his step. With a strong force he arrived in front of Chu Feng once again.
Both arms were spread. The shadows of the fists filled the air bringing strong wind with them. They were like a rainstorm that went along with the wind.
"Rank 3 martial skill."
The crowd was shocked. They could tell that Xu Tianyi was using a rank 3 martial skill in which he mastered. Chu Feng could not possibly defend against that sort of martial skill in addition to that strength.
"It came just at the right time."
But people never would have thought that Chu Feng wouldn't retreat from Xu Tianyi's fierce attacks. With the movement of both his arms, countless of palms gradually came.
Every shadow of the palm was incomparably real. Focusing to look, it was as if Chu Feng's body grew countless amounts of arms. The aura that it was emitted was even stronger than Xu Tianyi's.
*bang bang bang* The countless fists went against the countless palms. No one had the advantage at that time as they battled.
*Hu~~*
In that instant, the crowd started boiling again. It wouldn't be much if Chu Feng only used a rank 3 skill.
But he used the rank 3 martial skill to a level which made him equal to Xu Tianyi. It had to be known that he was only at the 6th level while his opponent was at the 7th level.
"This... Chu Feng is actually using this skill." After observing for a while, Chu Wei suddenly understood and the shock on his face became denser.
"Weier, what skill is Chu Feng using?" Suddenly, the voice of an old man rang next to him. Raising his head to look, it was Chu Yuanba.
Shock was hung on Chu Yuanba's face as well, but within the gaze in which he was looking at Chu Feng, it was filled with the longing of an answer.


MGA Capitulo 37 – Shocking Everyone
As an expert of the Origin stage, Chu Yuanba also discovered that Chu Feng was using a rank 3 skill as well and it was a lot more mysterious than the skill Xu Tianyi was using.
According to his experience, a skill like that was extremely hard to train in. Yet Chu Feng seemed to have already mastered it. So other than feeling astonished, he wanted to know what kind of skill it was.
"Grandfather, if I'm not mistaken, the skill Chu Feng is using is the hardest skill to train in the entire inner court of the Azure Dragon School, the Illusionary Palm." Chu Wei said seriously.
"What? It's the hardest skill to train in within the entire inner court? I never would have thought that this boy was this impressive!" Chu Yuanba inhaled a breath of cool air.
"Not only that grandfather. In this year's inner court disciple exam, there was a fierce person that battled 40 Fierce Beasts all by himself. Before the arrival of all the disciples, he killed all of the Fierce Beasts and took the reward for being the first."
"And we think that the fierce person is Chu Feng." Chu Wei continued narrating.
Hearing Chu Wei's words, Chu Yuanba's face changed once again and he was so shocked that he couldn't even speak. He immediately looked towards Chu Feng, only that his gaze was completely different.
At that instant, he had a thought in his heart. Perhaps Chu Feng really was able to recover the face of the Chu family.
Before, he never would have thought that the face of the Chu family would needed to be relied on this child to recover. After all, he was not truly a Chu family member, but, Chu Feng was his only hope.
*whoosh whoosh*
It was extremely hard to determine who had the upper hand in the battle between Chu Feng and Xu Tianyi. The observers could not tell who had the advantage, but Xu Tianyi was gloomy.
He did not pressure Chu Feng with his strength and his skills and he only evened themselves out.
He was already breathing roughly after many rounds of attacks. But, Chu Feng's face did not change at all as if he didn't know what was the things called "tired".
"This isn't right. This guy is delaying this round and wants to waste all my strength." Xu Tianyi felt that something was off as he said to himself, "It seems that I need to finish this fast."
Thinking to that point, Xu Tianyi did not dare to be slow. He changed his skill, and boundless pressure was emitted from his body. His entire atmosphere was different.
Chu Feng could feel that the stage was trembling even more violently when he did that. On both of the fists of Xu Tianyi, there was a silvery-white colour covering it. It was as if there was steel on it, and with it came an unconquerable aura as it came flying at Chu Feng.
"Rank 4 skill!"
Feeling Xu Tianyi's explosive power, everyone's face changed greatly. Even the face of Chu Yuanba that just calmed down changed as well.
Rank 4 skill. It wasn't something an ordinary disciple could train in. Within the martial arts training ground, there were many powers. From so many people, perhaps there wasn't even one that had a rank 4 skill. Even Chu Yuanba didn't have one.
The reason was very simple. The cultivators that could train in the rank 4 skill were certainly important people in the schools. The future achievements of that person would not be limited to a small place like this.
Also, not only were the rank 4 skills extremely hard to get, the difficulty to train in them was terrifying. Even if people got the rank 4 skill, they could not understand it. So, Xu Tianyi being able to use the rank 4 skill would naturally shock everyone.
Although he did not display the complete power of the rank 4 skill, he could be called a genius as he was able to use it to this extent.
Lost. Chu Feng lost. That was the voices of the hearts of countless people. But, it would not be injustice if he lost, because it wasn't that he was weak, it was his that opponent was too strong.
After all, Chu Feng will still young, and using the power of the 6th level of the Spirit realm to force Xu Tianyi to this extent already spoke a lot about his talent. If he was at the same age as Xu Tianyi then perhaps the result would be different.
Even though everyone felt that Chu Feng would undoubtedly lose, no one mocked him in his heart. Because, in their hearts, Chu Feng was also a genius.
*swoosh*
But just at that time, Chu Feng also changed his skills. He stopped the fists that covered his entire body and what took its spot was an afterimage that dodged Xu Tianyi's attack like the wind.
*bzz~*
Behind him, a body was spinning. Strong wind rose and there were even some lightning sparks. The momentum was only stronger and no weaker when compared to Xu Tianyi's previous momentum.
"This is..."
"Heavens! It's a rank 4 skill! Chu Feng can also use a rank 4 skill!"
If it was said that Xu Tianyi astonished people, the current Chu Feng would simply drive people insane.
At the age of 15, he had the strength of the 6th level of the Spirit realm. He could even use a rank 4 skill. He was simply broken.
But, the thing that was unbelieveable was still behind Xu Tianyi...
*bzz*
Chu Feng's whipped his leg out, and with the bits of lightning it swept towards Xu Tianyi.
"Damn." Xu Tianyi did not dare to be slow. He immediately retracted his hands to block it because he could feel how strong his leg whip was.
*whoosh* But he never would have thought that Chu Feng would suddenly pull his lightning fast leg whip back. Chu Feng changed his attacking angle and aimed at Xu Tianyi's waist then kicked out with his leg.
*bang*
Everything happened too fast. So fast that Xu Tianyi wasn't even able to react to it. Chu Feng's leg fiercely kicked his waist, and with some cracking sounds, Xu Tianyi flew off and fell off the stage.
"Tianyi!" Seeing that, Xu Qiang and the others were shocked as they quickly went up to support him.
"Don't move!" Suddenly, Xu Tianyi bellowed and said with a full face of pain, "It's broken. The waist is broken."
"What?"
"Hu~"
The entire place shook. Xu Tianyi lost. A disciple of a first-rate school, a young man who was in the 7th level of the Spirit realm lost. And he lost to a person who was 2 years younger than him and was only at the 6th level of the Spirit realm.
*Hualala~~~*
Suddenly, the people who were watching all stood up and clapped like the thunder. Some people even started cheering and kept on yelling Chu Feng's name.
They could not control their emotions. A person who was 15 years old had the cultivation of the 6th level of the Spirit realm, could use rank 4 skills, and he even defeated his opponent who was at the 7th level of the Spirit realm. He could not be called as a genius. He was simply a monster.
The battles were way too brilliant. Although the last exchange happened in a split moment, it still let people feel extremely carefree and excited.
"A monster like that appeared in the Chu family. It seems that we should build good relationships with the Chu family in the future."
Some people already hiddenly decided to have more contacts with the Chu family. For no other reason than the appearance of a monster like Chu Feng in the Chu family.
For the Chu family that had such a person, the only problem for their success was time. In the future, they could not stop it even if they wanted to.
So, many people saw the chance in their eyes and felt that as long as they had a good relationship with the Chu family now, perhaps in the future they could have a huge power to rely on.


MGA Capitulo 38 – Famous for a Hundred Miles
*whoosh*
Chu Feng leapt off from the stage. He did not bother enjoying the cheering and clapping and he directly walked out of the training grounds.
No one knew what to do as they looked at the back of Chu Feng. Only Chu Yuanba smiled and said in a low voice, "It seems like this guy has very deep resentments."
After leaving the martial arts training ground, Chu Feng went to Chu Guyu's room. Chu Hongfei's punch was very fierce and it was really not light when it hit Chu Guyu. After being unconscious for a good 4 hours he slowly awakened.
"Brother, what happened outside? Why is it so loud?" Chu Guyu didn't know what happened at the martial arts training ground.
"Nothing." Chu Feng's smile was very calm.
"Ahh, perhaps 6th uncle is the master now. It's all because of me. If I could have won, father would have..." Chu Guyu kept on blaming himself.
"Guyu, are you any better?"
But just at that time, Chu Yuanba walked in. Behind him were Chu Yuan, Chu Renyi, Chu Nanshan and some other people with high status.
"Grandfather, I'm fine." Seeing Chu Yuanba, Chu Guyu immediately sat up. He did not dare to neglect this grandfather.
"It's good if you're fine." Chu Yuanba lightly chuckled, and on his face, the rare benevolence emerged onto his face then he shot a glance at the Chu Nanshan behind him.
Seeing that, Chu Nanshan said with a bit of embarrassment, "Guyu, it's all because that child Hongfei inappropriately attacked. But don't put it to heart because now, his injuries are heavier than yours."
"What? Chu Hongfei also got injured?" Chu Guyu was a bit stunned.
"Ah..." Chu Nanshan bitterly laughed, but said nothing more and looked meaningfully at Chu Feng.
Following Chu Nanshan's gaze, Chu Guyu stared blankly at first, but shortly after it was like he thought of something and the colour of his face changed as he was surprised. Just at that time, Chu Yuanba also spoke.
"Fenger, thank you for today, or else our Chu family's face really would have been trampled over by the Xu family." As Chu Yuanba spoke, he took out 10 Saint Spirit Grasses from his pocket and gave it to Chu Feng.
"This..." Seeing that, everyone couldn't help but be at a loss. The reward of getting first place in the competition was only 2 Saint Spirit Grasses. But now Chu Yuanba took 10 out. It was not a small number!
"Grandfather, what does this mean?" Chu Feng pretended to not understand.
"This is what you should get. Take it. If you take it, I can feel more comfortable." As he talked, Chu Yuanba had an apologetic face on.
Although he never made things hard for Chu Feng, he never stopped the scenes in which Chu Feng got bullied by the Chu family. As for the reason, it was very simple. It was because he didn't like Chu Feng in his heart as well.
But today, if it wasn't for Chu Feng, his Chu family would have been the laughing stock of the crowd. Also because of Chu Feng, the Chu family's prestige increased many times.
Just now, there were already a few people from different powers that expressed their goodwill towards the Chu family. Chu Yuanba knew that it was caused by Chu Feng, and also because of that, Chu Yuanba felt more guilty towards Chu Feng.
"Fenger." Seeing that Chu Feng was hesitating, Chu Yuan quickly urged him.
"Then thank you grandfather." Chu Feng accepted the Saint Spirit Grasses but he had no smile on his face.
Chu Yuanba did not mind Chu Feng's actions. Rather, he was happy. He turned around and said to Chu Yuan, "In the future, the yearly supplement for Fenger will be 5 Saint Spirit Grasses."
With Chu Yuanba's words, not only other people, even Chu Yuan was astonished. There had never been such treatment before, and Chu Yuanba obviously wanted to develop Chu Feng well.
Although, at that time, the faces of Chu Nanshan and the others were not good, they did not dare to say anything. Because, in the Chu family, Chu Yuanba was like the sky. Even if the position of the family master changed, Chu Yuanba was still the real boss of the Chu family.
"The three of you continue chatting. Remember to take care of Guyu's injuries. Although today you are the master, don't ignore family relationships." Chu Yuanba instructed Chu Yuan.
"I understand, father." Chu Yuan responded.
Chu Yuanba looked at Chu Feng, and seeing Chu Feng's icy face, Chu Yuanba awkwardly smiled and brought the crowd and left.
"Father, look at Chu Feng's attitude. He is really too..." Just as they walked out of the courtyard, Chu Nanshan started to criticize Chu Feng.
"Shut up!" But what he got instead was an angry rebuke from Chu Yuanba. He pointed at the crowd with an icy face and said with an extremely serious expression,
"Listen up all of you. I do not want to hear anyone say anything bad about Fenger."
"If I hear it, no matter who it is, it will be handled, without exception, by the family law."
Hearing those words, the faces of Chu Nanshan and the others paled. They didn't dare to say anything because they knew in the future, in the Chu family, they could not offend Chu Feng anymore.
"Father, you're the master now?" With the room, Chu Feng was nicely surprised.
"Yeah, to be able to get this master position is all thanks to you, my precious son." Chu Yuan was also all smiles, "I never would have thought that you were hiding so many things!"
"Hehe." Chu Feng also smiled very happily as he was facing his father's praise. He worked so hard was to become the pride of Chu Yuan, and today, it seemed that his wish was reached.
"Father, brother, what is happening here?" Finally, the fog-headed Chu Guyu spoke.
Seeing that, Chu Yuan smiled at first, then he described everything in detail that happened on the martial arts training ground after Chu Feng left. Which included the sorry leaving figures of the Xu family, Chu Yuanba's announcement that Chu Yuan would take the position of the master, expressing goodwill towards various powers, etc.
After knowing all that, Chu Guyu had his mouth wide open, and he was so shocked that he couldn't say anything. His gaze towards Chu Feng became strangely complicated. He never would have thought that his brother would be like that.
But no matter what, as the elder brother of Chu Feng, he truly felt happy for Chu Feng. Because, he knew, his brother no longer required his protection.
After the gathering, Chu Feng became the topic of heated discussions in the area within the circumference of 100 miles. A lot of people knew that the Chu family produced a martial cultivation genius who was only 15 years old.
Some people even heavily exaggerated Chu Feng. Something about cracking the stage with one foot, a gale created with one breath and the exaggerations simply became legends. Some people even started to have suspicions on whether Chu Feng was a human or not. But, no matter what, Chu Feng was obviously the most paid attention topic of the mountain area.
Especially within the Chu family. Under the pressure of Chu Yuanba, no one dared to say anything bad to Chu Feng and no one dared to be disrespectful to Chu Feng. They had no choice but to face Chu Feng with a whole new attitude and recognize him differently
On that day, Chu Feng and the others returned back to the Azure Dragon School. When leaving, Chu Feng gave Chu Guyu a slip of paper and told him that he can only open it after he left.
"You have something under your pillow..."
That was the contents of the paper slip. Looking at Chu Feng and the others who were riding horses and gradually getting farther and farther, Chu Guyu helplessly shook his head. He did not know what circle his brother was moving him in.
But, after returning to his room, he still curiously lifted his pillow. Chu Guyu had a calm expression on as he lifted the pillow as it was not important. But, his face instantly changed like the waves because under his pillow, there were 10 Saint Spirit Grasses.
That number was not much to the Chu Feng who refined two Spiritual Beads and dozens of Saint Spirit Grasses, but to Chu Guyu it was a huge number.
"Ah..." After being shocked, Chu Guyu suddenly laughed. He looked at the direction of the Azure Dragon School and muttered, "It seems like the elder brother will have to rely on the younger brother from now on."


MGA Capitulo 39 – Displaying Strength
Chu Feng did a great service for the Chu family so Chu Yuanba wanted to focus on developing Chu Feng. Everyone in the Chu family knew about that thus their attitude towards Chu Feng also changed.
On the road back to the Azure Dragon School, the people that were hostile towards Chu Feng started to take the initiative to get closer to him. But other than Chu Yue, Chu Feng's attitude while facing them could only be neither cold nor hot.
Seeing Chu Feng and Chu Yue joking together, playing around, and being lively, many people endlessly envied Chu Yue and also at the same time they regretted their actions towards Chu Feng.
Their intestines even became green, but they could only regret because the only thing that the world didn't have was a medicine for regret.
[TN "Intestines becoming green" -&gt Intestines only become green after dying, so it's exaggerating that they "died from regret".]
"Chu Yue, if you have anything remember to find me. You know where my residence is."
After arriving to the Azure Dragon School, Chu Feng only said goodbye to Chu Yue and didn't care about the feelings of others as he left while swaggering.
Chu Wei's expression was very complicated as he looked at Chu Feng's back. He really wanted to say to Chu Feng, "Chu Feng, join the Chu Alliance. If you want, you can even take the spot as the head of the Alliance."
But he could not say that because he knew that he had no face to say it. Also, he also knew Chu Feng would not enter even if he said that.
Even he felt that Chu Feng did not deserve the Chu Alliance. The Chu Feng who was able to beat a person who was at the 7th level of the Spirit realm. Even in the entire inner court, he could certainly be seen as outstanding.
Chu Feng did not directly return to his residence. He came to the inner court's Mission Selection Location.
The inner court disciples were fairly free, but a lot of people still willingly remained at the school to cultivate because the Azure Dragon School could provide a large amount of cultivating resources.
Other than the yearly Spiritual Medicine Hunt, this Mission Selection Location could be said to be only route to gain cultivating resources.
Just as the name implied, the so-called Mission Selection Location was to select all sorts of missions, and after finishing, the appropriate reward would be given.
There were light missions and there were more serious ones. The light ones were finding items for people or escorting convoys whereas the more serious ones were killing monsters or helping in fights. As for the reward for the missions, naturally, they was related to the difficulty.
"Why are all these missions so simple?" Chu Feng was standing inside the Mission Selection Location's main hall while supporting his chin with his hand. He looked back and forth on the mission plates which were hung on the mission board. But after looking for a good while, he did not find any that he liked.
Because of the Divine Lightning in his body, if Chu Feng wanted to raise his cultivation level, the amount of spiritual energy he required would get larger and larger. It would not be simply settled by a few Saint Spirit Grasses.
So that was why Chu Feng put his current goal on the Spiritual Beads. But, after looking through the entire mission board, the highest reward for a mission was only a few Saint Spirit Grasses. Spiritual Beads? No need to even think about it.
"Ahh... It seems that I can only stack up the little things to form the great." Thinking to that point, Chu Feng did an insane decision. He flicked his arm and madly grabbed all the high difficulty missions plates that rewarded Saint Spirit Grasses on the mission board into his hands.
"Damn. Look at what that boy is doing? Is he crazy?"
"He isn't here to create trouble is he?"
Chu Feng actions undoubtedly attracted people's attention. In their eyes, with Chu Feng's age, at most he would be at the 4th level of the Spirit realm. The high difficulty missions required at least the 6th level of the Spirit realm to complete which was not something he could do. So, every felt that if Chu Feng wasn't crazy then he was creating trouble.
But, after all, there were limited high difficulty missions. So, after taking all the missions that rewarded Saint Spirit Grasses, Chu Feng cast his gaze onto the medium difficulty missions.
If Chu Feng crazily took the high difficulty mission plates, it would only attract their attention. But if Chu Feng extended his hand towards the medium difficulty plates, it would attract their hate.
"Oi! What are you doing? Do you have a problem?" Suddenly, someone yelled out.
Chu Feng frowned and looked at the person who yelled at him. Only then did he discover that he knew that person. He was someone that entered the inner court disciple exam at the same time as Chu Feng, and also the person who people thought highly of, Duan Yuxuan.
The current Duan Yuxuan's face was very ugly. After searching hard for a long time, he finally found a mission that he liked. But Chu Feng just grabbed it.
If Chu Feng really wanted the mission, then it would be fine. But obviously Chu Feng didn't so Duan Yuxuan couldn't tolerate that.
"You're cursing me?" Chu Feng calmly asked.
"So what if I am? Do you have a damn problem? Do you think this is opened by your family? From what I can see, with your mission grabbing, you are just here to make trouble..."
*bang* Before Duan Yuxuan even finished talking, a clear slap landed on his face.
A strong power made Duan Yuxuan feel that he was floating for a moment as his entire body flew up. As he landed, he opened his mouth and 3 teeth came out.
*hua~~~*
The crowd went into uproar because just now, everyone could feel that the seemingly unimpressive young man was an expert of the 6th level of the Spirit realm. His aura was also extremely thick and all of that made people speechless.
6th level of the Spirit realm. Although it wasn't the strongest within the inner court, to be able to reach the 6th level at that age already took people aback. The Dragon and Tiger brothers in the Wings Alliance were also at the 6th level of the Spirit realm, and obviously, the young person in front of them were stronger than the brothers.
Chu Feng ignored the shocked gazes of the crowd as he stuffed a large amount of mission plates into his bag on his shoulder. He pointed at Duan Yuxuan who was on the ground and said,
"Pay attention when you speak next time. I'll take how many missions I want and it has nothing to do with you."
After saying that, Chu Feng elegantly left. With his current strength, the people in the 7th level of the Spirit realm were not even suitable for him. Even against people who were at the 8th level of the spirit realm, as long as he used everything he had, he could have a battle as well.
From what he knew, in the entire inner court, the strongest people seemed to only be from the 8th level and there were no more than 10 people who were like that. So, in the entire inner court, there were not many people whom he was afraid of.
Also, after being in contact with Su Mei, he did not worry about people's suspicions towards his cultivating talent which was caused by his special body.
After all, in the inner court, there was already a genius like Su Mei. To know, in the Azure Dragon School, in the Azure Province, and even in the entire Nine Provinces, there would be even countless more impressive geniuses. So, the current innate skill that he was displaying was not worth being suspicious towards.
That was why Chu Feng felt that there was no need to hide his strength anymore. At least he wouldn't lower his head towards others.
After experiencing the Chu family gathering, Chu Feng also discovered a principle. Only with powerful strength will people respect him. So, from now on, he would not have a trace of restraint towards people that disrespect him.
"Who is this guy? The pressure that he was emitting just now was quite scary. I don't think that I've heard of him before." People started the discussions as they looked at Chu Feng's elegant back.
"I know who he is. He's Chu Feng, and he's also the person that refused the invitation of the Wings Alliance." Just at that time, someone yelled that out. With those words, the crowd exclaimed in surprise once again.
As for the Duan Yuxuan who was lying on the floor, he had some lingering fear. Someone who was at the 6th level of the Spirit realm and also who has the support of the Wings Alliance was not someone he could offend.


MGA Capitulo 40 – I Am Su Mei's Lover
"Get out of my face. If you dare to continue blocking me then I'll break you." But just as Chu Feng left the Mission Selection Location, he heard the sharp voice of a girl.
"Su Mei?"
Hearing that voice, Chu Feng couldn't help but be alarmed. He even thought that Su Mei met with trouble so he quickly went towards the direction of the voice.
Indeed, nearby, he found Su Mei's figure. But currently around Su Mei were a dozen or so Sword Alliance Members.
They did not conceal their aura so Chu Feng could clearly feel that most of the people there were at the 5th level of Spirit realm. The strongest one was a young man and he was at the 6th level of the Spirit realm.
That person had a high figure, white face, thick eyebrows, and big eyes. It could be said that he was a typical pretty boy. He was currently sinisterly smiling at Su Mei and the group of Sword Alliance Members were teasing Su Mei in front of the crowd.
But perhaps because of Su Mei's special status, the teasing from the white-faced male had quite some level so it made Su Mei extremely displeased and there was signs of her preparing to flip out.
Seeing that, the Chu Feng that originally wanted to help out instantly stopped his steps. He clearly understood Su Mei's strength. She was at the 7th level of the Spirit realm yet those people still dared to annoy Su Mei. They were simply looking to die.
But, obviously, the girl still did not want to expose her strength so she forcefully endured and did not attack. So, Chu Feng just joined the observers for the liveliness and hiddenly laughed in his heart, "I'll see how much longer you can endure this."
"Lady Su Mei. I, Jian Chen, truly like you. Can't you give me a chance?"
"In the entire inner court, no matter it be status, strength, or looks, who could fit you other than me, Jian Chen?"
That white-faced male called Jian Chen confessed with deep emotions. But, his pair of thief eyes were scanning back and forth on Su Mei's body. When he saw an attracting area, he couldn't help but lick his lips.
"You..." Su Mei's endurance obviously reached the limit because the thing that she could not stand the most was being annoyed by someone.
But just as she was going to explode, she suddenly saw a familiar figure in the crowd. A thought suddenly occurred and she retracted her angry expression while saying a bit embarrassedly to Jian Chen, "Actually, I already love someone."
"What? You have a lover? Who?" Hearing Su Mei's words, Jian Chen was as if he got hit by a huge blow and instantly got angry.
Su Mei smiled proudly, cast her gaze towards the crowd and used an extremely warm tone to say, "Darling, you're just watching when someone bullies me?" And the person she was looking at was exactly Chu Feng in the crowd.
"Damn!" Chu Feng hidden yelled in his heart. He never would have thought that Su Mei would discover him so soon and she even made a fool of him. Su Mei was obviously taking him as a shield!
Although he was displeased in his heart, as a man and while facing the concentrated gazes of the people all around him, how could Chu Feng retreat? After all, he was originally planning to help Su Mei out.
"Baby, I just arrived. Which bastard is bullying you? I'll help you take care of him." Chu Feng put up an act as he walked out of the crowd. He came in front of Su Mei, smiled sinisterly, then did an action that completely stupefied everyone.
He waved his hand and a burst of strong wind swept across. It pushed the delicate little beauty, Su Mei, into his embrace.
That scene could really be said to make people's eyes widen and jaws drop. Everyone had their mouths wide open and some people almost had their eyeballs fall out.
Who was Su Mei? She was a genius that everyone knew in the inner court and also a renowned beauty. Although there weren't many people that saw her, those who did see her were charmed by her beauty.
Many people even saw her as the goddess in their eyes. Those who had strong abilities and strong backgrounds directly confessed to Su Mei. This Jian Chen was only one of them.
"You..." Being flirted with in front of so many people, Su Mei was also angry to the point that both her eyes were on fire.
But after thinking that it was for herself, she strongly resisted against her anger. Not only did she not flip out, she was brimming with smiles of happiness and continued to stay in Chu Feng's embrace.
At that instant, Chu Feng could feel two balls of softness touching his stomach. That comfortable feeling instantly made him quiver once. After that, he couldn't help but more tightly embrace Su Mei a bit more and enjoyed that soft feeling as much as he liked.
"Damn it, who are you?!"
As he saw his own goddess being embraced by someone else in front of him, Jian Chen only felt anger attacking his heart and killing intent was emitted from his body.
"Who am I? I am the one whom Su Mei loves." Chu Feng stuck out his chest and raised his head as he said proudly.
"You bastard..." Su Mei cursed in her heart. Everyone could figure out what Chu Feng meant. His meaning was that Su Mei loved him instead of the other way around!
"Damn it. I'll break you." Finally, Jian Chen exploded. He pulled out the sword behind his back and stabbed towards Chu Feng.
"Darling, take care of him for me."
The thing that made Chu Feng speechless was the Su Mei in his embrace actually pushed him out. That push had plenty of power in it and it directly pushed him towards Jian Chen's sword. That was simply taking advantage of Chu Feng and she was taking revenge without even disguising it!
But what strength did Chu Feng have? People in the 7th level of the Spirit realm weren't even worth being his opponent, let alone a person of the 6th level.
*bang*
Chu Feng leaned to the side and dodged Jian Chen's attack. After that, he raised his leg and directly kicked Jian Chen into a miserable state.
"Boy, you're looking to die." Seeing that, the dozen or so remaining Sword Alliance members waved the sword in the hands and unrestrainedly chopped towards Chu Feng.
But, how could they be Chu Feng's opponent? Within a blink, the dozen or so people all got beaten up to the point where they were bleeding from their noses, bruised all over their body, rolling on the floor, and howling in pain.
*ta* Chu Feng stepped on the body of Jian Chen and said aggressively, "If you dare to disturb my darling in the future, I'll break all your teeth."
After saying that, Chu Feng went in front of Su Mei while chuckling and embraced her without restraint. He then said, "Let's sit over there darling." Then swaggeringly walked towards his own residence.
"Who is this guy? He dared to do that to Su Mei..."
Seeing the scene in which the two of them were relying on each other as they were leaving, at the same time that the people suspected his identity, the sounds of heartbreaking could also be heard.
As they walked, Chu Feng was really unrestrained. He tightly hugged the Su Mei in his embrace while completely ignoring Su Mei's gaze of contempt and also that small hand that was hiddenly pinching his arm.
These were Chu Feng's thoughts "Even I need to endure the pain, I will still take small advantages of you. The so-called ‘If you don't take the advantages of the small things, then you don't take advantage at all'. This is the price for taking me as the shield."
"Bastard, enough."
Just as they entered Chu Feng's residence, Su Mei pushed Chu Feng away. A gust of wind past by, and Su Mei's sharp kick came sweeping towards him.
"Damn~"
Chu Feng was shocked because Su Mei surpassed him no matter if it was speed or strength.
This girl was already at the 8th level of the Spirit realm!


MGA Capitulo 41 – Big Trouble
*whoosh*
Chu Feng had no way of dodging as he faced the Su Mei who was so strong. Under his helplessness, he could only use the first style of the Three Thunder Styles.
With that, Chu Feng was like the lightning. His speed instantly increased several times and he dashed, finally dodging Su Mei's attack.
"How is her power so strong?"
Chu Feng was shocked. According to his guesses, if he faced against experts of the 8th level, even if he could not win, there could be at least quite a battle.
But with Su Mei's attack, and it was clearly only a normal attack, it forced Chu Feng's trump card which was the Three Thunder Styles in which he wouldn't usually use. It simply exceeded his imagination.
"Hmph. You think you're the only one that trained in the Mysterious Techniques?" Seeing the astonished face of Chu Feng, Su Mei disdainfully shot Chu Feng a glance. She didn't attack Chu Feng anymore. She just sat on the chair in the hall, picked up an apple and started biting it.
"Mysterious Techniques, you've trained in the Mysterious Techniques?" Chu Feng was even more shocked.
Of course he clearly knew what the Mysterious Techniques were. They were called the Mysterious Techniques because they were techniques, and they were mysterious.
Those who grasped the cultivating techniques could condense the spiritual energy. If they had good talent, it was completely possible for them to breakthrough into the Origin realm. But to those who only had those cultivating techniques, the 1st level of the Origin realm would be the end of their cultivation. For example, Chu Feng's grandfather Chu Yuanba.
It was because the Origin realm was a whole new realm. What was required was not condensed spiritual energy. It was the Origin power. The Origin power existed between the skies and the earth, but it was not concentratable by cultivating techniques.
The only way to condense the Origin power was to use the Mysterious Techniques. But the techniques were too precious and too rare. According to rumours, in the entire Azure Dragon School, there were only a few books of them. And other than the elders, only core disciples could train in them.
But, Su Mei was only an inner court disciple so how could she have trained in the Mysterious Techniques? Unless...
"Is it that strange? Even you trained in the Mysterious Techniques. Does that mean I can't?" Su Mei curled her lips and said.
"So this girl thought I trained in the Mysterious Techniques." Chu Feng understood. He had only heard of the mysteriousness of the Mysterious Techniques but he had never seen them before. But thinking a bit more carefully, all of his behaviors up to this point really was quite similar to the rumoured people that trained in the Mysterious Techniques.
"Oi, what is this expression? Don't tell me that you haven't trained in the techniques and it was actually because of your strange innate gift that you could defeat the strong as the weak."
"I really did not train in the Mysterious Techniques." Chu Feng said.
"You're telling the truth?" Su Mei walked over.
"Mm." Chu Feng nodded.
After staring at Chu Feng for a good while as if trying to find hints of him lying, at the end, she said with shock, "It seems that the people who have the Spirit power are quite impressive. If you didn't train in the Mysterious Techniques yet you are already so strong, what would happen after you did?"
"Ah..How could I possibly train in things like the Mysterious Techniques?" Chu Feng shook his head. If it was possible, he really did want to see the so-called Mysterious Techniques.
Especially now when he knew that Su Mei, who already trained in the Mysterious Techniques, improved so quickly and the cultivations became so strong. He looked forward to those Mysterious Techniques even more.
Looking at the Chu Feng who revealed an expression of yearning, Su Mei frowned as if doing a very hard decision. After a while, she said, "I can give you the Mysterious Techniques."
"Are you speaking the truth?" Hearing those words, Chu Feng's expression changed greatly.
"Does it look like I'm lying to you?" Su Mei's face was full of seriousness.
"What's the price?"
"The price is to join in the Wings Alliance."
"Why do you want me to join in the Wings Alliance so much?"
"Because I want to rope you in. Right now, I am in the Wings Alliance. The Wings Alliance is relying on my power, so I feel that if you join then you can increase this power. Also, you have no road of retreat."
"What do you mean?" Chu Feng felt uneasy.
"Did you not know that the Jian Chen that you just beaten up was the younger brother of the alliance master of the Sword Alliance?" Su Mei said while smiling horribly.
"You damn girl." Chu Feng suddenly understood everything. After doing so much, not only did she use him as a shield, she even made unresolvable hatred between him and the Sword Alliance.
If the person that he beaten was only regular members of the Sword Alliance, then perhaps the Sword Alliance would ignore him due to his strength and not look into it too much.
But, the one Chu Feng beaten up was the alliance master's own younger brother. With that, the Sword Alliance would undoubtedly investigate it to the end because not only did it involve their faces, it involved family affection.
"I know that you have a spirit that is not afraid of the heavens or the earth. But, you need to remember that you may not be afraid, then what about your Chu Yue and your Chu family? Would they be afraid?" Su Mei tried again and said.
"I really did underestimate you." Chu Feng never would have thought that she would understand him that much. It was obvious that she investigated the details about him, but he still said seriously, "My reply are still those words. I refuse."
"Chu Feng, aren't you just a bit too arrogant?" Su Mei was quite angry. Even with the Mysterious Techniques he still refused. It really made her unable to endure it and her bossy temper instantly started to break out.
"This isn't the problem of me being arrogant or not. It's just that I don't like other people threatening me. You can leave." Chu Feng moved his hand back and forth. After being coerced by Su Mei like that, it would not be normal if Chu Feng was not angry.
*bang* But just at that time, Chu Feng's door to his residence was violently pushed opened by someone. After that, Chu Gao stumbled and tripped his way in.
When he saw Chu Feng, it was as if he saw his savior. He loudly yelled, "Young master Chu Feng, please save them or else it'll be too late!"
"Chu Gao, what happened?" Seeing that, Chu Feng was greatly alarmed because he saw Chu Gao with injuries, obviously showing that he suffered from an intense battle.
"Young master Chu Feng, young lady Chu Yue..." Chu Gao had a full face of panic and some words were scrambled up.
"Quickly bring me there!" After hearing the name Chu Yue, Chu Feng didn't bother asking much and pulled Chu Gao while rushing out.
But before leaving, Chu Feng fiercely shot Su Mei a glance because he felt that it was probably the Sword Alliance that came.
"They came so fast?" Seeing that, Su Mei curved her mouth upwards and after thinking for a while, she also followed them.
And on the road, it turned out that Chu Gao and the others didn't meet the Sword Alliance's revenge. They provoked another alliance.
Previously, after Chu Feng left, Chu Wei and the others met a fatty. That fatty saw Chu Yue and Chu Xue's beautiful appearance and teased them in front of the crowd.
So, Chu Wei and the others started beating that fatty up. But they never would have thought that it attracted a group of experts. So, the fatty that was only in the 3rd level of the Spirit realm was a master of an Alliance. Not only were there a lot of people, there were many experts.
Right now, the Chu family were all caught by them and Chu Gao was the only person to run out.
"Wait. Would the name of that fatty be Liu Mang and his alliance be called the Liu Alliance?" Su Mei spoke and asked.
"I don't know what he's called, but his alliance is indeed the Liu Alliance." Chu Gao replied.
At that instant, the Su Mei that always feared nothing started to frown and she said with a heavy expression to Chu Feng,
"Chu Feng, your family has gotten into big trouble!"


MGA Capitulo 42 – Matching a Hundred as One
"What do you mean?" Hearing Su Mei's seriousness, Chu Feng also understood that those people may not be that simple.
"If I'm not mistaken, that fatty is called Liu Mang. Although he is only in the 3rd level of the Spirit realm, he is indeed the alliance master of the Liu Alliance."
"That Liu Alliance is no simple thing. They have at least 100 members, and within them, there are 2 experts of the 7th level. In the many alliances in the entire inner court, the Liu Alliance is at least in the top 10."
"There's a reason why trash like the Liu Alliance can recruit so many members to join. Do you know he relies on?"
"What?"
"His grandfather, Liu Chengen, is the manager of the Azure Dragon School's inner court punishment department. Also, Liu Mang is the only son remaining in the Liu family so his grandfather spoils him a lot."
"The reason why Liu Mang has such powerful rallies is naturally because of his relationship with his grandfather. Within the inner court, as long as they don't kill, no one will investigate virtually any crimes by the Liu Alliance members. That's why they can be so reckless." Su Mei explained.
"Why are you telling me all this?" Chu Feng's gaze became more heavy.
"The Liu Alliance are not people that you can provoke. But, I can help you as long as you join the Wings Alliance." Su Mei smiled and said.
"We are both human, and there's no one who I cannot provoke. Also, you've got something wrong. It's not that I'm provoking him, it's that he's provoking me."
"I appreciate your good intentions, but this is my own family's business. As a man, I want to deal with myself." After saying that, Chu Feng bellowed at Chu Gao, "Chu Gao, lead the way!"
"Okay!" After Chu Gao's load reply, they quickly ran towards the Liu Alliance.
"This guy really is a bastard. Salt and oil simply does not mix with him." Looking at Chu Feng and Chu Gao's back, Su Mei pouted her small mouth. But after a quick moment of hesitation, she still followed them.
In a certain area in the inner court, there was a huge residence. It was Liu Mang's home and also the headquarters of the Liu Alliance.
At that moment, outside of the Liu Alliance, there were several hundreds inner court disciples that were gathered around and the amount of observers kept on increasing. Because, in front of the huge doors of the Liu Alliance, there were a dozen or so disciples hung there.
Their flesh was split open and they had fresh blood all over their bodies. Some people already fainted. Those people were Chu Wei, Chu Cheng, Chu Zhen and others.
"Quickly look. The Liu Alliance are having a demonstration again by bullying disciples just like that. Is no one managing this?"
"Managing? Who's going to manage it? The manager of the inner court punishment department is the grandfather of Liu Mang. Who dares to manage him in the inner court? He's just like a small overlord in the inner court!"
"Shh, quiet down. If you let the Liu Alliance hear you then you will end just like those people."
"Ahh, sadly, those two young girls were so pretty, but I'm afraid that they're going to get ruined by Liu Mang."
The observing disciples dared to be angry but not to speak up. Although within all the alliance powers in the inner court, the Liu Alliance was not the strongest, their background were very deep.
"Damn. That Liu Mang is looking for death."
Just at that time, Chu Feng and the others quickly arrived. Seeing the Chu family who were horribly injured, Chu Feng had no way of controlling his anger and rushed straight towards the Liu Alliance.
"Halt. This is the Liu Alliance headquarters. Non Liu Alliance members are not allowed in." Seeing someone was getting close, a member that guarded the gates into the Liu Alliance loudly yelled.
"Damn you." Chu Feng leaped up and kicked that person to the ground.
After that, Chu Feng pulled the person's collar and punched his face three times with three bangs. That person's face was full of blood and his nose was crooked.
After that, Chu Feng waved his arm and threw that person like a bag of sand into the air. After a beautiful curve it landed in the courtyard of the Liu Alliance.
"People from the Liu Alliance, listen up. Quickly release Chu Yue and Chu Xue or else I will trample over your alliance!"
Chu Feng's voice was like the thunder. Not to mention the nearby observers, but even the people within the Liu Alliance residence could hear it clearly.
"Damn. Who is that guy? He dares to challenge the Liu Alliance just like that?"
"I don't know. I never seen him before, but looking his age he seems to be this year's new disciple."
"It's really ‘Newborn calf is not afraid of the tiger'. He dares to challenge the entire Liu Alliance by himself. It seems that he's tired of living." Many people did a tribute towards Chu Feng's as they all felt that he was doing the same as looking for death.
Indeed, just as Chu Feng finished talking, the doors of the Liu Alliance residence violently opened. A whole 100 people aggressively rushed out.
Those people were still young and all of them were tall and big. Their strength were not weak either. The weakest was at the 4th level of the Spirit realm, the strongest was at the 6th level.
"Which bastard dares to act so wildly in the Liu Alliance? Break him!"
One of the person looked in the courtyard and saw the member who had his nose crooked and eyes slanted. He said nothing and rushed towards Chu Feng.
"Today, those who dare block me will receive the consequences."
As he faced the near hundred Liu Alliance members, the enraged Chu Feng did not back off in the slightest. He was like a crazy tiger and he leaped into the army of the Liu Alliance.
Chu Feng's attacks were extremely ruthless. To those who got caught by him The light injures were serious injuries, and the heavy injuries were those who instantly lost consciousness. Every move drew blood and he was unparalleled.
In front of him, no matter if it was level 4s or level 6s, none of them were able to take one of his attacks. In a instant, all sorts of howls of pain resounded everywhere.
"Heavens, who is this guy? How is he so strong?"
"He's too scary. At such an age he is already so merciless. That bone-piercing killing intent really goes straight to the soul and terrifies people."
Chu Feng slaughtered into the Liu Alliance. With a blink, the entire Liu Alliance were utterly defeated. Everyone cried out in surprise and even some observers trembled in fear.
As for those hundred young males, how were they even the Liu Alliance members that terrified people with their name? In front of Chu Feng, they were simply a group of kind, little sheep.
In front of the tiger, even wolves would be submissive. In front of demons, even evil people would become kind.
"This guy. I still underestimated him."
Su Mei's beautiful pair of eyes were hiddenly flashing as she was in a corner within the crowd who were watching Chu Feng's annihilation. Her sweet face was no longer calm.
Not to mention his dodging strength, but he was already so ruthless at that age. Even if it was Su Mei, she may not have been able to do it. After all, they were still so young.
But Chu Feng did it. If it wasn't for the Azure Dragon School rules, Su Mei had no doubt that Chu Feng would have killed all the people there.
That also meant that Chu Feng's mind was still clear. But to be able to remain a clear mind under such furious situations, that said even more about Chu Feng's scariness.
If he was already like this at this age, what would happen if he grew up? At that instant, Su Mei really did have a completely new understanding towards Chu Feng.


MGA Capitulo 43 – A Killing God
"Hehe, my two beauties. Let's see how you two can resist now."
In a certain room in the Liu Alliance residence, a fatty who had a full face of pustules, was fat-headed and had large ears was on the bed while looking at Chu Yue and Chu Xue.
He was the alliance master of the Liu Alliance, the notorious big molester, Liu Mang.
"Mm~~~"
Chu Yue and Chu Xue's hands and feet were tightly tied to the head of the bed. Even their mouths were sealed shut. Their eyes were full of fear as they trembled and constantly struggled.
Also, other than those three people, at that moment, there were also two young men standing within the room. Those two were the experts of the 7th level of the Spirit realm, the strongest within the Liu Alliance.
As for why they were there, the reason was quite amusing. It was because Liu Mang's strength was too weak and he had no way to assult Chu Yue and Chu Xue.
So, he had no choice but to get the two of them to tie Chu Xue and Chu Yue up so it was easier for Liu Mang.
They did not do any small amounts of horrible things like that. Most likely, they could have a sweet taste after Liu Mang felt refreshed.
So, at that instant, they did not plan to leave. They prepared to watch a reality show on scene as they waited for Liu Mang to finish. After that, they could go at it as well.
"waa~~~"
But just at that moment, another heartbreaking cry came from outside. Cries like that already rang several times before.
That made Liu Mang frown. He said to the two people, "Go take a look. Tell them it's about time to stop so it doesn't ruin my mood."
Hearing Liu Mang's orders, although the two of them were unwilling to, they had to turn around and go downstairs to stop the Liu Alliance members who continued to beat up those invaders.
But just as they entered the hall, they heard a huge boom. The big door of the residence was broken open and a body also flew in.
"This is..."
The person who flew into the main hall had a bloody face and they were unable to figure out who that person was. But, on his clothes, there was a "Liu" character written on it, so it was obviously their own alliance members.
"Damn."
As they saw their own people being beaten up like that, the two of them instantly got angry. Although Liu Mang was the boss of the Liu Alliance, in reality, they were the strongest in the alliance.
But, as they aggressively walked towards the door entrance, the scene in the courtyard even stunned the both of them.
At that moment, in the spacious courtyard of the Liu Alliance, Liu Alliance members were lying everywhere. All of them were horribly mangled, and other than the ones who lost consciousness, the rest were rolling on the ground and loudly howling in pain. It was extremely harsh.
Chu Feng was currently grabbing on a person's collar. Although that person was endlessly begging, he was not moved. He fiercely punched out, and with some bone-breaking sounds, that person's breastbone was shattered just like that.
After a howl in pain, he fainted. Then, like a scarecrow, Chu Feng threw him up high and with a puff he landed some place near.
Thus, the hundred Liu Alliance members that surrounded to attack Chu Feng were all destroyed by him.
But, it was only a short moment passed from start to finish. That ending made the observing people yell in surprise endlessly.
How was that a young man? He was just like a real-life killing God.
"Guy, who are you?"
Suddenly, at the big doors of the residence, a yell rang out. Looking over, everyone was shocked.
All of them could feel that the aura the two of them were emitting belonged to the 7th level of the Spirit realm. They knew the strongest people from the Liu Alliance came out.
If the ones Chu Feng were beating up were shrimp soldiers and crab generals, then he would currently be facing experts. Everyone yearned to see what would happen when Chu Feng and the two start.
[TN Shrimp soldiers and crab generals = useless troops]
"You will soon remember who I am." Chu Feng slowly turned around and cast his gaze which was filled with steaming killing intent towards the two.
"This guy..."
When they saw Chu Feng's icy face and the gaze that was full of killing intent, their bodies couldn't help but tremble and they uncontrollably backed off one step. An unstoppable fear started to spread within their hearts.
"bzz~"
Just at that time, Chu Feng suddenly attacked. He stepped forward, and he was like an arrow shot from a bow. He instantly ran at flying speed as if his entire body formed into a ray of lightning and he instantly arrived in front of the two people.
Before the two of them even reacted to that, they only felt some lightning movements in front of them and the rolling of qi and blood in their chest. After that, a mouthful of blood sprayed out as they fell on the floor without power.
"Heavens! That power belongs to a rank 4 skill!!!"
"How is it possible that this guy can use a rank 4 skill?"
"I know I know. He's the champion of this year's inner court disciple exam, the fierce person who slaughtered the 40 Fierce Beasts."
"How is that possible? The inner court disciple exam only passed for so long. How is he be able to use the rank 4 skill so quickly?!"
"Not only that. His aura is clearly at the 6th level of the Spirit realm, how is it possible that he instant beat two experts of the 7th level of the Spirit realm? Are rank 4 skills really that terrifying?"
The observing crowd instantly became a flying pot of oil. If it was said that Chu Feng battling the hundred Liu Alliance people displayed his ruthlessness, then now he was displaying his absolute power.
He was an unbelievable person, someone that shook away the limits of what they could bear, and to be able to do it to this extent was truly seen as a genius.
"Truly ignorant. How could mediocre people understand the world of geniuses?"
Su Mei shot a glance at the crowd who had faces of shock then shot it back at Chu Feng. Only then did she discover that Chu Feng disappeared within the main hall of the residence.
"Damn it! This guy is going to get into huge trouble." Seeing that, Su Mei's body leaped and rushed towards the residence.
"Darlings, you've been waiting right? I'll keep you accompany right now."
Back in that room, Liu Mang already took off all his clothes and revealed his incomparably nasty body.
His shining eyes looked at Chu Yue and Chu Xue who were on the bed. He shamelessly licked his lips, excitedly rubbed his hands, and as he was talking he was going to throw himself onto the two of them.
*bang* But just at that time, a heavy noise resonated. Looking over to the source of the sound, Liu Mang's face changed greatly and his eyeballs almost fell out from fear.
Because the frames of the room's door came out, and at that instant, it was flying towards him. At that speed, it was not something he could dodge.
*boom*
"Ahh"
With a boom, the door frame fiercely crashed onto Liu Mang's body and shattered the frame. Liu Mang crashed into the corner of the room while having fuzzy eyes and a dizzy head. His body was full of wood shavings and it was not a light smash.
As he slowly recovered, he discovered with shock that there was another person in the room. That person was standing right in front of him while glaring.
Although it was only a young man, his entire body was emitting an aura that terrified him. Especially those pair of eyes. It was as if it was filled with the shine of blood and he looked like a devil.


MGA Capitulo 44 – The Arrival of a Disaster
"You...You...Who are you?" That completely broke Liu Mang from fear. He kept on backing away, but he was already at the corner of the walls and there was no more paths of retreat.
*whoosh* Chu Feng said nothing and directly attacked. His hand was like the claw of an eagle. It went straight down at Liu Mang's lower part and grabbed onto Liu Mang's groin.
"Speak. How many girls have you wasted with this thing here?" Chu Feng suddenly smiled, but his smile was very strange.
Before Liu Mang was able to react to that, he saw Chu Feng smiling. He even thought that his chance came and he instantly changed his manner and loudly yelled,
"Why are you asking this? Do you not know who I am?! If you touch me then I'll get you killed!"
"I'm not doing anything, but it's just from today on, perhaps you can reflect on the girls that you've ruined before." After saying that, Chu Feng's hand suddenly clenched.
"Chu Feng stop!" Just at that time, Su Mei rushed in. She saw Chu Feng's movements and yelled at him to stop.
But it was too late. Two sounds of air escaping sounded out and blood splattered everywhere from Chu Feng's hands.
"Ahh~~~~~~~"
That Liu Mang howled like a pig dying. Both of his hands were covering that area as he rolled back and forth on the ground. But the pain was unbearable and he quickly fainted.
"Chu Feng! You've stirred up a disaster!" Seeing that scene, even Su Mei was not able to stay calm.
"Disaster? He dared to touch my family, so he's the one who stirred up a disaster!"
"He should be lucky that he didn't touch Chu Yue or else I wouldn't have only broke his genitals. I would have taken his life." Chu Feng coldly snorted and quickly walked towards Chu Yue and Chu Xue.
"Sob~~~~~"
When Chu Feng untied Chu Yue and Chu Xue's ropes, the both of them threw themselves into Chu Feng's embrace and sobbed without sound.
If Chu Feng did not arrive fast, the purity of those two really would have been ruined by Liu Mang.
After that, Chu Feng left with the Chu family. That event instantly stirred up the inner court. The crowd that gathered around the Liu Alliance also got larger and larger.
Everyone knew a young man fought against the hundred Liu Alliance members and stamped over the Liu Alliance, which did nothing but evil, all by himself. That young man was called Chu Feng.
Everyone also knew that the name Chu Feng was going to be spread all across the inner court. But, people did not know whether Chu Feng could live past tomorrow or not.
Not only did Chu Feng stamp over the Liu Alliance, he even broke Liu Mang and cut off the Liu family line.
Facing that kind of thing, as Liu Mang's grandfather, how could he look on the side and not care? An arrival of a disaster was destined for Chu Feng.
Indeed, after Liu Mang got wasted for not long, the residence in which Chu Feng was at got surrounded by people.
But, those were not simple disciples. They were the inner court elders. All of them were experts of the Origin realm and they were people from the punishment department.
Facing those elders, Chu Feng had no power to resist so he could only obediently let them take him away.
"Finished. Chu Feng's finished. That Liu Chengen will certainly take Chu Feng's life."
"Ahh, what a shame. A genius like him should have a great future just as he enters the inner court, but he provoked a person that he should not have provoked."
At that instant, there were a lot of people gathered outside of Chu Feng's residence.Those people tailed Chu Feng and followed him. After seeing Chu Feng being brought away by the punishment department, everyone felt pity for Chu Feng.
But, they did not notice Su Mei who was lingering nearby. At the instant that the elders showed up, she turned around and left.
There were many places in which the elders managed. Other than the Martial Skill Building, punishment department, Mission Selection Location, there was also a very important place. It was the elders' building.
In the elders' building, there were thousands of elders there and it was the area where the elders gathered the most. Su Rou was the manager there.
"What? You said Chu Feng destroyed Liu Mang's genitals?"
In a certain hall in the elders' building, after listening to Su Mei's narration, Su Rou's beautiful face was filled with shock.
"That's right. You need to help Chu Feng or else he will not be in a good situation." Su Mei begged and said.
"Not in a good situation? With Liu Chengen's methods, to be able to let him die happily would already be good luck."
"Chu Feng is way too rash. I cannot help him." Su Rou sighed and said regretfully.
"Are you just going to watch as a genius like Chu Feng get killed like that? You know how many benefits our Su family will get if we can rope him in?" Su Mei was a bit panicky.
"Chu Feng is indeed a genius, and if he was developed well he would indeed be helpful for our Su family. But he still isn't worth it for me to be hostile towards Liu Chengen." Su Rou shook her head.
"But he's a person that has the Spirit power! How long have our Su family searched for a person like him? Is he still not worth it for you to help him out?" Su Mei said emotionally.
"What did you say? Say it again?" Hearing those words, Su Rou's expression instantly changed greatly.
"I said is he still not worth it for you to help him out?"
"No, the previous sentence."
"He's a person that has Spirit power!"
"Sister. Is that the truth? Chu Feng has the Spirit power? How did you know?" At that instant, Su Rou excitedly grabbed Su Mei's shoulders and loudly questioned.
"I personally saw it. Did you not know about it?" Su Mei was stunned by Su Rou's sudden change.
"You saw it? When did you see it?"
Seeing that Su Rou really did not seem to know that Chu Feng had the Spirit power, Su Mei narrated everything in detail that happened in the Spiritual Medicine Hunt to Su Rou.
"If what you said was the truth, then this Chu Feng really does seem to have the Spirit power." Su Rou slowly closed her eyes and deeply took a breath. After that chest that was worth of being prideful of rose up and down once, she calmly said, "This Chu Feng must be saved!"
The punishment department was an area that punished disciples that wronged and also an area that imprisoned criminals. The people that were locked in here were not necessarily all people from the Azure Dragon Alliance. But those who did get locked in here could not escape the pain of punishment.
At that instant, in an iron prison in the most strict area in the punishment department, both of Chu Feng's hands were locked by iron chains and he was hung in mid-air.
In front of him were a dozen or so elders. The head of them was an old man who had white hair and a goatee.
The old man's sword-like eyebrows were upside down and his beard exploded. With a single glance, one could tell that he was a fierce character. He was the manager of the punishment department, Liu Mang's grandfather, Liu Chengen.
At that moment, Liu Chengen had both his eyes closed. He asked in a heavy voice, "Can Manger's injuries be healed?"
"Sir. Young master Mang's injuries are already stable, but I'm afraid that that part cannot be recovered..."
"Trash!" Liu Chengen suddenly stood up and the chair he was sitting on instantly shook and shattered. He pointed at the elder who was next to him and said, "No matter what the price is, Manger's injuries must be healed."
"Yes yes yes, I will do my best." That elder kept on backing away in fear, then he turned around and left.
At that instant, Liu Chengen finally cast his vengeful gaze towards Chu Feng and fiercely said,
"Cut off this brat's genitals, dig out his eyes, cut off his ears, nose, tongue and chop off his four limbs."
"Yes sir." Just as Liu Chengen's words fell, the elders behind him held all sorts of equipments and slowly walked towards Chu Feng.
Sinister expressions were hung on their faces as if they were going to chop Chu Feng into eight pieces. In reality, they were indeed preparing to do that.
*rumble* Just at that time, the iron prison's thick iron door shattered. At the same time, a beautiful figure also appeared in front of the door.


MGA Capitulo 45 – The Tyrannic Su Rou
Su Rou was wearing a white dress at that instant. With that clothing and her fox-like face, it was obviously different than the crowd and there was a type of manner that seemed different from the convention.
But, when Su Rou appeared, the expressions of the elders became more serious.
The iron prison was already tightly guarded. Other than the people from the punishment department, no other people could enter. Su Rou's current actions were just like breaking in.
"Elder Su Rou. Now this is a rare guest. I wonder what business you have in my punishment department?"
Although Su Rou arrived with bad intentions, after thinking about this person's background, even Liu Chengen had to smile while facing her.
"Just a small issue that I hope you can help out." Su Rou's charming smile had thousands different types of grace and even the old people found it difficult to manage her.
"If you have anything please say so. I will try my best to help out." Liu Chengen smiled and said.
"I want to bring this Chu Feng away." Su Rou lightly smiled and said.
With those words, not only the other people, even the Liu Chengen who was full of smiles had a great change in expression.
"Su Rou, what joke is this? Do you know what Chu Feng did?" Liu Chengen's attitude became serious.
"No matter what he did, today, I will bring him away." Su Rou also put away her smile.
"That will not do. I will say this right now. Even if God comes, don't think of taking Chu Feng away. See her out." Liu Chengen waved his big sleeve, turned around and didn't pay attention to Su Rou anymore.
"Elder Su Rou, please." Seeing that, several elders forcefully smiled and walked towards Su Rou, wanting to bring her away.
"Ahh!"
But before even getting close, a formless pressure shot out from Su Rou's body. That pressure was strong and it swirled like a whirlpool. Instantly, it filled the entire iron prison.
Almost at the same time, when the pressure was emitted, a dozen or so elders fell on the ground and mouthfuls of blood sprayed out from their mouths. Only Liu Chengen could continue standing.
At that instant, around Su Rou, a whirlwind was spinning around and that jet-black long hair was flying up and down. The snow-white long dress shook left and right as if a fairy was landing. But, her gaze was abnormally icy cold.
"I will also say this right now. You will release Chu Feng whether you are willing or not!"
"Su Rou, do not push your luck!"
Seeing that, Liu Chengen also got angry. The same strong pressure exploded out and engulfed the iron prison.
*rumble rumble*
At that moment, Chu Feng could hear the ear-piercing rumbling coming from all directions. He could also see that the sturdy iron prison was violently shaking as if unable to resist against the pressure coming from the two of them.
Under the pressure, even the Origin realm elders on the ground hugged their head while yelling as it was hard to endure.
But Chu Feng was completely fine. There was a warm aura around him that was defending him against a strong one. It was obvious that Su Rou's pressure was protecting him.
"Liu Chengen, it's not like I'm looking down on you, but you are still not suited to oppose me!"
Suddenly, Su Rou stepped forward once. Just as her feet touched the ground, a deep crack slowly extended out like a moving snake. It rapidly surged forward on the ground and went towards Liu Chengen.
*boom*
"Ahh!"
When the crack arrived in front of Liu Chengen, he instantly flew away and fiercely crashed into the iron walls. As he landed, his mouth opened and a mouthful of his old blood sprayed out.
"You...You actually reached this stage. With that strength, why are you still staying in the inner court as an elder?" Liu Chengen stared at Su Rou blankly with his eyes filled with fear because Su Rou's strength exceeded far beyond his imagination.
"There are things that shouldn't be asked!" Su Rou disdainfully shot Liu Chengen a glance and waved in the air with her hands.
With some bangs and clanks, Chu Feng's iron chains on his hands were cut. With that, Chu Feng also regained his freedom and stably landed on the floor.
Although Chu Feng didn't know why Su Rou came and saved him, he still quickly ran next to her. He knew at this time and instant, only being next to this person would he be in the safest position.
Chu Feng looked at the crack on the ground and couldn't help but inhale a breath of cool air. The entire iron prison was created with the heavy and thick iron. To be able to create a crack with one step on this iron, it showed how unreasonable Su Rou's strength was.
Chu Feng was not too injured and Su Rou also shot a sweet smile at Chu Feng. She grabbed Chu Feng hands and pulled him outside.
Looking closely, Chu Feng discovered that Su Rou was quite pretty. Although Su Mei's face was no worse than Su Rou's, she was still a bit young and she was still a bit "underripe".
But Su Rou was different. She had none of that and her entire body was emitting that mature charm. Even the fragrance of her body was especially enchanting.
*ta*
But just as Chu Feng sunk within that attracting fragrance, Su Rou suddenly stopped, looked back, and said with an extremely cold tone to Liu Chengen,
"Don't even think about hiddenly attacking Chu Feng or harming his Chu family."
"Or else, it wouldn't be as easy as your grandson being injured. I will erase your entire Liu family from the Azure Province."
"Su Rou, don't pressure me. If you pressure me past a point, no one will benefit from this." Liu Chengen angrily bellowed.
"Oh? If you feel you can, you can go ahead and try. I will accompany you anytime." Su Rou suddenly smiled, but her smile was extremely cold. She didn't speak anymore rubbish to Liu Chengen and walked out the iron prison with Chu Feng.
After Su Rou walked out, Liu Chengen was like a ball that had no air and weakly limped on the ground with a blank expression.
After a while, he bitterly smiled and his old tears started falling. He knew that he was only exaggerating just now because comparing the backgrounds of his Liu family and the Su family, it was really like a small wizard against a great one. Not even worth mentioning.
Today, he could only swallow his unpleasant breath back into his stomach. He was fated to have no more chances because...he did not want his entire family to be exterminated.
In a hall in the elders' building, Su Rou was busy making tea...
Chu Feng was sitting on a stool with one leg over the other as he hiddenly stared at Su Rou's well developed twin peaks and her smooth and round bottom. Looking down the dress and landing on those snow-white, long and beautiful legs, a wave of evil fire couldn't help but be created under his stomach.
"Hehe, this is quite the woman." Chu Feng hiddenly sighed in his heart. The person who could enjoy such a beautiful body would have such rare good luck.
With such a spicy figure, if it was possible to strip naked and reveal her perfect snow-white skin, Chu Feng only need to think about it to feel lucky.
But he could only think because he knew that Su Rou was not a simple person. Not to mention that she was the goddess in the hearts of countless inner court disciples, even core disciples and elders declared their feelings to Su Rou while crazily chasing after her.
But up until today, no one got their hands on her. So, this woman was not a person that would yield and be enjoyed on by normal people.


MGA Capitulo 46 – Entering the Wings Alliance
"Here, drink a cup of tea to keep the fear down!" Su Rou gave a cup of good smelling tea to Chu Feng.
"Thank you Elder Su Rou, I am indeed quite thirsty. " Chu Feng accepted the tea and poured it all into his mouth. He even wished for more as he asked, "Do you have anymore?"
"I do."
Su Rou continuously poured a few more cups for Chu Feng and he always finished it with one gulp. After finishing the entire pot of tea, he wiped his mouth with satisfaction. While he wiped his mouth he even burped.
Seeing Chu Feng act like that, Su Rou was surprised, "How is this guy even scared? He is clearly only thirsty."
To think that a young man at such an age would be so fearless towards such a threatening situation, that kind of courage, insight, and wisdom really made her see him in another light. The more she thought, the more she felt that she saved the right person today.
"Elder Su Rou, thank you for your help today. Or else I'm afraid that my little life really would have been ended." Chu Feng stood up and sincerely thanked.
But, he also guessed that Su Rou saved him because she wanted to rope him in. But, after all, she did save him. If he did not give his gratitude then that would simply be deceiving himself.
"No need for thanks. In this situation, Liu Mang wronged first and as an elder in the Azure Dragon School, it's normal for me to protect you. In any case, you are still such a rare and excellent disciple."
Su Rou sweetly smiled, and after that she extended her hand towards Chu Feng, "Since you already know the Three Thunder Styles then hand it back. A martial skill like that cannot be spread outside."
"Ehh, Elder Su Rou, I'll be honest. Within the Three Thunder Styles, I can only use two of them and I haven't understood the 3rd one yet." Chu Feng took the Three Thunder Styles out but he was a bit reluctant to part with it.
Su Rou took the Three Thunder Styles, then smiled and said to Chu Feng, "I won't hide this. Other than the founder of this school, no one truly understood the 3rd style, so if you mastered the first two then it's fine."
"Oh?" Hearing Su Rou's words, Chu Feng was hiddenly happy. Because faintly, he felt that there was some crucial point in the 3rd style that he didn't completely understand yet.
But Chu Feng also felt that one day he could completely understand it. At that time, wouldn't he be the only other person to know the 3rd style other than the Azure Dragon Founder?
After that, Su Rou chatted a bit with Chu Feng, but those were only the concerns of an elder towards a disciple and she did not mention anything about roping Chu Feng.
After leaving the elders' building, Chu Feng had an evaluation in his heart. Although Su Rou seemed a lot more gentler than Su Mei, her thinking was a lot deeper than Su Mei.
"Oi, you finally came out." Just as Chu Feng walked out of the large door of the elders' building, he heard a sweet voice.
Looking over, he saw a butterfly-like figure coming near him. It was Su Rou's younger sister, Su Mei.
"Thanks to you this time." Chu Feng smiled. He knew the reason why Su Rou helped him was most likely because of this girl. At least it was her that informed Su Rou.
"Oh? I couldn't tell, but you seem to still have a heart. But, if you're going to give me gratitude, you can't only use your mouth right? Shouldn't you express it a more materialistically?"
"You want me to kiss you?"
"Leave!"
"You want me to hug you?"
"Leave right now!"
"Fine. I'll take a deficit and I'll marry you."
"Instantly leave right now!"
Su Mei's little face was red from anger. Although she knew that Chu Feng was shameless, she never would have thought that he was that shameless. So, she didn't pay attention to him anymore and turned around to leave.
Seeing Su Mei pouting and leaving, Chu Feng laughed. Although he didn't dare to tease Su Rou, he dared to tease this little girl.
But after a bit of laughter, Chu Feng still caught up and said while smiling, "How about I join the Wings Alliance?"
"Really?" Hearing those words, Su Mei instantly stopped walking. A pair of shiny eyes were staring at Chu Feng while flickering.
"Of course. I owe you sisters a favour which I will return sooner or later. This doesn't count as repaying you, it's just to satisfy your small little wish."
Chu Feng words came from his heart. Although Su Mei saw his potential, currently, he was nothing.
If it wasn't for them saving him, he wouldn't even have his life. One must know favours and return them. Chu Feng was that kind of person.
At first, when he refused the Dragon and Tiger brothers, he was worried about exposing his innate gift, but now it was already exposed.
He refused today because he didn't like how Su Mei was threatening him. But, right now, with his strength, he still had no way to protect Chu Yue and his family in the inner court.
So, he felt that entering the Wings Alliance right now had hundreds of benefits and no harm. It would greatly help his Chu family's development as well.
Also, very faintly, Chu Feng could feel that Su Mei and Su Rou's background were not simple and the so-called Su family would not be simple as well.
A family that had the Mysterious Techniques would absolutely not be a normal power. It would be at least comparable to the Azure Dragon School.
So, he felt that the reason why Su Rou and Su Mei went to the Azure Dragon School was to find a person who had strength in which they could rope them to their own family.
Just like that Liu Chengen who asked Su Rou. Why did she stay in the inner court when she had that kind of strength? Why not become a core elder?
That was because core disciples would not easily be roped in by other people. But, most of the inner court disciples were new people. They were easy to attract and even easier to rope in.
At the end, those sisters were developing their family's power. Chu Feng also decided to join in their family.
[TN "Clan" may have been a better word of choice here, but I just kept it as "family" for consistency.]
"So you still have a bit of conscience." Hearing that Chu Feng really did agree, Su Mei sweetly smiled and said to Chu Feng, "There just happens to be a mission for our Wings Alliance tomorrow. You join as well."
"Mission? What mission needs so many people to participate?"
Chu Feng expressed confusion. Looking at the quality of the Wings Alliance members, everyone of them had the power to finish a high difficulty mission all by themselves. Why would they need him to join as well?
"You think it's going to be a trash mission like those at the Mission Selection Location? I'll tell you this. The Wings Alliance will never do those missions. The missions that we do are no easier than the ones that the core disciples do so you better prepare yourself."
"Also, the reward for this mission is also very generous. It's because no one is giving the mission to us, it's that we're taking everything from the mission." Su Mei said seriously.
"Damn. We're not doing a group robbery are we?" Chu Feng smiled and said.
"Idiot. Tomorrow noon, come here and find me. Also, don't wear the clothing of the Azure Dragon School."
Su Mei gave a paper slip and a badge to Chu Feng. The slip stated the location to meet tomorrow, and the badge was the symbol of the Wings Alliance.


MGA Capitulo 47 – A Warm Dinner
"Also, will the Sword Alliance not find my family for trouble?" Chu Feng was not worried about himself. It was only worried about Chu Yue and the others.
"That may not be so. The Sword Alliance is not a trash alliance like the Liu Alliance who only rely on their background. They do indeed have a certain amount of strength."
"But, if they dare to look for trouble, my Wings Alliance will tell them who's the boss alliance in the inner court."
After saying all that, Su Mei bounced away and left. It could be seen that her mood was pretty good.
"What sort of strength does the Wings Alliance have?" Chu Feng looked and the badge in his hand and his heart couldn't help but have a trace of rippling.
He could tell from Su Mei's words from before, the Wings Alliance did not put the Sword Alliance in their eyes. It showed that the Wings Alliance was really not simple.
After that, Chu Feng put on the Wings Alliance badge. He intentionally walked around the inner court. As for the reason, it was to know that he was a member of the Wings Alliance and telling the Sword Alliance to not attack his family.
"Look, isn't that Chu Feng?"
"The Chu Feng that stamped over the Liu Alliance and wasted Liu Mang?"
"That's him without a doubt. At that time, I was on scene so I wouldn't recognize him wrong."
"But wasn't he taken away by the punishment department? How can he appear here safe and sound?"
"Also, look at his chest! Isn't that the Wings Alliance badge? He already joined the Wings Alliance!"
"At first he refused the invitation of the Wings Alliance, but now he was still able to join in. He even escaped the punishment of the punishment department. How deep does the background of this Chu Feng go?"
"No wonder no wonder. No wonder he dared to do such things to Liu Mang. It seems that this Chu Feng isn't as simple as he seems on the surface. Do not offend this person in the future everyone."
Chu Feng walked around and those who knew him endlessly yelled in surprise. Other than sighing at Chu Feng's strength, they had to ponder at the power behind Chu Feng.
After walking around for a long time, Chu Feng also met quite a few people from the Sword Alliance. But none of them attacked him so it really showed that the status of being in the Wings Alliance came into use.
When Chu Feng returned back to his own residence, he discovered that the residence was still lit up. There were a few people moving around in front of the door, and from their auras, he knew that it was Chu Wei and the others.
"Chu Wei, what are you doing here?"
He saw Chu Wei and the others and they were wrapped with gauzes, as they were battered and bruised. They were not resting in their own residences and they were lingering around here instead. Chu Feng did not understand why.
"Chu Feng, you finally returned. This is great, if you're fine then it's great."
"Chu Feng, quickly come in. Everyone's waiting for you." Seeing Chu Feng, Chu Wei and the others breathed a sigh of relief as if releasing a burden. They did not say much and they dragged Chu Feng into the residence with smiles.
After opening the doors of the residence, Chu Feng saw that Chu Yue, Chu Xue and the others were all there. Even the other members from the Chu Alliance arrived.
In the middle of the hall, there was a huge table. On top of it were many delicious foods and most of them were his favourites.
After that, Chu Feng found about that after he got taken away, Chu Yue and the others went to the elders' building. They were trying to beg for help for Chu Feng, but they almost got detained themselves.
Luckily, Su Rou arrived and helped them out. She even told them to prepare delicious foods and wait for Chu Feng at his residence. Chu Feng would return safely without a doubt.
This meal was not the first time Chu Feng ate with his family, but it was the first time that he felt the comfort of a family.
Everyone's feelings towards him were all from their hearts. It was all sincere. Many people were grateful towards Chu Feng and Chu Feng really liked that sincere treatment.
The morning on the next day. Chu Feng woke up early and he took out all the mission plates that he got yesterday.
Since he was going out for a mission with Su Mei and the others, the mission plates did not have much use for him so he was preparing to put them back.
But just as he walked out, Chu Feng saw a figure. It was Duan Yuxuan that fought over the mission plates with him.
At that instant, Chu Feng couldn't help but be happy in his heart. He pointed at Duan Yuxuan and yelled out loud, "Oi, you there. Stop!"
Hearing that yell, Duan Yuxuan's body couldn't help but tremble. As he turned his head and looked, his face was even more pale.
The things about Chu Feng already spread throughout the inner court. Naturally, Duan Yuxuan would know about it as well so he was extremely terrified towards Chu Feng.
Especially when he thought about the things yesterday. He was disrespectful towards Chu Feng so he was afraid that Chu Feng would find him and look for trouble. Because of that, he did not sleep last night and his lingering fear lingered endlessly.
Now, seeing Chu Feng, even his feet were limp. Facing a person that even dared to destroy Liu Mang's "eggs", he did not know what Chu Feng would do to him.
Just as Chu Feng walked in front of Duan Yuxuan, he kneeled on the floor with a poof and begged with a painful face,
"Boss Chu Feng, I did not recognize you yesterday so I provoked you. I beg that you forget about me and forgive me this time..."
"What? You're talking about that?" Chu Feng was speechless. After that, he gave his bag to Duan Yuxuan and said while smiling,
"Duan bro, if you don't mind, help me return these back to the Mission Selection Location."
"Mm? You called me for this?" Duan Yuxuan awkwardly took the bag and he was a bit at a loss.
"Actually, the thing I wanted to tell you was that the mission that you liked is in here. Sorry to trouble you." Chu Feng patted Duan Yuxuan shoulders and ran towards his mission gathering spot.
Looking at the Chu Feng that disappeared in an instant, and also looking at the crowd that surrounded him who used a strange gaze as they stared at him, Duan Yuxuan hiddenly cursed, "Damn! This is so embarrassing!"
Heading towards Su Mei's meeting point, after Chu Feng left the Azure Dragon School, he changed into a set of casual clothes and went to an abandoned temple before noon arrived.
Before entering the temple, Chu Feng used his Spirit power and he felt that there were 7 people inside.
After entering the temple, there were indeed 7 males and females. Within the 7, he saw three familiar faces. One was Su Mei, the other two were the Dragon and Tiger brothers.
But Chu Feng did not recognize the other four. Although he could not confirm their strength, he could tell by their faces that the four people were not ordinary people.
A male and female were showing their affection as if there was no one around. It was like they were afraid that other people would not know that they were in a relationship.
But the thing worth mentioning was that male wore a pink long gown. On his head, there were even peach flowers and he was just like a pervert.
On the other hand, the female wore quite masculine clothing. But her face was still like a female's. Although it wasn't as beautiful as Su Mei, she could still be counted as good quality.
Other than the lovers, there was a young man wearing white clothing. His face was handsome with thick eyebrows and big eyes. After seeing Chu Feng, he lightly smiled and nodded. He seemed rather friendly.
On the other hand, there was a blue clothed male and he was the complete opposite. After seeing Chu Feng, he looked at him with disdain and coldly snorted. After that, his mouth curled upwards as if he had some deep hatred towards Chu Feng.


MGA Capitulo 48 – Tomb Robbing
"Come come come! Let me give you an introduction. This is the newest member of our Wings Alliance, Chu Feng. He may seem young, but he is no simple person." Su Mei smiled and started the introductions.
"Is he any younger than you Su Mei?" The white-clothed male walked over and politely clasped his hands towards Chu Feng, "I am Bai Tong. I have heard of you before, and seeing you today, you are really no ordinary person."
"Thanks." Chu Feng also clasped his hands in reply. To those who treat him with courtesy, he would always treat them back with courtesy.
The young man who wore a gown with peach flowers and the young female that wore a masculine clothing also walked over. That male said extremely solemnly, "I am Ye Taozi. This is my future wife, Zhang Tingzi."
[TN Tao -&gt "Peach" | Ting -&gt "Graceful"]
Chu Feng also smiled and clasped his hands towards the two of them. But, he said in his heart, "Damn. Ye Taozi, Zhang Tingzi, these two really are made for each other. Just with that name they are a perfect match!"
"Chu Feng, we welcome you to the big family of the Wings Alliance. We hope that you don't put the previous things before in your heart, because the both of us were actually..." The Dragon and Tiger brothers walked over and hiddenly looked at Su Mei as they spoke.
"cough cough" Seeing that, Su Mei quickly coughed two times and viciously glanced at the two of them. Instantly, they put away the words that they were going to say from fear.
The Chu Feng that had the strong Spirit power already saw the inklings. He guessed that it must have been Su Mei that forced the Dragon and Tiger brothers to do something.
"Chu Feng, you have quite some nerves. The Wings Alliance kindly invited you and you dared to refuse? Do you have any virtues or abilities?" Just at that time, the cold-faced blue-clothed young man spoke.
"Jia Yunfeng, you shut up!" Seeing that, Su Mei was going to show her true stripes.
"Ahh, Su Mei, let him finish." But Chu Feng pulled Su Mei behind him, smiled, stared at Jia Yunfeng then said, "What do you want to say? Spit it out!"
"I'm saying that you are not worthy to join the Wings Alliance." Jia Yunfeng bellowed.
*whoosh* Chu Feng's expression changed and he suddenly moved his hands. One Illusionary Palm came out and patted towards Jian Yunfeng's chest.
At that instant, everyone was shocked. No one would have thought that the kind-faced Chu Feng would attack without any signs.
"Illusionary Palm?"
Jia Yunfeng was no ordinary person. He instantly recognized the skill that Chu Feng used. The aura of the 7th level of the Spirit realm started to revolve. He turned his hand and punched out. A wave of boundless power exploded from it. The skill that he used was a rank 4 skill.
Seeing that, although Chu Feng was a bit surprised, he was not afraid at all. He changed his skill and used the 1st Thunder Style. With a blink, he arrived behind Jia Yunfeng. Following that was another Illusionary Palm and it went towards his back and attacked.
*bang*
That palm stuck without any accidents. Jia Yunfeng could not defend and he face-planted on the floor. After fiercely lying on the floor, he fled a few meters before stopping.
"This guy has really strong methods."
Seeing that, all the people on scene, other than Su Mei, were all shocked with their eyes lit up. Especially the Dragon and Tiger brothers. They were even shocked to the point of opening their mouths.
The Chu Feng in their memories was a very weak person. Or at least weak in front of them two.
But now they discovered that they could not be any more wrong. If Jia Yunfeng was not Chu Feng's opponent, then the brothers would not be able to beat him even more.
This clearly showed that Chu Feng hid his strength before. In the exchange before, he was obviously letting the two have their ways.
At that instant, the two of them knew why Su Rou and elder Ouyang recommended Chu Feng to join the Wings Alliance at all costs. It was because Chu Feng really did have the qualifications.
"Do you know whether I am worthy or not now?" Chu Feng coldy smiled and said while looking at the Jia Yunfeng who was climbing up from the ground.
"You bastard!" Just as Jia Yunfeng rose, he suddenly angrily yelled and leaped towards Chu Feng once again.
*whoosh* But just at that time, Bai Tong's body flashed and instantly appeared in front of Jia Yunfeng. As he blocked he said in a heavy voice,
"Just now, Chu Feng already left some face for you. Don't look for unhappiness."
Jia Yunfeng was obviously a bit afraid of Bai Tong. After thinking of Chu Feng's attack before he also coldly snorted and said no more.
"8th level of the Spirit realm?!"
As for Chu Feng, he hiddenly sighed in surprised. He could feel Bai Tong's aura from before. He was the same as Su Mei, also being in the 8th level.
"Okay, this is called ‘You won't know each other without fighting'. Time is tight so let's hurry up and go." At that time, Ye Taozi spoke.
Under his call, several people started walking out from the temple. Su Mei walked in front of Chu Feng and said while smiling,
"You are quite overbearing. They didn't even say anything yet you directly attack him."
"He asked for it." Chu Feng curled his lips.
"Fine. Actually, I like your temper when it's like this." Su Mei sweetly smiled and pulled out a book from her waist purse then gave it to Chu Feng.
"What is this?" Chu Feng received it and found out that the book was quite old. The shabby pages were quickly breaking.
But when Chu Feng saw the words on the book, his eyes lit up. Written on it was, "Beginning level Mysterious Technique, Breathing Technique"!
"It's actually a Mysterious Technique, this..."
"Quiet." Hearing that, Su Mei immediately used her hands to cover Chu Feng's mouth. She nervously looked outside the temple and was afraid that the people outside would hear them.
"Su Mei, you..."
"This is nothing. I promised you yesterday if you joined the Wings Alliance, I would give you the Mysterious Techniques to cultivate in. I am just fulfilling my promise." Su Mei said indifferently.
With those words, it made Chu Feng feel very uncomfortable. Yesterday, the sisters helped him so Chu Feng already owed them a huge favour. He did not need to use the Mysterious Techniques as the price.
But Su Mei did not bother about those things and it made him feel very apologetic so he said quietly, "Thanks!"
"What thanks? Hurry up and put it away. Don't let them see it."
"Also, do not give it another person to cultivate or else I will split your skin apart!" Su Mei fiercely waved her little fist in front of Chu Feng then ran out while jumping and bouncing.
Seeing the cute, beautiful and sincere girl, Chu Feng's impression towards Su Mei got several times better.
Chu Feng and the group kept on walking towards the west. After two days and two nights on horses, they already left the borders of the Azure Dragon School and they were obviously not doing a school mission.
"Su Mei, what are we actually doing? Aren't we wasting too much time by going so far?" Chu Feng asked quietly. He felt that for one mission, if they needed to spend so much time on the road, it was a waste of time.
"I'll secretly tell you. We are going to rob a tomb." Su Mei happily smiled and said.
"Robbing a tomb? Really? That's quite lacking in ethics!" Chu Feng's face was full of disdain.
"What do you know? This is a tomb of an expert in the Profound realm. Not only are large amounts of Spiritual medicines hidden in there, there are even Origin medicines and even Profound medicines."
"Other than that, there will also be a lot of Mysterious Techniques. It is simply like a huge treasure vault. If you feel that these actions lack ethics, then you can not come." Su Mei coldly snorted and said.
"It's the tomb of a Profound realm expert? Origin medicine? Profound medicine? Mysterious Techniques?"
Chu Feng was astonished. On the road of martial cultivation, the known realms were Spirit realm, Origin realm, Profound realm, and Heaven realm.
If the Origin realm was reachable with decent aptitude, the Profound realm could only be reached by geniuses that had extremely good talent.
According to what he knew, the current master of the Azure Dragon School was only in the Profound realm. It was a realm that only the strongest in the Azure Province could reach.
As for the Heaven realm, it was a realm that made people walk on air or travel tens of thousands of miles in a day. It simply broke the bindings of the heavens and earth, exceeded the limits of humans, and it was a realm like the legends.
The experts of the Heaven realm did not appear in the Azure Province yet. However, Chu Feng had heard before, that the overlord of the Nine Provinces, within the Jiang Dynasty, there were indeed people in the Heaven realm.


MGA Capitulo 49 – World Spiritist
When the Jiang Dynasty situated itself in the Nine Provinces, although it didn't interfere with any developments of any powers, it was still publicly recognized as the overlord of the Nine Provinces.
So, all sorts of powers in the Nine Provinces must pay their respects every year at a certain time or else their entire family would be exterminated.
The Jiang Dynasty claimed itself as the imperial family and they were not ordinary lives. Not everyone had a chance to interact with them.
For example, in the Azure Province. Only the top school in the Azure Province, the Lingyun School, were qualified to pay their respects.
As for the tributes, all the schools would give their tributes to the Lingyun School, and the Lingyun School would give their tributes to the imperial court.
So, to Chu Feng, the Jiang Dynasty was just like a legend and he had no way of getting close. Actually, he hadn't even seen any experts from the Profound realm.
The so-called Origin medicine and the Profound medicine were similar to the Spiritual medicine.
Just as the cultivators in the Spirit realm use the Spiritual medicine, the cultivators in the Origin realm use the Origin medicine and the Profound realm to the Profound medicine.
Compared to Spiritual medicine, the Origin and Profound medicine were a lot rarer and a lot more precious. Especially, if one could get a single Profound medicine, they could be extremely wealthy.
Today, there was such a good thing sent right to his doorstep, so naturally Chu Feng would be extremely excited. But, he was also suspicious. When would it even be their turn to rob that kind of place?
"Su Mei, in a tomb of a Profound realm expert, we should not be able to lead it with our strength right?" Chu Feng was a bit worried.
"What are you thinking? Do you really think that we're the only ones that got the news? When a tomb of a Profound realm expert becomes known, it undoubtedly attracts all sorts of attentions from all sorts of powers. There will be many experts that go up and lead."
"As for us, we're just there for the liveliness. We get some of the leftovers, and don't even think about those Profound or Origin medicines. We can already earn a lot with even a few Spiritual Beads." Su Mei explained.
"So it's like that. Where's the tomb then?" Chu Feng continued to ask.
"I hear that it's in the desert wilderness. As for the specifics, no one knows. For according to our sources, the tomb will be announced in the Ancient City near the wilderness."
"Of course, the so-called announced isn't publicly announcing to everyone. The person who announces it will sell the map of the tomb. Every sheet will be 80 Saint Spirit Grasses."
"Each one of us will give out 10, and it's just right for 80!" Su Mei continued explaining.
"That expensive? I don't have any!"
"Didn't you take a lot from me last time?"
"I finished them off."
"What a pig! You're so wasteful! Did you absorb it all?"
"That's..."
Chu Feng was a bit speechless. He couldn't tell Su Mei that "Although I didn't train in any Mysterious Techniques, I have a godly lighting in my body. No matter how many spiritual medicines I get, I can refine them all. Not only do I not waste any, I can absorb them 100%."
"Whatever. I'll help you out this time, but remember to return it back to me at a later date." As she saw Chu Feng who was crying from poverty, Su Mei curled her lips helplessly.
"Hehe, I thank you." Chu Feng smiled and said. The tomb of an expert of the Profound realm? He looked forward to it.
The group continued forward, and before noon, they entered the desert wilderness and quickly arrived at that Ancient City.
The Ancient City was extremely ancient. According to legends, it had thousands of years of history. Every brick and title were very worn out as if it would collapse and shatter with a little bump.
"So this is the Ancient City. It seems a bit too damaged, and it seems that it will collapse soon right? How are there so many people living in such a broken place?"
Looking at that damaged yet huge city and also the faint smoke rising into the air, Chu Feng knew that there was quite a few people living in the Ancient City.
But he couldn't understand why so many people were living in the Ancient City. An old construction like that could collapse at any moment so it should be very dangerous.
"What do you know? Every single brick and title in the Ancient City has a Spirit Formation laid by a World Spiritist."
"Not only gales. Even if experts of the Origin stage attack at full strength, they may not be able to damage any one of the bricks or tiles."
"It's that strong?" Chu Feng was shocked at first, but then quickly questioned, "Who are World Spiritists? What is a Spirit Formation?"
With those words, not only did Su Mei look at him with a gaze of astonishment, even other people cast disdain expressions at him.
"What a bumpkin." Jia Yunfeng coldly snorted.
"Ahh, Chu Feng, the World Spiritist is a special and noble occupation. People like us cannot touch it." On the other hand, Bai Tong smiled and started to explain.
"World Spiritists have a power called Spirit Formation. Spirit Formation is near indestructible and it's a very strong defending method."
"All World Spiritists have extremely high talent. Everyone of them could be said to be a genius and they have really powerful strength. In addition to their strong observing power and the special power from the Spirit Formation, they are almost unrivaled in their own realm."
"Also, because of the specialness of the World Spiritist, every single World Spiritist is the target of invitation of many powers."
"The various powers' school that have a World Spiritist will have a sky-rising upgrade for their defense. As for the Azure Dragon School, we used an extremely high price to ask for a World Spiritist."
"Oh? If it's that impressive, then why did you say that the World Spiritist is not something that we can touch?" Chu Feng curiously asked.
"Haha, because everyone can cultivate, but to become a World Spiritist one must have the Spirit power."
"And this Spirit power is extremely rare, so naturally, ordinary people cannot touch it. That's also why World Spiritists are so noble." Bai Tong continued explaining.
"Having Spirit power huh?" Hearing those words, Chu Feng couldn't help but cast his gaze towards Su Mei. He seemingly already knew why that girl wanted to rope him in.
"What are you looking at me for? Even if you have the Spirit power, without a World Spiritist to teach you, you cannot become one in your entire life." As if she knew what Chu Feng was thinking, Su Mei curled her lips up.
"Didn't Bai Tong just say that our Azure Dragon School has a World Spiritist?" Chu Feng chuckled and said.
"You mean Zhuge? Don't even think about that. That old guy is too strange and he never accepts disciples."
"In the Azure Dragon School, we have a core disciple that has Spirit power. He always wanted to pay his respects to Zhuge to learn the Spirit Formation Technique but after being ordered around like a slave for one year, he did not learn anything even up until now." Su Mei continued to strike blows.
"That is correct. It is just as how Su Mei said. The reason why World Spiritists are so noble are because they are so rare."
"Unless it's a person that they really like, World Spiritists will not easily pass down their skills. It means one more person they teach, one more person will come and fight for their livelihood!"
After Bai Tong explained all that, he said to Chu Feng with a tone of jest, "I see that you are very interested in this World Spiritist. Does that mean you have the Spirit power?"
To Bai Tong's words, Chu Feng stuck out his chest, raised his face, bluntly and proudly said, "I do have the Spirit power!"
"What?" When Chu Feng's words came out, other than Su Mei, everyone else was shocked. Even the Bai Tong that was usually calm had no way of remaining that way.


MGA Capitulo 50 – Grasping the Mysterious Technique
"Chu Feng, do you really have the Spirit power? You cannot joke on things like this!" Bai Tong's face became tight and his tone was filled with suspicion.
"He is correct. He is indeed the person that cannot be found even within tens of thousands." Just at that time, Su Mei spoke.
"Su Mei, is this the truth?" Hearing Su Mei's words, almost everyone widened their mouths in shock.
"That's the reason why my sister so strongly insisted to invite him to join the Wings Alliance." Su Mei sighed helplessly. She knew when Chu Feng's special power was revealed, everyone would see him in a new light.
At that instant, everyone couldn't help but inhale a breath of cool air. When they looked at Chu Feng again, their gazes had an extra hint of respect.
Even Jia Yunfeng that disliked Chu Feng had a complicated expression on. Obviously, he was feeling regret since he disrespected Chu Feng earlier.
A person that had Spirit power may not even show up within 10 thousand people. Even if it was 100 thousand people there may not even be one.
Until today, there were only two people that had the Spirit power within the entire Azure Dragon School. Even if Chu Feng was counted in there were only three.
People like them had naturally high talent for cultivation. Their understanding skills were also extremely fast and their observation skills were even more scarier. Even if they were not able to become a World Spiritist, just in the cultivation side, they could have huge achievements.
People like them could not be offended because before they were even born, they were destined to be unordinary. Naturally, as Jia Yunfeng treated Chu Feng like that before, he had some lingering fear.
"Chu Feng, please don't take offense from my previous actions."
"As an apology, I'll pay for your part in buying the map for the tomb." As he thought, Jia Yunfeng actually directly apologized to Chu Feng.
Although people were surprised at his sudden actions, they were understandable. If they were in his spot they would do the same thing.
"Eh? Then thank you." Chu Feng gladly accepted it.
10 Saint Spirit Grasses was not a small number. If there was someone willing to pay for him, naturally, Chu Feng would be willing to accept.
After a bit of chatting, they finally entered the Ancient City. At that instant, Chu Feng could hidden feel the strong aura of the Ancient City.
He could see that within the Ancient City, there were many experts hidden. Chu Feng also saw even more disciples wearing their school's clothing.
He recognized that they were the disciples from the Thousand Wind School. Chu Xun from the Chu family cultivated in the school.
"It seems that the news of this tomb really attracted quite a few people." Chu Feng sighed and said.
"Of course. The news about this tomb was already leaked and all sorts of surrounding powers rushed here. Sooner or later, there will be conflicts." Su Mei secretly explained.
"Are you saying that the Azure Dragon School will also send people here?" Chu Feng questioned closely because the distance between the Azure Dragon School and the desert could be said to be close.
"Of course. The closest schools to this desert wilderness is the Azure Dragon School and the Thousand Wind School. If the Thousand Wind School got the news, then the Azure Dragon School would come as well."
"Also, with how our Azure Dragon School does things, the people that are sent will certainly be the core disciples and core elders. Perhaps that Zhuge elder would come as well." Su Mei said.
"Wouldn't this become a battle between the Azure Dragon School and the Thousand Wind School?" Chu Feng asked.
"That's why we're in casual clothes and pretending to be a passerby. This way, we can avoid the unnecessary conflicts because at times like these, taking advantage of the conflicts is the best method for us."
"They can open up the road and they can fight over the treasures. It would be enough as long as we get some junk."Su Mei's sweet face was full of that evil smile. So it turned out that she already did all the preparations.
Looking at the girl who was only 14 years old, Chu Feng helplessly shook his head. He could completely imagine when she grows up, her scheming would not be any worse than her elder sister, Su Rou.
Because the position of the tomb was not announced, Chu Feng and the others could only temporary wait in the Ancient City for news.
In a tavern, after closing the door to his room, Chu Feng was very impatient as he took out the Mysterious Technique book "Breathing Technique".
Mysterious Techniques were separated into beginning level, middle level, and high level. Although the Breathing Technique was only a beginning level Mysterious Technique, it was already worth a lot as it contained strange cultivating effects.
Or else it would not be possible for Su Mei to be so strong at her age. Even Chu Feng felt a bit of fear from that.
After a bit of reading, Chu Feng understood the Breathing Technique a bit. The important part was to naturally breathe through the nose and to revolve the spiritual energy while breathing. The energy was to be moved in certain meridian channels in the body and at the end, running through the entire body to form power that exceeded far beyond normal people.
Although it was easier said than done, it only applied to normal people. To Chu Feng, it was not hard at all. Pretty much after looking at it once, he understood the meaning in it.
Chu Feng did not have such understanding power when he was born. Although Chu Feng's understanding power was extremely high before, it was obvious after getting the Spirit power, his brain became more sharp.
"hu hu hu"
After standing up and deeply breathing a few times, Chu Feng tried the Breathing Technique.
Just as the energy resolved, Chu Feng felt the spiritual energy within his body was like a surging dragon that started to roar in his body. When such a strong spiritual energy went along the special meridians, Chu Feng's power instantly rose several times.
"This power is very strong." Clenching his fist and feeling the spiritual energy that became a lot stronger, Chu Feng felt extremely happy.
The reason why Chu Feng's power was stronger than normal people was because he had the godly lighting in his body which made the quality of his spiritual energy better than others.
The power of the Mysterious Techniques on the other hand, it used special methods to change the spiritual energy within the body and it made it stronger than others.
Today, Chu Feng had both of them and his power exceeded far beyond normal people. From his estimates, currently, he may not lose if he dueled Su Mei.
But Su Mei was at the 8th level of the Spirit realm and she also cultivated in the Mysterious Techniques before. Chu Feng was only at the 6th level of the Spirit realm. With that power difference yet if he was able to fight her, it was simply overpowered.
"With this, could I participate in this year's core disciple exam?" After assessing his current strength, Chu Feng started to get excited.
The Azure Dragon School's core disciple exam was held every year. And looking at the dates, this year's exam was getting closer.
Compared to the inner court disciple exam, the core disciple exam had an age limit. That was to be under 18 years old. It didn't matter how strong you were or how much talent you were, if you passed the age limit, participation would not be allowed.
From what Chu Feng knew, as long as your strength reached the 8th level of the Spirit realm you could join the core disciple exam and there was a huge chance to pass it.
Core disciples were those who the Azure Dragon School focused their development on. Even the families of the core disciples received the protection of the Azure Dragon School.
As long as Chu Feng could become a core disciple, not only would it help his cultivation, it would greatly help his Chu family's development as well.
As he thought of the happy faces of Chu Yuan and the Chu family if he became a core disciple, Chu Feng greatly looked forward to become one.
*thump thump thump* But just at that time, Chu Feng's door was knocked by someone.
After opening the door, Chu Feng found out that the sweet and charming Su Mei was looking at him while smiling while having both of her hands behind her back.


MGA Capitulo 51 – World Spirit Compass
The current Su Mei was wearing a pink cheongsam and her jet-black long hair was scattered along her shoulder. On the top of her head, there was even a large bow. Her clothing mixed with her sweet face was really fresh, clean, refined, and it was a feast for the eyes.
"What's this darling? After being separated for such a short while, you're already thinking of me?" Seeing the Su Mei who was dressed like that, Chu Feng couldn't help but tease her.
"Do you believe me if you call me darling again, I'll tear your mouth apart?" Su Mei grinded her teeth and her sweet face instantly became fierce.
But from what Chu Feng saw, the Su Mei who was like that was even cuter so he laughed and said, "Why don't you allow me to call you darling? I am your lover!"
"You bastard!"
Su Mei's snow-white hands grabbed onto Chu Feng's arm. Her two fingers were like a pair of pliers and they suddenly intertwined. Chu Feng's face instantly twisted, his mouth opened, then a scream that was like the wail of ghosts and the howl of wolves resonated in the tavern.
"Ah~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~"
After a moment, the two of them appeared on the road in the Ancient City.
So it turned out that a lot of experts were gathered here. Some saw the business opportunity, and as they were waiting for the news of the tomb, they took out strange but precious treasures and sold them off.
When Su Mei learnt about that, the curious her that wanted to have a good time pulled Chu Feng and came over.
At this moment, the two of them were on the ancient roads. A foolish boy like Chu Feng was following a beauty like Su Mei and it attracted many gazes of admiration and jealousy.
But, it was obvious that Chu Feng didn't know he was lucky when he was lucky. Looking at the chunk of green on his arm, Chu Feng said with grievance, "Damn girl, you're too fierce. It's green now."
"Hmph, let's see if you dare to tease me now!" Su Mei curled her lips because she was pleased and with the bottom of her heart, she happily looked all over the place. As she talked, she grabbed Chu Feng's hands and ran towards a street stall.
On that street stall, the displayed items were all jewelry for girls. The materials were very unique and every colour that should be there was there. Su Mei was deeply attracted to it and she kneeled in front of the stall then started to seriously select them.
The old lady that opened the stall was extremely happy and she started to really introduce the items to Su Mei. Looking at that lady's evil smile and face, Chu Feng gave her an evaluation. Crafty businesswoman!
As he was bored, Chu Feng cast his gaze to the side and he discovered an old man lying nearby.
That old man was quite dirty. No one knew how many days his hair was washed and it stuck together in lumps.
He had a full face of dirt, patches all over his clothing, and within patches were more patches. He was carrying a cloth bag and some unknown thing was bulging inside. One of the legs of his pants was long, the other one was short. He was wearing a pair of broken shoes, and the front revealed his toes while the back revealed his heel.
His stall was not like other people's who were advertising everywhere. Rather, he was lying down there with one leg crossed over the other and he was like some idler. He didn't even look at the customers that were going around.
Although the old man wasn't selling property, the pile of books in front of him attracted Chu Feng's attention.
Actually, on the surface, the books didn't look that special. It was broken, shabby, worn out, and there was even a layer of dust on it. You couldn't even tell what the name of the book was.
But, the Chu Feng who had the Spirit power found out within the pile of books, there was one that contained a strange fluctuation.
"Old man, how are you selling these books?" Chu Feng went over and asked.
The old man didn't even raise his head. He extended one figure out towards Chu Feng, showing a 1.
"One copper coin?" Chu Feng tried.
"Ha! Is a copper coin even enough for a meal for a beggar?" Hearing Chu Feng's words, the old man sat up with a whoosh and was angry.
"Old man, so you want a tael of silver?" Although Chu Feng was polite on the surface, he was cursing in his heart, "With an appearance like yours, even if you say you're a beggar you would be insulting beggars."
"One Spiritual Bead and you can take everything!" The old man said the words extremely clearly.
"Damn! Why not steal it instead? You charge that much for these broken books?" At that instant, Chu Feng got angry as well.
But the old man didn't mind. He laid on the ground once again and said one sentence, "Take it or leave it."
After that he muttered to himself, "My books are passed down by my ancestor. Within some of them there must some treasure, but it's just that normal people can't see the difference. If it wasn't because the days are hard to bear, I would never take these books out for sale."
"Ancestor? You are quite ridiculous. Who's your ancestor?" Just at that time, Su Mei came over as well.
"My ancestor came from quite a place. He's a World Spiritist!" The old man said proudly.
"World Spiritist? What a boast!" Su Mei obviously did not believe him.
"You can believe it or you can not. At the end, someone who knows what they are doing will buy this." As he talked he closed his eyes.
Hearing the old man's words, Chu Feng's heart tightened. If what he said was true, then what Chu Feng felt would very likely be the remains of a World Spiritist.
"Su Mei, do you have a Spiritual Bead? Lend me one!" Chu Feng bit his teeth and said that to Su Mei.
"What are you doing? Are you really going to be tricked by this old man?" Seeing that, Su Mei was a bit unwilling.
"If you have one, please lend it to me!" Chu Feng stretched his hand towards Su Mei.
"You idiot. I never seen you being this stupid." Although she said that, Su Mei still took out a Spiritual Bead in her waist purse and gave it to Chu Feng.
"Thanks." Chu Feng took the Spiritual Bead and gave it to the old man, "Old man, I'll buy your books!"
"Wow! It is indeed a Spiritual Bead. You are quite rich young lady." The old man grabbed the Spiritual Bead and started to carefully inspect it. After knocking on the bead with his left hand for a good while, he lovingly embraced it.
"It seems that it's the first time that you saw a Spiritual Bead right?" Seeing the excited old man, Su Mei was very displeased.
On the other hand, Chu Feng said nothing. He wrapped the dozens of books with the cloth used as the street stall and put them onto his shoulder.
"Hehe, little brother, you have quite the eye. As an admiration towards you, I'll give you a present." But just as Chu Feng was prepared to leave, that old man took out something from the broken cloth bag.
It was a purple disk. The disk was created with a special type of wood. On the four sides, north, east, south, and west were written on it. On the left and right, life and death, good luck and bad luck were engraved on it. There was a strange symbol that was carved in the middle of the wooden disk.
"What's this?" Su Mei grabbed it over and curiously assessed it.
"Heh, little lady. This thing came from quite a place. It's essential for World Spiritists."
"It can predict life and death, good luck and bad luck. It is called the World Spirit Compass!" The old man said as if he knew all about it.
"Oh? That's quite incredible. How do you use this thing?" Su Mei questioned closely.
"This...This is a thing for World Spiritists so how should I know? Hehe, you two study it on your own. Hope to meet you again!"
The old man touched his dry beard and rolled his eyeballs, as if he was afraid that Chu Feng would go back on the purchase. Then he turned around and ran away.
"Look! I knew he was a swindler!" Seeing the old man's steps which were like a shooting star, Su Mei angrily stamped her feet.


MGA Capitulo 52 – Secret Spirit Technique
As he carried the broken books with the cloth, Chu Feng happily returned back to the tavern.
The current Su Mei was not angry and pouting anymore. Instead, there was a sweet smile hung on her face and she was also happy as well.
"Oi, did you find a treasure within this pile of rotten books?" After entering the room, Su Mei smiled and said.
"So you were acting just now."
Seeing the weird Su Mei, Chu Feng figured out that she was intentionally acting like that. She obviously discovered Chu Feng's intentions.
"If you said nothing and gave a Spiritual Bead to him, that old man would certainly raise the price. If I didn't try to oppose you, how would you get it so easily?"
"That's right, what treasure did you get? Hurry up and show it to me." Su Mei was very impatient and took the books off from Chu Feng's shoulder.
After rummaging through the pile book, finally, he picked one out. The book was also covered with dust, but it was obviously different from the others.
Although the book was shabby, it was still undamaged. It gave an unadorned feeling just by looking at it. In Chu Feng's hands, he could feel that the book's materials were special.
Chu Feng used his hand to wipe the book, and after the dust was cleared, a few words appeared. "Secret Spirit Techniques"!
Su Mei grabbed the "Secret Spirit Techniques". After cleaning it with detail for a while, she said with a bit of shock, "If this ‘Secret Spirit Techniques' is real, then you've earned quite a profit."
"Although this Secret Spirit Techniques can only be used by people with the Spirit power, the market price is absolutely no lower than 1000 Spiritual Beads. Strange. Why would that old guy hide such a good thing under the books? Ah! I know. That old guy must not know how to read."
"That expensive?" Hearing Su Mei's words, Chu Feng was shocked at first, but following that was huge happiness. It meant that this time, he picked up a huge deal.
"But, let's take a core disciple in the Azure Dragon School that has the Spirit power as an example. Although he has the Spirit power, he does not have the cultivation methods. If you sold this Secret Spirit Techniques to him, he would give an even high price because this thing is a precious treasure that is in high demand yet is lacking in merchandise." Su Mei said as if she was proud of herself.
"Haha, after I finish using this, wouldn't I earn a lot when I sell it out?" Chu Feng was crazily happy. 1000 Spiritual Beads could probably break him straight into the Origin realm.
"This secret book is just some controlling techniques for the Spirit power and not the cultivating methods for a World Spiritist."
"If you can truly grasp the power of the Spirit Formation and became a World Spiritist, at that time, many schools will ask you to join them. The offerings that the schools will give you would be enough for you to become a real rich person."
"Do you know how much our World Spiritist in the Azure Dragon School gets?"
"How much?"
"Every month, he gets one Profound Bead. One Profound Bead is equivalent to 1000 Origin Beads, and one Origin Bead is equivalent to 1000 Spiritual Beads. Which means, every month, he can get 1 million Spiritual Beads from the Azure Dragon School." Su Mei explained.
"My Gods, 1 million Spiritual Beads every month? That's unbelieveable." Chu Feng was endlessly stunned. Today, to him, one Spiritual Bead was already extremely precious. He didn't even dare to think of 1 million.
"Even so, that World Spiritist only reluctantly accepted it. If it wasn't because he had his eyes on our treasures in our Azure Dragon School, he would not be a guest elder in the Azure Dragon School."
"Treasures? What treasures?" Chu Feng was filled with curiosity.
"You know the Thousand Bone Graveyard in the Spiritual Medicine Mountain? People guessed that there are treasures in that Thousand Bone Graveyard. And that World Spiritist came here for those treasures." Su Mei continued to explain.
"So it's that place." Chu Feng was stunned once again. He never would have thought that there would be treasures in that dark and scary forest.
But after some careful thinking, he could understand that. After all, the Spirit power that he had today did not come with his birth. It was gained from the Thousand Bone Graveyard. So, he felt that perhaps the Thousand Bone Graveyard really did have treasures.
"What's wrong? Why do you have this expression?"
"It's nothing." Chu Feng hurriedly shook his head. He couldn't tell Su Mei that he was trapped in the Thousand Bone Graveyard, saw a glowing old man in there, and even got the Spirit power from that place right? That was too outrageous so Chu Feng couldn't easily tell other people.
"Okay, I can see that you really want to try this Secret Spirit Techniques so I won't bother you anymore."
Su Mei returned the Secret Spirit Techniques to Chu Feng and also took out something from her waist purse to give to Chu Feng, "Here, this is your reward for going out for a walk with me!"
Looking at it, Chu Feng discovered that in Su Mei's palm, there was a sack-like thing. But it was obvious not a normal sack because the materials were very special and it was filled with symbols on the surface.
After looking at that item, Chu Feng instantly took in a breath of cool air and exclaimed, "A Cosmos Sack?"
The Cosmos Sack. Although the size of the sack was not big, the heavens and the earth were contained within it. It could store all sorts of items without any extra weight. It was the magical equipment for storing items.
But the creation of the Cosmos Sack was extremely complicated so the price was extremely high. It was not something normal people could use.
Chu Yuanba wanted to buy one before, but at the end, because the price was too high, he gave up on it. So, to Chu Feng, this was an item of extravagance yet Su Mei was giving it to him.
"What are you looking at? Go and cultivate." Su Mei put the Cosmos Sack in Chu Feng's hands and prepared to leave.
"Su Mei, why are you so good to me?" Holding the Cosmos Sack in his hands, Chu Feng's gaze towards Su Mei was filled with appreciation.
"No reason. It's just that every member of the Wings Alliance has one and only you don't. So, it's to avoid you being in a poor state. In a few days when the tomb opens, you can't be carrying two huge bags like what you did at the Spiritual Medicine Hunt right? If it came to that, it would be strange if no one robbed you."
Su Mei smiled and didn't give Chu Feng an answer. But, just as she left the room, she looked back and said, "If you don't understand why, then you can take it as me trying to rope you in."
After saying that, Su Mei left. Looking at the door that was slowly closing, Chu Feng felt a wave of warmth in his heart. Regardless of the reason, Su Mei really treated him well.
Sitting cross-legged on the bed, Chu Feng impatiently opened the Secret Spirit Techniques. Only then did he confirm that they really were techniques that helped the user to control the Spirit power.
It could let the Spirit power wander and observe objects in detail. As long as the Spirit power was strong enough, even if someone hid their aura, he could still look through their true strength.
The ones who used it well could disturb the awareness of an opponent with a formless Spirit power. It had unimaginable uses in battle.
In short, the Secret Spirit Techniques book was certainly a good thing. To Chu Feng, it would have great uses in the future.


MGA Capitulo 53 – Map of the Symbols
Following the cultivation methods of the Secret Spirit Technique, Chu Feng started to train his control over his Spirit power.
Pretty much other than eating and sleeping, in every day and every moment, he was studying it. As Chu Feng cultivated diligently, more and more people entered the Ancient City. At the end, the Ancient City was overcrowded and many people could only station themselves outside of the city.
As Su Mei predicted, the people from the Azure Dragon School also came. Although there weren't as many people from the Azure Dragon School than the Thousand Wind School, all of them were core elders and core disciples. The elites of the school.
Following that, more and more powers came as well. The Ancient City really became the land where everyone mixed together. Conflicts happened almost every day, and looking at the situation, Chu Feng knew that there would be blood battles when the tomb was opened.
*bzz*
At that instant, Chu Feng was standing near the window and looking at an elder from the Thousand Wind School on the streets. Suddenly, his eyes opened and a small smile curled up on his mouth, "9th level of the Spirit realm. This Thousand Wind School elder is very ordinary."
After a few days of cultivating, Chu Feng already proficiently grasped the controlling methods of the Spirit power. As long as the power between him and the opponent wasn't too big, Chu Feng could see through their cultivation.
"If I put Spirit power on this, I should be able to move it right?" Closing the windows, Chu Feng took the World Spirit Compass out.
In these days, other than reading the spirit techniques until he was familiar with them, Chu Feng also looked over the other books that he got from the old man. Some of them were actually the notes of a World Spiritist, and on it, it recorded the uses of the World Spirit Compass.
Chu Feng also knew that the World Spirit Compass was a treasure. He could find a trace of opportunity to live within a battle or find the road within a maze if he used the World Spirit Compass. In more simple terms, it was a tool to search for treasures.
*bzz* Chu Feng moved his mind and a strand of formless Spirit power surged out from his brain. It was like an invisible little snake that was wandering around in the air. At the end, it merged into the World Spirit Compass.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh~~~*
The instant that the Spirit power merged with it, the words on the World Spirit Compass started to faintly glow. It even left the World Spirit Compass and floated in the air. Then, it started to rapidly circle around the World Spirit Compass.
"It really is a treasure!" See that, Chu Feng rejoiced. He knew that this World Spirit Compass was the real thing. As long as he took it into the tomb, he would certainly have unimaginable uses for it.
After all, in the tomb of a Profound realm expert, without even thinking, one would know that it would be filled with mechanisms and danger would be everywhere. That was also why all sorts of powers sent out their best experts.
Chu Feng had the World Spirit Compass, so even if his strength wasn't enough, he would at least have some opportunities and be able to protect himself in the tomb.
*whoosh* Chu Feng stuffed the World Spirit Compass in the Cosmos Sack. The symbols on the sack spun and sucked the World Spirit Compass that was several times larger than it in. It was also the mysteriousness of the Cosmos Sack.
Chu Feng patted the sack on his waist with satisfaction and laid on the bed. But, suddenly, his eyes lit up and suddenly remembered the strange symbols on his chest that came from the Thousand Bone Graveyard.
"I wonder if I can use the Spirit power to investigate this thing."
Thinking to that point, Chu Feng didn't neglect it and a strand of his Spirit power threw itself into the symbols in his chest. It wasn't too important, but the strange symbols actually did have a trace of movement!
Seeing that, Chu Feng stood up immediately and started to control the Spirit power within his brain. He endlessly sent it to his chest and at that instant, the strange symbols that stuck to his chest went through his clothes and floated out.
It formed into a huge drawing in front of Chu Feng. Following Chu Feng's endless Spirit power, the drawing created from the symbols gradually started to rotate. Although it was complex, Chu Feng could still tell that it was a map.
"Is it possible that there really are treasures in the Thousand Bone Graveyard? This would be the map to open the Thousand Bone Graveyard!"
Chu Feng was extremely excited. It more or less said that not only were the strange symbols harmless to him, it may have been good luck instead.
*bzz* But just as the map was going to be formed into a shape, a wave of pain entered Chu Feng's brain and he completely used up his Spirit power.
"It seems if I want to read this map, I would need extremely strong Spirit power." Massaging his aching brain, Chu Feng was not sad and instead he smiled.
His harvest today was too big. Anyone would feel excited if they thought about a map that could lead him to treasure which was hidden on their body.
After waiting for his Spirit power to recover, Chu Feng tried to use it towards his own dantian. He was most curious to the things hidden in it.
But it was useless. There was like a barrier around his dantian and his Spirit power had no way of entering. With that result, at first it made Chu Feng depressed, but very quickly Chu Feng got insanely happy.
If his own Spirit power could not see through his dantian, it also meant that other people who had the Spirit power could not search his dantian as well! With that, the secret of the Divine Lightning within his dantian would not be discovered by anyone.
His mood was too good, so Chu Feng wanted to take a breather outside of the tavern. But before walking out for far, he got attracted to a string of curses.
"You're stealing? Let's see if you steal anymore! Damn beggar. I'll beat you to death!"
In a certain alley, two huge people were ganging up and beating one person. It was the thick-haired, broken-clothed beggar.
Chu Feng originally did not want to bother those kinds of things. But, that beggar was not affected under the beatings of the big people. He was even minding his own business and eating the bun in his hands.
Out of curiosity, Chu Feng spread out his Spirit power. When it went through the beggar, he got a result. It was an ordinary person that did not cultivate before. But, how could a normal person have such a good body?
"Stop!" Feeling that something was wrong, Chu Feng spoke to stop them.
Hearing that someone yelled, the two people also quickly stopped. Especially when they saw Chu Feng's appearance. It made them feel that he was a person that cultivated so their attitude were very polite.
"What's happening?" Chu Feng inquired.
"This beggar stole our bun." One of them replied.
"I'll pay for the stolen bun. Also, go bring 10 more over here." Chu Feng gave the big person several copper coins.
"Yes yes yes..." The big persons did not move slow and quickly brought 10 buns over then tactfully left.
At that instant, in the alley, only Chu Feng and the beggar remained. Chu Feng evaluated the beggar in detail.
He discovered that his age was not too big. He seemed to be under the middle-ages and his eye expression was lifeless as if he was confused. If Chu Feng gave the buns to him he would eat them, if he didn't give the buns to the beggar then he would not take them. But, he would look at the buns in Chu Feng's hands dully and continuously drooled.
"This is..."
Just at that time, Chu Feng's pupil suddenly enlarged. He found out with astonishment that on the forehead of that big person, there was a bizarre scar. If it was said to be a scar, it wouldn't fit too well because it seemed like it was brought from the heavens and grown from the flesh.
The reason why he said it was bizarre was because the shape was strange. It was like a ball of flame and it gave people a vivid feeling as if it was currently burning.
Out of curiousity, Chu Feng stuck out his finger and wanted to touch that flame-like scar.
"What are you doing?!"
But just as Chu Feng touched the scar, the big person suddenly bellowed as if it was a completely different person. A hand that was like a steel clam firmly grabbed Chu Feng's wrist.
At that instant, Chu Feng's face greatly changed and he hiddenly cursed. He could clearly feel that layers of terrifying, suffocating pressure was surging out from that person's palm. It entered his body, and if it continued, after a short moment, his body would certainly explode and he would die.


MGA Capitulo 54 – The Insane Beggar
The overwhelming pressure were like huge waves. One wave after another continuously surged into Chu Feng's body.
That scary power was going to crush and tear Chu Feng's organs and the bone-piercing pain made Chu Feng want to yell out.
But the strange thing was that no sound was formed. It was like his voice was taken away. In front of that power, he lost all his ability to resist.
"It's you!!!"
Just at that time, the beggar yelled out in fear as if he was scared by something. Not only did he loosen the grasp on Chu Feng's wrist, he kept on backing off straight until he leaned on the corner of the walls. Only they did he bend his body down and shrunk into that corner.
Occasionally, he would shoot Chu Feng a glance. But the more he looked, the more terrified he got. At the end, he hugged his head with both his hands and trembled.
Chu Feng really did not know what to do when he faced such a change. After spinning around and looking, he did not even see half a shadow. It also meant that the beggar was speaking to him. But that made Chu Feng feel that something was wrong, so he gathered his nerves, went up, and asked, "You know me?"
"Don't come over. I beg you, please forgive me. The things you wanted me to do I already did. Please forgive me. I don't want to die yet!"
But before Chu Feng even got close, the beggar started yelling. Suddenly, he waved his big sleeve and a strong wind came sweeping. When the strange wind dissipated, Chu Feng discovered with astonishment that the beggar already disappeared without even leaving a single trace.
At that instant, Chu Feng's expression was extremely complicated. He was shocked in his heart because in the scene just now, anyone could see that the insane beggar was an expert in cultivation. It was a real expert, so strong that he was unpredictable and unable to determine at which level he was at.
But the thing that shocked Chu Feng the most was the beggar seemed to recognize him and feared him. Although he didn't know the specific reasons, Chu Feng hiddenly felt that the beggar may have known his identity.
To his own identity, his father Chu Yuan never mentioned it before, and Chu Feng never asked. He always felt that since his parents abandoned him, he had no reason to search for them. After all, parents like them were not worth searching for.
But when he met the beggar, his way of thinking completely changed. How did the beggar who had such an impressive cultivation go insane? What relationship did he have with him? Who were his parents? Or perhaps many years ago, something happened?
All sorts of questions rushed into Chu Feng's brain like the tide, making him more and more curious towards his identity. He felt that everything would not be as simple as he thought, and his own identity may not be as simple as he predicted.
"Oi, I've looked for you for quite a while. Why did you come to this place?" But just at that time, a sweet voice rang out. Looking over, Su Mei was standing at the entrance at the alley and she was looking at him. She also quickly went towards him as if some important thing happened.
"What's wrong?" Seeing that, Chu Feng hurriedly organized his emotions and he asked while smiling.
"The position of the tomb was already announced. Right now, all sorts of powers are rushing over there. We need to quickly go as well or else we won't even be able to get the leftovers." Su Mei had a full face of impatience and she dragged Chu Feng away.
It was just how Su Mei said it was. The map of tomb was finally announced, and although no one knew who the announcer of the map was, they were sure that just from the selling of the maps, that person got a huge profit.
The powers from all sorts of places majestically gathered together. Everyone used the fastest speed to head towards the tomb. Also at that time, the smells of gunpowder from the powers got stronger and stronger. Especially between the Azure Dragon School and the Thousand Wind School. Conflicts of big and small size endlessly happened.
That made Chu Feng feel lucky. Lucky that he listened to Su Mei's words and didn't wear the clothing of the Azure Dragon School. Or else with their strength, if they caught the eyes of the Thousand Wind School, they were most likely dead.
"Look over there, it's the core disciples of our Azure Dragon School."
"Why are they still fighting again? They haven't even gotten into the tomb. If treasures really were found, wouldn't this become a river of blood?"
Within the desert, Chu Feng and the group saw another Azure Dragon Disciple clashing against a dozen or so Thousand Wind School disciples.
The Azure Dragon School disciple wore a blue robe and it was obvious that he was a core disciple. Although the Thousand Wind School had the numbers advantage, they were all inner court disciples.
The core disciple had the cultivation of the 8th level, trained in the Mysterious Techniques, and also knew rank 4 skills. So, facing the mob, he had an absolute advantage. Very quickly, he defeated the group of Thousand Wind Disciples and attracted the exclamations of many observers.
"Hehe, it seems like the choice of our Azure Dragon School was correct. Sending out the elites is way better than sending out useless troops." As a disciple of the Azure Dragon School, seeing that their own school was winning, it would always make them feel extremely refreshed.
"Don't meddle in their business. We are only passersby right now!" But, the Su Mei that usually enjoyed the liveliness had an extremely opposite behavior at that time. Not only did she not stop to look, she even quickened her footsteps.
"Su Mei!" And with that yell, people knew that the core disciple from the Azure Dragon School actually knew Su Mei.
Hearing that call, Su Mei had no thoughts of stopping. Instead, she quickened her speed but that person also quickly caught up and stopped in front of Su Mei.
"It's really you Su Mei, why didn't you even look back when I called you?"That core disciple smiled and said.
"So it's senior Zhou? What a coincidence meeting you here." Su Mei put up an act and said.
"Hey, no need to be so foreign. You can call me brother Zhiyuan and it'll be fine." That core disciple had an evil smile on his face. At the same time, his pair of thief eyes restlessly scanned Su Mei's body.
At that instant, the people in the Wings Alliance cursed. Anyone could tell that the core disciple wanted to conspire against Su Mei.
If it was any other person, the Wings Alliance would have went up and blocked him. Perhaps they would even attack to teach him a lesson. But, not only were they facing a disciple from the same school, it was a core disciple. To people like them, the Wings Alliance members more or less had some fear.
After all, to be able to be a core disciple, their strength must be very strong. They could even be called as dragon within men. Their position in the school was extremely high, and normally, when them, the inner court disciples, met a core disciple, they would need to go up and pay their respects. How could they dare to offend them?
"Su Mei, you're also here for the tomb of the Profound realm expert right? Seeing your clothings, you must be afraid of meeting some unnecessary troubles. But, no need to fear. Follow me and I guarantee that no one will bully you."
As he spoke, the core disciple shamelessly smiled and extended his dirty hand, wanting to embrace Su Mei. That guy's speed was very fast as well. He almost gave no chance for Su Mei to react and he obviously wanted to take small advantages of Su Mei.


MGA Capitulo 55 – I Am Called Chu Feng
But just as he was going to have his way, Chu Feng suddenly appeared next to Su Mei and took her into his arms, dodging the dirty hands of the core disciple.
That scene greatly changed the face of the core disciple. Two cold rays instantly shot out from his eyes. That gaze really made him want to kill Chu Feng on scene.
But Chu Feng just ignored him and chuckled while looking at the Su Mei in his embrace, "Darling, do you know him?"
Seeing that, Su Mei sweetly smiled and said, "Not too familiar."
"Ohh, in the future, don't chat with people you are not familiar with. Girls need to pay attention." As Chu Feng spoke, he stroked Su Mei's hair and did not care, at all, what the core disciple felt.
"I understand." Su Mei also responded as if the two of them really were a pair of lovers.
"Boy, who are you?" The face of the core disciple turned green. He forcefully endured his anger, pointed at Chu Feng and questioned.
He came here with quite some difficulty and coincidentally met the little beauty Su Mei. Originally, he thought he could take small advantages of her, but he never would have thought that out of nowhere, this boy came out. It made him extremely displeased.
"And who are you?" Chu Feng did not reply, and instead, he arrogantly asked back.
"Who am I? I am a core disciple of the Azure Dragon School, Zhou Zhiyuan."
"Oh? You're Zhou Zhiyuan?"
"That's me."
"Never heard of you."
"You..."
That time, not to mention the core disciple Zhou Zhiyuan. Even the surrounding Wings Alliance members dropped their jaws in shock.
Chu Feng's nerves were too big. He dared to dig the face of the core disciple like that, and he even said it loudly so that everyone would hear it. A disaster was going to arrive for Chu Feng.
"You're looking to die!"
Indeed, Zhou Zhiyuan really did start to attack. He swung his arm, and the hard and strong palm carried the sound of wind as it aimed towards Chu Feng's face.
At that instant, Su Mei frowned, rotated her spiritual energy and was prepared attack as well. But, she felt a warm power that pushed her away. It was Chu Feng.
*whoosh*
After pushing Su Mei away, Chu Feng leaned his head to the side and dodged Zhou Zhiyuan's slap. Almost at the same time, he stepped forward, stuck out with his fist and it went towards Zhou Zhiyuan's chest.
"This guy."
Seeing that not only did Chu Feng dodge his attack and even sent such a sharp attack at him, he made Zhou Zhiyuan quite shocked. He hurriedly followed the Mysterious Technique and rotated his spiritual energy, then also shot out a punch which collided with Chu Feng's fist.
*bang* The two fists collided, and the strong power made the both of them back away a few steps. Although Chu Feng's face was calm, Zhou Zhiyuan's face changed greatly.
6th level of the Spirit realm. A boy of the 6th level forcefully collided fists with him yet neither one of them had the advantage. His hand even had a numbing feeling, and it let him know that the young person's body was quite something. It was just like having steel tendons and iron bones!
"You are decently skilled. Boy, do you dare to announce your name!" After finding out that Chu Feng was not a simple person, Zhou Zhiyuan didn't attack again. Instead, he questioned Chu Feng.
"I do not change my name whether I am sitting or standing. Inner court disciple of the Azure Dragon School, I am called Chu Feng!" Chu Feng kept his head high and chest out as he loudly announced his name.
"Chu Feng, very good. I've remembered you."
"After seeing a core disciple, you, a mere inner court disciple, not only did not pay your respects, you even disrespected me. You better not let me see you again or else I will have you face the consequences."
After coldly saying those words, Zhou Zhiyuan fiercely glared at Chu Feng then quickly left.
"Chu Feng, you're too impressive. That Zhou Zhiyuan is a core disciple that cultivated in the Mysterious Techniques, and he has the strength of the 8th level of the Spirit realm! You took one of his punches by force and didn't even suffer any damages! I, Bai Tong, truly admire you."
"Chu Feng, even in our Wings Alliance, your strength can absolutely be in the top 10. I, Ye Taozi, also admire you as well."
"The Spirit power is indeed strong. Chu Feng, when you are more developed in the future, don't forget about us brothers!"
When Zhou Zhiyuan walked away, the observing crowd that didn't dare to come close, Bai Tong, Ye Taozi, the Dragon and Tiger brothers all came close. Admiration filled their faces.
In an exchange between the 6th level of the Spirit realm and the 8th level of the Spirit realm, he could calmly respond to the attacks. That strength was never seen before by them and never even heard before.
But being shocked was being shocked. They didn't suspect Chu Feng's body too much and they thought that Chu Feng was so strong because of his Spirit power.
"Let's hurry up on the road. I'm sure that the Origin realm experts already reached the tomb. If we don't go quicker then we won't even be able to get the leftovers." Su Mei looked at the map and told everyone to continue forward.
When they restarted their journey, Su Mei gradually walked next to Chu Feng and said in a low voice, "You are really scary."
"What's wrong?" Chu Feng was a bit confused.
"You just used the Breathing Technique or else you wouldn't have been able to hold off Zhou Zhiyuan's punch."
"That's right, I used the Breathing Technique. What's so scary about that?"
"Do you know how much time I spent training the Breathing Technique?"
"How long?"
"I used an entire year to be able to use the Breathing Technique. But you. You only use a few days!"
"So are you praising that I'm too smart, or do you want me to say that you're too stupid?"
"You bastard."
"Ah~~"
A scream rang out, and on Chu Feng's arm, there was another chunk of green. Bai Tong and the others already got used to the behaviors of those two.
Actually, people could tell that Su Mei and Chu Feng's relationship was not ordinary, so even if they were rushing, they intentionally pulled the distance apart to avoid disturbing them.
Seeing the Chu Feng who was grimacing and constantly rubbing his arm, Su Mei pursed her lips and said softly, "Thank you."
"Thanks for what?" Chu Feng was a bit muddled and he didn't know what the girl was implying.
"You are a smart person, so I'm sure that you know what the future holds if you offended Zhou Zhiyuan. But you still choose to help me, I..."
"What are you saying? Don't think of foolish things. Remember, not only some core disciple, even if there's a stronger person that wants to bully you, I will stand in front of you without hesitation and help you to teach him a lesson!"
"Why?"
"Because you are a person that I want to protect!" After saying that, Chu Feng gave a bright smile and continued walking.
But Su Mei stopped where she was. Her pair of beautiful eyes flickered without stopping and the emotions on her face were very complicated. For the first time, she felt that the young person that she only knew for a short amount of time could be really reliable.
"Hehe" Suddenly, Su Mei beautifully smiled, and with her little hands behind her back, she bounced and jumped to chase up to Chu Feng. She had an extremely sweet smile on her face, and it was truly extremely sweet because the smile came from her heart.


MGA Capitulo 56 – Those Who Dare Approach, Die
Chu Feng and the others followed the map and continued walking. Finally, before the sky became dark, they arrived at the so-called tomb.
At that instant, the tomb was already opened. Although there were still a lot of people rushing in, they could not see the figures of the Origin realm experts. Which meant that the strongest people already entered.
"So we can only get some leftovers?" Seeing that scene, many people were discouraged.
"If we don't quickly enter, I'm afraid that we won't even see a single grain of rice." On the other hand, Chu Feng smiled indifferently and took the lead to rush in first.
The tomb was created under the desert and the size exceeded everyone's imagination. On both sides of the wide tunnel, luminous rocks were hung all over. The road lit up by the rocks were as bright as the day.
Going along the road, before 50 meters, a round hall appeared. The hall was lit up by lamps and the dazzling sight was very beautiful. It was the first time that Chu Feng saw such luxurious indoor decorations.
But, the round hall was not the end. Rather, there were dozens of tunnels there. Every tunnel went very deep and they couldn't see the end.
"Chu Feng, which one should we go into?" Seeing the tunnels that were like a maze, Su Mei and the others cast their gazes towards Chu Feng. At that moment, the Chu Feng that had the Spirit power became the backbone of their group.
"The tunnels go too deep and I can't even check the end. We can only wish for luck."
Chu Feng helplessly shook his head but he didn't hesitate and picked a tunnel. He rushed into it and Su Mei and the others closely followed.
After entering the tunnel before long, they found out that on both sides, many doors appeared. Some of the doors were already opened and they could see a large amount of spiritual medicines inside. Also within the many rooms, people were battling each other to fight over the spiritual medicines.
"Here, I'll open this one."
Chu Feng spread out his Spirit power and found the firmest iron door. As he arrived in front of the door, he said nothing and used the 2nd style of the Three Thunder Styles. A ray of lighting swept past and that sturdy iron door got opened by Chu Feng.
*bang*
After opening the door, a wave of spiritual energy rushed towards their face. Ground Spirit Grass, Sky Spirit Grass, Saint Spirit Grass... everything that should be there was there. There were several thousands being displayed in the room and they were all dazzling.
"How is this a tomb? It's just like a treasure storehouse!"
Seeing that, everyone was extremely happy. They knew that they were going to earn a lot because there were at least several dozens of rooms just like this in the tunnels.
"Bai Long, Bai Hu, Ye Taozi, Zhang Tingzi. The four of you guard the door. Bai Tong, Su Mei, us three will go and take the spiritual medicines."
After saying that, Chu Feng, Su Mei, Bai Tong rushed in, took the Cosmos Sacks and began to collect the spiritual medicines without restraint. No matter if it was of the low quality or of the high quality, as long as it was spiritual medicines they did not let it any go.
"Move. If you don't move I'll slaughter you."
"This room was opened by us so the spiritual medicines in here belong to us."
"Ha! The things in here have no owner. You think it's yours just because you said it is?"
But just at that time, a yell came from the entrance. Looking over, the brothers and the group started battling with a group of people.
No one knew which power the group belonged to, but their strength were not weak. 5 of them reached the 7th level of the Spirit realm and they pressured the brothers and the others.
"Bastards. They want to take the work of others." Seeing that Su Mei and Bai Tong were abnormally angry.
Before they opened the doors, they already saw the group of people. The group did not open any one of the doors and they were just standing in the tunnel while quietly observing the changes. Indeed, after Chu Feng and the others opened the door, they came rushing over.
"You guys continue collecting, I'll go block them." Chu Feng threw his own Cosmos Sack to Su Mei and rushed towards the group in huge strides.
At that moment, a person was battling intensely with the Dragon and Tiger brothers. But, Chu Feng came slaughtering in like a demon. They only saw a rush like the lightning and the spray of blood. Within a blink, 5 screams rang out. Three people from the 6th level of the Spirit realm and two people from the 7th level of the Spirit realm fell into a pool of blood. They breathed no more.
That scene terrified the group of people and they immediately put away their weapons, retreated, pointed at Chu Feng, then said, "Boy, you dare to kill! Do you know who we are?"
*whoosh* In the instant that the person finished speaking, Chu Feng appeared in front of him like a ghost. His palm was like a knife and a cold light flashed past. The person's head flew up and he was decapitated.
After cleanly killing those people, Chu Feng's body was full of blood. He stood in front of the door with eyes shooting out two cold rays. He only said 5 words. "Those who dare approach, die!"
A huge killing intent which was like a shapeless hurricane scared the group of people back. Looking at the 6 members who died, the group of people were angry but no one dared to approach.
They were terrified by Chu Feng's power. Although Chu Feng seemed quite young, everyone could tell that the young person was ruthless. It could be said that he was "killing without even blinking".
"Leave."
After grinding his teeth, the person that seemed to be the leader bellowed. The group of people deeply looked at Chu Feng and rushed towards other rooms.
At that instant, the Dragon and Tiger brothers, Ye Taozi and Zhang Tingzi, the gazes towards Chu Feng were extremely complicated. After all, they were still young. Although they experienced a lot, they never killed a person with their hands.
But Chu Feng was different. The killing intent emitted from his body was authentic. He really would kill, and he already did. Not only that, when he did, he was merciless. Only the killing intent emitted by people like Chu Feng could be so bone-piercing cold and it created fear from the bottom of people's hearts.
At that instant, the 4 of them were rejoicing in their hearts. Rejoicing that Chu Feng was their teammates and not their enemy. Or else it would be unimaginable what kind of dangerous situations they would sink into if they faced an enemy like that.
"Don't be lost in your thoughts. All of you, go in and collect the spiritual medicines. I can guard here by myself." Chu Feng said to the 4 of them.
"Mm." The 4 of them rushed in without hesitation. At that instant, Chu Feng's position in their heart changed. He was not even like a person that just joined the Wings Alliance. He became the leader of this operation just like that.
From then on, Chu Feng and the others continuously opened several more doors. The amount of spiritual medicines in every room got more and more compared to the previous room.
Also at that time, many people that didn't have eyes wanted to rob Chu Feng and the other's work. But, they only had one ending. That was death.
At the end, the killing intent on Chu Feng's body got stronger and stronger. Pretty much when people just looked at him, they quickly walked around. They were afraid to offend that baleful person because that bone-piercing killing intent was not for jokes.
There were only a few doors on the two sides that were not opened, but Chu Feng decided not to take it from those people. They continued going deeper. As for the goal, it was to take the initiative.
Although until now, the amount of spiritual medicines they got neared 10 thousand, most of them were low quality spiritual medicines. The best were no higher than the high quality Saint Spirit Grass.
As for the top quality "Spiritual Bead", they haven't seen any yet. So, they all felt that there were even better treasures deeper inside the tomb. After all, it was a tomb of an expert in the Profound realm.
But, when they went deeper in, a dense smell of blood rushed towards them. When they entered a wide hall, almost all of them were stunned by the scene in front of them.


MGA Capitulo 57 – Imperial Sky Sage
The spacious hall was filled with bodies. From their clothing, those people came in after the tomb was opened.
Surrounding those bodies were many human-shaped monsters. So, that was why they were called Human-Shaped Monsters. They were extremely ugly. Their bloody appearance were like a human that shed off their skin and they were extremely terrifying.
On their bodies were the auras of a martial cultivator. The weakest was at the 6th level. But, there were some that reached the 9th level of the Spirit realm.
At that instant, the strange monsters were munching the flesh of the bodies with huge bites. They were even more scary and ruthless than Fierce Beasts.
The most important thing was that there were several hundreds of the monsters. They almost completely occupied most areas in the hall. With that, if the group wanted to go from one part of the hall to the other, they would not have much luck unless there were experts of the Origin realm or experts of the 9th level of the Spirit realm.
"They are Blood Corpses. There are actually so many Blood Corpses. This...This is too cruel!"
At that instant, Su Mei covered her mouth with her hand. Her beautiful eyes were opened wide and they were filled with incomparable shock.
"Su Mei, you recognize these things?"
Chu Feng also felt that it was extremely disturbing. Through the observations of his Spirit power, he discovered that other than having almost no skin, the monster's body was no different than the human's body. Which more or less meant the monsters were evolved from humans.
"There's a poison in the world called the Blood Poison. The Blood Poison is created from several thousands of strange poisons."
"If a person swallows the poison and does not get the cure, within one hour, they will get stripped of their awareness. From then on, they do not die nor rot and they became a zombie-like killing tool. Because, after being changed, their outer skin would be stripped off and only the blood and muscles would remain. From that, they were called Blood Corpses."
"To prevent their tomb from being robbed, some people would use this poison to create the Blood corpses and then put them into their tomb. But I never would have thought that there would be so many Blood Corpses in this place! The master of this tomb is a bit too cruel..."
After hearing Su Mei's description, everyone took a breath of cool air. To change humans that were alive to monsters like these, their methods were indeed quite ruthless.
"Then, Su Mei, do you know the characteristics of these things?"
Chu Feng and the others were standing outside of the hall, and clearly, the Blood Corpses could see them but they did not attack them. Yet, it was obvious that the people in the halls were killed by the Blood Corpses. So, Chu Feng felt that because the Blood Corpses were not complete humans, they must have a certain weakness.
"The Blood Corpses do not have eyes nor awareness. They only have the desire to kill and they use their sense of smell to determine if it's food or if they're from the same species. Other than the same species, any organism that goes near their range of smell, they will receive the heartless slaughter from them." Su Mei said.
"You said that they use smell to distinguish between foe and ally?" Chu Feng's eyes lit up.
"Yes." Su Mei nodded and replied.
"If it's like that, then I have a method to go through." Chu Feng smiled and said.
"What method?" Hearing him say that, everyone was moved. It was originally a dead end in front of them, but if Chu Feng really had a way to pass through, then what was waiting for them would certainly be huge treasures.
"It's just a thought. As for if it will work or not, I need to experiment. You guys wait here for me."
After saying that, Chu Feng stepped into the hall. He used the Breathing Mysterious Technique and ran directly towards a Blood Corpse which was at the 6th level of the Spirit realm.
*wuaa*
Just as Chu Feng got within 10 meters of that Blood Corpse, it made a beast-like howl. While baring its teeth, it suddenly leaped towards Chu Feng like a hungry tiger towards food.
*whoosh whoosh* But Chu Feng's arms moved and a cold glare shot out. The undamaged Blood Corpse was sliced into many pieces and scattered everywhere. But, the Blood Corpse was very strange. Although it was bloody throughout its body, after being sliced, not a single drop of blood was sprayed out.
"This guy is too terrifying." Looking at the perfect cuts and looking at Chu Feng's palm, Bai Tong and the others breathed a breath of cool air.
Although at their stage of cultivation, their body would be as strong as steel and normal weapons would have difficulty even damaging them, they had rarely seen a person like Chu Feng who used his palm like a knife and it was even so sharp. At least at their stage they had not.
But, Chu Feng's following actions completely stunned them. After Chu Feng sliced a few more Blood Corpses, they saw that he used the clothes of the dead as a rope and tied the limbs of the Blood Corpse onto his waist and legs.
"What is Chu Feng doing? He used the Blood Corpse, disgusting..." Zhang Tingzi covered her mouth with both of her hands and she was slightly unable to bear with it
"Continue watching. He must have a reason for doing this." But Su Mei tightly stared at Chu Feng, expecting his next actions.
Just at that time, the shocking scene happened. Chu Feng started to run crazily. His goal was the middle of the hall where the Blood Corpses formed into groups.
That terrified Su Mei and the others. The Blood Corpses in the middle of the hall were very strong. A few already reached the 9th level of the Spirit realm. If they attacked in groups, even if it was Chu Feng, he would instantly die. He was simply looking for death.
But the next moment shocked them once again. They discovered with surprise, when Chu Feng shot through the Blood Corpses, they completely ignored Chu Feng as if unable to smell his scent.
"I know. He is using the scent of the Blood Corpse to conceal his own and it bypassed the Blood Corpses' smelling sense." Finally, Su Mei said with shock.
"So it was like that. It's quite impressive that he was able think of that method." At the same time, the others also understood and admiration was revealed on their faces.
After that, the crowd used Chu Feng's method and successfully dodged the Blood Corpses. At the end, they safely arrived at the other end of the hall and they could finally continue going in deeper.
Going along the tunnel for a thousand meters or so, a door made of stone appeared in front of them. After pushing open the door, Chu Feng and the others were extremely happy.
At that moment, a huge cave appeared in front of them. The cave was very wide, over 300 feet tall and it was like a world of rocks. The rocks in there were very special because it emitted a strange green glow. They were very numerous and beautiful.
But, they could only look at the beautiful scene of the cave and they were unable to touch those rocks. Because, currently, they were on top of a steep cliff.
On the peak of the steep cliff, there was a 10 meter tall stone tablet erected on it. On the stone tablet, a few rows of large flamboyant cursive words were carved on it,
"I started martial cultivation at the age of 10, entered the Origin realm at the age of 16, entered the Profound realm at the age of 25, and I was already at the 9th level of the Profound realm at the age of 40. No matter what, after 100 years, I was unable to understand the mysteriousness of the Heaven realm. At the end, I was unable to step into the Heaven realm and unable feel the feeling of traveling to the horizon."
"I did not use regret as a comfort and I painstaking researched for dozens of years. Finally, I created a skill, ‘Imperial Sky Technique'. Although I did not enter the Heaven realm, I could still walk in the air and feel the subtleness of walking within the clouds."
"The Imperial Sky Technique is my flesh and blood. Various people wanted to learn it but they were all refused by me. Today, the Imperial Sky Technique is in my tomb, waiting for someone to take it. But, my flesh and blood cannot be acquired by normal people. If you want to obtain it, then it will depend on your strength."
"It's him!" After seeing the words on the tablet, Su Mei was shocked.
"Su Mei, you know him?" Chu Feng asked curiously.
But before letting Su Mei speak, Bai Tong spoke first, "If I'm not mistaken, then this person is the 1 expert that dominated the Azure Province 100 years ago, the Imperial Sky Sage."


MGA Capitulo 58 – The Roads of Enemies Are Narrow
"It's the Imperial Sky Sage?" The Dragon and Tiger brothers were extremely shocked and it was obvious that they heard of that person.
"The Imperial Sky Technique is his absolute technique. But, very little people know what it was called. So, from what I can tell, this is certainly his tomb." Su Mei explained.
"I never would have thought that he would buried here. No wonder no one knew where he went." Ye Taozi also sighed and said.
"Look! There's something under the stone tablet." Just at that time, Zhang Tingzi suddenly yelled in surprise and ran towards the stone tablet as she talked.
At that time, others also noticed that there was a wooden box under the stone tablet. After opening it, everyone was extremely happy.
Gold light flashed in the box, and inside, all of them were Spiritual Beads. Although the box wasn't big, the sizes of Spiritual Beads were small. So, there were at least 100 Spiritual Beads in the box. 100 Spiritual Beads meant that everyone could get a dozen or so, so they earned quite a bit this time.
But just as the brothers and the others were crazily dividing the Spiritual Beads, Chu Feng walked towards the end of the cliff and looked down. He couldn't help but frown.
The cliff went for a long ways down. But, on the side of the cliff, there were several vines that went down. They went straight through the mist and disappeared there.
The mist covered everything and he couldn't see the world underneath. But, Chu Feng could hiddenly feel that there were dense killing intents under that fog.
"The Imperial Sky Technique is a strange technique. The Imperial Sky Sage used it to walk on air for tens of thousands of miles every day. Although he did not enter the Heaven realm, he had the dignity of the Heaven realm. It really makes one admire him."
"But sadly, the Imperial Sky Sage's character was quite strange. Not only did he not join any powers, he did not have a single friend. Although many young elites wanted to be his disciple, they all got one result. It was being refused."
"So, the Imperial Sky Technique has already been lost for hundreds of years. Some people estimate that the Imperial Sky Technique is rated as a rank 7 skill. But you need to know, in our Azure Province, the best skills are only rank 6 ones and our Azure Dragon School doesn't even have a rank 6."
"This time, if someone could successfully get the Imperial Sky Technique then we really would earn big."
"But I have to say, we're really lucky this time to have accidentally entered the tomb of the Imperial Sky sage. But sadly, our strength isn't enough and this good luck could only pass by our shoulders." Looking at the mist, Su Mei's eyes flashed and pursed her lips while feeling regretful.
"Is this Imperial Sky sage really that powerful?"
Chu Feng never even heard of his name. Suddenly, he felt that he was a poor little guy that grew in in some desolate village and knew nothing.
On the other hand, Su Mei and the others were like the were like the rich masters that grew up in the city. Although their age were not too far apart, being influenced by the people around them, their experiences would be broader than him as well and the truth was indeed so.
"As the 1 expert in the Azure Province back then, you think it was just a joke?"
"If the tomb of the Imperial Sky sage got spread out, it would be enough to shock the entire Azure Province. Powers from everywhere would insanely send their top experts here as soon as possible."
"At that time, not only will we not be able to take advantage of the situations, even the Azure Dragon School and the Thousand Wind School will not have the qualifications. It would be the world of the first-rate schools. So, that's why I said that we're very lucky." Su Mei explained.
Hearing Su Mei's words, Chu Feng's gaze got more and more bright. He tightly stared at the ocean of mist underneath and a crazy thought appeared in his mind.
The Imperial Sky Technique that was lost for hundreds of years would very likely be under in the mist. There was no reason to let it slide past him right?
*bang* But just at that time, a huge sound came from the entrance. Looking over, the faces of Su Mei and the others changed greatly. Even Chu Feng started to frown.
There were six tall and big males that were all handsome with unordinary auras. Also, they were wearing blue-coloured robes while having the aura of the 8th level of the Spirit realm. Those people were the core disciples of the Azure Dragon School. Within them, there was even someone they knew. It was the person that had a conflict with Chu Feng earlier, Zhou Zhiyuan.
"Oh? I never would have thought that someone already arrived here first. Looking at them, they seem like babies that haven't grown up yet. How could they be here?"
"It seems we underestimated the people here. Indeed, other than us, someone else also knew the way to pass through the Blood Corpses."
After seeing Chu Feng and the others, the core disciples were surprised. But from their words, they did not even put them in their eyes.
"The roads of enemies are quite narrow. Su Mei, we meet again." Just at that time, Zhou Zhiyuan spoke with an evil smile.
"Su Mei? This is Su Rou's sister and the people that disrespected you earlier?" Seeing that, someone spoke to question.
"That's right, it's them. Especially that boy over there. His nerves are so big that it covers the world." Zhou Zhiyuan pointed at Chu Feng who was at the top of the cliff and a cold smile was on his face.
"Zhiyuan, how do you want to handle that boy? We'll help you." The gazes of the other people became darker and colder. As core disciples, they were offended by inner court disciples. To them, it was not something that they could endure.
"We are under the orders of Senior Leng to collect the Spiritual Beads at the cliffs. Those who obstruct us die without exception." Zhou Zhiyuan said.
"Zhou Zhiyuan, we come from the same school yet you dare to kill us?" Su Mei said angrily.
"Same school? If so, why aren't you wearing the clothing of the Azure Dragon School? Those who do not wear the clothes of the school means that they do not put the Azure Dragon School in their eyes and don't see themselves as a disciple of the Azure Dragon School. We should get rid of people like them."
"But, Su Mei, no need to be afraid. How can I, Zhou Zhiyuan, bear to kill you? I will enjoy myself with you, hehe..." Speaking to that point, Zhou Zhiyuan's face revealed a shameless smile.
"You..." Hearing those words, Su Mei's face paled from anger. She was really angry because she never thought that Zhou Zhiyuan would be as shameless as that.
"Zhiyuan, that's not too good right? After all, she is Su Rou's sister." Another core disciple spoke. Although he said that, his pair of eyes restlessly looked around Su Mei's body.
"Everyone, I'm sure that you know that Su Rou is the 1 beauty in our Azure Dragon School. But, she is too proud of herself and we cannot even get close to her. It is fated that we will have no chance."
"But her sister Su Mei. No matter if it's her looks or body, she is no worse than Su Rou. In the future, she will be a beauty as well. Today, with such a good chance, do you not want to have a taste of this little beauty?" Zhou Zhiyuan was quite direct and said his own thoughts out loud.
"Haha, Zhiyuan, since you already said that, what are we waiting for? An instant of youth is worth a thousand gold!" Finally one of them impatiently started to force themselves towards Chu Feng and the others.
That scene, not only Bai Tong and the others, even Su Mei started to frown and became abnormally nervous. Six core disciples were not something that they could take.


MGA Capitulo 59 – Intense Battle
"Seniors, you just want the Spiritual Beads right? Is it fine if we give all the Spiritual Beads we have to you?"
"No, not only the Spiritual Beads, we'll give everything we have to you!"
Facing Zhou Zhiyuan and the others as they came closer and closer, the Dragon and Tiger brothers revealed faces of terror. They bodies started to uncontrollably tremble and they even took their Cosmos Sacks out, wanting to give it to them.
"What? Don't want to die right? That's fine. Kneel on the ground and bump your heads 100 times on the ground then we'll consider forgiving your two dog lives!" Zhou Zhiyuan and the others got closer to Chu Feng as they teased the two of them.
At that instant, the Dragon and Tiger brothers really had some movement. As they faced the choice between life and death, even though they knew that they would most likely die after kneeling down and begging, they still wanted to try and do the last struggle for life.
"Bai Long, Bai Hu, do not embarrass the Wings Alliance!" Seeing that the two of them really started to kneel down, Su Mei angrily bellowed.
But even so, she could not completely stop the knee that was slowly bending down and the waist that was curving forward. They seemed to already have decided.
"As men, you should have some dignity."
But just at that time, Chu Feng walked over. After glancing at the Dragon and Tiger brothers, he walked in front of them, cast that fearless gaze towards the 6 core disciples and said,
"Do you know that you all already violated a crime worthy of death?!"
"Boy, what do you mean?" Hearing those words, the Zhou Zhiyuan and the others who were originally proud of themselves couldn't help but stare blankly.
Chu Feng strangely smiled, narrowed his eyes and said, "I am saying that you dare to have evil thoughts towards Su Mei. That is the crime!"
*whoosh*
Before the words even finished entering their ears, Chu Feng's body was like the wind as he ran with flying speed. He took the initiative and attacked the 6 core disciples first.
His speed was extremely fast. Almost within a blink, he arrived in front of the 6 core disciples. That change shocked even the Zhou Zhiyuan and the others who had a pressing aura.
"Illusionary Palm!!!" Chu Feng rotated according to the Mysterious Technique then patted with his hands. The palm images that filled the air chopped the heavens and covered the earth while booming over. No one knew which was real or which one was fake.
"He has a bit of skill cultivating the Illusionary Palm to that stage."
"But boy, you're underestimating us. Today, we'll let you know the difference between core disciples and inner court disciples."
Being shocked was being shocked. After all, core disciples had experienced the world and very quickly, they adjusted their thoughts, rotated the Mysterious Technique, displayed the rank 3 skills, and started to exchange blows with Chu Feng.
But that exchange was not that important. What shocked them once again was a mere inner court disciple, a mere person of the 6th level could challenge 6 people by himself without losing. That was quite hard for them to accept it.
Especially their attacks. They were clearly attacking towards his back, but it was as if Chu Feng grew eyes behind him. Without even looking, he could easily dodge it. It made them feel that it was very strange.
"This boy has cultivated in the Mysterious Techniques. I cannot be careless and I need to use full strength to defeat and kill him or else it will cause troubles in the future." The Zhou Zhiyuan that fought with Chu Feng before knew that he was no simple person. He didn't want to waste too much time with him and he used his rank 4 skill.
*hu hu hu* Both his arms spread apart and created gales after gales. A strong aura was emitted from his body. Suddenly, he punched out towards Chu Feng.
That fist was extremely fast. It was like the lightning, and even if it was Chu Feng, he could not dodge it. The power of the punch was extremely strong as well. If he got hit, Chu Feng would not have much luck.
"Don't think that you're the only one who knows a rank 4 skill."
But even so, Chu Feng was not afraid in the slightest. One of his palm clenched to form a fist. With the flicker of lightning, his own fist collided with Zhou Zhiyuan's steel-like fist.
*boom*
As two fists collided, not only did it create an ear-piercing boom, it even created a wave of ripples. As the both of them were knocked back, the 5 other people were also forced back a few steps.
"The Three Thunder Styles. This guy can actually use a rank 4 skill of our Azure Dragon School."
"We must join hands and finish this person off today."
At that instant, the other people finally recognized Chu Feng's strength and didn't dare to be careless anymore. They all took out their absolute skills. Six strong, rank 4 skills surrounded and attacked Chu Feng.
*zi lala*
It was the so-called "Two fists cannot fight 4 hands". Chu Feng, who was only at the 6th level of the Spirit realm, was a bit disadvantaged while facing the attack of 6 people at the 8th level of the Spirit realm.
While facing that situation, he could only use the 1st style of the Three Thunder Styles. With an absolute speed, he dodged the attacks of Zhou Zhiyuan and the others. But, those who had eyes could tell that Chu Feng sank into a predicament.
"Chu Feng, I'll come and help you." Just at that time, Su Mei jumped in resolutely.
The her at that instant was emitting a jade-like glow from her body. Every attack and style would shake the air. She knew a rank 4 skill as well.
"I will come as well." After that, Bai Tong also jumped into the battle. Although he did not cultivate in the Mysterious Techniques, he still knew a rank 4 skill and he could use it quite proficiently.
Although they were core disciples, they only had the cultivation of the 8th level of the Spirit realm. So, after Su Mei and Bai Tong joined in, Chu Feng's pressure did indeed decrease.
Under that situation, Chu Feng counterattacked and sent a string of fierce attacks towards Zhou Zhiyuan. Being pressed by Chu Feng, the core disciple Zhou Zhiyuan got pushed back little by little and he was completely pressured by Chu Feng.
*bang* Finally, with the flash of a lightning, Chu Feng's fist landed on Zhou Zhiyuan's chest. The chest of that core disciple shook as he flew 50 feet away.
"Ahh!" Feeling the pain from his chest, Zhou Zhiyuan painfully grimaced. He wanted to stand up, but he discovered that he didn't have the strength. He got heavily injured by only one of Chu Feng's attacks.
The most terrifying thing was that Chu Feng was slowly walking towards him. When every step fell, his heart would violently shake once. It was as if it wasn't Chu Feng's steps but the God of death's.
"This guy. How is he so strong? Is he even human?"
Zhou Zhiyuan was extremely bitter. Although he knew that Chu Feng was strong, he never would have thought that he would be strong to this point. Under a 1 v 1 situation, he would not be able to beat him.
Especially the Chu Feng right now who only had the strength of the 6th level of the Spirit realm. If Chu Feng was like him, being also in the 8th level, he did not even dare to think how strong Chu Feng would be. Would he be able to battle against the experts of the Origin realm?
"Ahh!"
But just at that time, suddenly, a cry rang out. Looking back, Chu Feng's face couldn't help but change. He saw that Bai Tong got heavily beaten by a core disciple. A mouthful of blood sprayed out as it reddened his clothes.
"Bai Tong!"
Seeing Bai Tong being heavily injured, Su Mei was also shocked. Just at that instant, the other 5 people moved at the same time and using the power of attacking from all sides, 5 dirty hands extended towards Su Mei at the same time. The location in which they were attacking was Su Mei's forbidden area on her body.


MGA Capitulo 60 – Third Thunder Style
"Die!"
Looking at that scene, Chu Feng's face instantly changed. It became gloomy and cold to the extreme. He hissed while looking up and bellowed, then rays of lightning shot out from his body.
The lightning snakes rushed out and it was just as if they was materialized as they coiled around Chu Feng's body. They turned as he wished and became 5 lightning dragons. They roared and crashed towards the 5 core disciples.
Everything happened too fast like the flash of lightning or flint. Even Su Mei couldn't react to what happened. She only felt that instantly, in front of her eyes, she was enveloped by the light and a strong ripple of energy shook her a few meters back as she fell on the ground.
When she raised her head and looked, the light already dissipated. But, the scene in front of them stunned her. She discovered with shock that the 5 core disciples who surrounded to attack her were all laying on the ground.
Their blue robe were completely burnt up and their body burnt black. They already breathed no more and their bodies were emitting the smell of char. They died an extremely horrifying way.
"This... This... This..."
Just at that time, Zhou Zhiyuan's face was as pale as paper. His mouth could not stop shaking and his eyes opened perfectly round and said with a tone of disbelief,
"Was that the legendary 3rd style of the Three Thunder Styles?!!"
"What? The 3rd style of the Three Thunder Styles? Isn't it the style that only the Azure Dragon Founder knows? So...Chu Feng just....!"
Hearing Zhou Zhiyuan's words, Su Mei couldn't help but cover her lips and her eyes flickered non-stop. Her two long eyebrows slightly moved as well, showing incomparable shock.
As for Bai Tong, the Dragon and Tiger brothers, Ye Taozi, Zhang Tingzi and the others, they widened their mouths in astonishment. Chu Feng learnt the style that no one other than the founder knew. It was an extremely shocking news.
At that instant, they felt that they were wrong. Although they were shocked by Chu Feng's strength one time after the other and admired his talent again and again, their opinion on Chu Feng kept on changing.
But, this time, they discovered that they still underestimated Chu Feng. The young man who was younger than all of them had talent that exceeded their imaginations. He was unbelievably strong and it pricked their mind, making them sigh in admiration.
Chu Feng's expression did not fluctuate too much even when he annihilated the 5 core disciples in 1 attack. He already knew the 3rd Thunder Style before, and today, he just used his anger to obtain the opportunity to use it. As for the power, it was within his expectations because the 3rd style was equivalent to the style of a rank 5 skill.
*ta ta ta* After resolving the danger around Su Mei, he turned around and walked towards Zhou Zhiyuan one step at a time.
"You...You dared to kill core disciples! You..You're dead!" Looking at Chu Feng who was filled with killing intent, Zhou Zhiyuan knew it was unlikely that he could escape the disaster that he was in so he did not beg for forgiveness.
*bzz* Suddenly, Chu Feng stuck one of his palms out. A thick lightning came from his palm and hit Zhou Zhiyuan's left leg.
"Ah~~~" Feeling the scorching pain that was caused by the heat, Zhou Zhiyuan cried like a ghost. He looked at his left leg. It was charred and completely useless.
"You bas... Ah~~~~" Originally he wanted to curse, but when another lightning shot into his right leg, he cried out in pain again.
Following that, Chu Feng continuously used the 3rd Thunder Style two times again, completely wasting all four of Zhou Zhiyuan's limbs. Pain twisted his face, and his eyes and snot flowed down.
"Chu Feng, if you have the nerves then kill me! I will not forgive you even if I am a ghost!" Looking at the Chu Feng that finally arrived in front of him, Zhou Zhiyuan's gaze was filled with anger.
"Hoho, you think I'll kill you because you let me?" Chu Feng suddenly laughed, and his laugh was very loud. No one knew what he was laughing at, but the laughter made Zhou Zhiyuan feel extremely uneasy.
"Remember. The weak do not even have the right to die!"
*bzz* Suddenly, lightning shot out from Chu Feng's finger into Zhou Zhiyuan's mouth. It burnt off Zhou Zhiyuan's tongue and charred his mouth. His incomparably painful scream resonated. But, he said no more and finally fainted.
"hu~~~"
Looking at that scene, Bai Tong and the others couldn't help but swallow a mouthful of saliva. Their throat rolled over and cold sweat permeated on their foreheads.
Chu Feng's methods were quite cruel. So cruel that it made their hearts cold and they vowed in their minds not to be the enemy of Chu Feng. Having such an enemy was too scary.
When everyone wiped their sweat away because of Chu Feng's actions, he suddenly turned his head and said with a brilliant, sun-like smile,
"I know how far to go. The Spiritual Beads on their bodies are still there and it seems that they've gathered quite a bit. There should be roughly 1200 beads, so everyone go and split them."
With Chu Feng's words, it shocked Su Mei and the others once again. He knew without even looking how many Spiritual Beads that the people had. It was quite impressive.
Following what Chu Feng said, they went and searched the charred bodies. Indeed, they found that the Spiritual Beads still remained, but their Cosmos Sacks were already destroyed. The amount of Spiritual Beads was really around 1200.
Chu Feng, we've collected a total of 1380 Spiritual Beads. We got so many all because of you, so everyone of us will take 100 and the remaining 680 will go to you." Ye Taozi clasped his hands and brought the Spiritual Beads in front of Chu Feng.
The symbols on Chu Feng's Cosmos Sack revolved and it collected the 600 Spiritual Beads. As for the remaining 80, he gave it to Su Mei.
"What are you doing?" Su Mei did not understand.
"These are for the things that I've owed you. Whether it was the Spiritual Bead that you lent me before or the Cosmos Sack that you gave me, I cannot take those for free."
"You've calculated it so clearly with me?" Su Mei was a bit displeased.
"It's not called calculating it clearly, it's called knowing favours and returning them. If you don't take them then I won't feel comfortable." Chu Feng forcefully stuffed the Spiritual Beads into Su Mei's hands.
Looking at Chu Feng act like that, Su Mei stared blankly at him at first, but then she curled her lips and put the 80 Spiritual Beads into her Cosmos Sack.
The harvest that time was extremely big and it exceeded their imaginations. Of course, they knew that the reason why they could get so many Spiritual Beads was all because of Chu Feng. If it wasn't for Chu Feng, they wouldn't even have had the chance to live.
Then, as the group of people were happily and excitedly returning back, the Chu Feng who was at the back suddenly closed the stone door as he stood at the side of the cliff.
"Chu Feng, what are you doing? Have you gone insane?" Seeing that, Su Mei was stunned and instantly she understood something. She quickly ran back, but it was too late.
"Wait for me at the Ancient City, I will return and search for you."
Chu Feng lightly smiled, and with a bang, the stone door closed. No matter how Su Mei beat it, it did not even move in the slightest and it opened no more.


MGA Capitulo 61 – Imperial Sky Technique
After the stone door closed, Chu Feng could still feel the auras in the tunnel. After confirming that Su Mei and the others left, he went to the summit of the cliff without any worries.
Going along the vines, Chu Feng started to climb down into the ocean of mist. As he arrived near the mist, Chu Feng spread out his Spirit power. But he found out that within the mist, there was strange gas that disturbed his Spirit power, making him unable to penetrate through it.
Especially after entering the mist, the whiteness blocked his vision. Even with Chu Feng's strength, his vision range did not exceed 10 meters.
But luckily, after going down the mist for dozens of meters, he finally arrived at the bottom. Although the mist was still there, the feeling of stepping on the rocks freed his heart from anxiety.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
Chu Feng took out the World Spirit Compass. Instantly, rays of light spread everywhere and his vision range increased by several times. It had to be said that the light of that thing was very strange. It was as if it could penetrate through the mist and it was really a strange item for treasure hunting.
"It seems that danger is everywhere here."
Looking at the indications of the World Spirit Compass, Chu Feng knew which direction he needed to go. But, at the same time, he also knew that there were endless hidden dangers everywhere. With a careless mistake he would die.
Luckily, he had the World Spirit Compass in his hands. Or else, with his strength, he would not have much luck if he entered a place like this. Perhaps even if he had 9 lives he would use it all up.
Holding the World Spirit Compass, he walked in the area which was full of mist. Chu Feng could vaguely hear the growling of Fierce Beasts from afar. Also, there were other strange yells. There were even the cries of pain by people and their calls for help.
The deeper he went, the louder those sounds were. At the end, Chu Feng could even see some corpses that were eaten by just now.
He could feel the huge pressuring aura and hear some Fierce Beasts roaring nearby. It was the ones even stronger than the experts of the 9th level of the Spirit realm, the rank 9 Fierce Beasts.
According to rumours, the rank 9 Fierce Beasts were already the strongest rank with Fierce Beasts. The ones even stronger than Fierce Beasts were those who had spiritual natures, the Monstrous Beasts.
Although Monstrous Beasts did not randomly slaughter, their cultivation power were far stronger than Fierce Beasts. It would even have intelligence that was no weaker, or even stronger than humans. The important part was that Monstrous Beasts were very strong. They were born strong, having the most noblest blood of the beast species. It was rumoured that Monstrous Beasts that were just born had strength of the Origin realm.
The strong Monstrous Beasts could even speak languages and even transform into human shapes. Some Monstrous Beasts didn't like the deep mountains and wild forests, so they would change into human shapes and enter human societies and live with humans. They really lived up to the name of "Monstrous".
[TN This specific character "妖" in Chinese can mean monster, weird, devil, witch, etc.]
There were dangers everywhere in this place, and thinking of the strength of the Imperial Sky sage, Chu Feng had no doubts that the sage would grab a few Monstrous Beasts, throw them and restrict them within the tomb.
But luckily, after carefully walking for a full 2 hours, the mist in front of him slowly faded away. At the end, he could finally "dispel the clouds and see the sun" as he walked out of the mist.
"Hu.. I've finally got out."
At that instant, even Chu Feng couldn't help but exhale deeply. The misty lands before were just like hell. The ones within would feel incomparable repression.
"Damn. How big is the tomb of this Imperial Sky sage?"
Raising his head and looking, Chu Feng couldn't avoid feeling a bit helpless. In front of his eyes was not the expected treasures. It was another deep tunnel.
But, the tunnel was very broad and very bright. There was the atmosphere of boundlessness, and going along the tunnel forward, another wave of the smell of blood leaped towards Chu Feng's nose.
That smell was extremely strong. So strong that Chu Feng's Spirit power did not detect it yet the smell still floated over. Chu Feng held the World Spirit Compass, and because he discovered that there was no danger predicted, he continued forward without worries.
The further he went, the stronger the smell of blood became. At the end, it was able to make people gag. When Chu Feng entered the hall, he was stunned by the scene in front of him.
There were several tunnels in the hall, and the amount of tunnels was the same as the amount of tunnels in the entrance. Which meant, no matter which tunnel you went through at the beginning, as long as you could pass through the ocean of mist, at the end, the destination would still be here.
But, other than the tunnels, there was a ladder in the middle of the hall. The ladder kept going up and the end could not be seen. Obviously, it was the road to continue forward.
But the important thing was the hall at that moment. It was densely filled with corpses from all sorts of different powers. It could be seen that they were all strong people. Some were even even the experts of the Origin realm. The most amount of corpses belonged to the people from the Thousand Wind School and it was clear that they spent quite a bit on this tomb.
But the strangest thing was, within so many corpses, there was no one from the Azure Dragon School. The appearance of the dead were very wretched and it didn't like they died from simple battles.
Although the scene in front of him was quite fishy, Chu Feng didn't want to think too much about it. After all, he had the World Spirit Compass in his hand and as long as the compass indicated that it was safe, there would most likely not be any dangers. So, Chu Feng stepped over the seas of corpses and started to climb the tall ladder.
But, before even reaching the top, Chu Feng heard 2 voices. He could dimly hear that it was two old people, and the contents that the two people were talking about couldn't help but make Chu Feng feel happy.
At the end of the tall ladder, there was a strange room. The reason why he said it was strange was because the structure of the room was very special. Faint gas visible by the naked eye was floating around.
Within the middle of the room, two people were standing. One of the old men had white hair but a lively face like a child. On his body, a scary pressure was emitted from his body. He was an expert of the Profound realm.
The other person wore a white, long cloak. On the cloak, dense symbols were printed on it and the cloak covered his face. Only the two sharp, eagle-like eyes could be seen. It was the World Spiritist of the Azure Dragon School, Elder Zhuge.
But, at that instant, the two of them were standing and not moving. Their hands were raised up and a distressing face were on their faces. Because, above them, the roof of the room was currently falling.
The roof was a type of gold, but it was emitting cold air. It was also extremely heavy and if the two of them were not supporting it, they would certainly be crushed into meat pulp.
"You really are worthy of being the sect head of the Thousand Wind School. If you weren't here, I'm afraid that I really would have no way of holding this Cold Steel off." Elder Zhuge smiled and said.
"Bastard. Who are you? You are quite evil, using the life of the Thousand Wind School's elders to break the formation." The head of the Thousand Wind School was filled with anger. To think of the scene just now, he was endlessly angered.
"It doesn't matter who I am. The important thing is that you and me need to work together and find a way to break this Cold Steel or else this place will be our tomb." Zhuge smiled and said.
"You want me to work together with you? Don't even think about it!" The head of the Thousand Wind School coldly snorted. He did not believe the despicable, mysterious person in front of his eyes.
"I think that the reason that you came here was for the treasures. No need to lose both of our lives for previous disagreements right? Right now, the Imperial Sky Technique is in front of our eyes. Don't you want to obtain it?"
As Zhuge spoke, he cast his gaze towards a corner of the room. There was an exquisite jade stand there, and on top of the jade stand, there was a crystal-like object floating in midair.
Although it was translucent, it emitted a faint glow. The words that were engraved on it already stated what it was. It was the technique of the Imperial Sky sage, the Imperial Sky Technique!


MGA Capitulo 62 – The Fisherman Reaps the Rewards
"You think I'm an idiot? You spread the news of the tomb and baited me here. Then, you used me and the others to break the killing formation."
"You used such ruthless methods. How would you be so kind to give the Imperial Sky Technique to me?" The head of the Thousand Wind School obviously did not believe what Zhuge said.
"Elders, no need to fight over this. How about I enjoy this Imperial Sky Technique for you two?" Just at that time, underneath the room, a voice suddenly rang out.
When that voice rang out, the two of them were shocked. They never would have thought that other than them, there would be another person that was able to arrive at the room alive.
Under their astonished gazes, Chu Feng slowly came out from the entrance. He smiled as he evaluated the two people. But, when Chu Feng saw Zhuge, his eyes couldn't help but lit up.
Seeing the white cloak that was full of symbols, Chu Feng's instinct was that he might be a World Spiritist.
But compared to Chu Feng, the head of the Thousand Wind School and Zhuge were incomparably shocked. No matter what, they never would have thought that the person who was able to arrive at that place would be such a young man.
*bzz* Suddenly, Chu Feng frowned as he felt a strong Spirit power attacking him to sense his body.
The Spirit power was extremely strong and he didn't know how to defend himself. He was worried that their Spirit power would merge into his chest. Would the map of symbols be revealed just like that?
But luckily, the Spirit power passed through his chest without any reaction. At the same time, it relaxed Chu Feng and he thought of a possibility.
The map on his chest would very likely only be moved by his own Spirit power. If that was real, then in the future, he did not need to worry about his secret being detected by other people that had the Spirit power.
"6th level of the Spirit realm. With only a cultivation like this, you are still able to arrive at this place. It must be because of the World Spirit Compass in your hand right?" Zhuge spoke first.
"6th level of the Spirit realm?" Hearing those words, the head of the Thousand Wind School was even more shocked.
To the him who was at the Profound realm, people in the Origin realm were trash. People in the Spirit realm were the trash within trash. But, at that instant, such a trash arrived at this place. Naturally, it made him extremely shocked.
"Indeed, nice eyesight." Chu Feng lightly smiled towards Zhuge. He also didn't waste his time speaking and he walked towards the Imperial Sky Technique in big strides.
"Die." Seeing that, the head of the Thousand Wind School was seething with anger. With a thought, the boundless pressure came engulfing out and it pressed towards Chu Feng.
"Damn it." At that instant, Chu Feng could feel the boundless pressure surrounded his entire body. It wanted to penetrate his skin and stab his bones. It was extremely terrifying.
But, there was a huge difference between the pressure that the insane beggar gave him that day and to this. It could be said that the pressure from the beggar almost made Chu Feng die from the explosion of his body. But, the pressure from the head of the Thousand Wind School was able to be endured and it wouldn't kill him.
*ta, ta, ta* While enduring the pressure that was pressing his body, Chu Feng painfully walked the first step, the second step, the third step, and although it was extremely hard and painful, he still continued forward.
"What a strong physical body." Looking at that scene, Zhuge couldn't help but exclaim.
"You old guy, why aren't you attacking as well? Do you want this little brat to be the fisherman that reaps the reward?" Seeing that Zhuge was only looking and not helping, the head of the Thousand Wind School was even more angry.
"Hey, words cannot be said like that. Since he could arrive here with his cultivation, it clearly showed that he is not ordinary. Perhaps he could even be the prefered successor of the Imperial Sky Sage right?" Zhuge lightly smiled and he had a beautiful generosity of an adult.
"You bastard, I'll shred your body into thousands of pieces later."
The head of the Thousand Wind School grinded his teeth from his anger towards Zhuge. But, seeing the Chu Feng who kept on getting closer to the Imperial Sky Technique, he did not speak any more. He endlessly cast wave after wave of pressure towards Chu Feng, wanting to stop his movements.
But it was useless. Chu Feng's physical body was too strong. Under the pressure that was even feared by the experts of the Origin realm, not only could Chu Feng endure it, he could still continue walking forward. Although it was very painful and challenging, he was already quite overpowered being able to reach that point.
"Give it up. He is equipped with Spirit power and your pressure won't be able to move his determination. As long as his physical body can endure it, you will not be able to force him to give up purely with your pressure." Zhuge reminded once again and his eyes slightly narrowed and he concentrated on every movement and action of Chu Feng.
After a difficult journey, Chu Feng finally arrived in front of the jade stand that held the Imperial Sky Technique. Although he was pale at that instant and his body was completely soaked with sweat, he was still incomparably excited.
Grabbing the Imperial Sky Technique that was sparkling like a jade and created by the concentrated Spirit power, Chu Feng patted it towards his brain. Instantly, his face couldn't help but change greatly. A pain like the stabbing of needles was spreading from his brain.
"Ah~~~~~~~"
The pain was extremely strong and it was hard for Chu Feng to endure it. He hugged his head with both of his hands and rolled on the ground while loudly screaming.
Seeing that scene, Zhuge laughed out loud and said, "I forgot to tell you that the techniques created from the concentration of Spirit power isn't easy to cultivate."
"If you want to cultivate this technique, then first, you must have an extremely strong willpower. Having the Spirit power is a necessity. But even so, without a certain cultivation, you would be unable to bear this wave of power."
"If you are unable to bear the power, it would consume your Spirit power and take away your life. After drawing out everything, it would float out from your body and wait for its suitable master."
"But unluckily, it seems that your strength is just beyond the requirement of his power. It looks like you won't have much luck today!"
Hearing Zhuge's words, the confused head of the Thousand Wind School also became extremely happy, "I knew that you wouldn't easily let others take this Imperial Sky Technique. I knew that you were cruel, but I never would have thought that you would be this cruel."
"Haha, without a few methods, I wouldn't be qualified to be a World Spiritist." Zhuge did not admit to that and instead, he was proud.
How would Chu Feng even have the heart to listen to what Zhuge said? He only felt that his Spirit power was quickly being washed away. He even reached the stage in which he was getting dried up. The pain in his brain got clearer and clearer. He was unable to endure it and it was as if he was going to lose his life.
"Ahh~" Finally, Chu Feng yelled out for the last time and limped on the ground without strength and without making any sound.
"What, he's dead? Why didn't the Imperial Sky Technique float out?" The head of the Thousand Wind School quickly asked.
Zhuge already surged his Spirit power out and observed the current Chu Feng. But, when he retracted his Spirit power, he frowned and said, "This guy. He isn't dead yet."


MGA Capitulo 63 Bizarre Main Hall
"Mm."
As he was feeling hazy, Chu Feng opened his eyes. When he recovered his consciousness, Chu Feng got extremely happy.
He discovered, within his brain, there was a lot of new information. The information was the cultivation method of the Imperial Sky Technique. But, Chu Feng was not even able to smile from the happiness in his heart because he was stunned by the scene in front him.
"What...What place is this?"
At that instant, in front of Chu Feng, it was no longer the strange room. It became a bizarre hall. A truly bizarre, main hall.
It was tall yet there was no roof. It was as if one was able to see into another world. The walls surrounding him was not wood, nor stone, nor steel. It was as shiny as a crystal and as smooth as a mirror. It was extremely beautiful.
But, at that instant, what shocked Chu Feng the most was in front of him, there was a big door on the wall that shot up straight into the sky.
The door was extremely large, even several times larger than the city gates of the Ancient City. Its appearance was very strange as well. It was just like the mouth of a demon, extending out from the wall.
On top of the big door, it was filled with thick chains. Every chain was 1 meter thick and it densely covered the entire door as if locking a scary monster within.
Spreading out his Spirit power, Chu Feng's face lost colour. Although it was sealed shut by the door, Chu Feng could still feel an extremely scary aura on the other side.
That aura was extremely cold, extremely icy, and extremely dark. It was like it was't something from this world. It was so terrifying that Chu Feng's hairs stood up straight and chills went down his spine.
"Heavens, I didn't die right? This isn't hell right?" Chu Feng had that thought because he felt that everything in front of him was not real. It was so dream-like and it was so terrifying.
"Hey! It's you! You finally came! Haha, this is great! This is great!"
But just at that time, suddenly, a happy voice rang behind Chu Feng and because of the suddenness, Chu Feng jumped up in surprise.
"What's this?" Chu Feng shivered from that and suddenly stood up. Only then did he find out that there was an egg behind him.
That was right. It was an egg, and it was a black-coloured egg. The egg was extremely big and it was not a chicken egg. It was even taller than Chu Feng and there could not be such a huge egg in the world.
"You're a ‘What's this'! Stupid Chu Feng, really stupid. What an idiot you are! You only look for me to play after so long, don't you know that I'm bored?!!"
Suddenly, the huge egg made a voice. The voice was extremely sweet and pleasant. It was like the voice of Yingying and it was also like the bells of gold and silver. It could be said that it was the most pleasant voice that Chu Feng ever heard.
"Female egg? This is an egg of a female!" Chu Feng was stunned. Since it was the voice of a girl, then it was certainly an egg of a female.
"No, you're a female egg! You're a chicken egg! Rotten egg! Bastard!" Within the huge egg came a sharp cursing voice. The huge egg even started to shake as if something was going to break out.
[TN "Bastard" has the character "egg" in it.]
*bzz* Just at that time, Chu Feng's vision became blurry. The scene all around him started to quickly swirl and when everything returned to normal, Chu Feng discovered with shock that he was laid on the ground and he had returned to the room in the tomb.
"This...So I just had a dream?" Chu Feng was very surprised. He only relaxed when he found out that the cultivation methods of the Imperial Sky Technique was still in his brain.
"This guy really didn't die. How is this possible? Did he really get the approval of the Imperial Sky Technique?" Almost at the same time that Chu Feng opened his eyes, the head of the Thousand Wind School started bawling.
"Impossible. Absolutely impossible. With his cultivation, how could he possibly refine that special technique?" Although Zhuge's expression could not be seen, from his voice, it was also able to be heard that he was very shocked at that instant.
Seeing that, Chu Feng lightly smiled and couldn't help but stand up, pat his clothes and say to the two of them, "Excuse me, I've disappointed you two. I didn't die, and I'm living quite well. As for the Imperial Sky Technique that you two want, hehe..."
"It's here!" Chu Feng pointed at his brain.
"You bastard, I'll break you." Seeing that, the head of the Thousand Wind School yelled and released the Cold Steel over him.
*rumble* Just as he let go, the Cold Steel suddenly dropped and the entire room started to shake.
"Bastard." Facing that situation, the head of the Thousand Wind School could only put the hand in which he just released back or else the three of them would be turned into meat paste.
*bzz* Seeing that, Chu Feng did not delay and used the 1st style of the Three Thunder Styles. He quickly ran towards the entrance because in front of the two Profound realm experts, his position was really too dangerous.
If it wasn't for the Cold Steel that stopped their power, with a little movement of their fingers, he would be crushed to death by them.
"This guy is from the Azure Dragon School!" As he saw the skill that Chu Feng displayed, Zhuge's eyes instantly lit up. As a guest elder of the Azure Dragon School, with a glance, he recognized the skill that Chu Feng used.
After Chu Feng escaped the room, he quickly returned along the original road. He did not know when the two experts would free themselves, but he knew that they would undoubtedly have a way to free themselves. At least the World Spiritist would know.
Under those circumstances, the only thing he could do was run for his life. As he ran, Chu Feng saw too many corpses. The tomb of this Imperial Sky sage really did induce a huge blood battle.
A lot of people that did not have the strength paid with their lives as they had a greedy heart. Even many cultivating experts were made a fool by others. But, in this tomb robbing, the biggest winner was obviously Chu Feng.
But, just as Chu Feng thought he was already safe, he never would have guessed that the real danger just arrived.
"I finally found you boy." An angry yell came from behind. The head of the Thousand Wind School actually caught up to him.
But the current him was in quite a sorry situation. Not only was he messy, there were even some blood traces on his clothes and some cuts on his head. He was just like a crazy person. It could be seen that he paid quite a price to escape the tomb.
"Damn. I really shouldn't have directly returned to the Ancient City. I should have took a longer route."
But, the current Chu Feng had no heart to observe all that. He rotated according to the Mysterious Technique and used the 1st Thunder Style. He flung his arms, and in large strides, he really started to run for his life.
But even so, how could he be faster than the expert of the Profound realm? The huge pressure from behind flew past him like lightning. Very quickly, it pressed Chu Feng to the ground and fiercely sank him into a pile of sand.
At that instant, Chu Feng only had one thought, and it was that he was dead. That person, for the Imperial Sky Technique, harmed quite a few elders and disciples. If he was caught by him, he may get his brain opened just to see if the Imperial Sky Technique could be taken out.
"Hmm?"
But suddenly, Chu Feng felt that something was wrong. The huge pressure suddenly disappeared in the air. When he looked back, he was even more shocked. It was completely empty behind him. There was not even a shadow of a person.
"Was it an illusion?"
"No, it was absolutely not an illusion. But what happened?"
However, as Chu Feng was confused why the head of the Thousand Wind School disappeared, dozens of miles outside of the tomb, the head of the Thousand Wind School was sitting there blankly. On his face, it was filled with terror.
At that moment, he did not have the atmosphere of the head of a school. His lips uncontrollably trembled and even his body was shivering. His eyes were staring at the person in front of him.
There was a beggar in front of him. His hair was in chaos but his eyes were like the edge of a blade. On his forehead, there was a flame-like scar.


MGA Capitulo 64 – Raging Flames of the Burning Heavens
"You...Who are you?" The head of the Thousand Wind School said those words while trembling.
Looking at the middle-aged man who was like a beggar in front of him, he was really scared to a point in which he did not understand it at all. Although the beggar did not emit a single strand of aura and he looked like a normal person, just by looking at those eyes, he was terrified in his heart. The fear permeated in his bones.
Especially before. Although he did not see how he arrived at that place, he hiddenly felt that he came from the sky. Which meant that the person in front of him was an expert of the Heaven realm.
The Heaven realm. A realm that no one reached in the entire Azure Province. Only within the overlord of the Nine Provinces, the Jiang Dynasty, had such a strong character. It was undoubtedly the realm that could only be reached by the pinnacle experts of the Nine Provinces.
But from what he knew, even in the imperial court, the characters that reached the Heaven realm were old people that were similar in age as him. But in front of him, the person was clearly only middle-aged. It was extremely hard for him to accept that he arrived at the Heaven realm at that age.
"You should not attack him." The beggar-like person spoke. This voice was very steady as he emitted the atmosphere of a king that was overlooking the world.
"I should not attack who? Is...Is it that boy?"
"So...Sorry, I did not recognize him and I didn't know that he was connected with you. I hope that you can be generous and spare my life."
After all, he was the head of a school. Very quickly, he remembered that Chu Feng was quite different than the others. If Chu Feng was connected with the person in front of him and he tried to kill Chu Feng before, then the current him would really be at death's door.
"Please, spare me...spare me..."
Thinking to that point, the head of the Thousand Wind School kneeled down and continuously banged his head on the ground. He completely ignored his high position and status. When his life was in danger, he chose to give everything up and that included his dignity.
*rumble rumble rumble*
Just at that time, from afar, the thunder-like noise of footsteps resonated out. After a moment, sand sprung up everywhere. Looking over, densely gathered figures were crazily running towards the tomb. From their clothes, it was the army of the Thousand Wind School.
The Thousand Wind School and the Azure Dragon School were different. Although they were fairly close to the desert, the news of the tomb was the arranged trap by the Azure Dragon School elder, Zhuge.
So, the goal of the Azure Dragon School was already clear before even coming. The core disciples collected the treasures from different places of the tomb but no one entered the mist. The instant that they finished collecting the treasures, they retreated away.
The Thousand Wind School that did not know the truth kept on sending people after the tomb was opened. They sent a lot of people as they wanted to monopolize the treasures within the tomb. But, they never thought that they were in the trap of Zhuge so they received heavy losses.
The Thousand Wind School army that was approaching also didn't know the truth. They were the supporting troops that just arrived, but after seeing that scene, they were a bit speechless.
"Who are you that dares to harm the head of our school?"
The core elders of the Thousand Wind School recognized their own head with a glance. But, when they saw that he was kneeling on the ground while begging for forgiveness, they were furious and angry. Without even thinking they lead the army and slaughtered towards him.
Facing that scene, the head of the Thousand Wind School did not care in the slightest. He continued banging his head towards the beggar and hoped that he could gain his forgiveness. He knew that the person in front of him was not a person that was beatable with numbers.
"Even if I don't kill you, he will not forgive you. I'll send you on a journey and at least it would be better than him making a move on you."
The beggar slowly closed his eyes. Suddenly, the scar of flame on his forehead started to emit a fire-red glow. As his hair fluttered, a huge boom resounded. Within the circumference of 10 miles, it became an ocean of fire.
The ocean of fire rose into the air reaching dozens of feet tall. The surging flames were like a huge dragon at times, were like a fierce tiger at times, and it roared as it rushed around within the desert.
Almost within a flash, it swallowed the army of the Thousand Wind School. The aggressive people from before were like ants on a hot pan. They instantly lost all their abilities and started to roll their bodies in the flames while howling in pain without end.
In an instant, all sorts of cries sounded everywhere. Even the head of the Thousand Wind School had no way of resisting against such terrifying high temperature.
But, the insane beggar was not affected at all within the flames. Even his clothes were not lit and he calmly walked within the flames.
Although his clothes were not adequate, although his hair was in chaos, the aura on his body was incomparable by anyone. He was like a king and he emitted the airs of a king that looked over the world.
"I am the raging flames of the burning heavens and I can burn all living things. I am the saint of the burning heavens and I wish to unite the world. I am the holy son of the burning heavens and I am invincible..."
"Ahh~~"
Suddenly, the strong expert that had an abnormal presence flashed his eyes. Suddenly, he started to howl in so much pain like he wished to die. Both of his hands were grabbing his long hair and he started to roll over within the flames. He used his body to collide with the desert ground and the strong power even made the desert shake.
No one knew how long that lasted for before he slowly calmed himself. The flames also started to gradually vanish and the scar of flame between his eyebrows also returned to normal. Even the king-like aura before disappeared.
His eyes were no longer fierce and they were dull. His expression was extremely tense as if frightened by something. He ran and yelled while shaking left and right,
"I should die, I should die, I shouldn't have entered your territory, please forgive me, please forgive me, I don't want to die..."
"I promise that I will protect him, I will protect him without fail as long as you let me go I will do anything for you..."
Later in the day, the entire desert became a forbidden area. Although there were no more flames, the area had such a high temperature and no one could step into it. The suddenly arrived huge fire also became a shocking news and it quickly spread to the Ancient City.
"Let me go, I need to find him."
"Su Mei, calm yourself. The tomb has already become a forbidden area. Even Profound realm experts can't go near it so you have no way of entering."
"Let me go! 3 days has passed already and Chu Feng isn't back yet. Are you guys not nervous? He risked his life that time to save you all!" At the entrance of the Ancient City, Su Mei was being pulled back by Bai Tong and the others. Her face was full of anxiety and anger.
"Hey, what are you doing? Why is it so lively here?" But just at that time, a voice suddenly rang out and when everyone raising their heads to look, they rejoiced.
They saw Chu Feng standing nearby while smiling and looking at him while squinting. But, the Chu Feng at that instant was in a bit of a sorry shape and he looked just like a beggar.
"Chu Feng." But everyone would have never thought that even though Chu Feng was in such a shape, Su Mei ignored it and jumped into Chu Feng's embrace and tightly hugged him. On the corner of her eyes, there were even tears of joy.


MGA Capitulo 65 – Breaking Through with a Sky-High Price
"Where did you go? Why did you return so late..." Su Mei raised her head, pursed her lips and said with a bit of complaint.
"Mm, I was met with a little bit of trouble." Seeing the watery-eyed Su Mei, Chu Feng felt a wave of warmth in his heart. He couldn't help but spread his arms and take Su Mei's soft little waist into his arms tightly embraced the little beauty.
"Bastard." Feeling Chu Feng's restless hands and looking at Bai Tong and the others behind her, only then did Su Mei feel that her and Chu Feng's movements were a bit indecent. So, she quickly threw Chu Feng off and her little face was as red as an apple.
"Heh." Seeing the completely red Su Mei, Chu Feng licked his lips while pondering. Her feeling was quite nice.
After that, Su Mei and the others did not ask Chu Feng anything. Naturally, Chu Feng would not say anything about him getting the Imperial Sky Technique, being chased by the head of the Thousand Wind School, and to avoid being caught he looped around he spent 3 whole days to return to the Ancient City.
But, Chu Feng got the news about the sudden ocean of fire in the tomb and also the heavy casualties of the Thousand Wind School. When even the location of the head of the school was unknown, Chu Feng was quite shocked.
That affair was too strange. An ocean of flames with the circumference of 10 miles appearing in the middle of the desert and it was so coincidentally at the same location of the tomb.Also when the ocean of fire dissipated, there was still the extremely high temperature that was unpassable by even Profound realm experts. It became a forbidden area and it was truly a bit scary.
About that, some people said it was the trap laid by the Imperial Sky sage so that people who dared to enter his tomb and dared to disturb his rest would be buried along with him.
But even more people felt that even if it was the Imperial Sky sage, he could not have such methods when he was alive. How could he create such a trap after he died? There must have been some other reason and some people even felt that it was a disaster from the heavens.
But no matter what people guessed, Chu Feng knew that if the head of the Thousand Wind School disappeared just like that and was buried within the ocean of fire, the Thousand Wind School could very well be dropped to a 3rd-rate school and no longer be able to struggle against the Azure Dragon School.
On that day, Chu Feng and the others hurried back to the Azure Dragon School. In a few days, the day of the core disciple exam would arrive. Originally, Bai Tong and Su Mei were definitely going to join. But, this time, they knew that there was going to be an extra person from the Wings Alliance and that would be Chu Feng.
"Huu, 600 Spiritual Beads. I wonder which point I can break through to."
After returning back to the Azure Dragon School, Chu Feng impatiently opened his Cosmos Sack and took out the 600 Spiritual Beads. Looking at the golden and dazzling Spiritual Beads, his heart was quite satisfactory.
600 Spiritual Beads. The current Chu Feng could certainly be counted as a real rich person. As for how rich, it was probably equivalent to the entire Chu family property. And the so-called entire family property, naturally, it included the Chu family's industries as well.
*gulp*
Chu Feng grabbed a handful of Spiritual Beads and threw it into his mouth. To him that had the Divine Lightning, he was not worried in the slightest that he would be unable to digest the Spiritual Beads. He was only worried that it would not be enough.
As Chu Feng predicted, when the Spiritual Beads entered his body, almost instantly, they were attracted and refined by the Divine Lightning. The boundless spiritual energy rushed into his dantian and it felt a bit full. But, that feeling only lasted for a split moment. As for why it disappeared, of course, it was because all of the spiritual energy was eaten by the Divine Lightning.
One handful contained 50 Spiritual Beads. According to his estimations, 50 Spiritual Beads were more than enough to break through into the 7th level of the Spirit realm. After all, from the 5th level to the 6th, he did not even use 4 Spiritual Beads. But, Chu Feng still clearly underestimated the greedy Divine Lightning.
After the 50 Spiritual Beads entered his body, the spiritual energy within Chu Feng's dantian did indeed fill up several times. But, there was no feeling of breaking through.
"I do not believe that I cannot feed you full!" Chu Feng grabbed another handful of Spiritual Beads, coincidentally also being 50, and when it entered his stomach, the long awaited change finally arrived at Chu Feng's dantian.
The 9 Lightning Beasts made eye-piercing roars, and although the outer world could not hear a single ripple, it constantly lingered in Chu Feng's ears. The feeling got stronger and stronger as if the 9 Lightning Beasts got closer and closer to him, and also as if they were gradually merging into one.
Broke through. Finally, he broke through. The 7th level of the Spirit realm. From aura of the changed nature of the spiritual energy, it was certainly the 7th level. But, the price for it was a full 100 Spiritual Beads. If it was any other person, it was unimaginable.
What was the Spiritual Bead? It was a top-quality spiritual medicine and many people would only be willing to use it when they reached the peak of the 9th level of the Spirit realm. They would use it to gain a strong amount of spiritual energy and break through into the Origin realm.
But, for Chu Feng to go from the 6th level of the Spirit realm to the 7th, he used 100 beads. If that got spread out, it would even scare a person to death. Using 100 Spiritual Beads just to breakthrough one layer. It was too wasteful.
Of course, Chu Feng's 7th level was not comparable to the normal person's 7th level. Especially after cultivating in the Mysterious Technique, even if he faced an expert of the 9th level of the Spirit realm, he would not have any trace of fear. He even didn't put them in his eyes.
Unless the opponent was the same as him, also having an overpowering ability, there would be no one able to fight against Chu Feng within the Spirit realm. The people worthy of attacking him could only be in the Origin realm. But that power was even more shocking.
"Ahh, if this goes on, how can I even feed you?" Chu Feng had a face of helplessness on. He looked at the 500 Spiritual Beads in front of him and did not continue refining it. Instead, he put them away in his Cosmos Sack.
He knew that the demands of the godly lighting would get more and more terrifying. Perhaps even if it consumed the 500 Spiritual Beads, at most his dantian would be half full and he would be unable to breakthrough.
If that was so, he had no need to refine it. Why not keep the Spiritual Beads for the future? After all, he did not want to borrow money from other people when he needed it. As a man, that was not something good.
"Knock knock, Chu Feng...Are you here?" Just at that time, suddenly, Chu Yue's voice came from outside of the residence.
Hearing that, Chu Feng immediately ran over and opened the door. Indeed, he saw that Chu Yue was standing in front of the door and Chu Xue was also behind her.
"Chu Feng, you've finally returned. Speak honestly. Where did you go in the past few days?" Seeing Chu Feng, Chu Yue felt that it was unexpected at first but then she became extremely happy.
"I didn't go anywhere, I just did some random missions." Chu Feng smiled and said half-heartedly.
"Missions? Just missions? I've heard that you went out with the 1 beauty in the inner court, Su Mei." A hint of spoiled smile was on the corner of Chu Yue's mouth.
"Ehh..." When Chu Yue said that, Chu Feng was a bit speechless and didn't know how to explain it at that moment.
"Haha, okay, I won't tease you anymore. Actually, this time, we were just passing by. Since you're here, come with us and join in the liveliness."
"Liveliness? What liveliness?"
"Chu Feng, have you heard of the Cultivation Formation? "


MGA Capitulo 66 – Cultivation Formation
"Cultivation Formation, the place that core disciples cultivate martial skills?"
Of course, Chu Feng had heard of the Cultivation Formation before. It was a cultivation treatment that only core disciples of the Azure Dragon School could enjoy. After entering it, pressure would increase by several times. But, no matter if it was cultivating martial skills or training the body and soul, a better effect would be gained.
"That's right. Right now, the Cultivation Formation is no longer only enjoyed by core disciples. The inner court disciples can as well. Today, the Cultivation Formation officially opens so we want to go to the Martial Skill Building to check it out and experience it." Chu Yue smiled and said.
"So there was something like that." Chu Feng hidden rejoiced. He had the Imperial Sky Technique and he was fretting on where to cultivate it. But, he never would have thought that at this time, the Cultivation Formation would be opened to inner court disciples. It was just like it was prepared for him!
The three of them walked together towards the Martial Skill Building. On the road, Chu Feng used his Spirit power and he discovered that Chu Yue was still stuck at the 4th level of the Spirit realm. She was still unable to break through into the 5th level.
"Chu Yue, you still haven't broke through?" Chu Feng asked.
"Yeah, for some reason, I seem to be unable to break through. Perhaps my perception is not too great." On that topic, Chu Yue's face was a bit ugly.
"Chu Yue, refine these and you will certainly be able to break through." Chu Feng stuck his hand into the Cosmos Sack and took out two Spiritual Beads.
"This...This is..." Seeing the Spiritual Beads in Chu Feng's hands, Chu Yue and Chu Xue both widened their mouths and their eyes revealed surprise.
Although it was the first time that they saw it, from the spiritual energy that rushed towards them, they guessed that it was likely the top-quality medicine, the Spiritual Bead.
"These are Spiritual Beads. After swallowing, it gets converted into spiritual energy and it maximizes absorption." Chu Feng held Chu Yue's little hands and put the Spiritual Beads within them.
"Chu Feng, this is too precious. I can't take it."
"You're only at the 6th level of the Spirit realm today so it still has uses for you. You should still keep it to yourself."
Chu Yue's first reaction was to refuse it. She knew the price of Spiritual Beads. Naturally, she did not feel comfortable accepting such precious items, and it was even two beads.
"If I give it to you, you should take it. I still have more and if you don't take it then it means you look down on me." Chu Feng forcefully stuffed the two Spiritual Beads into Chu Yue's waist purse.
"Chu Feng, this..."
Chu Yue didn't know what to do, but deep within her heart, she really wanted to accept it. Spiritual Beads! It would absolutely help her break through to the 5th level of the Spirit realm. There would even be a large amount of spiritual energy residue left in her body. It was way too helpful towards her cultivation. Not only that, there were even two beads.
If it wasn't for Chu Feng, she would really not know when she could enjoy the use of such things. At least her father never even used a Spiritual Bead in his life.
"You could pay me back in the future if you wish." Chu Feng was afraid that Chu Yue would have a burden in her heart so he started a joke.
"Mm." The Chu Yue who was usually lively nodded extremely seriously.
Facing Chu Yue like that, Chu Feng was a bit helpless. But, it was understandable because if other people gave him things that were too precious, he would have burdens in his heart as well.
But just at that time, Chu Feng discovered that Chu Xue's face was a bit off. The girl was pursing her lips and her big eyes were restlessly flickering. That expression was called admiration with one word, high admiration with two words, very extreme admiration with three words... Anyway, it could be said that she was broken by admiration towards Chu Yue.
"Chu Xue, it has been so many years. As your elder brother, I haven't really given you much, so take this Spiritual Bead as your first present from your brother." Chu Feng took out another Spiritual Bead and gave it to Chu Xue.
"This..."
"Enough of this and that, I give it to you so take it or else you would be looking down on me."
"Chu Feng, thank you."
Chu Xue happily took the Spiritual Bead as if she was crazy and a smile opened on her white face. After lovingly holding it for a while, she took out a handkerchief and covered it before carefully putting it in her waist purse.
"Chu Feng, your sack seems pretty special, is it..." Just at that time, Chu Yue suddenly discovered that the thing on Chu Feng's waist was a bit special.
"Ha, this is the Cosmos Sack given to me by Su Mei." Chu Feng chuckled and walked in front.
As for Chu Yue and Chu Xue, they were blankly staring while standing where they were. Surprise was filled on their faces, and looking at the young man in front of them, they started to have the same feelings.
It was that they felt that the distance between them and Chu Feng became farther and farther apart. Although Chu Feng treated them better and better, their position and status were no longer on the same level and it was as if they were people from two different worlds.
The three of them chatted and laughed along the road and they quickly arrived at the Martial Skill Building. Only then did they find out that it was already overcrowded outside of the building. There were layers after layers of people surrounding the building.
Chu Feng lead the way and pushed aside the crowd with Chu Yue and Chu Xue. That stirred up a lot of grumbles, but when they turned around and saw the Wings Alliance badge on Chu Feng's chest, no one dared to even say half a word of complaint and they even took the initiative to make way for Chu Feng.
After passing through the walls of people, Chu Feng finally knew what they were observing.
At the entrance of the Martial Skill Building, there was an extra tall stone stage. On top of the stone stage was an elder, and behind the elder was a strange house.
The house was very special yet strange. It was entirely dark green like a jade, but the strange thing was that it could block Chu Feng's Spirit power. So, that would certainly be the so-called Cultivation Formation.
After hearing the discussions from the people around him, Chu Feng understood it a bit more. There was only one Cultivation Formation and every time only one person could be in there. If they wanted to cultivate within the formation, they must pay a Saint Spirit Grass.
Because of such an expensive price, there was not a single person that was willing to go within the many people in the observing crowd.
After all, for many people, one Saint Spirit Grass was already a huge price. There was pretty much no one that was willing to give it for a chance to cultivate. But, to Chu Feng, it couldn't be any better.
"Move, move." But just as Chu Feng walked near the stage, yells came from the crowd behind him.
Turning his head to look, he saw a group of people entering. It was the people from the Sword Alliance and Jian Chen who had past conflicts with Chu Feng was also within them. But, the person that attracted Chu Feng's gaze the most was the large young person next to Jian Chen.
That person had an extremely similar appearance to Jian Chen. But, the aura on his body already reached the 9th level of the Spirit realm. Strength like that wasn't even reached by many core disciples.
When he saw people looking at him with fear and respect, Chu Feng didn't even need to think to know who he was. Without a doubt, he was Jian Chen's elder brother, the master of the Sword Alliance, Jian Fengyi.
"It's you!" Just at that time, Jian Chen also recognized Chu Feng.
"You know him?" Jian Fengyi tilted his head and asked.
"Brother, he's the person that attacked me that day." Jian Chen started to angrily bellow.
"Oh?" Hearing those words, Jian Fengyi cast his gaze again towards Chu Feng. But, at that moment, there was already dense killing intent with in his gaze.


MGA Capitulo 67 – Supporter
*whoosh* Suddenly, Jian Fengyi's body flashed and he disappeared like a ghost.
When he reappeared, he already arrived in front of Chu Feng. A strong punch constantly got bigger in front of Chu Feng's eyes. He did not care where he was and he directly attacked.
But, he underestimated Chu Feng. He thought that his punch would hit and defeat Chu Feng, but he did not know that his punch was powerless in Chu Feng's eyes.
The corner of Chu Feng's mouth slightly curved up. He stepped forward, his shoulders slightly shook, his right arm suddenly extended and he punched out as well.
The two fists collided in the air. The fast speed and strong power even rustled the air as if burning the air.
"Stop."
But just as the two fists were going to collide, a body suddenly appeared in front of the two people and two strong palms tightly grasped Chu Feng and Jian Fengyi's wrist, forcefully stopping the two attacks.
"Origin realm?" The power from the wrist lit up Chu Feng's eyes. He raised his head and looked. It was the Martial Skill Building elder on the stage before.
But, at that moment, the elder was also looking at Chu Feng. Within his eyes, there was a bit of astonishment.
From the two fists, he could obviously feel that Chu Feng's power was stronger than Jian Fengyi's. Yet, Chu Feng only had the aura of the 7th level of the Spirit realm whereas Jian Fengyi had the aura of the 9th level.
"What is happening? Why do I feel fluctuations in spiritual energy?"
Just at that time, an aged voice came from the direction of the Martial Skill Building. An old man with black hair walked out and it seemed like it was another elder from the Martial Skill Building. His position seemed to be higher than the middle-aged elder in front of him.
"Elder Wang, these two disciples were going to exchange blows here." Seeing that, the middle-aged elder went up to report.
"Oh?" The elder looked at Jian Fengyi at first, then strictly scolded Chu Feng, "Why did you attack here? Do you not know where this place is? Do you even have the rules of the school in your eyes?"
"Elder, did you not see that he attacked me first? I was only defending. Was that wrong in any way?" Chu Feng felt aggrieved.
Hearing those words, Elder Wang also frowned. He never would have thought a disciple dared to talk to him in such a manner. But even so, he still looked at Jian Fengyi and asked with an extremely gentle tone, "Fengyi, did you attack first?"
"I..." At that instant, Jian Fengyi was at a loss of words. He was indeed in the wrong. After all, countless pairs of eyes saw the scene just now.
"Okay, just pay attention next time. As a representative character within the inner court disciples, remember to pay attention to your influences okay?"
"I understand."
"Mm, you never come to the Martial Skill Building. What are you here for today?"
"Elder Wang, I came here today to have a feel for the mysteriousness of this Cultivation Formation."
"You're going to become a core disciple in a few days yet you still want to have a feel here. But it won't have any harm. Since you came, go ahead." Elder Wang smiled and waved his hand.
"Thank you elder." Jian Fengyi did not delay and took out a Saint Spirit Grass from his Cosmos Sack. He respectfully gave it to the middle-aged elder and walked towards the stage.
However, when he walked next to Chu Feng, he said in a voice that only Chu Feng could hear,
"Boy, can't you tell that I have supporters in this inner court?"
"Also, don't think that you'll be safe and sound after joining the Wings Alliance. Since you dared to attack my brother, even the heavens can't protect you." After saying those words, Jian Fengyi waved his big sleeve, stepped forward in huge strides and climbed up the tall stage.
At that instant, Chu Feng's face turned a bit ugly. He said with dissatisfaction towards Elder Wang, "I clearly arrived here before him. Why did you let him go first?"
"The so-called ‘The able takes priority'. Jian Fengyi is one of the outstanding disciples of the inner court. Naturally, he has priority in the cultivating resources within the inner court."
The elder said that unhurriedly but traces of anger were jumping in his eyes. Obviously, being contradicted by Chu Feng again, he felt displeased.
"How do you know I'm not more outstanding than him?" Chu Feng did not let the topic go.
"Haha, you're more outstanding? A mere disciple of the 7th level dares to call himself outstanding? How arrogant. How did such a disciple appear in the Azure Dragon School?" Elder Wang's tone became more and more icy.
"Whether I am outstanding or not cannot be judged by you. At the end, you are only an inner court elder. You have no right to judge a person's qualifications." Chu Feng saw that the elder had connections with Jian Fengyi so his attitude also became more rude.
"What an arrogant boy. You dare to talk to me like that?" Elder Wang grinded his teeth and said.
"As an elder, you treat things unjustly. How are you qualified for my respect?" Chu Feng disdainfully curled his lips.
"Impudent. If I don't teach you a lesson today, you would really think none of the all laws of the world apply to you." Finally, the elder could not take anymore of Chu Feng's arguments. He waved his big sleeve and a strong palm headed towards Chu Feng.
"3rd level of the Origin realm?" At that instant, Chu Feng couldn't help but be shocked. He never would have thought that the elder would have the cultivation of the 3rd level. If it was the 1st level of the Origin realm, Chu Feng could still face it. But if it was the 3rd level, Chu Feng would not have much luck.
*bang*
"Ahh"
But just as Chu Feng thought disaster was going to strike, the Elder Wang yelled in surprised and backed away a few steps. It was as if he felt a huge blow, and when he stabled his steps, his face became abnormally pale.
"Elder Wang, it doesn't seem to be too appropriate to attack disciples like that right?"
At that instant, people noticed that there was a white-haired elder that appeared next to Chu Feng. Chu Feng also recognized that person. It was the person that registered for him, an elder of the Martial Skill Building, Elder Ouyang.
But he also would not have thought that the elder's strength would be that strong. Not to mention that he arrived next to him completely silently, he didn't even feel the strike just now. But, he knew that the aura of the old man was extremely thick. It was far above Elder Wang's.
"Milord Manager, we pay our respects!" Seeing elder Ouyang, Elder Wang and the middle-aged elder greatly changed their expressions and immediately became respectful.
"Manager? He's the manager of the Martial Skill Building?" Chu Feng suddenly understood and looked at the old man next to him with a bit of shock.
"How did this boy get to know elder Ouyang?" At that instant, Jian Fengyi who was already on the stage also frowned.
From his family, he had some connections with Elder Wang. That was why he could step onto the stage. But he never would have thought that Chu Feng would know the manager of the Martial Skill Building.
It seemed that the relationship between the two was quite good or why else would Ouyang personally come out for Chu Feng? At that instant, Jian Fengyi felt that the situation was not heading towards a good direction.
"I won't look too much into what just happened. However, in my Martial Skill Building, there is the rule of first come first serve."
"Chu Feng, you go up. No need to pay the Saint Spirit Grass." Ouyang didn't waste any words and he waved his hand, indicating Chu Feng to go up.
"Thank you elder." Chu Feng gratefully bowed to Ouyang, and under the gazes of the crowd, he walked on the tall stage.
But, when he arrived next to Jian Fengyi, Chu Feng couldn't help but stop. He smiled and said,
"It seems that your supporter in the inner court is only so-so."
"Also, not only do I dare to attack your brother. I will even dare to attack you. You better not let me meet you again or else you'll have to face the consequences."


MGA Capitulo 68 – A Burst of Lingering Fear
"What, you have nothing to say?"
"That's right. You better quiet down for me or else I'm afraid that the next time we meet, I might accidentally hit you to death. Haha..."
Looking at the Jian Fengyi who was paled-faced and fiercely glaring yet not even daring to fart, Chu Feng laughed, elegantly walked onto the stage and entered the dark-green house.
As for Jian Fengyi, he was clenching both of his fists as they made sounds. The flames in his heart were as if they was going to explode at any moment.
As the alliance master of the Sword Alliance, he was one of the most eye-catching disciples in the inner court. When had he ever been provoked like this before? Even the alliance master of the Wings Alliance never treated him like that.
But in his eyes, he could only endure even if he got more angry. He did not dare to attack in this Martial Skill Building and he did not dare to attack in front of Ouyang. After all, even core disciples were respectful to Ouyang, say nothing of him.
"Who is that guy? He dared to speak to Jian Fengyi like that. Does he not want to live?" Looking at that scene, some people worried for Chu Feng.
"I recognize him. He's Chu Feng. A few days ago, he annihilated the Liu Alliance all by himself. He's also the person that destroyed Liu Mang's groin."
"I'll tell you this. Never, ever, offend him. Compared to Jian Fengyi, Chu Feng is way more dangerous and way more terrifying. He is not afraid of anything and when he attacks, he is extremely ruthless. He's just like a devil."
But some people recognized Chu Feng. Especially to those who personally saw Chu Feng destroy the Liu Alliance, when they thought of the scene that day, they shivered even though it was not cold. Deep within their hearts, a shadow of fear was already marked by Chu Feng.
However, compared to others, the ones with the most complex expressions were Chu Yue and Chu Xue. As part of the Chu family, they deeply understood Chu Feng's past.
They were clear that the boy who was always bullied by the Chu family became an idol of every Chu family young generation. He arrived at a point in which they could only raise their heads to look as he would walk further and further away.
Just as the inner court disciples kept on discussing about Chu Feng, he already stepped into the so-called Cultivation Formation.
"What a mysterious formation. It should be the work of that World Spiritist right?"
At that moment, around Chu Feng was not the room of a simple house. It was a different world.
Under his feet was a muddy swamp above his head were black clouds and lighting all around him were howling gales and storms next to his ears were the rumbling of thunder.
Even the him that had Spirit power knew that everything was false and only an illusion, looking with the naked eye, everything was as if it was true.
The most important thing was being in that area, it did indeed make Chu Feng feel strong pressure. He didn't even need to do anything. Just by standing there, the pressure increased by several times. Perhaps the weaker people had no way of waiting here even if they didn't move, let alone cultivating any martial skills.
However, an environment like that was exactly what Chu Feng needed. He really enjoyed being in the environment that was filled with pressure. Only then could he become stronger and it would be more convenient for his cultivation.
Chu Feng slowly closed his eyes and started to organize the information about the Imperial Sky Technique in his brain.
"Rank 7 bodily martial skill, the Imperial Sky Technique. Divided into 4 big sections. For the early stage, creating wind under one's feet and running would be as fast as flying. For the middle stage, creating lightning under one's feet and running would be as fast as lightning. For the late stage, creating light under one's feet and running would be as fast as a flash. After mastering, nothing may live under one's feet but one's feet can step on the air, resist the air to walk and travel towards the horizon."
Although the descriptions were simple, just with the mark of "rank 7″ told Chu Feng that the difficulty of cultivating the bodily martial skill was extremely high. After all, in the Azure Dragon School, the best martial skills did not pass rank 5. However, the harder the difficulty of the martial skill, the more Chu Feng wanted to cultivate it.
"Elder Wang, you won't blame me for making a move on you just now right?" Within the Martial Skill Building, elder Ouyang was chatting with Elder Wang.
"No need to worry about that. It was thoughtlessness on my part so can how can I blame you?" Although Elder Wang said those words with his mouth, he did not think that in his brain.
Before the large crowd, he was forced back by Ouyang. Although he was not injured, as an elder he still felt that his face was completely gone.
"The reason why I stopped you from making things difficult for Chu Feng was because I was thinking for you. After all, we are from the same generation. I did not want to see you offend a talented person that has quite a future." Ouyang smiled and said.
"What do you mean? Does Chu Feng have some sort of background?" At that instant, Elder Wang finally understood that something was off.
"He doesn't have a background, but he quite impressive by himself."
"Himself? Chu Feng is just another boy who has hair. I don't see which part of him is outstanding."
"Ahh, he has the Spirit power so is that not enough?"
"What? He..."
Hearing those words, Elder Wang's face couldn't help but change. He finally knew why elder Ouyang helped Chu Feng.
"Thank you for stopping me today, or else I was going to follow in Liyi's footsteps."
At that moment, Elder Wang had a burst of lingering fear. Both of his hands were even trembling a bit. After a while he got himself together and kept on thanking Ouyang.
He remembered something a few years ago. An inner court elder had some conflicts with an inner court disciple and that inner court elder was called Liyi.
Normally, the inner court disciples were still young, so it was not like there were none who did things rashly like Chu Feng. So, there were still quite a few conflicts between them and the elders.
But, after all, disciples were disciples. If they offended an elder, most of the time they had it coming. That disciple received quite a bit of Elder Liyi's beatings, and at that time, everyone felt that the disciple was dead. After all, he was still young and it was nothing good when he offended an elder that had high power in the inner court.
But, only until the disciple shocked everyone by becoming a core disciple in a short period of time, people discovered that the disciple was a rare cultivating genius.
The thing that made people even more shocked was that one year after the disciple became an inner court disciple, when Liyi was on his road home, he was decapitated by someone and died under the martial skills of the Azure Dragon School.
Although the murderer was still not found today, in reality, many people could have guessed who that murderer was. It was the disciple that had conflicts with Liyi. His name was Leng Wuzui and currently one of the strongest within the core disciples but the only person to have the Spirit power.
"Hoho, I won't hide it from you. According to my observations, the current Chu Feng is a lot stronger than the Leng Wuzui before. In the future, he would certainly have big achievements. But the most important thing is that he is ruthless enough." Ouyang smiled and said.
After hearing those words, Elder Wang's face which just turned to a better colour instantly became pale again without a single trace of blood. He couldn't say anything at the moment and deeply thought.
"Okay, the things has passed and I'm sure he won't create any troubles for you in the future. But, I can't say that for Jian Fengyi." Ouyang lightly smiled, walked towards the window, looked downwards at the Cultivation Formation and said,
"This Cultivation Formation is a good thing for training one's mind and body. It has extremely strict requirements for physical strength and perseverance and I wonder how long Chu Feng can go on with this."
"From what I know, the best result from the core disciples seems to be 6 hours. Chu Feng's current strength is a bit too weak so I'm guessing 1 hour would be his limit and even that would be fairly good." Seeing that, Elder Wang took a guess.
"Mm." After some consideration, Ouyang did not refute it. He even felt that with Chu Feng strength, it could be called a miracle to pass 1 hour. After all, within the Spirit realm, no one could stay in the Cultivation Formation for over an hour.


MGA Capitulo 69 – Creating Legends Again
The Azure Dragon School core zone was the area in which the core elders and the core disciples lived in.
That place was the forbidden area for inner court elders and disciples. But, there was a forbidden area that even forbidden core elders and core disciples.
It was a large palace. Although it was huge, it was not luxurious. Rather, it had the airs of ancientness and even some mysteriousness.
That place was the living quarters for the only World Spiritist of the Azure Dragon School, the guest elder, Zhuge Liuyun.
In the main hall, Zhuge Liuyun was sitting on an old stone stool. He still had the white cloak that was full of symbols and it still covered his entire body. The only thing remaining was his pair of deep eyes.
In front of him, a male was half-kneeled on the ground. It was a core disciple. He was under 20 years old but his body emitted calmness and experience that did not belong to that age. That person was the only person within the core disciples that had the Spirit power, Leng Wuzui.
"Wuzui, how many years have you been following me for?" The deep voice came from Zhuge's white cloak.
"Up to today, it has been exactly 3 years." Leng Wuzui respectfully replied.
"So much time has passed without even one knowing. Time really does pass fast. You've served me in these years and your performance is decently satisfactory. Today, I will give you the last mission. As long as you finish it beautifully, I will officially accept you as my disciple and pass the Spirit Formation Technique down to you."
"Master, what mission is it? Even if I go through hot water or walk on fire, I will not refuse it." Knowing that Zhuge was going to officially accept him as his disciple, Leng Wuzui was incomparably happy.
"Find a person for me." Zhuge said.
"Which person do you want to find?" Leng Wuzui asked.
"A young man around 15 years old but can use the 3rd style of the Three Thunder Styles. He is the same as you as he also has the Spirit power. He has also seen me once but I don't know what his name is nor do I know if he really is a disciple of our Azure Dragon School."
"A young man who has Spirit power and also can use the 3rd style of the Three Thunder Styles?" At that instant, Leng Wezui's face changed slightly and he couldn't help but say, "Without a doubt, there is no one like that within the core disciples."
"That's why I want you to go and find him. No matter if he is an inner court disciple or not an Azure Dragon School disciple, find him for me."
"As long as you find him, you can officially become my disciple. I trust that this won't be too hard for you."
"In the journey in the tomb, I exchanged a few blows with the head of the Thousand Wind School and I suffered some injuries. From now on, I will close myself behind doors for a while. I hope when I come out you would have already found that young man."
"I will do my best."
"Leave."
"As you wish." After respectfully replying, Leng Wuzui walked out of the palace. But, at that instant, his face was a bit ugly and even slightly cold.
"Junior Leng, what did Elder Zhuge need you for?"
"Yeah junior Leng. Is it another mission?"
Outside of the palace, two core disciples walked over. One was male, one was female. The male was called Gao Le and the female was called Liu Bing. Although they were older than Leng Wuzui and entered the inner court earlier, they were two of Leng Wuzui's trusted aides.
"Go to the inner court and check if there's a young man that cultivated the 3rd style of the Three Thunder Styles. If you find him, secretly eliminate him. Do not let anyone know that he was killed by you. Not even Zhuge Liuyun can know." Leng Wuzui coldly said.
"We will do that right now." Gao Le and Liu Bing did not hesitate. After responding, they quickly left.
Leng Wuzui turned his head and looked at the palace that Zhuge was in. His slightly narrowed eyes were emitting a cold gaze,
"Old guy, I've sold my life to you for 3 whole years yet you want to accept another person as your disciple. Since you're treating me so heartlessly, don't blame me for being unrighteous. Don't even think of taking others as your disciple."
No one in the inner court knew about what happened in the core zone. But, the amount of people that gathered outside of the Martial Skill Building got more and more. They were all attracted to the dark-green house on top of the tall stage.
Especially the elders of the Martial Skill Building. All of them had tight faces and they didn't move their gaze away from the Cultivation Formation. It was because Chu Feng had entered the Cultivation Formation for a whole 6 hours.
"Manager, nothing happened to Chu Feng right? It has been 6 hours, and even if it was you..." Some elders started to worry about Chu Feng.
"No. If Chu Feng fainted because of lack of strength in the Cultivation Formation, the formation would instantly stop working. But currently, the Cultivation Formation is still in progress and the power is even stronger than before. This means that Chu Feng is still enduring so at least nothing happened to him." Ouyang shook his head, but surprise flickered within his gaze.
6 hours. Even if it was him, with his current cultivation, he could only last for 6 hours in the Cultivation Formation at most. After all, it was the Cultivation Formation laid by Zhuge who was barely weaker than the head of the school.
However, Chu Feng, with the cultivation of the 7th level endured for 6 hours in the Cultivation Formation. It exceeded the limits of the core disciples and he was still persisting with it. That really made Ouyang feel admiration.
After 8 hours in the Cultivation Formation, the admiration turned into shock.
When Chu Feng left the Cultivation Formation by choice, everyone saw that Chu Feng was extremely relaxed. He even had an extremely happy smile on his face and it even made people suspect whether he really was in the Cultivation Formation for 8 hours.
They suspected if the Cultivation Formation really had unendurable pressure like the legends. Because of that, after Chu Feng came out, someone firmly walked into the Cultivation Formation and wanted to investigate to the end.
But the attempt by that person let people know that the Cultivation Formation was absolutely as it was rumoured to be. The disciple that went in only stayed in for a short while before losing consciousness and he was carried out by an elder of the Martial Skill Building.
"Heavens, that means that Chu Feng really stayed in the Cultivation Formation for 8 hours and he was not affected at all?"
"That's too scary. Is he still human? It seems that a monster appeared in the inner court."
Seeing the disciple that had white foam coming out of his mouth and showing the whites of his eyes while being carried by the elder, everyone endlessly yelled in surprise. Of course, they were not yelling for that disciple, they were yelling for Chu Feng who walked out earlier.
After that, without a doubt, Chu Feng created another legend in the inner court. But, Chu Feng did not mind things like that. The reason why he was happy was because he mastered the early stage of the Imperial Sky Technique.
Although it was only the early stage, the wind-like speed satisfied Chu Feng. At least, with the Imperial Sky Technique, if he couldn't win against Origin realm experts he could at least safely escape. It was his trump card in running for his life.
Time passed and within a blink, the day of the core disciple exam arrived. The night before the exam, Su Mei that disappeared for a few days came to his door.


MGA Capitulo 70 – Jealousy
On the sky, the round moon was hung up high. On the ground, there was a male and a female.
On the stone path in the dark and quiet night, Chu Feng and Su Mei were walking shoulder-to-shoulder. Borrowing the bright moonlight, Chu Feng would occasionally and secretly peek at Su Mei who was next to him. He couldn't help but hiddenly sigh. That girl was quite pretty.
Her long and thin eyebrows, water-like eyes, tall and beautiful nose, pink and soft lips, perfect curve of the convex in front of her chest, and in addition, her snow-like white skin. It really made people's heart bump loudly. Even if it was said that she was a descended fairy, it would be correct.
As he was absorbed into looking, Chu Feng couldn't endure it and opened his arms. He extended his dirty hand towards Su Mei. So, a painful cry rang out again.
"Ah~~~"
"Damn it girl. Isn't it just a hug? No need to bite so fiercely..." Chu Feng looked at the two perfect rows of little teeth marks on his hand and painfully grimaced.
Luckily, he had thick and rough skin and he could be compared to steel tendons and iron bones. Or else, Su Mei's bite really would have bit off a big chunk of his meat. It could be seen that she really dared to do that.
"Who let you do that? Damn scoundrel." Su Mei fiercely glared at Chu Feng then said, "I hear that you stayed in the Cultivation Formation for 8 hours. Was that true?"
"Mm. What about it?"
"You really are a monster. Don't you know that in the Cultivation Formation, even core disciples could only stay there for 6 hours? You've already become a freak in the inner court right now."
"Is that so? It just means those guys are garbage right?"
Chu Feng was not boasting. If it wasn't because he felt that he already mastered the early stage of the Imperial Sky Technique and decided to waste no more time, he would have no problems staying for a few more hours in the Cultivation Formation.
"It's not that they're garbage, it's just that you're too abnormal." Su Mei curled her lips then squinted her eyes and giggled, "In a while, you're going to meet all of the Wings Alliance members. Are you nervous?"
"What's there to be nervous about?" Chu Feng denied that.
He originally thought that Su Mei had some good things for him since she looked for him at such a late time, but he didn't know that it was for the meeting of the Wings Alliance members. As for why, naturally, it was for tomorrow's core disciple exam.
Including Chu Feng, there were only 33 members in the Wings Alliance. But, in this year's core disciple exam, there were at least 12 people joining. Those 12 people could be said to be the strongest within the Wings Alliance.
It meant that the Wings Alliance in the inner court was going to have quite some changes. Not only did they need to choose a new alliance master, they also needed to plan for the exam.
For this core disciple exam, not only did the Wings Alliance wait for a long time, the Sword Alliance and the World Alliance also waited for a long time. The exam was not as simple as it seemed on the surface. It would very likely be a battle between the top inner court disciples.
"I already know that you are inhuman and wouldn't be nervous because of them." Su Mei sweetly smiled and revealed some admiration within her eyes.
Accompanied by Su Mei, Chu Feng arrived at a residence. It was where the alliance master of the Wings Alliance lived in and also the gathering location of the Wings Alliance. Before his eyes, all of the members of the Wings Alliance were already in the residence.
As he entered the residence, Chu Feng felt countless gazes focusing on him and looking around his body. Some had surprise, some were strange, and some also contained disdain and suspicion.
But, what Chu Feng first felt was the strong aura of those people. The Wings Alliance were indeed worthy of being called the alliance of geniuses. So it turned out that the Dragon and Tiger brothers were only at the bottom within the Wings Alliance.
Within the bodies of the 31 people, Chu Feng found some familiar faces. For example, Bai Long, Bai Hu, Ye Taozi, Zhang Tingzi, Bai Tong and the others. Chu Feng had seen those people before.
"This is Chu Feng right? I am the alliance master of the Wings Alliance, Situ Yu." A handsome male walked towards Chu Feng. He was the one that lead all the Wings Alliance members.
Situ Yu's age was similar to Jian Fengyi's age, even his cultivation was at the 9th level of the Spirit realm as well. But, his aura was a bit thicker than Jian Fengyi's. However, although he seemed polite on the surface, Chu Feng could feel that he was not as kind as he seemed.
"Hey! My brother is speaking to you. Did you not hear it?" As Chu Feng was staring blankly, a black-faced young man who was behind Situ Yu rushed forward.
The age of the young man was close to Chu Feng's. Even if he was older he would be no older than 2 years. With the cultivation of the 8th level of the Spirit realm at that age, it was not bad.
But his current attitude was extremely nasty. He pointed at Chu Feng and bellowed while his nose was blowing and his eyes glaring. Looking how he was, it really seemed like he wanted to beat Chu Feng up.
"Little Liang."
Seeing that, Situ Yu pulled the black-faced young man back. After that, he apologetically said to Chu Feng, "This is my brother Situ Liang. His character is a bit violent but he's not a bad person in his heart. I do hope that you don't mind that."
"Don't worry, I, Chu Feng, am always very graceful." Chu Feng waved his hand without caring.
"You..." Situ Liang grinded his teeth from Chu Feng's actions that were full of contempt. Smoke was even going to rise from his nose, but before he lashed out, he was stopped by Situ Yu.
After that, Situ Yu introduced all the members of the Wings Alliance to Chu Feng. Although they were quite polite on the surface, Chu Feng could feel that those people obviously disliked him.
Most of the people who disliked Chu Feng were male. As for the reason, it was not hard for him to guess them. It was certainly because he was very close with Su Mei recently. After all, the gazes of the males that looked at Su Mei were not right.
But other than the male members, the female members were quite friendly towards Chu Feng. However, Chu Feng did not know that the reason why they were friendly towards him was because Chu Feng's got more and more famous within the inner court. After all, females would have indescribable favourable impressions towards more outstanding males.
"Since all the members are here, let's get into business. Everyone, please sit." After some short chatting, Situ Yu spoke seriously.
At that instant, all of the Wings Alliance members sat. But, Chu Feng suddenly discovered a problem. In the 33 chairs in the hall, 31 of them were already sat on. There were 2 remaining positions.
One of the spots was at the top, close to Situ Yu. At that instant, Su Mei was being led to that spot by the brothers, Situ Yu and Situ Liang.
The last spot was at the end. Logically, it wasn't anything important. After all, it was just a seat.
But, Chu Feng found out that the positioning of the seats had reason for them. The ones that sat at the top were strong people, the ones at the end were the less strong people such as the Dragon and Tiger brothers. Which meant that the Wings Alliance took him as useless firewood.
"Chu Feng, sit here." Just at that time, the young female next to the end of the seat spoke.
The female was quite nice looking. On her white face, there was a pair of fox-like eyes. Her long hair scattered along her shoulders and she could be counted to be a first-class beauty. Her chest was especially impressive. The purple robe was bulging out and it was as if it was going to puff out.
The most important thing was that the big-chested beauty was currently winking at Chu Feng. It was obvious that she was trying to seduce Chu Feng.
Speaking of it, Chu Feng was still a male. Although he was honest, it did not mean that he would refuse the seduction of females. So, he did not think too much about that. He lightly smiled and sat on the spot at the end.
"Chu Feng, I've heard that you were quite fierce, previously completely stepping over the Liu Alliance." After Chu Feng sat down, the big-chested beauty actually grabbed Chu Feng's arm and the two round balls of softness fiercely pressed upon it.
"Waa." That was Chu Feng's current voice in his heart. Being pressed by those two round balls of softness, Chu Feng only had one word to describe that feeling. Comfortable! That was the true big-chestedness! The ones from Su Mei hadn't been developed as much yet and obviously they could not be compared to hers.
"You, stand up." Just at that time, a fierce yell rang next to him.
Raising their heads to look, Chu Feng and the big-chested female, even everyone in the hall were stunned.
They saw Su Mei with one hand on her little waist and the other hand pointing at the big-chested beauty beside Chu Feng. Her little mouth was curled up and her eyes were glaring. There was visible jealousy hung on her sweet little face.


MGA Capitulo 71 – Quiet Down
"Little Mei, you..." The big-chested beauty seemed to be afraid of Su Mei and she didn't know what to do at that moment.
"I'm telling you to stand up!" Su Mei aggressively bellowed.
That voice scared that big-chested beauty and her little face instantly paled. She quickly stood to the side and didn't even dare to speak.
"Hmph."
Su Mei coldly snorted and angrily shot Chu Feng a glance before sitting where the big-chested female sat before. She pointed at the spot next to Situ Yu and said, "Sit there."
"Mm."
The big-chested beauty did not dare to be slow and she lowered her head while she quickly walked next to Situ Yu. Without even raising her head, she gloomily sat down.
That scene widened everyone's eyes and mouths. They were all taken aback on what happened. To anyone who had eyes, they could tell that Su Mei was jealous.
Jealous of who? Jealous of Chu Feng! Countless people seeked Su Mei yet no one got their hands on the 1 beauty in the inner court. Yet, she was jealous of Chu Feng. That was an absolutely shocking thing.
But carefully thinking about it, it was not that sudden. After all, the two of them walked very closely together recently and there were even rumours about Su Mei secretly being in love with Chu Feng.
But even so, it was still impossible for everyone to accept that. On the other hand, Bai Tong and the others were quite relieved because they had personally seen more violent actions by Su Mei before.
However, compared to Bai Tong and the others, Situ Yu's face was a bit unnatural. Although he was trying his best to conceal it, he still revealed some irritation. He was jealous as well.
"You're quite fierce and there was no need to treat her like that right?" Chu Feng chuckled and said.
"I do what I want and what can you do about it?" Su Mei fiercely glared at Chu Feng before turning her head and ignoring Chu Feng.
After that little storm, the so-called meeting also officially started. First, the people that were going to participate in the core disciple exam were announced. There were 12 people, including Chu Feng, Su Mei, and Situ Yu.
The other 9 people had the cultivation of the 8th level and it was not hard to pass the core disciple exam with that cultivation. So, it was basically confirmed that 12 members were going to leave the Wings Alliance.
However, facing that situation, Situ Yu had preparations done already. It was that his brother was not going to participate in this year's core disciple exam, so Situ Liang was going to stay within the inner court. He was going to succeed as the alliance master of the Wings Alliance.
There was one other thing. Situ Yu suggested that after becoming core disciples, the Wings Alliance would be preserved and he didn't want everyone going their own ways.
Situ Yu sent his thoughts to the former Wings Alliance members but current core disciples that he wanted them to lead the Wings Alliance and to create a new land within the core disciples. But, he was refused.
So, there was a serious problem in front of their eyes. They wanted to recreate the Wings Alliance in the land of core disciples with their group. With the recreation of the Wings Alliance, there was a need to choose a new alliance master and that was the current discussion.
"Situ Yu, is there even any need for discussion? Since the former seniors are unwilling to lead us, the seat of the alliance master would naturally be sat by you."
"That's right. Within the Wings Alliance today, who other than you has the ability to take that spot?" The various members all recommended Situ Yu to continue being the alliance master.
"Ahh, everyone here are the dragon within men and I'm sure no one is willing to live under someone else's charity. So, it's better to be a bit more fair. Everyone. There's no need to keep on choosing me and you can speak your real thoughts."
Situ Yu faked evasion but anyone could tell that he was still very happy. Happy that everyone chose him to continue being the alliance master.
Seeing Situ Yu, Chu Feng gave him an evaluation of one word. "Hypocrite". Thus, he didn't bother listening what they said and he currently focused his attention on Su Mei.
She hadn't talked to Chu Feng in quite a while. Her hands were supporting her chin with her head tilted upwards. No one knew where she was looking, but it was certain that she did not pay attention on what Situ Yu and the others were saying.
"Oi, are you angry?" Chu Feng went over and asked while chuckling.
"Who's angry? Angry at who? Who's worth it for me to be angry on?" Su Mei resentfully shot Chu Feng a glance.
"If you're not angry what you are doing?" Chu Feng said suspiciously.
"I'm seriously listening to Situ Yu's words." Su Mei grumbled.
"That's fine. Could you say what Situ Yu just said?" Chu Feng laughed a bit.
"He said..." Su Mei was a bit at a loss. She was not listening so how could she know what Situ Yu was saying?
When she turned her head and looked at Chu Feng face that was brimming with a spoiled smile, she knew that she got tricked by Chu Feng. She angrily bit her lips and she really wanted to go and bite Chu Feng.
"Okay, don't be angry. How about I tell you a story?" Chu Feng said amusingly.
"What story? If you want you can tell it." Su Mei curled her lips but still put on a look of listening respectfully.
"Three little white rabbits picked a mushroom."
"The two big ones told the small one to get some wild vegetables to eat."
"The little one said, ‘I'm not going. If I go, you two will eat my mushroom.'"
"The two said, ‘We won't. So don't worry and go' So the little rabbit went~~~"
"But after a long while, the little white rabbit didn't return. After some discussion, the two of them decided that there was no need to wait and they were going to eat the mushroom."
"But just at that time, the little white rabbit suddenly jumped out from the nearby bushes and angrily said, ‘See, I knew that you two were going to eat my mushroom!'"
"Hahaha, so the little white rabbit never left that place?"
"What do you think?"
"Haha, he didn't. That's too cute and pretty funny..."
Su Mei laughed from Chu Feng's story and the beautiful laugh was very pleasant to listen to. But, the time in which it rang out was obviously not the right time and it already attracted everyone's attention.
"Here, I'll tell you another." Seeing that Su Mei finally smiled, Chu Feng also got enthusiastic. He showed his arms by pulling up his sleeves and he prepared to show his skill again.
The actions of the two displeased Situ Yu. Seeing that the one he liked was laughing in front of someone else yet not caring what he said, he was quite stuffed with panic.
*bang* Just at that time, Situ Liang suddenly slammed the table, stepped up, pointed at Chu Feng and said,
"My brother is speaking right now so quiet down!"
Hearing those words, Chu Feng's expression did not change. He slowly stood up and calmly walked in front of Situ Liang.
Suddenly, Chu Feng waved his hand, and with a bang, a clear slap fiercely landed on Situ Liang's face.
The strong strength directly flipped Situ Liang to the ground. He opened his mouth and along a mouthful of blood, three front teeth came out as well.
That scene completely scared the crowd there. Chu Feng directly hit a person and the person he hit was the future alliance master of the Wings Alliance and also Situ Yu's younger brother. His nerves were a bit too big.
Chu Feng did not care in the slightest while facing the shocked gazes of the crowd. He pointed at Situ Liang who was on the ground and fiercely said,
"You quiet down when I'm talking!"


MGA Capitulo 72 – Oppressive Situ Yu
"I'll kill you."
Situ Liang looked at the bloodstain and the three front teeth on the ground and he was enraged. Instantly, he grasped onto insanity and exploded his strength of the 8th level of the Spirit realm. The aura engulfed like a hurricane as he rushed towards Chu Feng.
Just as Situ Liang rushed in front of Chu Feng and prepared to attack him, Chu Feng raised his leg and kicked him and he flew through the air.
That time, the strength that Chu Feng used was obviously stronger than before. The large power shattered the chair next to Situ Liang and after flying a few meters through the air, he fiercely crashed on the wall.
"This guy is extremely strong."
At that instant, many Wings Alliance members who only saw Chu Feng for the first time were all shocked. Clearly, he was only at the 7th level of the Spirit realm yet he completely crushed Situ Liang who was at the 8th level of the Spirit realm. That power deterred the crowd.
Some people that wanted to attack Chu Feng just now blew away that thought. Especially when they heard certain rumours about Chu Feng recently, for the first time, they recognized that he might be a character that was very troubling.
"Chu Feng, you went too far. The Wings Alliance members are like a family. What is the meaning of treating Situ Liang like this?" Situ Yu angrily said.
Seeing his younger brother being humiliated in front of everyone, raging flames were already lit in his heart. If it wasn't for his own status, he would have attacked Chu Feng already.
"Family? Did he see me as a family? Do you see me as a family?"
"Let me tell you this. Don't try to play these tricks in front of me. Don't think that we're a family just because you said you are. Whoever I, Chu Feng, want to hit, I will hit regardless who they are."Chu Feng coldly said.
"Who you want to hit you hit? I will see how much skill you have today being that arrogant." As he talked, Situ Yu wanted to attack and Chu Feng also wanted to give it a try.
"Stop."
Just at that time, Su Mei strictly yelled, walked in front of them then said, "What are you guys doing? Infighting? Tomorrow is the day of the exam yet you are fighting here. Do you want to go to tomorrow's exam in injuries?"
"Little Mei, you saw everything before. It's not that I want to attack him, it's just that he's..." Situ Yu wanted to explain.
"I saw it all. Situ Liang was in the wrong just now." The thing that was completely unexpected was Su Mei leaning towards Chu Feng with no hesitation. It was even so direct.
Hearing Su Mei's words, Situ Yu was as if he heard the sound of his heart shattering. Finally, he could not control himself. He didn't say anymore to Su Mei and he pointed at Chu Feng then said,
"Chu Feng, as a man, don't stand behind a woman. Don't you like to fight? Today, I'll keep you accompanied to the end."
"That's fine. You think I would be scared of you?" Chu Feng grabbed Su Mei's wrist and pulled her behind him.
"You two stop."
Seeing that, Su Mei was a bit angry but no matter what, she could not throw Chu Feng's hands off. When a wave of spiritual energy entered her body, it relaxed Su Mei's body.
"Chu Feng, you..." Feeling the pressure engulfing her entire body, Su Mei was endlessly shocked. It was because the pressure simply did not belong to the Spirit realm. It was comparable to experts of the Origin realm.
"Little Mei, don't worry. As the alliance master of the Wings Alliance, I look over the general situation with most importance. Today, exchanging blows with Chu Feng, I will not use any martial skills." Situ Yu vowed solemnly.
"Oh? You're going easy on me?" Chu Feng disdainfully smiled.
"It's not that I'm going easy on you. It's just that I don't want to injure you. After all, you are the person that was recommended by Elder Su Rou and elder Ouyang. Even if I go easy, it's only giving face to Elder Su Rou and elder Ouyang." Situ Yu said.
"Quite a tone you have there. I would really want to see who's going easy on who."
*whoosh*
Chu Feng didn't speak anymore rubbish and went straight to attacking. With an extremely fast speed, he arrived in front of Situ Yu within a blink of an eye. Quickly spinning his body, a beautiful whip-like leg lashed out.
"Hmph."
Facing Chu Feng's approaching attack, Situ Yu only coldly snorted and didn't even put Chu Feng's attack in his eyes.
He slightly raised his right arm and planned to easily block Chu Feng's attack. However, he paid a painful price.
*bang*
When the strike landed, it was as if Situ Yu's right arm took the force of three hundred thousand catties. At the same time in which the pain was sent from his arm, a huge force was bringing him up.
Seeing that, he hurriedly operated the Mysterious Technique but it was too late. The strong force made his entire body fly in the air.
But, after all, Situ Yu was an expert of the 9th level of the Spirit realm and known as the strongest disciple in the inner court. Naturally, he had some methods. His body revolved in mid-air and a beautiful flip canceled the force on his body as he stably landed on the ground.
"Take this."
But just as he raised his head, Chu Feng was already in front of him. At that time, a huge fist was approaching his face.
*puu*
Everything happened too fast and Situ Yu had no way of dodging it. He felt a fiery pain on his face and his entire body flew away once again. That time, he ferociously crashed on the ground, and after rolling two times he stabilized himself.
"Lords, Chu Feng actually..."
Chu Feng's speed was too fast. His attacks were like lightning and flint and many people didn't even see what happened. When they did, they discovered that Situ Yu was like a watermelon as he rolled to the side. When he stood back up, his face was slightly swelled and it seemed that he took quite a bit.
"Why did this happen? How is his speed and strength exceeding mine? He is clearly only at the 7th level of the Spirit realm. Is he truly a monster?"
Situ Yu was endlessly shocked and he really underestimated Chu Feng. He never would have thought that Chu Feng would have such strong power. So strong that when they fought purely with physical strength, he had no way of even matching two rounds with Chu Feng.
"Alliance master of the Wings Alliance. You are merely so." Chu Feng clapped his hands and hiddenly laughed in his heart. Situ Yu was simply looking to die if they were fighting based on physical strength.
"Chu Feng, cultivation requires savageness. The reason why you won over me is because I didn't use any martial skills."
"If I used the martial skills, with your current cultivation, you would have no chance of beating me." Situ Yu bitterly said.
He was beaten, and being beaten so badly in front of his members and in front of the one he liked really made him impossible to accept that. So, he had to get back some face.
Also, he knew that Chu Feng only entered the inner court for a short while. So, he thought that Chu Feng was only strong in his physical body. If he used martial skills, he could completely pressure Chu Feng.
"Oh, since you said that, I would like to experience the you that uses martial skills and see what's so impressive about it." Chu Feng waved his hands towards Situ Yu, indicating him to go over and try.


MGA Capitulo 73 – Reminder
"I'll satisfy you."
Seeing that, Situ Yu did not speak anymore and with a bellow, the entire hall couldn't help but shake. A boundless aura surged out from his body, and at that instant, his body had a materialistic change.
His arms and legs instantly thickened to twice its size and it almost bursted the purple robe on his body. Looking past the clothes, his chunks of healthy muscles could be clearly seen.
As for the colour of his skin, he became golden. Even his hair became golden. Both of his eyes became red and his breathing also became rough with power.
The current Situ Yu did not look like the warm and refined alliance master of the Wings Alliance. He was simply a golden beast. Especially, the aura that was emitted from his body had the deterrent feeling of Fierce Beasts.
"Rank 4 strengthening skill, Transformation of the Golden Lion!"
"I never would have thought that the alliance master cultivated the Transformation of the Golden Lion to this stage. It seems like Chu Feng would lose without a doubt this time."
"That's right. The Transformation of the Golden Lion is a rank 4 strengthening martial skill. After cultivating to the stage that the alliance master has, neither sword nor spear can harm him and neither water nor fire can invade him. It's just like an indestructible body. It wouldn't matter how much stronger Chu Feng's physical body is, he would absolutely not be able to harm the alliance master in the slightest. He will only get beaten up."
Seeing Situ Yu's change, some male Wings Alliance members felt that Chu Feng was certainly going to be defeated. They couldn't help but feel refreshed because they really did not like Chu Feng's aggressiveness and arrogance. But the more important thing was that they didn't like how Chu Feng and Su Mei were that close.
As for the female members, they felt the strong areas of Chu Feng and they sighed in admiration towards his strength. But, when Situ Yu displayed that skill, they also felt that Chu Feng would not have much luck.
Only Su Mei, Bai Tong, the Dragon and Tiger brothers, and the others remained silent. They knew that Chu Feng had an even stronger skill.
"Chu Feng, I can let you go if you admit defeat now. Or else, if I attack in this state, I cannot guarantee that I won't harm you."
Situ Yu spoke and at that instant, his voice was thick and powerful like the roar of a Fierce Beast. It was no longer the voice of a human and more or less, it was a bit scary.
"Since you're that confident, hurry up and come. I would really like to see how you would harm me." Chu Feng smiled without caring much.
"Since you want to be injured that much, I'll grant you wish. After all, I don't want to disappoint you."
Situ Yu moved. Every step he took, the ground in which his feet landed on would crack. He madly rushed and jumped, shaking the entire hall and it was like an earthquake.
Looking at Situ Yu who was getting closer and closer, Chu Feng smiled strangely and used the 1st thunder style. He broke open the door and ran out.
"Hmph. You want to run, but can you?"
Seeing that escaping Chu Feng, Situ Yu even thought that Chu Feng was afraid of him. He arrogantly laughed and chased after him. As for Su Mei and the others, they quickly followed and rushed out closely.
But just as they stepped out of the residence, everyone couldn't help but be at a loss. Chu Feng did not escape. Instead, he was standing in a wide area outside of the residence, extended both of his hands and did a disdainful gesture towards Situ Yu.
"You're looking to die." Situ Yu bellowed and he was like a rank 9 Fierce Beast. Emitting the terrifying aura, he rushed towards Chu Feng once again.
*bzz*
But just at that time, with a thought from Chu Feng, both of his eyes had traces of lightning. Following that, some "pili pala" sounds could be heard and it started to endlessly exploded from his body. His entire body was enveloped by the white lightning and it was as if he became a man of lightning.
*rumble rumble*
After that, Chu Feng raised his arm up high and the lighting on his body shot out from all directions. The destructive power even shattered the slabs under his feet into dust. Several deep holes kept on appearing around Chu Feng.
"This...This scary aura, what is this? How can he display such a terrifying martial skill?"
At that instant, everyone endlessly cried in surprise. It was the first time that they saw such a frightening skill. No matter if it was from the might or from the aura, it completely exceeded Situ Yu's Transformation of the Golden Lion.
*whoosh* Just at that instant, Chu Feng slightly stretched his finger forward. A ray of lightning explosively shot out and almost at the same time that people reacted to that, the lighting already landed on Situ Yu's chest.
*bang*
"Ahh~~~~"
A painful cry rang out and Situ Yu got blasted dozens of meters back. When his body landed, he returned to normal but his face was filled with pain.
Almost at the same time, the lightning on Chu Feng's body instantly disappeared. Other than the holes on the ground, there was not a single trace left. It was as if the lightning on his body never appeared.
"Chu Feng, are you crazy? You used such a skill towards my brother! Do you want to kill him?"
At that instant, Situ Liang got extremely frightened. As he loudly cursed, he ran towards Situ Yu and there were even tears on the corners of his eyes.
The might that Chu Feng exploded out before was really too terrifying. At least, within the Spirit realm, he had never seen anything as strong as that. Being hit by such an overwhelming skill, he was very worried that Situ Yu got killed by Chu Feng's strike.
"Little Liang, I'm fine."
But just at that time, Situ Yu slowly stood up. He looked at his chest first, then after that, he helplessly sighed and clasped his hand together while saying in a shameful tone,
"Chu Feng, thank you for holding back. My skill cannot match yours. I lose!"
"Huu~"
With Situ Yu's words, everyone couldn't help but take in a breath of cool air. They could hear the meanings behind his words. It was clear that Chu Feng held back or else Situ Yu would not be so healthy at that moment.
"No need to be polite. I spared your little life because I'm giving Su Mei face."
"Little Mei, let's go. I'll accompany you back." Chu Feng waved towards Su Mei then shook his sleeve and left. Su Mei also quickly went over and the Wings Alliance were left behind...
Looking at the backs of the two people, the faces of the Wings Alliance members were filled with complicated expressions. Their emotions couldn't help but roll back and forth. Today, Chu Feng really left them a deep impression.
They finally understood why Su Rou and Ouyang both recommended Chu Feng to be invited to the Wings Alliance. They also finally knew why Chu Feng acted so arrogantly. It was because he had that qualification and he was even more monstrous than the rumours.
Before, they all felt that they were cultivating geniuses. But after today, they knew in front of Chu Feng, they did not deserve to be called that.
"Chu Feng, you can't go on like this." Outside of Su Mei's residence, she said seriously.
"What do you mean?" Chu Feng was a bit confused.


MGA Capitulo 74 – Examination
"Even if you have the Spirit power, you can't cultivate like this. Do you not know in the journey of cultivating, it emphasizes the cycle of gradual progress? If you're breaking through so quickly, it will cause difficulties for your success in the future."
"If I wanted to, with my family's wealth, it was completely possible for me to break into the 9th level of the Spirit realm when I was 12 years old. Do you know why I'm only at the 8th level of the Spirit realm at the age of 14?"
"That's because by using cultivation resources to breakthrough, it breaks the rules of martial cultivation. At the same time that it brings power, it also burden's the body and it will lower one's comprehension in the future."
"Even if you can become an expert of the 9th level in a short amount of time, what the future brings is the predicament of never being able to break through into the Origin realm. Do you understand what I'm saying?" Su Mei's mood was a bit emotional, but it could be seen that she really was worried for Chu Feng.
Seeing Su Mei like that, Chu Feng was secretly happy yet his heart ached. Naturally, he knew that the road of martial cultivation required gradual progress and one could not seek instant benefits. However, that only applied to normal people, and obviously, Chu Feng could not be seen as a normal person.
Chu Feng understood his body the most. His body was not burdened because of his quick improvement. Instead, it got stronger and stronger.
But, he could not say the truth to Su Mei because he did not know how to explain his body. He could not say that not only did he have the Spirit power, he even had a special body and he was hiding a lump of Divine Lightning in his dantian right?
Chu Feng would not easily tell anyone that secret. If he could, he would hide it for his entire life.
"I understand and I'll pay attention." Not knowing how to explain, Chu Feng could only smile and say briefly.
"Do your best then. I don't wish that you destroy your good future because of some short-term benefits." Seeing that smiling Chu Feng, Su Mei was a bit angry and she turned around then entered her own residence.
Looking at Su Mei's back, Chu Feng felt a wave of warmth in his heart. He had to say that he was blessed to have a girl that cared for him that much.
Morning on the next day. The sky just started to get bright and Chu Feng already risen from his bed. Today was the day of the core disciple exam.
The core disciples. The important targets of development of the Azure Dragon School and also the main force of the Azure Dragon School. Their position compared to the inner court disciples was like the sky and the earth.
First of all, the core disciples got to enjoy the best cultivating resources of the Azure Dragon School. Second of all, their families received the protection of the Azure Dragon School. To those who dared to touch the families of the Azure Dragon School core disciples, it meant that they were going against the Azure Dragon School.
Also, not all core disciples were like Zhou Zhiyuan. In reality, many core disciples were very strong and most of them stepped into the Origin realm. They were extremely talented people and some of the strength of the core disciples could be rivaled with core elders.
For example, Su Rou. If it wasn't because she choose to be an inner court elder, she would have been a core disciple. Which also meant, within the core disciples, it was possible that there were people as strong as Su Rou.
So, compared to the inner court, the core zone was the place where Chu Feng wanted to go the most. There were more challenges there and he enjoyed that kind of life. It was a kind of life that forced him to become strong.
The location of the core disciple exam was also a huge underground palace. But, the size of the underground palace was a lot larger than the one in the inner court disciple exam. The mechanisms within were a lot more dangerous as well.
The most important thing was that not a single dust of the mechanisms in the inner court disciple exam changed. On the other hand, the core disciple exam mechanisms changed almost every year. There were hundreds of tricks and no one knew what the mechanisms this year would be like.
Of course, as long as you have absolute power, you could pass even if there were harder mechanisms.
At that instant, the 12 Wings Alliance members entered the huge underground palace.
"Oh! This time, the Wings Alliance is moving in quite a big scale. There are so many people participating."
"There are only 12 people. How can this be counted as a big scale?"
"There are only 33 members in the Wings Alliance. This time, it could be said that they are using almost half of their members. Is that not a big scale?"
"That's true. Hahaha..."
When Chu Feng and the other Wings Alliance members entered the main underground palace hall, they heard mocking voices.
Focusing their gazes, from nearby, there were two groups of people. One group was the Sword Alliance and the other was the World Alliance.
Chu Feng saw the Sword Alliance members and they sent 30 people out this time. Other than Jian Fengyi, the only person in the 9th level of the Spirit realm, there were 3 people in the 8th level and the rest were only in the 7th level.
The World Alliance also had 30 people. One of them was in the 9th level, two were in the 8th level and the rest were in the 7th.
The person that had the strength of the 9th level, the young man who was mocking the Wings Alliance with Jian Fengyi, was obviously the alliance master of the World Alliance.
"Why are the World Alliance together with the Sword Alliance?" Seeing the harmonious World Alliance and Sword Alliance, some of the Wings Alliance members felt that something was off.
"No need to worry about them. This core disciple exam is different than the inner court disciple exam. What it relies on is personal strength."
"Look at those entrances. They are not connected and every person could only enter one of them. Which means the stages inside are completed by a single person."
"But, I have to remind you guys that after walking out of the underground palace, it does not mean that the exam is passed. After walking out, we will enter a flower garden."
"The flower garden contains many spiritual medicines and it counts as the reward for passing the underground palace. As for how many one can get will depend on your own power."
"The most important thing is that the exam has a limit of 4 hours. Which also means after entering the underground palace, we must walk out of the flower garden within 4 hours or else you would fail the exam."
Situ Yu did not care about the people from the World Alliance or the Sword Alliance. He was explaining the important points of the core disciple exam to Chu Feng and the others.
Although the Wings Alliance did not have the numbers advantage over the World Alliance or the Sword Alliance, on the topic of strength, the Wings Alliance had absolute superiority. Especially when they had a monster like Chu Feng, they did not need to worry about anything.
So, they were not afraid of the Sword Alliance and the World Alliance. They were only worried if they could become core disciples or not.
If they failed the exam, they would return to the inner court to continue cultivation. To the Wings Alliance, that was a type of humiliation and they were determined to not let that happen.
"Chu Feng, I hear my sister say that the flower garden was created by the founder of the Azure Dragon School so that's why it's called the Azure Dragon Flower Garden."
"Within the Azure Dragon Flower Garden, there's a type of flower called the 7-Coloured Flower. The 7-Coloured Flower has 7 types of colours and it's extremely beautiful. But, they are very rarely seen and they're a lot more precious than spiritual medicine. Not every person has a chance to see it, but, I really want to have a look." As Su Mei spoke to Chu Feng, her eyes were filled with yearning.
"Don't worry, I'll certainly let you see them." Chu Feng smiled and said.
"Don't speak nonsense. The Azure Dragon Flower Garden is extremely big and the 7-Coloured Flower are extremely rare. They are not that easily found and you can only depend on luck." Su Mei did not believe Chu Feng's words.
Chu Feng only lightly smiled and did not explain anything. On the other hand, while he passed by Jian Fengyi, he suddenly stopped and said to him, "Don't let me see you in the Azure Dragon Flower Garden or else I will beat you up so badly that even your mother won't be able to recognize you."
After speaking those words, without even giving a chance for Jian Fengyi to refute, he quickly walked away with Su Mei as he terribly angered Jian Fengyi.


MGA Capitulo 75 – A Similar Genius
"Jian Fengyi, who's that guy that dared to speak to you like that?" Looking at Chu Feng's back which was free and easy, the alliance master of the World Alliance was full of shock.
He basically recognized all the experts of the Wings Alliance but he never even seen Chu Feng before. Also, the only person that would dare to speak to Jian Fengyi like that could only be Situ Yu. So, Chu Feng's actions shocked him quite a bit.
"A brat that doesn't want to live. I will let him pay the price." Jian Fengyi's tone was extremely dark and cold. It could be seen that he really hated Chu Feng down to the bone.
"Haha, of course. This time, no one from the Wings Alliance should even think of passing this exam. After we get to the Azure Dragon Flower Garden, you can teach that boy a lesson however you wish."
"Oh, not Su Mei though. I'll take care of her. Although I can't do much to her, grabbing onto chances, I can still take tiny advantages..."
The alliance master of the World Alliance shamelessly laughed, then he went next to Jian Fengyi's ears and quietly asked, "Jian Fengyi, are you sure that the mechanism decoding map is correct? It better not be wrong and harm my group of brothers."
"Don't worry, it is absolutely correct. As long as you follow the methods of the mechanism map, I guarantee that all of them will safely pass the stage."
"You just need to remind them to quickly pass it. This time, we have to completely surround the Wings Alliance members in the Azure Dragon Flower Garden. Not a single one of them can pass the exam." Jian Fengyi said with confidence.
"Of course. The people from the Wings Alliance think that their geniuses and this time, we'll make them lose all their faces. I can die from excitement just by thinking of the reactions when the news of the Wings Alliance members' exam failure gets spread throughout the inner court." The alliance master of the World Alliance happily laughed loudly.
"Hmph. Geniuses? They're just idiots that believe themselves to be infallible. All the Wings Alliance members that were so arrogant in the inner court, when they got to the core zone, weren't they just all defeated by that person?" Jian Fengyi disdainfully said.
"You're saying the 1 disciple in our Azure Dragon School, Gong Luyun?"
"Who else other than him!"
"That's correct. Gong Luyun is way too powerful. I hear that he's going to enter the Profound realm soon. I wonder if it's true or false!" Mentioning Gong Luyun, admiration surged onto the face of the alliance master of the World Alliance.
"Yeah, I hear that he's the genius that appeared after Zhang Tianyi. He's only 20 years old today, and if he really enters the Profound realm, he would have unlimited achievements in the future. The position of the head of school could only belong to him." Jian Fengyi also endlessly admired him.
"Sorry for the wait." Just at that time, a warm and clear voice rang out. Su Rou led a group of elders and solemnly went on the stage.
When Su Rou appeared, the people from all 3 powers couldn't help but quiet down. They knew Su Rou's appearance was as beautiful like a fox and she was also extremely gentle to others, but her methods were feared by many people. At least within the inner court, no one dared to offend her.
After Su Rou appeared, she explained the exam rules in detail. They were pretty much exactly the same as what Situ Yu said. After explaining the rules, several entrances slowly opened and Chu Feng and the others rushed into them instantly.
"Hehe, was this made just for me to test the Imperial Sky Technique?"
At that instant, Chu Feng looked at the mechanisms. They were iron blades sticking out and there were only a few safe areas that could be landed on. His heart was filled with joy.
*huu~*
Suddenly, strong wind was revolving under his feet. The tip of his toes lightly tapped and with a bang, his entire body was like an arrow as he ran with flying speed. He was actually stepping on the iron blades to walk. Within a blink, he entered deep into the tunnel and disappeared.
The Imperial Sky Technique, rated as a rank 7 martial skill. Who cared that Chu Feng only mastered the early stage? His speed completely exceeded everyone's imagination. If it was about the leg power, perhaps even experts of the Origin realm could not be compared with Chu Feng.
Using the speed of the Imperial Sky Technique, Chu Feng rushed through the underground palace like the wind. He didn't even decipher the mechanisms yet he passed them all.
The so-called core disciple exam was just like a child's play. After a short moment, Chu Feng already stepped outside of the underground palace and the scene displayed in front of him was the so-called Azure Dragon Flower Garden.
The emerald green grass was under his feet and there were all sorts of strange flowers and weird grasses in front of him. The lively cry of birds endlessly rang next to his ear, and suddenly, a burst of light wind passed him and the fragrant smell leaped towards his nose. All around him were birdsongs and fragrant flowers. It was just like a real, otherworldly garden.
"There are quite a few spiritual medicines here. But other than the top-quality spiritual medicine, the Spiritual Bead, nothing else has too much meaning to me."
The first thing that Chu Feng did was spread out his Spirit power and felt the environment of his surroundings in detail. He discovered that the Azure Dragon Flower Garden was really big and there were indeed many spiritual medicines planted there.
But, Chu Feng did not pick them. His body moved and he went deeper into the flower garden. Other than the Spiritual Bead, he was not interested in other spiritual medicines at all. What he wanted to find was the 7-Coloured Flower.
"Elder Su Rou, why hasn't Chu Feng moved yet? Does he want to give up on this exam?" Within the observation room in the underground palace, Su Rou and some elders were gathered there.
At that place, although they were not able to see what was happening in every single tunnel, they could tell changes in the mechanisms. The exam already started, but in Chu Feng's tunnel, the mechanisms hadn't even been touched yet and that confused many people.
"Leave. Follow me and have a look."
Su Rou who had very good impressions of Chu Feng slightly frowned. She pushed the door opened and walked out. The other elders also quickly followed her.
But when they opened Chu Feng's tunnel, they were all shocked. They discovered that the mechanisms in the tunnel were completely untouched yet Chu Feng was not there.
Facing that scene, almost everyone could guess what happened. After all, when one's strength reached a certain point and grasped superb techniques, they could directly pass the underground palace without damaging the mechanisms.
But for that to happen, one had to be at least in the Origin realm. However, Chu Feng was only at the 7th level of the Spirit realm. So, seeing that situation happening on Chu Feng, of course they were endlessly astonished.
"This guy is really comparable to the him back in the days." As she was shocked, Su Rou slowly closed her eyes.
She suddenly thought of the genius many years ago. The person who created the Wings Alliance and swept the strong in the core zone. Reaching the Profound realm at the age of 16 and becoming the 1 disciple in the Azure Dragon School. The Chu Feng today was really similar to him back at that time.
In Su Rou's eyes, only people like them could be called a real genius.


MGA Capitulo 76 – Break Them, Got It
*tatata...*
A burst of light steps resonated in the tunnel. Su Mei was swaying her light and soft body and her sparkling drops of sweat were falling. She was excitedly running because the door to the Azure Dragon Flower Garden was right in front of her eyes.
After opening that door, it was equal to her passing the exam and becoming a core disciple. The most important thing were the 7-Coloured Flowers that she wanted to see the most and they were in the world behind those doors.
*creak~*
Following a deep sound, the thick and heavy door was slowly opened by Su Mei. The sunlight poured down and Su Mei couldn't help but close her eyes as she felt the warm air hitting her face.
But when she opened her eyes again and saw the scene in front of her eyes, the face that originally had a smile hung on it instantly froze. Replacing it was heavy shock.
From nearby, a person was kneeling down. His face was full of blood and he was painfully supporting his body trying to climb up. He was the alliance master of the Wings Alliance, Situ Yu.
*puu*
But before Situ Yu even stood up, a strong foot fiercely stepped onto his body. The powerful strength ferociously sank him back down. A mouthful of blood sprayed out from his mouth.
The person that stepped on Situ Yu was the alliance master of the Sword Alliance, Jian Fengyi. Beside Jian Fengyi stood another person. It was the alliance master of the World Alliance, Luowu.
"What are you doing?" Seeing that scene, Su Mei was surprised and also endlessly angry at the same time.
"Oh? Isn't this the 1 beauty in the inner court, Su Mei?" Looking at Su Mei, Luowu excitedly laughed.
"Su Mei, run! They've joined hands and they're attacking the Wings Alliance!" Seeing Su Mei, Situ Yu loudly yelled out.
"Shut up!" Before the words even fell, Jian Fengyi kicked fiercely again towards Situ Yu's stomach. He painfully curled up in a ball and he couldn't speak.
"You two bastards." Seeing that in front of her, how could Su Mei run and escape? She angrily rushed towards them.
But how could the her who was at the 8th level of the Spirit realm beat both Jian Fengyi and Luowu? Very quickly, she was suppressed by them but they did not harm her. They took out a rope made out of special materials and tied her up.
"What are you planning to do?!" Su Mei angrily bellowed. Although Situ Yu was not as close to her as Chu Feng, he was still a decent friend. Seeing Situ Yu being abused by them, she really couldn't bear to look at it.
"Hehe, no need to get agitated Su Mei. We just want your Wings Alliance members to be broken here."
"If you don't understand what I'm saying, I can clarify and tell you. Every single member of the Wings Alliance will fail this year's exam." Jian Fengyi smiled and said.
"Bastard, this is against the rules. Wait until the exam is finished. I will tell my sister and you will pay the price."
"Haha, Su Mei, you're overestimating your sister. I admit, we're afraid of her in the inner court. However, when we become core disciples, can she even do anything to us?" Luowu refuted what she said.
"Fine, that's what you said. We'll see about that." Su Mei viciously said.
"No need to scare us with your sister. We know that you also have many friends in the core zone, but since we decided to do all this, naturally, we're not afraid of you and your sister." Jian Fengyi said disdainfully.
After arriving here, the disciples that passed the mechanisms started to enter the Azure Dragon Flower Garden. But, all Wings Alliance members would receive the violent beatings of Jian Fengyi and Luowu.
After that, the 11 out of the 12 Wings Alliance members that participated in the exam all landed into the hands of the World Alliance and the Sword Alliance.
The thing that astonished Su Mei and the others were that all the members of the World Alliance and the Sword Alliance passed the underground palace. Even the members of the 7th level of the Spirit realm passed and their speed was also very shocking.
At that moment, the members from the World Alliance and the Sword Alliance were humiliating the Wings Alliance members one after the other. Almost all the members had green noses and swollen faces. They were injured everywhere on their bodies but no one yelled out. They were grinding their teeths and enduring.
"Hey, it's strange. Why hasn't that boy passed yet? He wouldn't have failed right?" Looking at the door that was not opened. Luowu was a bit disappointed.
"He better have failed or else he would be the most miserable one here." Jian Fengyi coldly snorted.
"You better release us now, kneel on the ground and bang your heads to us while begging for forgiveness. Or else when Chu Feng comes here he will not let you go."
Su Mei said very fiercely. At that instant, she was extreme enraged. Looking at her comrades being beaten up so badly, she really had the heart to kill.
"Oh, so that little guy was Chu Feng. Su Mei, you seem to have a lot of confidence in that Chu Feng. You like him do you?" Seeing that, Luowu chuckled as he walked next to Su Mei.
"Of course she does. That boy is Su Mei's lover." Jian Fengyi said on the side.
"Is that so? Su Mei, your eyes are a bit too bad. How can you like such a weak person? Rather than him, why not like me? Heh..." Luowu kneeled down and used his hand to hold Su Mei's chin.
"Leave! If you touch me I'll get my sister to kill you!"
"Really? Seeing how you are, I'm afraid even if I don't do anything to you, you'll still say bad things about me to your sister right?"
"But no need to fear. I just want to kiss you. Come here darling and let me have a taste."
Luowu licked his lips and stuck his mouth out. His donkey-like big lips started to advance towards Su Mei's white, sweet, and beautiful face.
"Die!"
But before he even touched Su Mei, an angrily yell like the thunder exploded. A wind swept past and Chu Feng appeared next to Luowu like a ghost.
*wuu* Chu Feng's hand was like a claw of an eagle as it fiercely grasped onto Luowu's neck and pressed him to the ground.
"You want to kiss right? I'll let you kiss. I'll let you damn kiss."
After pressing Luowu to the ground, Chu Feng raised his left hand, formed it into a fist and punched several times at Luowu's mouth with huge bangs. After that, Luowu had a mouthful of blood, entire mouth of shattered teeth and even a broken jaw. He opened his mouth and he was preparing to spit out blood.
"Swallow it back down."
Seeing that, Chu Feng angrily yelled and restrained Luowu's mouth with his hands. Any struggle from Luowu was helpless, so at the end, he could only swallow the mouthful of blood and teeth down his throat.
"This...This guy."
Looking at Chu Feng and Luowu, the World Alliance members and the Sword Alliance members were broken by fear. Even Jian Fengyi's expression changed greatly.
He was extremely clear what strength Luowu had. He was at the 9th level of the Spirit realm, knew a Mysterious Technique and a rank 4 martial skill. Otherwise, the two of them could not so easily defeat Situ Yu.
But such a strong Luowu was completely helpless in front of Chu Feng. What did that mean? It meant that Chu Feng's strength was far above Luowu's.
Just as they were staring blankly, Chu Feng suddenly stood up. Looking at Luowu again, he had white foam coming out from his mouth, showing the whites of his eyes as he lost consciousness.
The current Chu Feng had an icy face, cold gaze in his eyes and his entire body was emitting cold air. Just by looking at him, people would shiver and tremble even though it was not cold.
"Little Mei, how do you want to take care of these people?"
"Break them."
"Got it."


MGA Capitulo 77 – Useless Begging
With every step, Chu Feng got closer and closer to Jian Fengyi. His purple robe fluttered without any wind, the cold gaze from his eyes was threatening, his entire body was emitting a bone-piercing killing intent and he was just like a killing God.
Facing Chu Feng in that state, the people from the World Alliance and the Sword Alliance all backed away in fear. Some people even fell to the ground and they were rolling and crawling, trying to escape.
Only Jian Fengyi stood there without moving. It was not that he didn't want to run, it was that he couldn't. As the alliance master of the Sword Alliance, how could he do such a shameless action in front of his subordinates?
But, in front of him, the deterrence that Chu Feng brought really did make him feel uneasy. Especially looking at Luowu who was incomparably wretched state behind Chu Feng, he knew that he would not have much luck.
"Chu Feng, what do you want to do?" Jian Fengyi asked in panic. The "break them" from Su Mei earlier really made him shiver.
"Jian Fengyi. I told you before that I better not see you in the Azure Dragon Flower Garden or else I will beat you up so badly that even your mother won't be able to recognize you."
Chu Feng's face had a light smile as he continued getting closer to Jian Fengyi. But from Jian Fengyi's perspective, the hint of smile on Chu Feng's face was cold and heartless.
"If you want to break me, we'll have to see if you have the power."
Seeing that he had no way out, Jian Fengyi angrily bellowed. Not only did he not retreat, he even took the initiative and attacked first.
He pulled the sword behind his back and as the cold light flickered, he crazily stabbed it towards Chu Feng. Several sword shaped gases that were formed by his spiritual energy flew out and it broke through the air like a meteor and made whooshing sounds. The denseness almost completely sealed Chu Feng's path forward.
That was not a simple sword technique. It was a rank 4 skill and since the person who used it was Jian Fengyi, being born into a family of sword-users, he displayed that skill brilliantly.
"He's indeed the alliance master being able to use the Meteor Sword Technique to this stage."
Seeing the sword gases that broke through the air like meteors, the disciples of the Sword Alliance rejoiced in their hearts. At that instant, their originally terrified to the extreme hearst were as if they had seen their hope. They suddenly felt that perhaps their own alliance master could defeat Chu Feng who was like a killing God.
"Hmph."
But, when the dense sword gases brushed in front of Chu Feng, with a thought, Chu Feng's body got covered by a layer of faint lightning. When the gases touched the lightning, it was like wood colliding against an iron wall. They all instantly shattered and dissipated into the air.
"This..."
Not to mention the others, but even Jian Fengyi was hugely shocked. He already mastered the Meteor Sword Technique and even experts of the Origin realm did not dare to be careless in front of his skill or else they would be heavily injured. But, in front of his eyes, Chu Feng completely dispelled it. Even his steps were not stopping.
"I don't believe it."
Jian Fengyi became heartless, turned the tip of his sword and several sword gases flew again. But, this time, they were not all concentrated towards Chu Feng. They also aimed towards Su Mei who was behind Chu Feng.
"You're looking to die."
Seeing that, Chu Feng's sword-like eyebrows turned upside down, and with the wave of his big hand, a ray of lightning shot out. It was like a long lightning whip as it shattered all the sword gases. Chu Feng waved it again and the lightning whip fiercely lashed towards Jian Fengyi.
"Object Condensation? This guy can use a rank 5 skill?"
Jian Fengyi was shocked. Most martial skills could condense spiritual energy to an object outside of one's body, but to change spiritual energy into a substance such as lightning like how Chu Feng did and to approach the original form in terms of appearance and essence, only rank 5 martial skills could do that.
"Damn it. Who is this guy?"
At that instant, he finally knew that Chu Feng was strong. But facing the sweeping whip of lightning, how could he dare to think too much about it? He hurriedly raised the sword in his hands and used it to block Chu Feng's attack.
*clatter clatter~*
When the whip of lightning swept past, sparks could be seen and Jian Fengyi's iron sword in his hands was cut into two. At the same time, the whip fiercely lashed onto Jian Fengyi's body.
"Ah~"
That whip directly lashed onto Jian Fengyi and he flew several meters away. As he landed, people could see that on his waist, a blood wound appeared. They even saw the eerie white bones.
*bang bang bang*
But just at that time, Chu Feng still continuously lashed out with the lightning whip randomly on Jian Fengyi's body. Not only did it cause Jian Fengyi get horribly mutilated, even his arms got broken.
If it wasn't because Jian Fengyi still had some breaths, people really would suspect if he was alive or dead. But, even if he didn't die, injuries like those would require 3 – 5 years for complete recovery.
"Senior Chu Feng, we were wrong. Please forgive us."
Suddenly, all the disciples from the Sword Alliance kneeled down. Since their own alliance master got beaten up like that, they could completely imagine how they were going to end. Especially when Chu Feng's methods were ruthless and they had no doubts that he would beat them until they were dead.
"Master Chu Feng, please spare our lives. We will never be enemies with the Wings Alliance again."
Also at the same time, the World Alliance members kneeled down as well. They were also kowtowing towards Chu Feng and they were really terrified. Facing Chu Feng like that, it would be strange if they weren't.
"If begging for forgiveness and admitting your wrongs worked, all the people who wronged before could avoid the pain of punishment. Today, I just want to tell everyone here what the price is for attacking people who are close to me."
But no matter how much the crowd begged, Chu Feng's face did not have a single trace of being moved. Suddenly, his pupil shrunk and the lightning whip roared out again.
"Ah~~~~~"
At that moment, endless cries came from the Azure Dragon Flower Garden. Almost no one could endure Chu Feng's lash yet Chu Feng would whip every person at least 10 times. Even if they already lost consciousness, Chu Feng would not even be slightly merciful.
"Chu Feng, that's enough."
Finally, Su Mei spoke. Seeing the crowd of mutilated people, although she was extremely enraged before and hated them down to the bone, she could not find a single strand of anger anymore. Rather, she had a thread of sympathy.
After Su Mei spoke, Chu Feng naturally stopped. He did not have friendly relations with Situ Yu, so the reason why he treated Jian Fengyi and the others like that, other than some personal grudges with Jian Fengyi, he wanted to vent Su Mei's anger.
But, compared to Su Mei, Situ Yu and the others almost had their hearts jump out. They finally knew, on that day, Chu Feng really did hold back. Situ Yu also felt some lingering fear from Chu Feng's provocation that day because compared to Chu Feng, he was incomparable to him no matter if it was strength or methods.
"So you already passed the underground palace. Why didn't you wait for me here? Or were the spiritual medicines so important to you?"
"If you were a bit late, I would have..."
After being freed by Chu Feng, Su Mei grumbled a bit. She felt that Chu Feng most likely went and picked spiritual medicines in the Azure Dragon Flower Garden.
"Ho...Wait a bit."
Chu Feng did not refute it Su Mei's grumble. Instead, he chuckled and jumped into a distant bush. When he reappeared, Su Mei's expression instantly froze.


MGA Capitulo 78 – Talent Test
The current Chu Feng had a bright smile on his face. It was extremely warm. So warm that it could melt one's heart.
But the most eye-attracting thing was Chu Feng's right hand. Within his grasp, there were some fresh flowers. They were very pretty because the flowers had 7 petals and every petal had a different colour.
Under the illumination of the sunlight, they were extremely beautiful. It was as if they were covered by a layer of dim, 7-coloured light. There were even several butterflies surrounding them and it could be seen how fragrant the flowers were.
7-Coloured Flowers. They were extremely rare and only by chance could one see a single one. Yet, Chu Feng had a handful of the flowers within his hands.
"Of course spiritual medicines are important to me. But, these 7-Coloured Flowers are even more important because you want to see them. So, I had to pick them for you." Chu Feng lightly smiled as he placed the 7-Coloured Flowers into Su Mei's hands.
"I..." Su Mei took the flowers and didn't know what to do. She only felt that her heart beated even faster and felt sour yet warm in her heart while her eyes were getting moist.
"You won't be so touched that you need to cry right?" Seeing that, Chu Feng chuckled.
"Who's crying."
Su Mei glared at Chu Feng and really held back her tears. After that, she moved her nose close to the 7-Coloured Flowers and deeply inhaled. Feeling such fragrance in her nose, she smiled from happiness.
Her smile was extremely sweet and extremely beautiful and her smile really moved one's heartstrings. Those people who saw it were enchanted it and even Chu Feng was no exception.
But very little people knew the reason why Su Mei smiled so happily was not only because of the 7-Coloured Flowers in her hands, it was because of the person that picked the flowers for her.
"Let's go. The 4 hour time limit is approaching and we're going to fail soon." After being crazily happy, Su Mei reminded while smiling.
"But what about them? Their injuries are so heavy. If they're not healed soon they won't die right?" Some people were worried. Although they were not lightly injured, most of them were only bruises. It was simply incomparable to the members of the World Alliance and the Sword Alliance.
"Don't worry, I held back so they won't die." Chu Feng explained and said.
"Mm, no need to care about them. When the time of the exam arrives, my sister will enter the Azure Dragon Flower Garden and they will treat them."
"Also, they were at the wrong so my sister won't blame us. The more important thing is to get out of this Azure Dragon Flower Garden." Su Mei said.
"I know where the exit is. Follow me." Chu Feng smiled and lead them and it was like a walk in the park.
"This is also the first time that you've been here. How do you know where the exit is?" Su Mei followed up and she was a bit suspicious.
"I've ran through the entire Azure Dragon Flower Garden for the flowers and I can't possibly be anymore familiar to this place. Not to even mention the exit, I've also picked all of the spiritual medicines in here." Chu Feng smiled and patted his Cosmos Sack.
"You rascal."
Hearing Chu Feng's words, Su Mei was both shocked and moved. Shocked at Chu Feng's speed because of the size of the Azure Dragon Flower Garden. Even if they spent a whole day walking, they may not even walk through the entire garden. But Chu Feng already went everywhere in such a short period of time. How fast was his speed?
As for why she was moved, naturally, it was because for picking the 7-Coloured Flowers for her, he diligently went through the entire Azure Dragon Flower Garden. So, to such a pure young female like Su Mei, obviously, she being moved was greater than her shock.
Indeed, under Chu Feng's lead, they quickly reached vast palace. That was the exit of the Azure Dragon Flower Garden and the entrance to the core zone.
After entering the palace, in front of them was a huge hall. In the middle of the huge hall was a stone stage. On the stone stage was a triangular rock. The rock was 1 meter tall, and from bottom to top, it was divided into the three colours green, yellow, red and it was quite pretty.
The most important thing was that next to the rock sat 6 old people. All of them had white and gray hair with a full face of wrinkles. With a glance, one could tell that their age neared 100.
Although their ages were very high, the auras in their bodies were extremely thick. Chu Feng had no way of finding out their strength with his Spirit power and it could be seen that they were no ordinary people.
They were currently closing their eyes to rest. After hearing movement, they gradually opened their eyes. However, when they saw Chu Feng and the others, surprise surged out within their old gazes.
The injuries on Situ Yu and the others' face and body were obviously not from the mechanisms. They were clearly caused by human actions but the elders did not ask anything. After all, they had seen too many of battles between disciples.
"Those are 7-Coloured Flowers and there's so many. Did you pick all the 7-Coloured flowers in the Azure Dragon Flower Garden?" Rather, when an old lady saw the 7-Coloured Flowers within Su Mei's hands, she felt very astonished.
Su Mei only responded the old lady's question with a smile because she didn't know how to answer. She only had happiness within her heart.
"Okay, come over and test it out." Another old person spoke.
Hearing that, Chu Feng and the others did not hesitate and went up one after the other in front of the strange 3-coloured rock.
Actually, the so-called test was to test their talent value. The talent value would be publicly announced in the core zone and all core elders and core disciples would know it. In the future, the development that they gained was closely related to it.
As for the testing method, it was to imbue the middle of the 3-coloured rock with some spiritual energy. As long as the concentration of spiritual energy was enough, it would activate it and the rock would release bright light.
Green represented low-rank talent, yellow represented medium-rank talent, and red represented high-rank talent.
Most core disciples had low-rank talent. Very little people could activate the yellow coloured part and have medium-rank talent. As for the red high-rank talent, up to today, only 2 people activated it.
One was the 1 disciple that year, Zhang Tianyi. The other was today's 1 disciple, Gong Luyun.
"I'll go first."
As the alliance master of the Wings Alliance, Situ Yu went up first. He was very confident towards his own talent so he felt that there should not be many problems to activate the yellow section. After all, before Chu Feng, he was the 1 person within the inner court disciples.
When Situ Yu put his hand onto the testing stone, other people tense up, including Su Mei. After all, the test represented their future achievements and it had relation to their future.
*hmm*
Following the permeation of spiritual energy, the testing stone created fluctuations in energy. After that, the lowest part, the green section, shone a green light.


MGA Capitulo 79 – Shocking Discovery
"This..." Looking at the green light, Situ Yu was greatly disappointed. No matter what, he never would have thought with his potential, it was only low-rank talent.
Seeing that result, the elders were not happy nor were they disappointed. Their mood was very stable as someone spoke with a heavy voice, "Low-rank talent. Next."
After that, the other Wings Alliance members did the test one after the other. Although they all activated the green light, some of the light were strong, some were weak. At least, there was not a single one that was as bright as Situ Yu's.
Facing that scene, Situ Yu was hiddenly delighted. At least it meant that his talent was stronger than certain other people. Instead, the 6 elders' face sank and they were clearly started to be displeased.
"Low-rank talent. Next."
Finally, it was Su Mei's turn. After the results of the people in front of her, the current Su Mei lost all confidence. With a nervous heart, she uneasily stretched her white hand. If one looked more closely, they could even see that her hand was slightly trembling.
Also, when Su Mei went up, the 6 elders' gazes became more serious. After all, Su Mei was Su Rou's younger sister and when Su Rou became a core disciple, she was publicly recognized as a genius. So, the 6 elders had quite some expectations towards Su Mei.
*hmm* After sending a strand of spiritual energy, the yellow part emitted a dazzling light.
At that instant, Su Mei's nervous heart instantly calmed down. Replacing it was incomparable happiness and from her face, one could tell that she was extremely happy.
"Not bad, medium-rank talent and even such a strong light. It seems that your cultivation talent is slightly better than your sister's."
After the average or even bad talent before, without a doubt, Su Mei's result lit up everyone's eyes. The 6 elders repeatedly nodded and for the first time, a satisfied smile appeared on the face.
Even Situ Yu and the others sighed with admiration at Su Mei's talent. But after that, Su Mei and the others cast their gaze towards Chu Feng.
They looked forward to the young man that only joined the inner court for a short while yet came and participated in the core disciple exam. They wanted to know what kind of talent he had. Was it going to be the same as Su Mei's, or was he able to create a legend like Zhang Tianyi and Gong Luyun?
As for Chu Feng, he was full of confidence. He walked in front of the testing rock with ease and put his palm on it with strength. With a thought, a strand of spiritual energy entered it.
After the spiritual energy entered, everyone could feel that the testing rock fluctuated. But after that fluctuation, the result shocked everyone.
There was not any light. Not to mention the red or yellow part, there was even no reaction from the green part. Chu Feng's spiritual energy could not activate any light at all.
*hmm, hmm*
Facing that situation, Chu Feng frowned and imbued two more strands of spiritual energy into the rock. But, the result was the same. The three sections did not emit any light at all.
"Damn. What is this?" Chu Feng was extremely speechless. Was his talent that horrible? He couldn't even activate the weakest part of the green section?
"This..."
Not to mention Chu Feng, even Su Mei, Situ Yu and the others who had plenty of confidence towards Chu Feng were endlessly shocked. The strength that Chu Feng displayed already proved his martial cultivation talent yet how could the result be the one in front of their eyes?
"You passed the exam with this strength and talent? It seems that you used some special methods right?" The old lady before looked at Chu Feng with disdain.
"What is your meaning?" Hearing those words, Chu Feng was a bit angered as well.
"Hmph. Aren't you clear in what I mean in your heart?" The old lady coldy snorted.
"You..."
"Chu Feng!"
Chu Feng originally wanted to refute but he was stopped by Su Mei. The core elders were not comparable to inner court disciples. Even she needed to respect them and they could not be offended by Chu Feng.
Chu Feng was not a single-minded idiot and he understood Su Mei's meaning. Although he was extremely displeased in his heart, he forcefully endured it. After all, he could not even activate the testing rock and with his current cultivation, he was indeed easily suspected by others.
"Whatever, there's no use saying this to him. Strength is relied everywhere. Without a certain strength, even if he becomes a core disciple, he would only be stepped on by others and it would be difficult for him to become useful."
The gazes of the other elders were also filled with disdain as well. There was even a hint of anger. It could be seen that they felt that Chu Feng did not rely on his own strength to arrive there.
"Old Li, you should have seen the examination results just now. We'll hand these children to you."
The 6 elders stood up and prepared to leave, but before leaving they did not forget to tell Su Mei,
"Su Mei, we think highly of you. We hope that you can be as outstanding as your sister. But, when making friends, you must wipe eyes clean or else you will hold yourself back."
Looking at the leaving backs of the 6 elders, Chu Feng's anger in his heart rolled up and down. But, at the end, he still forcefully endured it because he knew he had to. It was not a reasonable action to challenge people that he could not win against.
"Chu Feng, luckily, you didn't explode there. Those people are the Six Protectors of the Azure Dragon School and all of them are experts of the Profound realm." When the 6 elders left, Su Mei quickly reminded Chu Feng.
"Hehe, my friends, congratulations on becoming a core disciple. Follow me to pick up some things." Just at that time, an aged sound came from a corner of the hall.
Only then did Chu Feng and the others notice that there was another old person there.
That person had extremely little white, fluffy hair. He was mostly bald and the wrinkles on his face were also very dense. With his camel-like back, the feeling that he gave people was like a dead person and it was even a bit scary.
But, Chu Feng did not dare to look down on the old man. He discovered that the aura of the old man was not worse in any way than the 6 elders from before. If the 6 elders were strong people of the Profound realm, the old man in front of him would very possibly be an expert of the Profound realm.
Under the lead of the old man, Chu Feng and the others switched into the blue robes of the core disciples. Every one of them received a token and also a large banner.
On the banner was the symbol of the Azure Dragon School. Only the powers with the protection of the Azure Dragon School had the banner. People called the banner as the Azure Dragon Banner.
After taking the core disciple things, Chu Feng and the others walked out of the hall. They headed towards the long awaited core zone. On the other hand, the old man that was called "Old Li" by the Six Protectors slowly walked close to the testing rock and studied it.
"Strange. Seeing the actions of that little demon in the Azure Dragon Flower Garden, he should belong to the geniuses. Why could he not even match low-rank talent?"
The old man observed with detail, seemingly trying to find a reason but he couldn't discover anything wrong. Then, when he cast his gaze towards the top of the testing rock, his eyes suddenly lit up and his face changed greatly.


MGA Capitulo 80 – Unrivaled Genius
On the top of the testing rock, it was originally red. But if one looked closely, they would discover, on the top of the red section, there would be a small black dot as big as a sesame. The strangest thing was that currently, on the small dot, it was flickering with black light.
"Did that boy activate the section in the legends?"
At that instant, the old man's eyes couldn't help but flicker and his breathing quickened. It was as if his body was going to fall apart and he also started to violently tremble.
On a complete testing rock, it originally had 4 colours. The peak was not the red colour. It was the black colour. But, the black colour was just like a legend. According to rumours, in the entire Nine Provinces, not a single person could activate it.
If it was said that the people who could activate the red part were worthy of being called a cultivating genius, the people who could activate the black section would simply be an unrivaled genius that would create legends.
Since there was no one that could activate the black section, people thought that the black section was useless and impossible to activate. Or perhaps they thought that it was simply a lie. So, gradually, 3 colours remained on the testing rock.
"Is this real? Is this truly real?"
Looking at the strange, flickering black little dot, the old man felt that was hard to believe. He couldn't help but rub his eyes. When he opened them, the light still remained but it was slowly fainting away and finally, the rock returned to its original state.
"Hu~~~"
When he discovered everything that just happened was real, the old man couldn't help but close his eyes. He calmed his current excited emotions and after a long while, he gradually opened his eyes. But, within his aged eyes, incomparable excitement already surged out.
He looked at the direction in which Chu Feng and the others left then said quietly, "It looks like the heavens want my Azure Dragon School to flourish. But, this is no small matter and it seems that time is required for decisions."
Chu Feng and the others did not know anything that happened within the hall. At that instant, they already entered the core zone. Looking at one grand palace after the other and the wide stone-paved road, they finally knew that their new journey had started.
"These are this year's core disciples right? Why are they all so badly battered?"
"Perhaps something happened. But look at the badge on their chests. They should be the members of the Wings alliance. Did the World Alliance and the Sword Alliance not participate in this year's exam?"
"That girl looks pretty good. To pass the exam at that age, more or less she's a monster. I wonder which person will conquer this monster."
Many core disciples were gathered outside of the plaza. They knew that today was the day of the core disciple exam. So, they wanted to take a look at this year's new core disciples and their appearances so they gathered at that place early.
Chu Feng judged the surrounding people, and he also discovered within the core disciples, there were really crouching tigers and hidden dragons. Although most of the surrounding crowd of dozens of people were at the Spirit realm, there were also many that entered the Origin realm.
From what he knew, there were far less core disciples in the Azure Dragon School than the outer court disciples and the inner court disciples, but there was still roughly 2000. The 2000 people were young and they already had unordinary power. No wonder they were the important targets of development by the Azure Dragon School.
The value of the 2000 people were way higher than the hundreds of thousands inner and outer court disciples. No matter if it was elders or the future head of the sect, they were chosen within the 2000 people.
"This aura..."
Suddenly, Chu Feng slightly frowned and cast his serious gaze towards a distant street. He felt an extremely strong aura from there and it was heading towards them.
Indeed, at the end of the street, a dozen or so bodies appeared. They were young and there were both males and females within them. They had quite impressive and unordinary appearances. Not only were the males handsome and the females beautiful, the auras that they possessed were not something that normal people had.
Although Chu Feng could feel that they were strong, he could not feel what strength some of the people had. Which meant that they were not only simply in the Origin realm. Very likely, they would have already entered the late stages of the Origin realm.
In front of his eyes, the one that Chu Feng was most attracted to was the young male that led the group. If it was purely on the topic of looks, he was not that outstanding compared to the people behind him. However, the aura he was emitting was far beyond them.
"Profound realm. That core disciple is already at the Profound realm?"
Chu Feng hidden sighed in admiration. Although he had no way of confirming it, the feeling of unseeable depth belonged to only Profound realm experts. So, Chu Feng felt that most likely, he entered the Profound realm.
"Gong Luyun, the 1 disciple in the Azure Dragon School." Just at that time, Su Mei spoke.
"He's Gong Luyun? No wonder..."
Hearing Su Mei's words, Chu Feng could pretty much confirm that he was in the Profound realm. After all, he had heard of Gong Luyun's name before. The 1 disciple having that strength was not unexpected.
"Not only Gong Luyun, some of the seniors of the Wings Alliance are also within the group. Do you see the person that Gong Luyun is talking to? She was one of the former heads of the Wings Alliance. She is Han Xue, 8 in the Azure Dragon Leaderboard and one of the outstanding representatives of the Wings Alliance." Su Mei pointed at cold yet beautiful female next to Gong Luyun.
"8 in the Azure Dragon Leaderboard?" Chu Feng sighed in admiration again. In the core zone, there was an Azure Dragon Leaderboard. There were 10 spots on it and the people who took the 10 spots represented the strongest 10 disciples within the 2000 Azure Dragon School core disciples.
So after knowing that Han Xue was ranked 8 in the Azure Dragon Leaderboard, Chu Feng was fairly shocked. Although she was young, to have such an achievement meant that she was not a simple person.
"Haha, it's really senior Han Xue! Is she welcoming us?" When Situ Yu and the others saw Han Xue, they were also excited.
Although they were extremely impressive in the inner court, after entering the core zone, they were only existences at the very bottom. No one there had worse potential than them. But, if they had a supporter, in the future it would naturally reduce many troubles. Han Xue was the person they wanted as a supporter.
"Senior Han Xue!"
As they were excited, someone yelled out loud. That yell did indeed attract Han Xue's attention. Even Gong Luyun cast his gaze towards them.
"Han Xue, you recognize these disciples?" Gong Luyun asked.
"Mm, they're the Wings Alliance members that just became core disciples today." Han Xue smiled and replied.
"Wings Alliance? Did you not tell them that in the core zone, creating alliances are forbidden?" Seeing the badges on the chests of Chu Feng and the others, Gong Luyun narrowed his eyes and irritation flashed into his eyes.


MGA Capitulo 81 – Humiliated
"Senior Gong, even in the future, creation of alliances are not allowed in the core zone?" Han Xue asked quietly as if afraid of Gong Luyun.
"Of course. I've said it before. As a core disciple, it's fine as long as you are loyal to the Azure Dragon School. Creation of alliances to create your own power is not allowed."
"I don't care about the inner court because those people are only random mobs and they have no use to our Azure Dragon School. But in the core zone, I, Gong Luyun, do not allow any futile attempts in creating alliances."
"Han Xue, for the sake of your face, I won't investigate those people. Go over and tell them to quickly take down the Wings Alliance badges. Also, in the future, Wings Alliance members will exist no more. They only have one status and that is to be core disciple." Gong Luyun's tone was a bit cold.
"I understand. I'll go and tell them right now." Han Xue did not dare to be slow, and after nodding she walked towards Chu Feng and the others.
"Han Xue, I've missed you." When Han Xue got close, Su Mei leaped into her embrace. Han Xue was also full of smiles and it seemed that their relationship was quite nice.
"Little Mei, are you really planning to continue the Wings Alliance in the core zone?" Han Xue smiled and asked.
"Mm, we're planning to do that. Is there something wrong?" The smart Su Mei heard the meaning behind Han Xue's words.
"If it was before, you could. But recently, senior Gong passed down an order and that was to forbid any creation of alliances or powers in the core zone. So, all the alliances in the core zone has been disbanded." Han Xue explained and said.
"Senior Gong? He's Gong Luyun?" Hearing those words, Situ Yu and the others couldn't help but cast their gazes to the nearby Gong Luyun and within their eyes, a hint of fear surged up.
"Other than him, who else has such power? So..."
"Senior Han Xue, we understand your meaning. We won't create the Wings Alliance in the core zone."
Situ Yu firmly took off the badge on his chest. Seeing that, the other Wings Alliance members also took off their badges.
On the other hand, Su Mei was frowning and she said, "Han Xue, is this issue undiscussable?"
"Little Mei, I know that your feeling with the Wings Alliance is very deep, and it's not like I don't have deep feelings as well. But, the situation in the core zone is different. In here, personal strength is what matters. The use of alliances isn't too big. In any case, senior Gong has already spoke and who dares to not follow it?" Han Xue earnestly persuaded.
"At the end, isn't Gong Luyun just a disciple? He still wouldn't go against elders so how is he qualified to speak those words?" At that time, Chu Feng spoke.
He quite understood Su Mei and he was very clear that Su Mei wanted to let the Wings Alliance continue existing in the core zone. Although he didn't know the specifics, he knew Su Mei's thoughts.
That was also why when the Wings Alliance no longer had any value to him, he still chose to stay in the Wings Alliance. It was for Su Mei.
"This is?" Hearing Chu Feng speak, Han Xue frowned and cast a strange gaze towards him.
"Ahh, I forgot the introductions. He is Chu Feng and he's the newest member of the Wings Alliance." Su Mei quickly introduced and said.
"Oh, it seems that he is still quite young and is inexperienced of the world. It's normal if he doesn't understand the seriousness of certain issues."
"Little Mei, I'll let you take care of him. Remember. The Wings Alliance must be disbanded." After saying those words, Han Xue turned around and was going to leave.
"Actually, I'm very curious how serious the so-called seriousness is." Chu Feng spoke again because the thing he could not take the most was other people threatening him.
Hearing those words, Han Xue suddenly turned her head as if wanting to say something. However, when she saw Su Mei, she suppressed it down and said,
"Little Mei, don't say that I didn't remind you. In the current core zone, no one dares to go against Gong Luyun. So, you better give the Wings Alliance up. It's also a good thing for you two."
"Han Xue, have you met with trouble?" Just at that time, Gong Luyun's voice suddenly rang out. The 1 disciple in the Azure Dragon School walked over.
At that instant, the faces of Situ Yu and the others changed greatly. Although they would have rebutted angrily in the inner court, when facing Gong Luyun, they were truly terrified.
"Senior Gong, there's no trouble. I'm just chatting a bit more with the juniors." Han Xue said half-heartedly.
"Oh? It doesn't seem that simple in my eyes." Gong Luyun lightly smiled, walked in front of Su Mei and Chu Feng then said with an absolute tone,
"I think the thing that should have been said were said by Han Xue. I'm only giving you two a choice. If you take the badges off your chest, I will act as nothing had happened."
Hearing those words, Su Mei had some hesitation but she still slowly raised her hand and prepared to take the badge off because she already clearly felt that Gong Luyun was not kind.
But just at that time, Chu Feng's grabbed Su Mei's hand then smiled and said to Gong Luyun, "Senior Gong, our Wings Alliance won't affect others. Is there an absolute need to disband it?"
*whoosh* But, who would have thought that Gong Luyun said nothing, raised his hand and slapped towards Chu Feng's face?
*swoosh* At that instant, Chu Feng was alarmed. He quickly used the Imperial Sky Technique and the wind under his feet lifted him up. He instantly disappeared and reappeared 10 meters away.
"This guy is fast." Seeing that scene, all of the core disciples were shocked. Not ordinary people were able to escape from Gong Luyun's hands.
"Hmph." Gong Luyun coldly snorted. His body went straight toward and he appeared behind Chu Feng like a ghost. His hand grabbed downward towards his back.
"Crap." At that instant, Chu Feng could feel a strong power engulfing his body and he pretty much lost the power to escape. While facing an expert of the Profound realm, he was indeed still too weak.
*bang* After grabbing onto Chu Feng's neck, Gong Luyun suddenly pressed him down. He forcefully pressed Chu Feng onto the ground and the strong power made Chu Feng fiercely sink into the rocks. Instantly, large cracks appeared in his surroundings.
"You remember this. In this core zone, no one dares to go against me. Those who do only have one ending. That's to be like you, kneeling on the ground like a dog."
"Damn it."
Chu Feng's hands were pushing towards the ground. He operated the Mysterious technique and used his entire body's strength to try and support his body back up. But the palm behind his neck was pressuring him like a huge mountain. Not to mention standing up, even breathing got harder and harder.
"Senior Gong, we'll disband the Wings Alliance. We'll disband it so please let him go!"
Seeing Chu Feng who sank within the rocks, Su Mei cried from fear. As she took the badge in front of her chest down, she ran and begged in front of Gong Luyun.
"This junior. Words of begging are useless by you. I need him to personally say that to me." As Gong Luyun spoke, he pulled Chu Feng back up from the rocks.
"Pah!" But just as Chu Feng left the rocks, he turned his head and a huge gob of phlegm flew towards Gong Luyun.


MGA Capitulo 82 – Battle Arrangement
*whoosh*
The sparkling and shiny phlegm was as if it had the tail of a comet. It flew with lightning speed towards Gong Luyun's face.
Everything happened too quickly. In addition, with such a distance and Gong Luyun's reaction time, it was too late. With a bang, the phlegm landed on his face.
"I will slaughter you." Touching the stickiness on his face, Gong Luyun crazily grabbed and threw his fist towards Chu Feng's brain.
That punch was no small matter. Even the air cracked from it and howling wind sounds were created. Before it even landed, Chu Feng had difficulty resisting it. His hair got blown into chaos and his face would be deformed by that burst of pressuring power. If that punch landed, even if Chu Feng had copper skin and iron bones, he would certainly get shattered.
Facing that scene, some people could not bear to watch and closed their eyes. They felt that Chu Feng most likely was going to get killed right there but it couldn't be helped. Who told him to anger Gong Luyun right?
The 1 disciple in the Azure Dragon School had an extremely high position there. Everyone knew that he was the future head of the school. Before the future head of the school, what was the life of a little core disciple? Even if Chu Feng really was killed, Gong Luyun would not receive any punishment. At most, he would get a few words of scolding.
But compared to those who could not bear to look, even more people watched as they gained pleasure from his misery. Not only did their faces have not a single trace of sympathy, they extremely looked forward to it.
They looked forward to Chu Feng being killed. They looked forward at the spray of blood everywhere. They looked forward to the bloody scene. They thought it was well-deserved. The result of offending the 1 disciple should nothing but that.
*bang*
But just as everyone felt that Chu Feng was dead, a dried out, skeleton-like palm suddenly appeared. It grabbed onto Gong Luyun's wrist and stopped his fist.
"It's him?"
That change shocked everyone. When people saw who it was, they were shocked to the extreme. The person who stopped Gong Luyun was an old man with a thin body, little hair, and a camel-like back. He was just like a living dead man and it was fairly scary.
As for who he was, the crowd knew that as well. He was the elder who looked over the Azure Dragon Flower Garden and was responsible for receiving new disciples. No one knew his name but everyone called him Elder Li.
Elder Li's position in the core zone was not high. At most, he was an old man who sounded gongs so all the elders looked down on him. Even disciples looked down on him and no one put him in their eyes.
But in front of their eyes, he accepted Gong Luyun's punch. Naturally, it would stun everyone because they were suddenly aware that the elder they looked down upon was not a weak person. Instead, he was a strong one.
"Move."
The angry Gong Luyun did not even give Elder Li any face. Operating the Mysterious Technique, he waved his hand and wanted to fling the elder away.
But that did not work. He discovered with astonishment that he could not even move his hand. His wrist, in the hand of the old man, was firmly locked and he could not move it in the slightest.
"Gong Luyun, as the 1 disciple in the Azure Dragon School, you should be protecting your juniors. What is this way of handling things?" Elder Li said that neither quickly nor slowly. He had a gentle smile on his face, but the smile was quite frightening.
Although he did not expect Elder Li to have that kind of strength, Gong Luyun did not let the issue go. He felt that within the Azure Dragon School, other than the head of the school, only the Six Protectors and Elder Zhuge were worth his respect. Other elders were not qualified.
"If it's about punishment, you already did it before. Leave this issue alone." Elder Li coldly smiled and suddenly waved his hand. Gong Luyun got flung away and the strong power forced him back a few steps.
"This old guy is very strong."
At that instant, the surrounding disciples were shocked. He accepted Gong Luyun's punch just now and it meant that his cultivation was not weak. But his current actions meant that his strength was very strong, or at least stronger that Gong Luyun.
Profound realm. The amount of elders of the Profound realm in the Azure Dragon School did not exceed 10. But, every person had an important position and extremely high status. They were filled with respect of the core disciples.
But this elder, since he had that kind of strength, why did he need to do such petty and low jobs? People could not understand that. However, from today on, the disciples had a completely new understanding of Elder Li.
"You are protecting him?" Being flung away in front of the crowd, Gong Luyun felt that he had no more face. His face was cold to the extreme.
"Not protecting him. It's just that I don't want a good seed being killed by someone." Elder Li lightly smiled.
"Good seed? You have quite a high view of him." Gong Luyun coldly smiled.
"You will know in the future whether this person is a good seed or not. It's just that you're relying on your many years of cultivation and bullying his inexperience. More or less, you're lacking some virtue."
"Lacking virtue? You're saying that I'm using my long years of cultivation to bully his little years of cultivation?"
Gong Luyun was even more angered. He thought himself as a cultivating genius and the people all around him thought that as well. When had someone dared to say that to him? It was unacceptable for him to be said that he was bullying because he had longer cultivation time.
"If not that then what?" Elder Li coldly smiled.
"Fine, I'll give him 10 years. In 10 years, if he still cannot win against me, I will have you two kneeling on the ground and admitting your wrongs." Gong Luyun was really angered and he pointed at the elder while saying that.
Facing Gong Luyun, Elder Li only smiled with relief and did not reply. Instead, he looked at Chu Feng who was next to him and ask, "Little friend, what do you think?"
"10 years is too long. 1 year is enough." Chu Feng lightly smiled and said.
When those words came out, not to mention others, even Elder Li who spoke for him was greatly shocked. 1 year? Was he trying to trap me? It didn't matter if he lost, but if he did, even I had to follow him and kneel!
Thinking to that point, Elder Li quickly asked while smiling, "Little friend, 1 year of time. Are you sure?"
"1 year is enough because I, Chu Feng, always take my revenge for enmity and I don't like delaying it for too long." Chu Feng replied firmly.
"Haha, what an arrogant brat. 1 year it is. Don't say that I was bullying you. After one year, you don't need to defeat me. As long as you take take 3 of my attacks, I will say that you've won." Gong Luyun pointed at Chu Feng and coldly smiled.
Chu Feng lightly smiled and said, "No, 1 year later, I will beat you to death."


MGA Capitulo 83 – No One Should Even Think Of Bullying Me
"You want a life or death match?" Gong Luyun coldly smiled.
"I do want a life or death match. Scared?" Chu Feng asked.
"Scared? Would I be scared of you? Haha...very funny." Gong Luyun laughed loudly and his laughter was abnormally loud. It was as if he heard the funniest thing in the world and then he said to the crowd behind him,
"Today, I set a life or death battle with this person. 1 year later, at the same place, one battle will take place to determine the winner or loser. If he can block 3 of my attacks, I, Gong Luyun, will cut my throat right here without half a word of complaint."
Gong Luyun's words were aggressive, direct, and incomparably arrogant. It could be seen that he was filled with confidence. But the strangest thing was that people approved of his confidence. It was as if at that instant, they could see Chu Feng's wretched death at this place 1 year later.
1 year. What could he do in 1 year? Not to mention that Chu Feng was still in the Spirit realm, but even if he was in the Origin realm, he could not enter the Profound realm in 1 year.
In addition, Gong Luyun was the publicly recognized 1 genius in the Azure Dragon School. Within the year, his strength was going to be raised by even more. So, everyone felt that the winning chance of Chu Feng was almost zero.
"But, one year later, if you cannot take 3 of my attacks, I will beat you to death and no one will be able to save you."
Gong Luyun pointed at Chu Feng and fiercely left those words. After a cold snort, he quickly left and the people that came with them also coldly smiled while looking at Chu Feng before chasing after him.
"Chu Feng, sorry, it's my fault..." Su Mei went next to Chu Feng, and seeing the bloody traces on Chu Feng's face, she cried out again from the pain in her heart.
"It's nothing, they're just minor wounds so don't cry."
Chu Feng wiped Su Mei's tears away from her face. After that, he cast his gaze towards Situ Yu and the others who were nearby, smiled, then said, "No need to fear. Since we're not Wings Alliance members anymore, we don't have any relations between us. I won't spread the trouble."
"Chu Feng, we..."
Hearing Chu Feng say those words, Situ Yu and the other's face changed. Indeed, they didn't dare to go near Chu Feng. Indeed, they were afraid that Chu Feng would spread the trouble to them. Who told him to offend the 1 disciple Gong Luyun right?
"Heh. You don't need to look at me with that insincerity. I don't owe you anything, and you don't owe me anything. From now on, we are strangers."
Chu Feng waved his hand towards Situ Yu and the others. Although there was a smile on the corner of his mouth, his gaze was unusually cold. He did not need false friendships around him.
Seeing Chu Feng like that, Situ Yu did not put up any acts. After deeply looking at Chu Feng, they went their ways. They had to remove the relationship between them and Chu Feng or else disaster would fall upon them.
"Little friend, with a year of time, how confident would you be in defeating Gong Luyun?" Just at that time, Elder Li spoke.
"Hehe, I'll be honest. The current me isn't even 10% confident." Chu Feng spoke honestly.
"What? You're not even 10% confident yet you dared to set a life or death battle? Are you trying to trap me?" Elder Li instantly blew his beard and glared his eyes.
"Heh, thank you for you help just now. But, although I am not even 10% confident right now, after a year, I will certainly be 100% confident?" Chu Feng smiled and said.
"Little boy, where did all the confidence come from?" Elder Li slanted his eyes and looked at Chu Feng.
"My confidence comes from pressure. 1 year later, if I don't win I die. Therefore I must win." Chu Feng smiled again.
"Ahh, the young people these days." Elder Li said no more. He took out a roll of paper from his Cosmos Sack, went in front of the announcement board in the plaza, opened up the paper and posted it up there.
At that instant, many disciples surrounded there. They wanted to know what Chu Feng and the other's exam results were. But, they wanted to know the most what Chu Feng's talent was since he dared to challenge Gong Luyun.
When Chu Feng's results were posted on the board, everyone was stupefied. Unclear talent. What did that mean? After being in the core zone for so long, it was the first time that people saw a person who had unclear talent.
"Ho. He was unable to activate the testing stone so naturally, his talent is unclear." Seemingly knowing the suspicions of the crowd, Elder Li smiled and explained.
"What? Unable to activate the testing stone? Doesn't that mean that he doesn't even have low-rank talent? Damn. After acting all that, at the end he's just trash?"
Everyone were endlessly shocked. Their gazes towards Chu Feng were even filled with even more contempt. Elder Li did not say anything about the crowd's opinions. After posting all 12 rolls of paper, he waved his sleeve and walked into his own, old palace.
"This old man really is not simple."
Chu Feng originally wanted to go and thank him again, but after seeing Elder Li who didn't even look at him, he didn't go. He knew that Elder Li had plans when he saved him, but he did not know what they were.
Even if he said any more words of gratitude, they would be useless. That was because gratitude should not be said with words. It should be given by actions. What Chu Feng needed to do was to defeat Gong Luyun in 1 year. That was the best way of thanking him. At least, it would let people know that Elder Li saving him today was the correct action.
Within countless of discussions, under countless of gazes, Chu Feng held the core disciple token and headed towards his residence in the core zone.
From start until the end, Su Mei was always by his side. She did not care about the words from others and she only looked at Chu Feng with an aching heart. That really warmed Chu Feng's heart.
"Chu Feng, it's my fault that I've made trouble for you."
"Leave the Azure Dragon School and head towards my family. Let my family protect you and don't fight with that Gong Luyun." After entering the palace, Su Mei quickly spoke.
"What do you mean? You want me to be a turtle that has its head tucked in within its shell?" Chu Feng was a bit displeased. Although he knew that Su Mei only had good intentions for him, he still felt uncomfortable.
"You don't know the background or the power of Gong Luyun and his family. It is no smaller than the Azure Dragon School. The reason why he came to the Azure Dragon School for cultivation was to become the head of the Azure Dragon School and to occupy this place."
"Let's not talk about the tiny hope of you winning over him 1 year later. Even if you can win, you cannot kill him. If you do, his family will certainly kill you."
"All in all, you almost have no winning hope in this arranged battle. Him and his family will not give you that hope." Su Mei said seriously.
"Ho. If it's like that, not only will I kill him, I will annihilate his family."
"Su Mei, I know that you're thinking for me, but I, Chu Feng, am never afraid. Since I dared to arrange a battle today, I will stick to my word. Even if the person that will die is me, I will admit it."
"I am not afraid of dying, but I'm afraid of living cowardly. Since Gong Luyun humiliated me like this today, I will return the humiliation 100 times back. Or else what would the meaning of me living be? Do I live in this world to be humiliated by others?"
"No. I, Chu Feng, am a person that does not get bullied. No matter who it is, they should not even think about beating me down. I can endure a moment of humiliation, but I will never endure a lifelong of humiliation. All those who bully me will pay the price."
"Since Gong Luyun dared to bully me, I dare to kill him. If his family dares to bully me, I will exterminate his family. If everyone in the world dares to bully me, I will massacre everyone in the world. Unless I die, no one in the entire world should even think of bullying me, Chu Feng!"


MGA Capitulo 84 – Bow of Hundred Transformations
After hearing Chu Feng's words, Su Mei was dumbfounded. She was deeply attracted towards Chu Feng, attracted to that type of grandeur. A strange feeling was created. It was her feeling that Chu Feng was not lying and he could really do everything that he said.
"Little Mei, I know you won't be like Situ Yu and the others, but the truth is that I did offend Gong Luyun. So, I don't want to spread my trouble to you." Suddenly, Chu Feng spoke.
"Chu Feng, what do you mean? The things that happened originated from me. If it wasn't for me...You would have never done those things. Because of me, you suffered from such a huge grievance. If I left you, would I even be a person?"
"Indeed, Gong Luyun does have quite some influence in the core zone. But I, Su Mei, am not afraid of him. Not only inside of the Azure Dragon School, even outside, I am not afraid of him either." Su Mei firmly said.
Seeing Su Mei act like that, Chu Feng really did not know what to do. Was Su Mei afraid of Gong Luyun? Of course she was. After all, in the core zone, it was Gong Luyun's world. Even her elder sister, Su Rou, might not be able to beat Gong Luyun.
But perhaps because she was afraid could she say those words so firmly. Chu Feng could not bear to convince her otherwise because he did not want to betray Su Mei's kind feelings.
"Fine, I really don't know what to do with you. Since it's like this, come with me to the Martial Skill Building and let's take a look."
"Sure. I was just thinking of cultivating rank 5 skills."
At that instant, Su Mei became that lively and cheerful girl as she ran out while jumping and bouncing. Chu Feng also followed up along the road.
The core zone was extremely big but there were only 2000 disciples or so within it. So, after things happened, news spread extremely quickly. For example, the arranged battle between Chu Feng and Gong Luyun spread throughout the core zone in a short amount of time.
In addition, Chu Feng's appearance and name was already hung on the announcement boards. So, many people had an impression of Chu Feng and on the road towards the Martial Skill Building, almost all the people that saw Chu Feng pointed at him and endlessly discussed.
Chu Feng already expected that situation so he did not pay any attention to it. Su Mei was the same and the two of them talked and laughed as they entered the Martial Skill Building and started to choose the martial skills they wanted.
Although the Martial Skill Building in the core zone was a lot smaller than the one in the inner court as it only had one floor, it was very refined. The worst skills were only rank 3 skills and the best were rank 5 skills.
Of course, other than martial skills, there were even mysterious techniques. But, they were only beginning level mysterious techniques. To the two of them who cultivated in the Breathing Techniques, they were not that useful so their main goal was to choose a martial skill book.
"Rank 5 martial skill, Bow of Hundred Transformations. What a strange name."
After circling around, Chu Feng was attracted towards a book called the Bow of Hundred Transformations. He couldn't help but flip through it, and as he looked, Chu Feng liked it even more.
It was a type of condensation martial skill and the controlling difficulty towards spiritual energy was extremely high. It expelled spiritual energy out of the body and condensed it into weapons for battle. According to what one liked, they could condense it to various shapes.
Knives, spears, swords, halberds, hatchets, battleaxes, hooks, pitchforks, tridents, sticks, lances, clubs, whips, truncheon, hammers, claws. All sorts of weapon shapes could be condensed and formed. The book was even equipped with the attacking sequences of the weapons.
But the hardest to condense was the bow. If the bow was condensed and created, it could use spiritual energy as the arrows and shoot them for over 10 miles. The speed was extremely fast and almost no one could dodge it. It was an extremely impressive method.
So, that was why the Bow of Hundred Transformations, within the rank 5 skills, could be counted as a first-class martial skill. Naturally, the cultivation difficulty was very high as well.
"This one." After finalizing it, Chu Feng took the book and registered it. After waiting for Su Mei to choose a martial skill, the two of them walked out of the Martial Skill Building.
But the instant that they walked out of the Martial Skill Building, over 20 core disciples were gathered there. All of the faces of the core disciples were not kind and at that moment, they already surrounded the two people and blocked their escape.
"What are you doing?" Seeing the core disciples that surrounded them, Su Mei frowned and loudly questioned.
She intentionally spoke louder. After all, they were still at the entrance of the Martial Skill Building. So, she wanted to draw the Martial Skill Building elder out and get his help.
But it was in vain. The elder clearly heard Su Mei's yell yet completely ignored her. On the other hand, the disciples within the Martial Skill Building ran out and started observing.
"You are Su Mei, Su Rou's younger sister right?" One of the disciples went up and asked.
"Is there a problem?" Su Mei's face was icy cold.
"Hoho, I hear that you had medium-rank talent and that's already quite rare even within the core zone. With your talent, I'm sure that in the future, your name could be seen on the Azure Dragon Leaderboard."
"But, with your talent, why are you together with this guy? There's nothing good about walking so close to him." Another male disciple laughed and said.
"I stay together with whoever I wish to. This is my own matter and it has nothing to do with any of you." Su Mei coldly said.
"Ho. Su Mei, I was just advising you with a kind heart but I never would have thought that you would be so ungrateful. Since it has come to this, I'll say the truth. Chu Feng offended senior Gong and he can't continue going on this way in the core zone."
"Today, we're here give this arrogant brat a lesson for senior Gong. I hope that you stay a bit farther away from him or else you can't blame us for harming you." That male disciple's face also became darker and colder.
"You're giving me a lesson to help Gong Luyun, or are you using that as an excuse to give me a lesson so that Gong Luyun would have a better impression on you?"
"Trash are indeed trash. Perhaps only all of you could think of that method just to lick Gong Luyun's boots. But, I'm afraid that you won't even be able to do that." Just at that time, Chu Feng suddenly coldly smiled. The gazes that he cast towards the crowd was full of disdain and contempt.
Although the group of people were not weak, they were not strong either. They only had the strength of the 8th and 9th level of the Spirit realm. Within the inner court, they would absolutely be counted as the tip, but within the core zone, they were existences at the bottom.
So, Chu Feng could guess the reason why they were looking for trouble. Without a doubt, they were trying to use this to attract Gong Luyun's attention and to gain better impressions. However, with their strength, Chu Feng did not even put them in his eyes.


MGA Capitulo 85 – Danger Lurks Everywhere
"I never would have thought that there was going to be a good show already. It's already hard to say whether Chu Feng can even live past a year."
"Yeah, how can he even survive in the core zone after offending senior Gong? Even if senior Gong doesn't attack, many people would be troubling him. With his current strength, it's really quite hard to continue in this place."
As they looked at the scene in front of them, the surrounding crowd coldly smiled. They felt that Chu Feng was going to be crazily beaten up today. After all, Chu Feng's strength was only at the 7th level of the Spirit realm. In addition to his horrible talent, in the core zone, take any single person and they could beat him up to the point in which he would need to look for his teeth on the ground.
That was also why Gong Luyun's underlings didn't attack Chu Feng yet. They felt that Chu Feng was simply too weak and he was not worthy enough for their attack.
"What. You bunch of trash are going to come one by one or everyone at once?" Chu Feng swept over the crowd and disdainfully said.
"What an arrogant brat. Clearly a trash that doesn't even have low-rank talent yet dares to say we're trash. If we don't give you a lesson today, you really won't know how high the sky is and how deep the ground is."
One of the core disciples was quite angered by Chu Feng. He stepped forward, and a hand with strength clawed towards Chu Feng. He started to attack directly.
*bam* But just as the hand was going to touch Chu Feng, Chu Feng's hand tightly grabbed onto his wrist. A strong power made him unable to move even half an inch.
"He blocked that person's attack?"
The observing crowd felt surprised. Although the person who attack Chu Feng was very weak, but he was still at the 8th level of the Spirit realm. The person whom he was taking care of, Chu Feng, was only at the 7th level of the Spirit realm so he should have been more than enough. How was he so easily blocked by Chu Feng? Then, when the next scene happened, their surprise completely turned into shock.
Chu Feng used a bit of power in his hand and suddenly pulled down. With a snapping sound, the core disciple's arm got broken by Chu Feng.
He was not done yet. Chu Feng raised his leg and kicked the person's left knee. Another snapping sound rang out and the person's left leg was broken. He then started to roll on the ground while painfully howling.
*whoosh*
Just as they were shocked, Chu Feng shot in front of a disciple like a ghost. He struck with his fist and it fiercely landed on that person's face, directly breaking his jaw.
"Cripple this bastard." Seeing that 2 people fell within the blink of an eye, the group of core disciples were completely enraged. They attacked all together and they all leaped towards Chu Feng.
"Hmph, nice timing."
When Chu Feng faced the group attack that contained all sorts of martial skills and every kind of power, he only coldly laughed. A ray of lightning flashed into Chu Feng's eyes and instantly, his body was covered with snakes of lightning.
*bzz~~~*
The lightning shot in every direction and it was as if the sun was falling. The bright light forced the observing crowd's eyes close and the strong might caused them to continuously back away.
When they felt that the power was withdrawn, they couldn't help but open their eyes. As they focused their attention and looked, their faces changed greatly as their eyes and mouth were wide open.
The 20 or so people that surrounded to attack Chu Feng were all laid on the ground. Their bodies were all black and they were not lightly burnt. They were currently rolling and flipping while painfully bawling.
They focused their attention back to Chu Feng and not a single hair was damaged. There wasn't even any dust on his clothes. He was disdainfully looking at the people howling and he coldly said, "You are not qualified to give me a lesson."
After he finished those words, Chu Feng cast his chilling gaze towards the observing crowd. Those who saw Chu Feng's gaze shivered and coldness started to rise in their hearts. They couldn't help but back away one step. Even experts of the Origin realm were no exception.
Looking at those who had faces of being joyful in other's disasters yet currently had nervous expressions on, the corner of Chu Feng's mouth rose to form a cold smile before leaving with Su Mei.
"Heavens. How is this guy so terrifying? How is he the trash of the Spirit realm with that atmosphere just now? Even people from the Origin realm may not even have that."
"Not only that, the skill he just used was not just simply a rank 5 skill, it seemed like..."
"Like what?"
"From the airs of that skill, it should belong to the Three Thunder Styles."
"The Three Thunder Styles? How is that possible? The Three Thunder Styles is only a rank 4 martial skill but it was clearly a rank 5 skill just now."
"That's right. The Three Thunder Styles is indeed a rank 4 skill, but you should know if one mastered the 3rd style of the Three Thunder Styles, it would be a rank 5 skill."
"Your...Your meaning is?"
At that instant, people didn't even dare to continue thinking. After all, until today, only the founder of the Azure Dragon School completely mastered the Three Thunder Styles.
Countless people cultivated it before but no one could completely master it. But right now, Chu Feng seemed to have mastered the legendary skill so how could people not be shocked by that?
"Hehe, it seems like this guy isn't simple. No wonder he dared to provoke Gong Luyun."
"The skill just now must have been the 3rd style of the Three Thunder Styles. I never would have thought that he had cultivated it to that extent. It seems like the person Leng Wuzui wants us to find is him."
Just at that moment, in a certain location outside of the Martial Skill Building, a male and a female appeared. They looked at the back of Chu Feng who was leaving and cold glints surged in their eyes.
"Look, isn't that senior Gao Le and Liu Bing?"
"Those two were on the Azure Dragon Leaderboard back in the days. After being defeated by Leng Wuzui, they removed their names from the leaderboard on their own accord."
"I heard that after they were defeated by Leng Wuzui, for some reason, they chose to follow him. Up to today, they are still working for Leng Wuzui so very rarely do they appear in the Azure Dragon School."
"Is that so? After getting defeated they chose to follow him? That means that Leng Wuzui is no simple person."
"Of course! Leng Wuzui is the only disciple in the Azure Dragon School that has Spirit power. Although his talent is not as high as Gong Luyun, he has Spirit power which Gong Luyun doesn't."
"Yeah, he's only 19 years old right now and 3rd on the Azure Dragon Leaderboard. On that topic, our 2 genius in the Azure Dragon School is not really worth being in that position so I believe that the 2nd spot in the Azure Dragon Leaderboard will belong to him sooner or later."
As they mentioned Leng Wuzui, admiration surged onto the disciples' face. After all, he was another publicly recognized genius after Gong Luyun.
After Chu Feng left the Martial Skill Building, he parted ways with Su Mei but didn't return to his own residence. He left the Azure Dragon School and wanted to personally bring back the good news of him becoming a core disciple. He wanted to personally stab the Azure Dragon Banner in his Leaning Mountain Town.
However, Chu Feng did not know at the same time that he left the Azure Dragon School, two Origin realm core disciples silently tailed him.


MGA Capitulo 86 – Mysterious Expert
Within the core zone, in a flower garden within a certain residence. Leng Wuzui was currently feeding a Fierce Beast.
It was a rank 9 Fierce Beast and it was as large as an elephant. It looked like a gorilla but its sharp teeth were very fierce. However, in front of Leng Wuzui, the Fierce Beast was abnormally cute.
It was just obediently eating the food on the ground and did not attack Leng Wuzui. It even let Leng Wuzui stroke its fur and it did not have any reactions.
It was not that the Fierce Beast had spiritual nature and lost its violent instincts. It was just deeply suppressed by Leng Wuzui's power and became his pet. A pet that was subdued by power.
"Junior Leng, the person you wanted to find has been found." Gao Le and Liu Bing were standing behind Leng Wuzui and talking. Their attitude towards him was respectful and even a bit fearful.
"What background does that boy have?" As Leng Wuzui toyed around with the Fierce Beast, he spoke and questioned. He didn't even turned his head around.
"He is called Chu Feng and he's only 15 years old today. He came from the Chu family located in Leaning Mountain Town and he has the cultivation of the 7th level of the Spirit realm. Today, he entered the core zone and became a core disciple."
"But, he was quite aggressive and he had a conflict with Gong Luyun so Gong Luyun gave Chu Feng a lesson. If it wasn't for the Elder Li who looked over the Azure Dragon Flower Garden, he would have already died." Gao Le narrated.
"Elder Li? He interrupted?" Hearing the name Elder Li, Leng Wuzui's gaze flickered.
"Yeah, it was just as you said. Elder Li really did hide his strength and he is at least an expert of the Profound realm." Liu Bing hurriedly said.
"Of course. He can hide it from others but he cannot escape my scenes. My Spirit power already discovered that he was not simple. However, why would he save Chu Feng? Do they have connections?" Leng Wuzui sank into deep thought.
"I doubt it. Chu Feng's family background is very normal. Besides, he arranged a life or death match with Gong Luyun one year later. Even if we don't take care of him, one year later, Gong Luyun would still slaughter him." Gao Le continued and said.
"Oh? That's quite an arrogant boy. But he must be quickly disposed of. This cannot be delayed." Leng Wuzui reminded with a serious tone.
"Don't worry. He already left the Azure Dragon School and returned to the Chu family. He should be wanting to personally bring the Azure Dragon Banner back to his family. After all, the Chu family is only a small power and the Azure Dragon Banner would help them greatly."
"We already sent the Zhao Shi brothers to hiddenly assassinate him. Although that boy may have some methods, the Zhao Shi brothers are at the 3rd level of the Origin realm. With their coordination, it's more than enough to finish off that boy." Liu Bing explained.
"Bastards!" Hearing those words, not only was Leng Wuzui not happy, he was even angered. He suddenly stood up, pointed at the two and reprimanded, "Do you not know what ‘Long nights means more dreams' is called? Or are you too lazy to do this tiny little thing and need me to personally go?"
Seeing Leng Wuzui like that, Gao Le and Liu Bing's face changed greatly. They backed away, frightened, and then said at the same time, "We'll go and finish him off right now."
Gao Le and Liu Bing quickly left the Azure Dragon School. The two of them were on quick horses and crazily running towards the Chu family. Within Liu Bing's hand was a triangular yellow talismen.
The talismen was flickering with weak light. As the two of them continued forward, the light got brighter and brighter. Seeing that, Liu Bing frowned slightly, suddenly stopped the horse and said nervously, "Something's wrong."
"What?" Seeing that, Gao Le also tensed up.
"This is the locating talismen on the bodies of the Zhao Shi brothers. They should be tailing Chu Feng and attacked when he left the Azure Dragon School boundary. But, right now, the location that this talisman is showing means that they are nearby." Liu Bing explained.
"So that means..." Hearing those words, Gao Le also frowned and became uneasy.
*whoosh whoosh* The two of them leaped off the horse and started to search nearby according to the indication of the talismen. Very quickly, the two of the entered a forest and the light on the locating talismen got brighter and brighter. It no longer flickered and it started to continuously give off light.
When the two of them entered 2000 meters into the forest, they discovered with shock that there were two bodies in front of them. They were laid within the bushes and the two people had casual clothing on. But, looking at their faces, they were the Zhao Shi brothers who they recognized.
However, the two of them at that instant did not breath. The strangest thing was that on the surface of the two people, there was not a single wound.
Gao Le crouched down and pressed his hand on their chests. After feeling for a while, his brows tightened and said with a serious expression,
"Their organs have shattered and they died from overwhelming pressure."
"How is that possible? Chu Feng is only at the 7th level of the Spirit realm so how could he have such a strong pressure? The Zhao Shi brothers were experts of the 3rd level of the Origin realm!" Hearing those words, Liu Bing's face also paled.
Using pressure to shock a person to death meant that one had to have the cultivation of at least 3 levels higher than their opponent and Chu Feng could not possibly do that. That meant that Chu Feng had help, and that help was at least of the 6th level of the Origin realm.
"It seems that Leng Wuzui guessed correctly. We really did underestimate Chu Feng." Gao Le helplessly sighed and his gaze endlessly flickered without anyone knowing what he was thinking.
"What do we do? Chu Feng has experts next to him and that person is at least at the 6th level of the Origin realm, perhaps even stronger. If that person has the strength of the 9th level, even if we attack together, we may not even be able to beat that person."
Liu Bing had no more ideas. After all, they were only at the 8th level of the Origin realm. Naturally, they had no confidence facing an unknown enemy.
"If we go back like this, we will certainly be punished by Leng Wuzui. You know his methods. We're just his puppets and he would not have a sliver of mercy. You don't want to have a taste of the poison that drills the heart and stabs the bones right?"
"No! Of course not!!!" Hearing the word "poison", Liu Bing's face instantly turned ashen. Even her body started to tremble and her gaze was full of terror.
"So, we must finish off Chu Feng or else Leng Wuzui will not continue giving us the antidote. I rather be killed than even think of that poison." Gao Le firmly said. Liu Bing did not hesitate and she also nodded in agreement.
Chu Feng did not know anything about Leng Wuzui wanting to kill him in secret. So naturally, he did not know that the two people who wanted to kill him were already hiddenly disposed of.
At that instant, his mood was extremely good because after a few days on the road, he finally returned back to the Leaning Mountain Town. Chu Feng couldn't help but laugh when he imagined Chu Yuan's happy expression if he told the news of him being a core disciple.
"This aura, it's uncle's!"
But suddenly, Chu Feng's expression changed greatly. He felt, from nearby, some auras were intertwined and it obviously meant that people were fighting. Within one of the fighters was his oldest uncle, Chu Renyi.


MGA Capitulo 87 – The Chu Family Has Difficulties
On the road leading to the Leaning Mountain Town, Chu Renyi and some Chu family members were being surrounded and attacked by a group of people.
At that instant, most of the Chu family members had heavy injuries and they laid on the side of the road. Within some of them, because their injuries were too heavy, they passed away. Only Chu Renyi who was at the 8th level of the Spirit realm painfully propped himself up.
But facing 6 people at the 8th level of the Spirit realm along with several injured enemies at the 7th level of the Spirit realm, Chu Renyi was obviously at a disadvantage. He had countless wounds and he was breathing roughly with huge breaths. Currently, helplessness was within his gaze.
"Chu Renyi, you never would have thought that we waited many hours for you right? Today, no one can save your Chu family. How many Chu family members that come back are how many will die!" The male leader fiercely said.
"Mazhong, my Chu family has no enmity with your Ma family. Why are you helping the Xu family and harming my Chu family?!" Chu Renyi loudly questioned.
"Haha, Chu Renyi. You should be clear in your heart why we are joining together to deal with your Chu family. You think that you could hide this thing from others?" Mazhong coldly smiled as he crowded around Chu Renyi while revealing killing intent.
"We will still need to see if you have the ability to deal with my Chu family." But just at that time, a clear voice exploded like thunder.
To the sudden voice, the Ma family jumped in fear and quickly turned their heads to look back. The seemingly unimportant action caused everyone to be shocked.
They saw a young man riding a big, white horse. He was slowly going towards their direction, and obviously, that person was Chu Feng.
"That's the young man of the Chu family, Chu Feng. Why has he returned?"
"Something's wrong. Look at his clothes! That's...the Azure Dragon School's core disciple clothing."
At the Chu family gathering, the people did see Chu Feng before so they instantly recognized him with a glance. However, when they saw Chu Feng's core disciple clothing, they were all greatly shocked.
From the end of the Chu family gathering, one short month hadn't even passed. But, clearly, the Chu Feng who was only an inner court disciple so quickly became a core disciple. That simply was unimaginable.
Even though they knew Chu Feng's talent was impressive and he would become extremely useful in the future, they never would have thought that his talent was that outstanding. It exceeded their imaginations.
"Chu Feng, run!" Suddenly, Chu Renyi yelled out.
"Surround him. Do not let him escape." Hearing that, Mazhong reacted to it and quickly instructed the crowd to surround Chu Feng.
As for Chu Feng, he did not even put the group of people in his eyes. He stood there, high on the horse and looked down on the extremely nervous crowd that sealed his exit.
"Haha, you little demon. You're quite impressive, becoming a core disciple of the Azure Dragon School at that age. It would be fairly dreadful if we let you continue developing." Seeing that Chu Feng's escape was sealed, Mazhong laughed in relief.
"That's right. Today, we must completely exterminate the Chu family or else there would be endless troubles in the future."
The other people also echoed him. After all, Chu Feng's talent was too terrifying. So strong that it made them feel fear. If they didn't kill Chu Feng, there would be too many troubles in the future.
"Bastards. You want to exterminate my Chu family? Go dream." At that instant, Chu Renyi was as if he was insane and rushed forward.
Today, a calamity really arrived at the Chu family and pretty much the entire Leaning Mountain Town was going to be perished. The hopes of the Chu family were placed on the young generation, and obviously, Chu Feng was their biggest hope within the young generation. Although he personally did not like Chu Feng, as part of the Chu family, he had to protect Chu Feng even if he sacrificed his life.
"Chu Feng, run! Tell Yueer and the others not to return to the Leaning Mountain Town!" As Chu Renyi slaughtered as best as he could, he loudly yelled out.
"Hmph. You can't even look after yourself yet you want to save others. Kill them all."
Mazhong coldly snorted and he waved and chopped towards Chu Renyi with an iron blade in his hands. At the same time, the others also attacked Chu Feng. Their moves were heartless and they really were planning to kill.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
Mazhong was also at the 8th level of the Spirit realm but he was in his heathy years. In addition to Chu Renyi already heavily injured, Mazhong's blade was unusually strong. After a few chops, Chu Renyi was incomparably strained. His speed already slowed and it was hard for him to defend.
"Ahh~~~~"
But just at that time, endless cries of pain started to sound behind him. At first, Mazhong ignored it and he even thought that it was his own subordinates that were beating Chu Feng up.
However, the more he heard, the more he felt something was off. Those voices seemed to be from his own subordinates and from nearby, seeing the Chu family member's expression that had happiness within surprise, he finally understood that perhaps things did not happen as smoothly as he imagined.
*whoosh*
Feeling that someone was wrong, Mazhong faked a strike then dashed to the side. Taking a glance, he was instantly stunned. He saw the body and the head of the Ma family members separate as they breathed no more.
Looking over, he saw Chu Feng's body which was sprayed with blood yet he was without a scratch as he stepped on the corpse of a Ma family member. He was wiping away the bloodstains on his hand with their clothes, and seemingly feeling Mazhong's gaze, he couldn't help but turn his head and he revealed an evil smile.
"You...You..."
At that instant, Mazhong's face paled from fear and he quickly backed off a few steps. The blade in his hand was also thrown at the ground. With a trip, he fell on the ground with a poof.
He never would have thought that the many experts of the Ma family would be instantly slaughtered by Chu Feng. His methods were even so cruel as all of them were decapitated.
How did the young man in front of him even look like a person that had no experience of the world? He was simply a demon that had ruthless methods, a cold heart, and killed without even blinking. Especially when Chu Feng cast his gaze towards him and shone the killing intent from his body, the repression almost made him suffocate.
Chu Feng did not pay attention to Mazhong's reactions. He walked forward, one step at a time, and he picked up the blade that Mazhong dropped on the floor. After looking at it for a while, he said, "Nice blade."
*whoosh* Before he even finished speaking, a cold light flashed past and blood sprayed out. Mazhong's did not even have the chance to cry out before his head fell on the floor.
Looking at that scene, even Chu Renyi and the Chu family members trembled from fright. Drops of cold sweat appeared on their forehead.
Everything that happened was too inconceivable. Putting off how Chu Feng's strength was so strong that he could kill people of the 8th level of the Spirit realm like killing a little chick, with his age, how could he be so ruthless? After all, Chu Feng was still a young man that was 15 years old. Even big adults might not have been able to do all those things.
"Uncle, what happened?" Chu Feng threw the blade to the side and quickly questioned. He could tell that the Chu family seemed to have met with difficulties.
"Fenger, there's a great catastrophe." After Chu Feng's question, only then did Chu Renyi recover from his shock as he emotionally explained everything that happened.


MGA Capitulo 88 – Die
So it turned out in the period of time when Chu Feng and the other left, something huge happened in the Chu family. In the mining zone on the mountain, a rare, black iron ore was excavated out. After more exploration, they discovered that there was a lot more of the ore.
The black iron ore was the best material for weapon creation. The value of it was even higher than gold ores and that mine was a extremely precious mineral deposit. It could increase the Chu family's profits by several hundred times.
So, when the black iron ore was discovered, at the same time that the Chu family rejoiced, they also started to secretly extract the ore and strict secrecy measures were taken.
But, in the world, there were no walls that did not let any wind pass. No one knew who spread the news of the black iron ore, but when the information was leaked out, very quickly, it attracted the envy of the various neighbouring town's powers.
Under the lead of the Chu family's nemesis, the Xu family, they united with the two strongest families in the mountain area, the Ma family and the Wang family. Together, they attacked the Chu family and they wanted to equally divide the black iron mine amongst them.
Chu Renyi was originally handling business outside of town. When he received the news, he instantly hurried back. But, he never would have thought that he would meet the Ma family's ambush. If it wasn't for Chu Feng who arrived just in time, he would have certainly got killed.
"This Xu family must be tired of living."
After hearing what happened, Chu Feng grinded his teeth in anger. The killing intent from his gaze filled the air, and not even going on the horse, he went straight forward as he crazily ran towards the direction of the Chu family.
"Fenger, don't go. It's too dangerous." Seeing that, Chu Renyi hurriedly spoke to stop him.
But it was in vain. Chu Feng's speed was simply too fast and with the sweep of the wind, Chu Feng disappeared. At that instant, Chu Renyi who wanted to say something could only swallow his words back down.
After a while, he recovered back before saying with incomparable shock, "Fenger's speed! Is his strength past the Spirit realm already?"
Hearing Chu Renyi's words, the heavily injured Chu family members widened their mouth in shock. What did it mean when he surpassed the power of the Spirit realm at that age? It simply exceeded what their brains could bear.
The Leaning Mountain Town was based off of the Chu family. The order was maintained by the Chu family and the citizens were protected by the Chu family. To say that the little town was a small-sized country would not be exaggerating.
Also, because of the recent black iron mine, the Chu family already prepared several layers of defense in the Leaning Mountain town to defend against anyone who had ill intents towards them.
But, in front of them, the attack of the Xu, Ma, and Wang family, the Leaning Mountain Town's layers of defenses were broken through and almost all of the citizens within the town were massacred. The Chu family were the only ones to continue to struggle.
However, no matter how much stronger Chu Yuanba was, while facing the three masters of the Xu, Ma, and Wang family, naturally, he would be at a disadvantage. The current him had a face that was as white as paper. He had blood all over his body and he was half-kneeling on the floor while violently panting and coughing.
"Father." Seeing that Chu Yuanba had no more strength to fight, Chu Yuan quickly arrived next to him. He swept his gaze of alert towards his surroundings and he was deeply afraid that someone would kill his father.
When Chu Yuanba was defeated, the forces from everywhere also stopped battling. Finally, a short moment of peace arrived for the bloody battle.
"Chu Yuanba, seeing that you are quite a person, I'll give you a dignified death. Go and suicide." Within the people, there was an old person that was slightly fat and short with a black beard. He was the master of the Xu family.
Looking at the three old men in front of him and then using his gaze to sweep over the heavily injured and the dead Chu family members, Chu Yuanba said with sorrow across his face,
"I, Chu Yuanba, can suicide. But please let my Chu family go."
"I guarantee that my Chu family will leave this mountain and never come back."
"Haha! Are you an idiot or do you take us as idiots to let go of your Chu family? You want us to release the tiger and let it return to the mountain? Leaving diseases alone?"
"Chu Yuanba. If you have to blame something, you can only blame your inability to reason. If you had promised and shared the black iron mine with us, how would the things that happened today happen? The only reason why your Chu family fell to this point is because of you."
"Not a single Chu family member will leave here alive. You should all go and suicide. We'll leave you with a complete corpse."
The tone of the master of the Xu family was icy cold and it had unmatched heartlessness. After facing the Chu family for so many years, he hated the Chu family down the bone. How could he give any breathing chances to the Chu family?
"Ahh~~~"
"Waa~~~"
But just at that time, sudden cries came outside of the Chu family residence. The cries were connected one after the other and some even happened at the same time. Within the continuousness, it was quite terrifying.
At that moment, the expression of every single person within the Chu family courtyard changed greatly. Especially the people from the Xu, Wang, and Ma family. Instantly, they became uneasy.
That was because currently, the people from the Chu family were already forced within the Chu family residence. Only their men remained outside of the residence.
But, the wretched yells only happened for a moment. Very quickly, silent sank in. However, the silence made people restless.
*ta ta ta*
"Family master, save me!"
But before he even ran for 3 steps, behind him, a cold wind swept by and a black iron blade came flying over.
With a poof, that Xu family member's head, under countless of gazes, flew into the air. At the end, it fell on the ground like a watermelon with his body still standing there, maintaining the running posture.
"This..."
At that instant, be it the Xu family or the Wang family, they were endlessly shocked. Their faces turned pale white because the Xu family member who was killed was an expert of the 8th level of the Spirit realm.
The 8th level of the Spirit realm. A person like that was so easily killed. It was even done in front of the 3 family masters, so it could be imagined how strong the person who attacked was.
Just as everyone's nerves were tightening, clear sounds of footsteps suddenly resonated outside of the Chu family residence and broke the current silence.
But, when the unhurried footsteps sounded out at that time, it made people uneasy and even frightened as if every step violently throbbed their hearts.
Finally, under the gazes of the crowd, a figure appeared within their vision. It was a young man.
A young man that was wearing a blue, long robe and holding a big banner.
The banner was very special. On it was a green coiling dragon. In the middle, there were three big words. It was the symbol of the Azure Dragon School, the "Azure Dragon Banner".
But compared to the domineering Azure Dragon Banner, the young man was clearly more terrifying. On his young face was blood and his entire body was emitting blood stench and also an extremely pressing killing intent.
*bang*
Suddenly, the big banner in the young man's hand dropped. With a bang, he stabbed the banner into the stone slabs and the jolt created several cracks.
"Today, those who invade my Chu family, die!"


MGA Capitulo 89 – Now It's Your Turn
"Today, those who invade my Chu family, die!"
Chu Feng's voice boomed with power. Every single word was absorbed into their souls. Almost everyone who heard that sentence couldn't help but shiver and chills went down their spines. Even the Chu family were no exception.
The young man in front of them was too terrifying. His entire body was covered with blood and his suffocating killing intent made others not dare to take him as a young man. They involuntarily took him as a demon. A demon that killed without blinking.
"Who are you?" The master of the Xu family yelled out first. It was the answer that every single person urgently wanted to know.
Although from his clothing, they could tell that Chu Feng was a core disciple of the Azure Dragon School. Although from the Azure Dragon Banner they could also tell that Chu Feng was a core disciple of the Azure Dragon School.
However, currently, blood was everywhere on Chu Feng's body. Even his face was unclear. People did not even know who he was. Just now, he called himself as a Chu family member so naturally, people did not know what to do.
They did not know when the Chu family had a young man like him appear. Even the Chu family did not know when they had a core disciple.
"Chu family, Chu Feng!" Chu Feng coldly replied.
"What? Chu Feng?"
"It's Fenger?!!"
When those words came out, a huge uproar was set off within the crowd.
The name Chu Feng resonated within a hundred miles of the mountain. It could be said that he was a person that no one did not know.
But from what they knew, Chu Feng was only 15 years old and he was only at the 6th level of the Spirit realm. How did he become a core disciple? How did he so easily kill off experts of the 8th level?
Although they did not dare to believe it, after some more detailed assessments, they discovered with astonishment that no matter if it was his build or his silhouette, he was extremely similar to Chu Feng.
The most important part was that Chu Feng really was an Azure Dragon School disciple. If a core disciple appeared in the Chu family, Chu Feng would be the one who had the most hope.
"So it's you little demon that broke my grandson's, Xu Tianyi's, waist?" The master of the Xu family fiercely questioned.
"His skill was inferior. Breaking his waist was benevolence." Chu Feng said disapprovingly.
"You!!!" The master of the Xu family was endlessly enraged. As he spoke, he wanted to attack.
But before he even got the chance, he was stopped by the master of the Wang family and the master of the Ma family. They said extremely seriously,
"Do you not see what he is holding in his hands? It's the Azure Dragon Banner!!"
"So what if it's the Azure Dragon Banner? This person harmed my grandson. He cannot rise from bed, and even up to today, he cannot go off his bed to walk. In the future, he may not even be able to do any martial cultivation. Today, I must murder this person." The master of the Xu family angrily roared.
"Are you insane? The Azure Dragon Banner is the symbol of the Azure Dragon School! Having the banner means having the protection of the Azure Dragon School! If you dare to even touch Chu Feng, not only you, even our two families will have disasters fall upon them."
The two family masters were extremely terrified. They were not afraid of the Chu family but they had to be afraid of the Azure Dragon School. Although the Azure Dragon School was only a second-class school within the Azure Province, to them, they were still a huge monster.
The Azure Dragon School didn't even need to send out a huge army. A few inner court elders could be sent out and their family would be exterminated. They did not dare to provoke nor offend them.
"You two are the insane ones. Do we have any path of return right now? Can't you see what the Chu family has become because of us?"
"Right now, we have no retreat. If we kill Chu Feng, we will offend the Azure Dragon School. If we don't kill him, the Azure Dragon School will not let us go either."
"However, if we kill Chu Feng right now, the Azure Dragon School won't receive the news right away. We can still pack our stuff and leave. If we don't kill him, the Azure Dragon School will send people very quickly and not even leave anything behind." The master of the Xu family said seriously.
Hearing those words, the two family masters also sank into deep thought. Suddenly, they felt that the master of the Xu family was correct. Today, they already forced the Chu family to this extent. How could the Chu family who had the support of the Azure Dragon School forgive him?
They really walked into a dead end. If they killed to the end, they would still have a string of hope. But, if they stopped at that moment, there would only be a road of death.
"Fenger, run! Leave us!" Feeling that the situation was not going well, Chu Yuan loudly yelled out.
"Fenger, escape! Only by leaving your life can you take revenge for our Chu family!" Also at the same time, the master of the Chu family, Chu Yuanba, loudly yelled out.
Hearing that, the three powers, Xu, Wang, and Ma, did preparations to prevent Chu Feng's escape. The three family masters even emitted their auras of the Origin realm and prepared to attack Chu Feng.
*ta*
But just at that time, not only did Chu Feng not back away, he even stepped forward. On the face that was full of blood, a confident smile rose up as he said, "I already said it. Those who invade my Chu family, die."
*whoosh* Before he even finished saying, a gust of wind rose and Chu Feng disappeared.
"Ahh~"
Almost at the same time that Chu Feng disappeared, several cries rang out within the courtyard. Looking over, they saw several Xu family members decapitated and they were killed by Chu Feng.
*whoosh* But just as they found out about that, Chu Feng disappeared again. Following that was the death of several Ma family members.
"Bastard. Join hands and kill him."
At that instant, the master of the Xu family roared and rushed towards Chu Feng. Quickly after, the master of the Wang and Ma family closely followed him.
At that moment, Chu Yuanba, Chu Yuan and the others were endlessly tense. They wiped their cold sweat for Chu Feng because no one felt that the Chu Feng, who was only at the 7th level of the Spirit realm, could escape from three experts of the Origin realm.
Although there was only one word of difference between Spirit realm and Origin realm, the realm between the two could be said to be the distance of heaven and earth. It was simply a large, impossible to pass gap. It was impossible to discuss the two together.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
However, the unexpected thing was that although the 3 family masters had atmospheres like a rainbow, extremely quick speed and even stronger power, they had no way to match Chu Feng's speed. Every time, they were one step slower.
They could only watch as the people from their own family wretchedly died from Chu Feng's hands one after the other. They could not do anything because Chu Feng's speed was simply too quick. So quick that it exceeded common sense and they had no way of catching up to him.
Under those situations, after a short moment, within the entire courtyard, other than the Chu family, there were only three people remaining from the Xu family, the Wang family, and the Ma family. They were the three family masters. As for the others, they all died and their death was from beheading.
"Bastard, I will cut your corpse into 10 thousand pieces." Looking at the bodies that filled the ground, looking at one family member dying after the other, the three family masters were enraged to the extreme.
*ta* But just at that time, Chu Feng suddenly stopped his wandering steps and stood in front of Chu Yuanba and Chu Yuan. He cast his icy cold gaze towards the three family masters and coldly said,
"Now it's your turn!"


MGA Capitulo 90 – Spirit Realm Battling Origin Realm
The current Chu Feng was like a person of blood. He was covered with blood all over his body but not a single drop of it was his. All of them were the blood of his enemies.
The bloody Chu Feng stood there and he appeared more or less scary. His pair of sharp eyes were as if they were dyed with blood. His eye truly turned red from all the killing.
"What a conceited brat. If I don't skin you alive today, I am not worthy of being the Xu family's master."
Although Chu Feng already displayed something that would shock the world, the master of the Xu family already lost his reason from rage and he did not care about that.
The air around his body were already twisting and layers of Origin power continuously surged out from within his body. The strong pressure became a formless hurricane as it engulfed everything around him. If it wasn't for Chu Feng's resistance, the Chu family crowd would have been even more heavily injured by the pressure.
As for the master of the Wang and Ma family, they were doing the same. Their heart was extremely painful as they saw their family die and fall one after the other in front of them.
Especially when their family were killed by decapitation. A complete corpse was not even remained. How could they endure that?
"Chu Feng, leave your life here!"
The master of the Wang family attacked first. He clawed the air in front of him with his big hand and his Origin power flooded out. It formed into a transparent huge hand that was 2 meters tall and fiercely clawed towards Chu Feng.
That attack was not small. Although it was only a rank 3 martial skill, when it was used by an expert of the Origin realm who restructured it with Origin power, the might increased by dozens of times.
"Hmph."
But even if it was such a terrifying attack, Chu Feng's expression was unchanged as it was fearless. Operating the Mysterious Technique, he raised his hand and sent an Illusionary Palm to forcefully smash away the martial skill from the master of the Wang family.
*ta ta ta...*
However, Chu Feng underestimated the experts of the Origin realm. Even though he blocked the martial skill of the Wang family master, the tyrannical Origin power still forced Chu Feng a few steps back.
"Boy, let's see if you can take my Stone Fists."
Seeing that Chu Feng got pushed back, the 3 family masters rejoiced. The Ma family master quickly attacked and several fists struck out. The fists from condensed Origin power were like huge boulders as they emerged while hiding the sky and covering the ground.
His attacks were not only directed towards Chu Feng himself. They were also directed at the Chu family who were behind Chu Feng as he wanted to quickly kill them all.
Without saying anything, Chu Feng's legs slightly moved into a horse riding stance and the robe on his body started to move without any wind. Within his eyes, two rays of lightning suddenly appeared.
*bzz*
Countless thick lighting were like rolling lightning snakes. They appeared from Chu Feng's body, intertwined, and surged forward. They formed a dense wall of lightning that did not let any wind pass. It completely held back the fist formed from the condensation of Origin power.
"Haa!"
After taking the attack, Chu Feng angrily yelled out. The snakes of lightning abandoned defence and started to attack. The lightning dragons that were as if they were furious made an ear-piercing roar. The dazzling lightning split and attacked the three family masters.
"This power, this form, it's a rank 5 skill. This boy can use a rank 5 skill."
The expressions of the three family masters changed greatly. No matter what, they never would have thought that Chu Feng could already use a rank 5 skill. If it was said that they could only yearn for rank 4 skills, they could only extravagantly hope for rank 5 skills.
After all, only core disciples could cultivate in rank 4 martial skills. As for rank 5 martial skills, even if they could cultivate it, one needed extremely strong comprehension power to succeed in training in it.
Even if they were at the Origin realm and they got a rank 5 martial skill, they might not even be able to control it so proficiently. Besides, they did not even have any chances to cultivate rank 5 martial skills.
So, at that moment, when they saw the display of Chu Feng's 3rd Thunder Style, they were both surprised and angry. Surprised that he could use a rank 5 skill at that age, angry because of jealousy.
They had lived for half a generation yet they did not even have the chance to cultivate rank 4 martial skills. Yet, Chu Feng could cultivate rank 5 martial skills at that age. It made them feel the unfairness.
However, where did fair come from in the world? The world was a survival of the fittest. An era when one ate another.
"Haa!"
As they were shocked, the three family masters did not dare to be slow. They all fully used their own martial skills that they were skilled in to defend against Chu Feng's attack. Even though the ranks of their martial skills were far weaker than Chu Feng's rank 5 martial skill, their foundation, the Origin power, compensated for that.
*rumble rumble rumble*
Waves of explosive rumbling stirred up waves of energy ripples. Within the Origin power came lightning that engulfed the middle of the courtyard. The stone fragments on the ground swirled in the air. The buildings around shattered. Even the Chu family members that retreated were forced even further away by the waves.
"So strong. Fenger can fight against three experts of the 1st level of the Origin realm while only being at the 7th level of the Spirit realm."
The current Chu Yuanba was as if he forgot about his own injuries. His eyes did not even look away as he stared at the battle between Chu Feng and the three family masters. He had never seen nor heard a person that did not lose when the difference was an entire realm.
"Chu Feng is really strong."
Other than Chu Yuanba, the other Chu family members were also focusing their attention on the battle. However, while looking at the shocking battle and the destructive attacks, other than shock, they had another complicated emotion.
Within the entire Chu family, including Chu Yuanba and Chu Yuan, not a single person thought that at the time of the Chu family's calamity, the one who would stand in front of them would be this young man.
Looked down upon when he was young. Insulted when he was young. Bullied when he was young. Discriminated against when he was young.
But even if it was even more impossible to think, the person who was standing in front of them was that young man. He threw away his own opinion of them, threw away the humiliation he suffered before, and at that moment, he was using his life to protect the entire family.
When the survival of a family landed into a person's hands, that wasn't much because every family would have a person like that. The backbone of their soul.
However, when the survival of a family landed into the young man's hands who had been disdainfully looked upon by countless people, that was the real shocking scene. The scene was enough to shake the deepest areas in their hearts.
"Good luck Chu Feng!"
No matter if they were willing to or not, at that moment, those words were yelled in every single heart of the Chu family members. In front of them, the survival of the Chu family was truly within Chu Feng's hands.


MGA Capitulo 91 – Unite
*rumble rumble rumble*
The battle continued as Chu Feng fought against 3 experts of the Origin realm by himself. Although he did not have the advantage, he was certainly not disadvantaged.
An unheard miracle was being performed right in front of the crowd. The Chu family all urgently hoped that Chu Feng could win. Not only did it represent that they could be saved from this calamity, it also meant that the Chu family could reach a whole new peak.
With the young man who could create miracles, they knew that their Chu family would not be unordinary anymore. At least, they would not be curled up in the small little Leaning Mountain Town.
*bzz*
Suddenly, several lightning snakes stacked on one another and swept past. It was like a long lightning whip and it scattered all of the martial skills from the 3 family masters, continuously pushing the 3 of them back.
"Boy, don't even think of being imperious." Being shattered by one attack, the three family masters counterattacked at the same time. They condensed an even stronger Origin power, displayed even stronger martial skills and started to attack Chu Feng.
However, no matter how much strong the attacks were from the family masters, in front of Chu Feng's lightning, it was in vain and it could not even harm Chu Feng in the slightest.
"Is this boy even human? Does he have endless spiritual energy in his body?"
"No need to rush. Since he used rank 5 martial skills, it meant that he also trained in the Mysterious Techniques. Having sturdy spiritual energy in his body is very normal. However, rank 5 martial skills consumes a lot of spiritual energy. With his cultivation, he can't go on for long."
"That's right. Even if his spiritual energy gets more sturdy, there will be a time when he gets dried out. He cannot endure past us. If this goes on, he will lose without a doubt." The three family masters quietly communicated.
That was because Origin power and spiritual energy could be said to have the difference of heaven and earth. So, even if Chu Feng used his might of the rank 5 martial skill and was able to fight against them temporarily, they thought that Chu Feng's spiritual energy would dry up sooner or later. When that time arrived, naturally, they could win against Chu Feng.
*whoosh*
But just at that time, strong wind started to rise under Chu Feng's feet and he instantly disappeared. When Chu Feng reappeared, he was behind the master of the Ma family. The hand that was like a blade already chopped towards his neck.
*poof*
Everything happened too fast and too sudden. They only saw Chu Feng's hand which was covered with lightning chop like a scythe. Blood sprayed out and before the master of the Ma family could even react, his head already fell with that proud smile still hung on his face.
"Old fellows, don't be careless when fighting me."
As he killed the master of the Ma family with one strike, on the corner of Chu Feng's mouth was an evil smile. He stepped forward and formed strong wind again before disappearing.
"This boy is too fast, be careful."
Seeing that, the remaining two family masters frowned and did not dare to have even a trace of carelessness. They stood back to back and started to strictly defend.
*whoosh*
Just at that time, Chu Feng suddenly appeared. His arm suddenly flashed, and the lightning that was on his hand suddenly surged out and became a lightning sword. It chopped towards the back of the two people.
"Boy, don't look down on us." The two family masters used their strong methods at the same time to block Chu Feng's attack.
*whoosh* But, they only saw Chu Feng lightly smile. Before the sword of lightning even sliced down, his body disappeared once again and he arrived behind the master of the Wang family.
"Careful!" The master the Xu family reacted first and he quickly yelled out.
But it was too late. Chu Feng already attacked and the lighting swept past. With a poof, the head of the Wang family master also flew up and he died right there.
Seeing two people who were killed by Chu Feng within a blink, the anger that was on the face of the Xu family master no longer remained. Replacing it was fear. Under the threat of death, he finally felt fear.
At that instant, he had a thought. It was that when they fought against Chu Feng, there was never a chance of victory. From the start, the young man seemingly never truly fought with them. It was more like he was toying with them.
"You...You...I'll kill you!
Knowing that his life was reaching the end, the master of the Xu family could only put everything he had and left nothing behind. He used his most fierce attack on Chu Feng.
However, in Chu Feng's eyes, even stronger attacks were useless towards him. In front of his Imperial Sky Technique, in front of that absolute speed, the strength of the 1st level of the Origin realm was really not enough.
*whoosh* Chu Feng's body shot forward and arrived behind him like a demon. With the wave of his hand, he easily killed the master of the Xu family.
With that, the 3 experts of the Origin realm all died by Chu Feng's hands. Their death was the same as their family. They were decapitated.
"Huu~~~"
At that instant, the Chu family crowd couldn't help but inhale a breath of cool air. Chu Feng's performance was too unexpected and he was simply so imaginably strong.
At that instant, there was no one cheering and only there was only silence. So silent that other than breathing, one could only hear the beating of hearts. Their hearts which were full of emotion.
A young man who was only at the 7th level of the Spirit realm could kill 3 people at the 1st level of the Origin realm.
A young man who was only 15 years old but had already became a core disciple of the Azure Dragon School and could use rank 5 skills.
That young man, no matter where, was going to be called a genius. That genius belonged to the Chu family. Every single Chu family member knew that not only were they saved, they were even destined to rise abruptly as long as the young man was willing to.
The curtains of the huge battle fell and the Chu family started to clear the corpses that were everywhere in the Leaning Mountain Town. No matter if it was the Chu family members or town citizens, they all got a dignified bury.
However, the heads of the Wang, Xu, and Ma family, they were hung on the walls of the Leaning Mountain Town. That could be said to be "killing the chicken to warn the monkey" but it was really a flaunt of power.
In the Chu family's conference hall, the place where Chu Feng was not qualified to enter before, all of the Chu family's backbones were there. As for Chu Feng, he sat on the seat of the head.
"Fenger, following what you said, invitation letters were sent towards the various powers in the mountain area."
Chu Yuanba's injuries were already taken care of, but this main backbone of the Chu family was reporting some things to Chu Feng and his attitude was very humble.
"Mm." Chu Feng nodded and didn't say much. He didn't even look at Chu Yuanba as he continued to look over the book within his hands.
Facing Chu Feng who had that attitude, Chu Yuanba could only dryly laugh. As for the other backbones of the Chu family, they did not dare to say anything. They knew that from today on, in the Chu family, it was not Chu Yuan's words that counted nor Chu Yuanba's. It was Chu Feng's words.
It had nothing to do with experience nor seniority. It was because Chu Feng had the strength. After all, without him, everyone would have been dead.
"Fenger, I wonder why you sent out invitations to those powers?" Finally, Chu Yuan spoke. Today, only him, his foster father, dared to speak to Chu Feng like that.
After hearing Chu Yuan's words, Chu Feng closed the book in his hands, raised his head, slightly smiled and said,
"I just feel that it's time to unite all the powers in this mountain area."


MGA Capitulo 92 – Chu Feng's Ancestry
The Chu family's meeting concluded. Chu Feng and Chu Yuan returned to their current residence.
"Father, I have something that I want to ask you." As father and son were in one room by themselves, Chu Feng spoke to ask about something.
"Fenger, there's no harm in speaking your mind about anything." Chu Yuan looked at Chu Feng and his gaze was full of love and proudness.
Chu Feng's performance shocked him one time after the other. Today, he even saved the Chu family, and within his heart, he already became his greatest pride.
Seeing that, Chu Feng did not drag the conversation and while smiling, he said the question that he had always wanted to ask, "Father, who are my biological parents and why did they need to abandon me?"
"That's..." When Chu Feng's words came out, the Chu Yuan who was still full of happiness instantly froze and change on his face clearly happened.
"Father, is it some unspeakable issues?" Chu Feng saw that something was wrong.
"It's not unspeakable. It's just that, Fenger, about your parents, I hardly know anything about them." Chu Yuan dryly smiled while he explained.
"Even you don't know? Can it be that you picked me up?" Chu Feng panicked a bit.
From when he met the beggar that was so unpredictably strong yet quite insane, Chu Feng felt that his ancestry must not have been simple. So, he impatiently asked Chu Yuan that question.
However, if Chu Yuan really did pick him up from somewhere, it meant that all trails were broken and he would have no way of getting information about his parents from Chu Yuan.
"No, it's not like that. Actually, I was entrusted by someone to take care of you." Chu Yuan explained, but from his expression, one could tell that everything was not that simple.
"Entrusted by someone? Entrusted by who? And how do you know that that person was not my parent?" Chu Feng impatiently questioned.
Seeing Chu Feng's impatience, Chu Yuan's face continuously changed as if doing some internal struggle. At the end, he sighed and said,
"Ahh, since you want to know so badly, I'll tell you."
"This story needs to be started from 15 years ago. On that year, I brought some Chu family servants to go to a distant place. On the road, we passed through a forest on a mountain."
"Within the mountain forest, I met a man. That male was carrying a child and he asked me if I was surnamed Chu or not."
"Because we were escorting some goods and because the man's clothing was quite suspicious, I did not face him and answer his question."
"But I never would have thought that without that man even moving, two people exploded and died, becoming a pool of blood."
"At that time, we were terrified. We originally wanted to turn around and run, but it was useless. A formless aura bound all of us and we could not even move."
"Are you surnamed Chu? That man spoke and asked me once again. Only then did I realize that the one who killed my Chu family's servants and bound us would very likely have been that person."
"However, the me who saw such a strong person at that time was already filled with fear. How could I have noticed his question? I only blankly stared at him."
"Then just at that time, I discovered with astonishment that two flames suddenly appeared in his eyes. At the same time, all the goods that we were bringing were burnt by fire. Even the cart and horses instantly became ash."
"At that moment, he already showed impatience. I could clearly feel the killing intent that he was emitting. It was the most terrifying killing intent that I had ever felt in my life. It was as if he came from Hell."
"So, at that instant, I felt that I was, without a doubt, dead. However, he did not attack me. He only spoke and asked, for the last time, whether I was surnamed Chu or not."
"That time, I did not hesitate at all. I quickly replied to his question and I even said the circumstances of my own family and the location of the Chu family."
Speaking to that point, Chu Yuan seemed to feel extremely guilty. Chu Feng could guess why. Obviously, it was because the him at that time was afraid of death and handed over everything about the Chu family.
After all, if that person had enmity towards the Chu family, Chu Yuan's words would have completely sold the Chu family out and all of the Chu family members could not have escaped death. However, since the Chu family was still here, it meant that the man should have had another goal.
"Father, what next?" Chu Feng really wanted to know the ending.
"After that, he killed all the servants that went along with me and only left me alone. He entrusted that child to me, and that child was you."
"After taking you, that person told me to raise you well and to see you as my own. However, your name was not allowed to be decided by me. It had to be Chu Feng."
"That's..."
At that moment, Chu Feng was greatly shocked in his heart. Although he already guessed that child was him, his heart was still endlessly shocked. He never would have thought that his name was not decided by Chu Yuan. It was already decided by another person.
When he thought of the male who asked Chu Yuan the same question 3 times, it was not hard for Chu Feng to think that his biological father might also be surnamed Chu. As for why he entrusted him to Chu Yuan, it was very possible that the man did not want Chu Feng to change his surname.
"How could I dare to refuse at that time? Naturally, I promised him."
"However, he gave out a few demands. It was that I could not tell you where you came from, nor could I say that you were my own son. I had to tell you, from the start, that you were my foster son. The most important thing was that I could not do anything harmful to you and I had to let you grow up healthily."
"If any one of the demands were violated, there would only be one ending. It was that he would exterminate the entire Chu family and not leave anything."
Chu Yuan spoke the truth and finally, Chu Feng knew why Chu Yuan never spoke about Chu Feng's ancestry if he never asked and also why Chu Yuan would be so uneasy or even fearful when Chu Feng asked about his ancestry. It was because someone was always threatening him.
"Father, do you know what that male was called and if there were any special signs on his body?" Chu Feng seriously asked because hiddenly, he already had the answer in his heart.
"He did not say what he was called, but on his forehead, there was indeed a strange birthmark. It was like a flame and it was extremely weird." Chu Yuan replied.
At that instant, Chu Feng was quite calm because it was fairly similar to his guess. His ancestry really was related to the beggar on that day.
"Father, did he say anything after that? Did he mention my parents?"
"Nothing. He did not tell my anything about your parents."
"Then why did you say that he could not possibly be my father?"
Hearing those words, Chu Yuan closed his eyes and took a deep breath. Only then did he slowly spoke, "It was because after handing you over to me, it was like a heavy burden was removed. He quickly changed into a completely different person and started to yell like he was insane."
"I still deeply remember the insane words that he said that day."
"What did he say?" Chu Feng was unable to wait.
"He yelled towards the sky You've seen it right? I already did what you told me to do. Can you let me go!? I beg you, let me go!!!"


MGA Capitulo 93 – Present
Chu Yuan described the scene that year vividly and colourfully. On his face, a stunned expression was still hung there as if the scene that year reappeared in front of his eyes.
Chu Feng could also tell that what happened that day really hugely affected Chu Yuan. At least, an unerasable shadow was left deep within his heart.
Seeing Chu Yuan like that, Chu Feng also sank into deep thought. He knew that what Chu Yuan said was correct. That insane man shouldn't have been his father or else he would not have said such strange, insane words.
But, anyone who had intelligence could tell that the insane man should have been entrusted with the job of handing Chu Feng over to Chu Yuan. It could even be said that he was forced by someone. He was extremely terrified of the person that forced him, and that person was very likely Chu Feng's family.
However, that man was already so shockingly strong. How strong would the person that could force the man and even made him so terrified be?
"Where did I come from? Who are my parents? Why did they need to entrust me to others?" At that instant, within Chu Feng's heart, those were the biggest questions. The more he understood, the more he discovered that his identity was so special. Something must have been hidden behind that.
"Father, what next? Did that person say else anything to you?" Chu Feng closely asked.
"After that, he disappeared. I didn't see how he left. If it wasn't because I was carrying you, I really would have suspected if he actually appeared or not. But the facts told me that everything was real."
"As for me, I brought you back to the Chu family. Because the goods were burnt and my men were killed yet I could not say the truth, I could only lie then and say that I picked you up on the road."
"But after knowing what happened, the family did not approve of me raising you and felt that you were bad luck."
"However, today, I believe that no one would feel that you are bad luck because you saved the entire Chu family. It's just that by telling the truth to you, I wonder if that person will..." Speaking to that point, the worry on Chu Yuan's face became even stronger.
After all, that person's strength was too terrifying. Chu Yuan did not even know whether that person could hear it or not when he said all that. He felt that he was always in danger and that person could appear at anytime. However, being asked by Chu Feng, he really could not bear to not say the truth and could not bear to hide it from Chu Feng.
Because up until now, he who knew the truth was very clear that Chu Feng's scary talent was brought when he was born. After all, his ancestry was already filled with the colours of legends.
"Father, don't worry. I feel like that person would most likely be muddled and confused. I think that he already forgot about the things that he entrusted you with so he shouldn't look for trouble."
"Besides, even if he returns, you still have me. Since he entrusted me to you, he would not harm me."
Chu Feng couldn't help but think back at the scene in the Ancient City. He really felt that that person already went insane. Just because of that, Chu Feng was even more curious. What did he experience to force him into insanity? Was it his parents?
Anyway, Chu Feng already had all sorts of questions lingering around in his heart and it made him a bit confused. The Chu Feng who was impelled by those questions wanted to know the truth.
Where did he come from? Who were his parents? The most important thing was, why did his parents entrust him to others? What happened that year? Those were the answers that Chu Feng wanted to know the most.
"Ho, that would be nice. But, Fenger, no matter what happens in the future, you will always be my pride."
"Although I know that such an outstanding you doesn't have anything to do with me and I know that you got it all from your parents. However, in my heart, you are still my son."
Suddenly, Chu Yuan seemed relieved as if life and death did not matter. To him, it was already enough to have a son like Chu Feng.
"Father, don't say that. If it wasn't for you, I would have already starved to death. How could I even be here today? No matter what others say, in my heart, you are my father. A well-qualified father."
Chu Feng's words all came from his heart. If it wasn't for Chu Yuan who took him in that year, other people might not have been so passionate. Even if he followed that insane man, perhaps he would have been hit to death from some rashness.
So, Chu Feng was really grateful for Chu Yuan and he really had deep affection for him. Even if he had yearning for his own, biological parents.
The feelings from all these years made Chu Feng feel that Chu Yuan was his biological parent because up until now, the person who let him feel family love, the person who let him feel fatherly love, was none other than Chu Yuan.
However, Chu Feng did not blame his own biological parents anymore. He felt that it was most likely some unspeakable thing or else they would not entrust himself to others and they even used threats.
The current Chu Yuan could not say anything from overwhelming emotion. Tears appeared in his eyes and he was really moved by Chu Feng's words.
He felt that all these years, as a father, he did not do his job well. He did indeed let Chu Feng feel many grievances. Also, if it wasn't for the threats of the insane man back then, perhaps he would not even raise Chu Feng.
"Father, I have a present for you." Chu Feng took out a bunch of Spiritual Beads out from his Cosmos Sack and gave it to Chu Yuan. It looked like there were almost a hundred beads.
"Fenger, this is too expensive. I cannot take it."
Seeing those golden and shiny Spiritual Beads, Chu Yuan was greatly shocked. He widened his eyes and mouth while being stunned. Although he already discovered Chu Feng's Cosmos Sack, he never would have thought that there were so many Spiritual Beads within that sack.
To know, that many Spiritual Beads was huge property to the Chu family and Chu Feng was giving it all to him. Naturally, it was impossible for him to accept.
"Fenger, right now, are you in the crucial points of cultivation. With your talent, these Spiritual Beads can help you break into the Origin realm. You should still leave it for yourself." Chu Yuan started to evade them at all costs.
Chu Feng only lightly smiled, "Father, I still have Spiritual Beads. Take these. In 2 more days, all of the powers in this mountain area will come from the invitation. At that time, I'm sure that there will be some conflicts."
"Grandfather is heavily injured right now and all of the burdens will land on your shoulders. So, you need to break into the Origin realm in 2 days or else it would be very hard for those powers to acknowledge allegiance to us."
"Break into the Origin realm in 2 days?" Chu Yuan's heart tightened. Although he was pushing them away with words, in his heart, he really desired to enter the Origin realm. Seeing so many Spiritual Beads in Chu Feng's hands, perhaps he could really succeed.
"Take them."
Under Chu Feng's request, Chu Yuan could only take them. With Chu Feng's help, he started to refine the Spiritual Beads and wanted to rely on the huge spiritual energy to break into the Origin realm that he dreamed of.
At the same time, in the core zone of the Azure Dragon School, another scene was happening.
Leng Wuzui was standing in a dark underground palace. His face was extremely angry and in front of him, Liu Bing was standing there with fear all over her face.
Seeing Liu Bing like that, Leng Wuzui slightly frowned and asked seriously, "You're saying that someone is hiddenly protecting Chu Feng and it is at least an expert of the Profound realm?"


MGA Capitulo 94 – Morality and Ability
"That person was certainly in the Profound realm. Or else with Gao Le's cultivation, it would be impossible for him to be killed instantly by someone, not to mention that it was under the situation of pressure." Liu Bing said while trembling in fear and her face was full of panic.
On that day, when she and Gao Le discovered that something was wrong, to avoid Leng Wuzui's punishment, they chose to continue chasing after Chu Feng. While they were resting on the road, Gao Le went to relieve himself. However, before leaving for long, Liu Bing felt an extremely strong energy ripple and the direction was where Gao Le was.
Liu Bing listened as she went over, but she discovered that Gao Le had already died. It was the same as the Zhao Shi brothers. There were not any injuries on the surface but his organs were already shattered. It was clear that he died from overwhelming pressure.
So, Liu Bing did not dare to continue chasing and instead, she escaped back as fast as she could and told Leng Wuzui everything. At that moment, her opponent was not someone who she could take care of.
"It seems that I underestimated that Chu Feng."
Leng Wuzui sank into deep thought and Liu Bing was standing where she was while using that fearful gaze to look at Leng Wuzui. She did not dare to say half a word and it could be seen that she was really afraid of Leng Wuzui.
"Liu Bing, I will personally take care of this issue. Take a rest." Suddenly, Leng Wuzui took out a little white-jade bottle from his Cosmos Sack and gave it to Liu Bing.
"Thank you." Seeing the white-jade bottle, Liu Bing rejoiced and quickly took it. Without even thinking, she opened the top of the bottle and finished all the liquid contents in one go.
"Liu Bing, does the antidote taste different this time?" Liu Wuzui stood up with his hands behind his back and used a strange gaze to stare at Liu Bing. On the corner of his mouth, there was even a dark and cold smile.
"The taste this time seems to be a bit sweeter." Liu Bing wiped the corner of her lip, but suddenly, her face changed greatly as she pointed at Leng Wuzui and yelled, "You...You...You..."
"Oh~"
Very quickly, Liu Bing could not say anything. Her face changed from pale to green, from green to purple and her body started to emit white-coloured steam. She stuffed her hand into her throat as if wanting to dig the liquid back out. However, nothing was rewarded for her actions.
"No use in keeping you if you only do detrimental work." Seeing Liu Bing who was in pain, there was not a trace of sympathy on Leng Wuzui's face. Only when Liu Bing fell on the floor and breathed no more did he have hint of cold smile on his face.
"Intentionally letting her back to report so I know the difficulties to force me to retreat? Interesting. I would really like to know what person is playing around with me and whether you can protect Chu Feng or not."
Thinking to there, Leng Wuzui walked in front of a desk, took out paper and started to write. On that letter, it wrote "My lord father, I have difficulties in the Azure Dragon School. Could you send out our ancestor Leng to solve this trouble?"
Time elapsed, and with a blink, 2 days passed. It was the day where the Chu family invited all sorts of powers within the mountain area.
Outside of the Leaning Mountain Town, the heads of the Wu, Ma, and Wang family were still hung there. Even with a single glance it was terrifying.
Within the Leaning Mountain Town, in the middle of the martial arts training ground, there were banquets everywhere to welcome the guests coming from various places.
Although happiness and smiles were on their faces while everyone drank and chatted merrily, the atmosphere was slightly off.
After all, the Chu family excavating the black iron mine already shook the entire mountain area. The Chu family's battle between the Xu, Wang, and Ma family also spread out quite thoroughly.
The Chu family being able to fight against three families yet not lose while also beheading the family masters of the 3 Origin realm people showed that the Chu family's strength was the strongest in the entire mountain area.
When the Chu family sent out invitation towards various powers for a banquet, those who had eyes could see what the Chu family planned. So, that was why although everyone were all smiles, in reality, they were not willing to come in their heart. The reason that they did was only because they were afraid of the Chu family.
"Why is Chu Yuanba not here? On such an important day, shouldn't Chu Yuanba be hosting this?"
"Chu Yuanba is indeed strong. He could defeat those three people all by himself. However, since he has not shown his face today, I would think that he was heavily injured so it would not be good for him to show himself."
"You are correct. My guess is exactly the same. But, if only Chu Yuan is here, could he control the scene? After all, there are the existences of the Origin realm within the people who came here right?"
"I believe, in the necessary times, Chu Yuanba would show himself. Without absolute certainty, the Chu family would not invite everyone to this place. It's just that, who is that young man? How can he sit on such an important position?"
As everyone discussed, some people pointed their fingers towards Chu Feng who was next to Chu Yuan. Although Chu Feng's name already became known everywhere, there were indeed some people who did not see Chu Feng before.
"That's the genius of the Chu family, Chu Feng. Looking at his clothes, he should have already become a core disciple. That is really quite impressive."
"That means the Azure Dragon Banner is real? No wonder. No wonder the Chu family would have such a huge movement. With the protection of the Azure Dragon Banner, there really aren't people that would dare to touch the Chu family in the mountain area."
"That may not be so. Although the strength of the Wang, Xu, and Ma family has been greatly wounded, within the mountain area, there is still the Li family and the Zhao family. Their strength aren't any weaker than the Xu family before and today, those two Origin realm family masters have arrived."
"If the Chu family was only displaying their might to tell others not to even think about the black iron mine then that would be fine. However, if the Chu family wants to unite the mountain area and lead it themselves, I'm afraid many powers will not agree to it. If we all join hands, I believe that the Chu family would have a headache."
People were guessing the goal of the banquet and may powers already hiddenly got news. If the Chu family really wanted to unite the powers within the mountain range, then they would join hands and resist.
"Father, it's about time to start." Chu Feng shot a glance to Chu Yuan.
"Mm." Chu Yuan stood up and said in a loud and clear voice, "First of all, thank you everyone for coming here and joining this banquet."
"I'm sure many know that 2 days ago, my Chu family met with a calamity. Three big families surrounded and attacked my Chu family because they wanted to rob my Chu family's property. But regrettfully, they paid the price for their own wickedness."
"Although my Chu family was victorious in this battle, many of the town's citizens were harmed and many families had been met with misfortune. This made me think over it. In the mountain area, the many powers are sharing the mountain area's resources. We should originally be like a family so how could we kill one another?"
"At the end, I thought of the solution. The so-called without a compass and a set square, circumferences cannot be made. I feel like, in the mountain area, we should have some rules and the rules would be maintained by everyone."
[TN The character "compass" and "set square" forms the word "rule".]
After that, Chu Yuan stated some of the so-called rules. But in reality, it was to restrict the development of various powers so that the Chu family would have the most benefits.
*bang*
Suddenly, a table was shattered by a hit. A 9-foot, dark-skinned, big person with sideburns across his face stood up, pointed at Chu Yuan and loudly yelled,
"Chu Yuan, you want to unite us? What morality and ability do you have to do that?"


MGA Capitulo 95 – I Behead Without Exception
The big person who had the sideburns was the master of a family that existed for generations. His age was similar to Chu Yuan's and he had the strength of the 9th level of the Spirit realm. So, while facing against Chu Yuan, naturally, he did not give in.
Chu Yuan's expression did not change as he encountered the big person's actions. Chu Yuan slowly walked towards him, and at the same time, Chu Feng and the other Chu family members closely followed.
It had to be said that the movement of the Chu family really did bring quite a strong grandeur. As they walked, the hearts of many of the surrounding people jumped because the hung heads outside of the Leaning Mountain Town already proved that the Chu family were heartless and ruthless.
However, compared to others, the big person with sideburns was fearless as he stared at Chu Yuan who was in front of him and said,
"Chu Yuan, if your Chu family wants to unite the mountain area, you should find a person who's more presentable. Go and find Chu Yuanba or else you really would not be qualified to unite and lead us."
*bang* However, just as the big person finished speaking, Chu Yuan suddenly extended his hand. A clear slap fiercely landed on the big person's face.
*boom* The strong force made the big person fly dozens of meters away. As he flew in the air, the chairs and tables shattered. Many surrounding people got heavily injured just by getting hit by his forceful collision.
But, that was still the result of Chu Yuan restraining himself or else Chu Yuan's slap could have broke his brain into pieces.
The big person came to his senses and he was filled with shock. As he covered his face with his hand, he lost himself from fear and panic as he howled,
"You...You...You entered the Origin realm?!"
"Origin realm? Chu Yuan entered the Origin realm?"
When the words of the big person came out of his mouth, the surrounding crowd were endlessly shocked as well. Thinking back, the aura that Chu Yuan emitted was a bit off. It was not spiritual energy. It was Origin power. Chu Yuan really did enter the Origin realm.
Chu Yuan did not answer the big person's question and he only walked in front of him, raised his leg and kicked. With a cracking sound, he broke the big person's left leg.
"Ah~~~~~" The big person cried out in pain, hugged his leg and started to howl.
Looking at the big person who had pain all over his face, Chu Yuan's face did not have a sliver of sympathy as he only coldly smiled and said, "Am I qualified now?"
Looking at that scene, the crowd couldn't help but breathe a breath of cool air because that time, Chu Yuan did not conceal himself as he released his own aura. Without a doubt, it was the 1st level of the Origin realm.
"Chu Yuan really entered the Origin realm. So the Chu family already had 2 experts of the Origin realm."
"No wonder. No wonder even when the Xu, Wang, and Ma family acted together, they could still not beat the Chu family. The Chu family's strength is too strong."
At that instant, many people who originally wanted to oppose the Chu family erased those thoughts. Suddenly, they understood that they underestimated the Chu family. The strength that the Chu family had today was not something that they could go against.
"It's not that I'm looking down on you. However, if you're only at the 1st level of the Origin realm, you are still not qualified."
Just at that time, an aged voice suddenly rang out somewhere. Looking over, a person who was thin as firewood yet almost 10 feet tall stood up.
That old man was too skinny and too tall. As he stood there, he was just like a dried out tree that was on the verge of collapse. However, his pair of eyes were abnormally bright and it made people not dare to underestimate him.
"It's the master of the Li family. He really did come." Seeing that old man, many people cried out in surprise. Within the mountain area, that person was as well-known as Chu Yuanba, being also an expert of the 1st level of the Origin realm.
"Old Li, no need to be so direct when you speak. At least leave some face for the young ones."
Just at that time, another old man stood up. He was also very skinny but in contrary, he was very short. He looked just like a monkey.
However, ignoring his ugliness, his aura was not ordinary. He also had the cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm.
"Indeed. They came prepared." Chu Yuan slightly frowned because the old man who was like a monkey was the master of the Zhao family. It could be said that those two, within the mountain area, other than Chu Yuanba, were the strongest in the old generation.
The strength of the Zhao and Li family were actually no worse than the Xu family. It was just that they usually kept a low-profile and they belonged to those people who silently made their fortune. The most important thing was that the two families were very close to one another and their relationship was extremely good. It was obvious that they came together this time to join hands and fight against the Chu family.
"Chu Yuan, go get your old father. You are not equal to the both of us." The master of the Zhao family waved his hand towards Chu Yuan but never looked at him in the eye. It was obvious that he did not even put Chu Yuan in his eyes.
"Hmph, whether we are equal or not will still rely on strength."
Chu Yuan coldly snorted and rushed towards the two of them. At that moment, the him who was at the 1st level of the Origin realm had a lot of confidence. In addition to his healthy, young self, he did not put the two old men in his eyes.
"Ahh, after reaching the Origin realm with great difficulty. What a shame." The master of the Zhao family sighed, stepped forward, and dashed towards Chu Yuan. Very soon, the two of them started to battle.
The two of them displayed their Origin power. That might that was created was not little and many people were harmed by the shock. The tables everywhere were shattered and everything was in a mess.
But after a few exchanges in blows, a principle was proved. It was that the old were not easy to deal with. Although Chu Yuan was at the 1st level of the Origin realm, his control over Origin power was clearly inferior to the master of the Zhao family. Very quickly, he was in the disadvantage.
"Shameless words of the Chu family, wanting to unite us all. The Chu family is obviously not putting us in their eyes. Today, I will show the Chu family that we are not good to bully. Everyone join hands and end the Chu family."
Suddenly, many areas in the martial arts training ground exploded. They were the people from the Zhao and Li family and they did not restrain themselves as they attacked the Chu family.
"That's right, we still need to see if the Chu family even has the strength to be our boss. Everyone, join hands and destroy the Chu family."
Seeing the Chu family's might being suppressed down, many powers felt that it was a good chance and chose to join the battle. They started to attack the Chu family members.
At that instant, in the entire martial arts training ground, everything was disarrayed. However, the most eye-catching was still the battle between Chu Yuan and the master of the Zhao family. But, at that moment, under the fierce attacks of the Zhao family master, Chu Yuan was clearly unable to go on and he had hints of becoming defeated.
"Chu Yuan, today, your life shall rest." Suddenly, a figure entered the battle. It was the master of the Li family.
The master of the Li family attacked with his palm. On his palm, green light was emitted from it and strange gas was spread. It was a very dark and fierce martial skill, the Five Poison Hand.
At that instant, the people from the Chu family hidden cursed. Chu Yuan who was already disadvantaged had difficulties upon difficulties while facing the master of the Zhao family. When the master of the Li family attacked as well, he had no way to dodge. If he was stuck by that attack, even if he didn't die, he would be crippled.
*whoosh*
But just as the Li family old man was going to get his way, a body appeared like a demon behind the master of the Li family. His hand was like lightning, and as if it was a shape blade, it stabbed through the throat of the Li family master.
*poof*
With the wave of the hand, blood sprayed out and the head of the Li family master flew up. His corpse fell on the ground and died violently.
He was not finished after that. His body spun and attacked again. He went straight for the master of the Zhao family, and with the same method, after beheading the master of the Zhao family, he stably landed on the ground.
Everything happened too fast. People could not even see the person who attacked was yet the two Origin realm masters already died by decapitation. They died quite straight-forwardly.
When everything ended, when everyone locked their gazes on the person who attack, everyone was greatly shocked. They discovered with astonishment that the person who attacked was a young man. The genius of the Chu family, Chu Feng.
Chu Feng did not pay attention to the crowd's shocked expression. He only swept his gaze around the crowd and icily said,
"Today, my Chu family will unite this mountain area. Those who dare oppose it, no matter who, I behead without exception."


MGA Capitulo 96 – Golden-Purple Commanding Badge
"Hu~~"
When Chu Feng's words came out, the crowd yelled in surprise. Everything quieted down because of Chu Feng's words. Everyone stopped their battles and blankly stared at Chu Feng.
At that instant, they knew the shocking truth. It turned out the reason why the Chu family could defeat 3 families that had existed for generations was not because of Chu Yuanba nor Chu Yuan. It was because of the young man who was only 15 years old.
After all, no matter how much stronger Chu Yuanba's strength was, according to the people's understandings, his strength was not far from the 3 other family master's strength. As for Chu Yuan, they already saw his strength and it was inferior to Chu Yuanba's.
As for Chu Feng's strength, they already saw it personally. It was so strong that it was impossible for them to accept.
At that instant, most people had their eyes and mouths wide open. They felt that they did not know what do because they had no way of accepting that Chu Feng had such strong strength.
A young man who was only 15 years old could so easily behead strong people who were at the 1st level of the Origin realm. It was just like a fantasy story but when all that happened, they had no choice but to accept it. What they needed to do was not to display shock. It was to perform a choice.
"My Tian family agrees on the views of the Chu family. From today on, we are willing to follow the rules set by the Chu family and listen to the orders of the Chu family." Someone took the initiative to declare their position. It was a power that had friendly relationships with the Chu family before.
"My Qiao family is also willing to follow the Chu family." After that, the powers who remained neutral started to surrender to the Chu family.
At the end, even those who opposed the Chu family, the powers who attacked the Chu family all chose to surrender to the Chu family. It was not that they were willing to, it was just that in front of Chu Feng's absolute power, they had no choice.
No one knew how strong Chu Feng actually was. However, him easily decapitating two people who were at the 1st level of the Origin realm was an unarguable fact. Him being a disciple of the Azure Dragon School was also an unarguable fact.
So, everyone knew, as long as the Chu family had Chu Feng, no one could oppose the Chu family in the mountain area. The young man really was too terrifying.
Even if they heard of the names of geniuses, they never even personally seen a real genius. However, their eyes were opened today. They knew what a true genius was. A true genius did not care about cultivation that could not possibly be won against, yet could still easily kill someone who was a realm higher than them.
When almost all of the people surrendered to the Chu family, Chu Feng slowly walked onto a tall stage, swept his glance towards the crowd and said,
"Since everyone has displayed your position, I won't talk in circles. From today on, everything in the mountain area will be decided by my Chu family. The only word I want is, obey."
"I want your hearts to obey, not your mouth. To show your sincerity, everyone, please kneel down."
"What? What is this meaning?" Hearing Chu Feng's words, the crowd was ceaselessly shocked and they did not know what to do.
"Did I not make myself clear? I'll emphasize it one more time then. I want you all to kneel down." Suddenly, Chu Feng's face turned cold. Strong killing intent filled the air and engulfed the entire training ground.
*whoosh*
At that instant, everyone trembled from fear. They did not dare to have any hesitation and they all kneeled on the ground. Almost in the entire training ground, only the Chu family remained standing.
Everyone acknowledged their allegiance. No matter if they were the ones who were friendly towards the Chu family, or the neutral ones, or the ones who attacked the Chu family, or even the Zhao and Li family who had their family master beheaded, all of them kneeled down.
It was not that they did not have dignity. It was that while facing the threat of death, they had to let go of their dignity.
As they looked around at the crowd who were all kneeling down, the Chu family members sighed in surprise.
Especially when many of the people kneeling were those who attacked them earlier and wanted them dead. With a blink, they kneeled in front of them instead. It was quite hard to believe.
As for Chu Yuan, while standing next to Chu Feng and looking at his son who was only 15 years old, his heart was extremely complicated. He felt, compared to himself, Chu Feng was more like a master of the family.
No. Not a master of a family. The atmosphere that Chu Feng was displaying was not comparable to a little master of a family. It was the real atmosphere of a king.
"The Chu family seems quite mighty. Do you really think that the mountain area is your Chu family's world?"
"All of you are quite useless as well. You kneel to a little child who doesn't even have hair? Do you even have any dignity?"
But just at that time, a clear voice suddenly rang out. Looking over, a group of people were slowly walking into the training ground. The person who talked was quite a capable old man.
Everyone recognized the group of people who entered. It was a power within the mountain area called the Fierce Tiger Escort Office. The capable old man was the manager of the escort office and everyone called him manager Lin.
The manager Lin was from a foreign family. Using his strength of the 9th level of the Spirit realm, he led his subordinates to escort various goods for families and got some land within the mountain area.
However, compared to the Chu family, the Fierce Tiger Escort Office was still a class lower. Normally, he would be extremely polite to the Chu family. However, he dared to say all that today. It greatly confused everyone.
"Bastard. A mere external villager dares to say these words. It seems that you have gotten tired of living."
"That's right. You are only looking to die if you don't obey the Chu family."
At that instant, before even letting the Chu family speak, various powers that surrendered to the Chu family exploded first. They angrily rushed towards the people from the Fierce Tiger Escort Office.
Naturally, they wanted to get good impressions from the Chu family's. After all, the Chu family uniting the mountain area was already set. As long as Chu Feng was there, the possibilities for the Chu family in the future could be said to be infinite. At this time, it was the best time to lick the Chu family's boots.
However, facing the crowd that were full of killing intent while rushing towards him, that manager Lin was not afraid in the slightest. He took out a commanding badge from his pocket, raised it high, then loudly said, "I have the Golden-purple Commanding Badge here. Who dares to touch me?"
"What? Golden-purple Commanding Badge?!!"
[TN I really don't know any better translation other than "badge", but here are some images of it for a more general idea.]
Hearing those words, everyone was greatly shocked. The people who were originally full of killing intent instantly stopped their steps and focused their gazes on the commanding badge.
Although the gazes did not seem to be important, their faces instantly turned ashen. A formless fear surged into their hearts. Not to mention that they had no more intention to harm the Fierce Tiger Escort Office, some people already started to back away.
500 miles outside of the mountain area, there was a city called the Golden-purple City. The strength of the city was quite strong and all the land within 1000 miles of circumference was grasped by that city. It was the real ruler of the mountain area.
However, because it was quite far and because there weren't many resources in the mountain area, the Golden-purple City did not manage the mountain area so that was why many families dominated.
As for the Golden-purple Commanding Badge, only the trusted aides of the lord of the Golden-purple City had that. Seeing the commanding badge was like seeing the lord of the city and everyone would have to kneel down.


MGA Capitulo 97 – The Army Arrives
"The Golden-purple Commanding Badge! It's really that badge. How did this old man Lin get his hands on that thing?"
The faces of everyone changed because the meaning of the Golden-purple Commanding Badge was not small. It had even more deterrence than the Azure Dragon Banner that Chu Feng brought back.
At the end, no matter how much strong the Azure Dragon School got, it was only one school. It could deter powers everywhere, but it could not order powers everywhere.
However, the Golden-purple City was different. Although in terms of inside information and strength it was inferior to the Azure Dragon School, it was the overlord at that area. The so-called a strong dragon cannot suppress snakes on the ground. The same meaning applied.
[TN The idiom means that a strong force (dragon) cannot suppress the local powers (snakes).]
Also, between cities, there were interconnected relationships. Although the Golden-purple City was a second-rate city that controlled its own land, on top of it, there were still first-rate cities. In terms of strength, it would not be inferior to the Azure Dragon School.
On top of first-rate cities, there were even the Prince's Mansions. The strength of a Prince's Mansion was extremely large and it was even no weaker than the first-rate school in the Azure Province, the Lingyun School.
But the most important thing was, behind the Prince's Mansions, there was a huge monster. It was the Jiang Dynasty. The overlord of the Nine Provinces.
Which also meant, although the Jiang Dynasty did not restrict the development of various powers nor did it directly supervise the areas in the Nine Provinces, in reality, the imperial court already established a complete management system in the Nine Provinces. Everything in the Nine Provinces were within the hands of the Jiang Dynasty.
That also created the situation in which no matter how much stronger schools got, they were only a power in one area. No matter how weaker the cities were, they had the imperial court behind them as a supporter.
Schools could attack other schools, but very little of them would dare to provoke any city because they could not afford to do that.
So that was why to many families within the range of jurisdiction of the Golden-purple City, the name of the Golden-purple City was even scarier than the Azure Dragon School. The deterrence of the Golden-purple Commanding Badge far exceeded the Azure Dragon Banner.
"Why aren't you kneeling even after seeing the Golden-purple Commanding Badge?" Seeing their fearful expressions, that manager Lin flamed at them. He pointed at the crowd and started to loudly yell.
When his words came out, it really did scare the crowd and there were indeed many people who kneeled with a poof. Especially the Zhao and Li families. They were as if seeing their savior and they started to knock their heads on the ground.
Facing that scene, Chu Feng slightly frowned as he put everything in his eyes. He suddenly understood a saying. He knew what the grass on the top of the wall bends with the wind meant because at that instant, there were a group of people in front of him who were like that.
"Why aren't all of you kneeling? Do you dare to not put this Golden-purple Commanding Badge in your eyes? Do you dare not to put the city lord in your eyes?" Seeing that there were many people who did not kneel, that manager Lin loudly bellowed.
"I'll see who dares to kneel for him." Seeing that, Chu Feng also angrily bellowed.
After hearing Chu Feng's words, the ones that originally wanted to kneel did indeed confused as they entered a dilemma. Although the Golden-purple City was very impressive, after all, the emperor was high up in the mountains. With only a commanding badge, it could only be used as a bit of deterrence.
In front of them, Chu Feng was the strongest person here. If they angered Chu Feng, with his temper, he could even possibly kill them all.
"Chu Feng, your nerves are quite big! You dare to go against the rules of the Golden-purple City? Not only do you not kneel when you see the Golden-purple Commanding Badge, you even dare to threaten others. Are you opposing the Golden-purple City? Are you opposing the Jiang Dynasty?" Manager Lin pointed at Chu Feng and bellowed. Within his words were meanings of threat.
"So what if I'm opposing? Do you believe that I'll kill you right now?" Not only was Chu Feng not afraid, he even coldly yelled back.
"Fenger, do not go crazy. His Golden-purple Commanding Badge is real. You cannot attack him or else the Golden-purple City will not forgive you."
Seeing that Chu Feng really had killing intent, that frightened Chu Yuan. He quickly pulled Chu Feng's sleeve and he was deeply afraid that Chu Feng would attack that manager Lin.
"Hahaha, Chu Yuan, I see that you understand." Seeing Chu Yuan's weak attitude, manager Lin crazily laughed then loudly said,
"I won't hide it from you. Right now, the lord of the Golden-purple City already discovered about the black iron mine in the mountain area. The city lord is currently leading troops and quickly arriving here. I believe that he will reach at this place soon."
"So, from now on in this mountain area, there will be the personal management of the Golden-purple City. As for me, I'm the personally appointed manager by the city lord."
"The Chu family has done quite a deed by discovering the black iron mine. So, in the future, the black iron mine extraction will be done by the Chu family as well. However, all the extracted ores must be given to the Golden-purple City. Embezzlement is not allowed or else, without exception, beheading will the punishment."
Manager Lin's words explained everything. Currently, the army of the Golden-purple City was rushing over. That meant that Chu Feng and the others should not do anything or else the Chu family would not be able to escape death.
As for the reason why the Golden-purple City was coming, it was for the black iron mine. As for how the Golden-purple City got news about the black iron mine, it was not hard to explain. The answer was given just by looking at the Golden-purple Commanding Badge in manager Lin's hands.
Without a doubt, it must have been that old guy who told the news to the Golden-purple City and because the lord of the Golden-purple City thought that he performed a service by telling that secret, he gave a reward out. The Golden-purple Commanding Badge and the position of the manager was the proof.
"This old bastard."
Although the face of Chu Feng did not change, his fists within his sleeves were tightly clenched. He really never would have thought that there would be such a treacherous old man in the mountain area.
However, being angry was being angry. Chu Feng was still reasonable and what he could do right now was not to attack manager Lin. It was just to silently wait. Wait until the army of the Golden-purple City arrived before making a decision.
Just as manager Lin said, dozens of miles outside of the Leaning Mountain Town, a group of armored, armed, and organized men and horses were nearing.
The large group of troops had up to 1000 people in it. The strength of it was not to be underestimated. The weakest was at the 5th level of the Spirit realm, and the ones riding horses were all experts of the Origin realm. The one who led had unordinary strength.
It was a past-middle-aged large man. He did not wear armor and he only wore a wide and loose robe. The robe was purple and on it had dragons and phoenixes sewn on it. It was quite beautiful being sewn by gold.
In addition to him being not simply dressed, his face was even less simpler. A special aura was emitted from his body and others around him did not have that aura. The most important thing was his strength. He was an expert of the 9th level of the Origin realm. With one more step, he could enter the Profound realm. He was the lord of the Golden-purple City, Chen Hui.
Recently, the resources of the Golden-purple City were lacking and Chen Hui was worried about the tribute taxes. However, just at that time, he got news that a black iron mine was discovered in the mountain area. That made him crazily happy. Under his happiness, not only did he award the Golden-purple Commanding Badge to that person, he even personally brought his men to take a look at the Leaning Mountain Town.
The current him was humming a small tune and chatting with his subordinates. But, suddenly, he discovered that a person appeared in front of them and blocked their road.


MGA Capitulo 98 – Using Might to Pressure People
At that instant, the eyes of Chen Hui and many other soldiers and officers lit up. It was because the person who stood in the middle of the road and blocked them was a graceful and beautiful woman.
She was extremely beautiful. So beautiful that with a glance, one's heart couldn't help but beat quicker. That white skin, sweet, beautiful face, and figure worthy of pride. It was simply a beautiful woman that all males yearned for.
However, although she was beautiful enough, the aura emitted from her body was not simple. Especially just by standing there alone, in front of the thousand men army, already showed her courage and insight, and it also showed that she did not have kind intentions.
"This lady, I wonder what your name is? What business do you have with us by waiting here?"
After all, Chen Hui was the lord of a city. With his experience, he felt that the beautiful woman in front of him would not have any good intentions. So, he straightforwardly questioned.
"I am Su Rou, an elder of the Azure Dragon School's inner court. By waiting here, I do have something that I require your assistance for." Su Rou charmingly smiled.
"I never would have thought that with your age, you became an elder of the Azure Dragon School. I have quite a bit of admiration for you. If you need something, there's no harm in speaking your mind." Chen Hui smiled and replied.
"I know that you are on this journey because of the black iron mine in the Leaning Mountain Town. However, the black iron mine in the Leaning Mountain Town was discovered by the Chu family and they are also in charge of it right now. As for me, I have some relationship with that Chu family, so I hope that you can give me some face and don't get involved with the black iron mine." Su Rou also smiled as she replied and her tone was also quite polite as well.
Hearing those words, Chen Hui's expression did not change and he was abnormally calm. He unhurriedly smiled, "Lady Su Rou, you are incorrect. Since this mountain area is within my jurisdiction, the people within the mountain area are managed by me. The things in the mountain area are also managed by me."
"Other than the black iron mine being a huge wealth and I simply cannot let others take it, we are total strangers so I don't need to give you any face. This is the matter of my Golden-purple City. Not to mention you, even if the head of the Azure Dragon School comes, he has no right to interfere."
"Quite a tone you have there. You said that my Azure Dragon School has no right to interfere with your Golden-purple City, then I, Su Rou, will interfere today. I would very much like to see how any of you are going to pass here without my permission."
Suddenly, Su Rou's fingers extended and pointed at the road in front of her. A formless energy exploded out and a deep hole was jabbed out on the road.
*rumble*
Su Rou waved her arms and dust flew everywhere. A deep crack appeared and started to split the road.
"What an arrogant girl. I would actually like to see how you will block us."
Seeing Su Rou's actions, the soldiers and officers of the Golden-purple City were incomparably angry. Urging the horses forward, they emitted layers of Origin power as they aggressively rushed towards Su Rou.
*rumble rumble*
With horses galloping, Origin power lingering, and under the trampling of the iron hoofs and Origin power, the ground under their feet made eye-piercing rumbling noises and started to violently shake. The might that they displayed was truly terrifying.
While facing the movements of the Golden-purple City troops, Su Rou's face did not change. She only smiled as she looked at everything. Only when the army was going to step past the boundary created by the cracks did Su Rou's face change slightly.
Her snow-white cheongsam crazily danced and within her delicate body, layers of gas were emitted and they were visible by the naked eye.
The gas was extremely strong as they engulfed the Origin realm officers and soldiers. All of them became a mess as they got forcefully blown back.
"Profound realm?"
At that instant, Chen Hui's eyes lit up because he already felt that the aura Su Rou was emitting was not Origin power. It was Profound power. The young and beautiful female in front of him was in the Profound realm.
The Profound realm. Although there was only a string of distance between him and the Profound realm, the power they had was the difference between the sky and the earth. If Su Rou's strength was strong enough, even if their entire thousand man army attacked at the same time, they might not even be able beat her. That was the strength of the Profound realm.
There was a person once who was at the peak of the Profound realm and that person exterminated an entire second-rate school alone. To know that not only do second-rate schools have several hundred thousands of disciples, they also had Profound realm experts who watched over the school. However, in front of that person, they could not even take a blow.
So, after Chen Hui discovered that Su Rou was an expert of the Profound realm, a hint of worry finally rose from his calm face as he said solemnly,
"I never would have thought you would be this impressive. You can indeed block us as you are in the Profound realm."
"However, as an elder of a school, you should know the rules of the schools. If you block our way like this, are you not afraid that the Azure Dragon School will have troubles in the future?"
"Trouble? Are you not putting the Azure Dragon School in your eyes are you are not putting me in your eyes? Although in the Nine Provinces, there is a general rule of schools that forbids interference with cities, it does not mean that my Azure Dragon School is afraid of you."
"I politely asked you to help before, but not only did you not recognize my good intentions, you even used your status to threaten me."
"That's fine. I'm changing my decision now. I am not asking for your help, I am ordering you." Su Rou slowly walked past the boundary made by the crack and walked towards Chen Hui.
"What are you doing? If you dare to harm me, you will stir up a disaster for the Azure Dragon School. You are not able to take that blame!" At that instant, Chen Hui completely panicked. He had no confidence while facing a person in the Profound realm.
"Do you think that you are able to take the blame of speaking to me like that?" Su Rou's smile became icy.
"What...What do you mean?"
Feeling Su Rou's strong and tough atmosphere, Chen Hui urged the horse that he was on backwards. He subconsciously felt that it was not a good situation. The beauty in front of him was not as simple as she seemed or else she would not have said those words.
"I want to say that you are far from qualified to be able to discuss status or position with me."
Su Rou's wrist turned and a commanding badge appeared. After seeing that commanding badge, the expressions of Chen Hui and all of the officers behind him greatly changed. An indescribable fear surged onto their faces.
*whoosh* Suddenly, Chen Hui leapt off the horse he was on and kneeled with a poof in front of Su Rou. With a tone of unmatched dismay, he pleaded,
"I did not know that the second lady would come here. I have previously offended so please punish accordingly."
At that instant, whether if it were the officers on the horses or the soldiers behind, they all kneeled down and begged for forgiveness while admitting their wrongs towards Su Rou.
Su Rou's commanding badge also came from a city and that city was a first-rate city. As for Su Rou's identity, she was one of the 2 daughters of the Vermilion Citys lord.
But that was not the important part. The important part was that the Golden-purple City was coincidentally managed by the Vermilion Bird City and Su Rou was Chen Hui's direct superior.
[TN Su Rou has an elder brother so she is titled as second lady.]


MGA Capitulo 99 – Rewards and Punishments
Within the martial arts training ground in the Leaning Mountain Town. It was completely silent and the tension rose to the extreme.
Everyone could see the dust flying in the air from afar. They could hear the roar of battle horses. The army of the Golden-purple City had arrived.
"Quick, follow me to welcome the city lord." Manager Lin loudly yelled and quickly walked towards the entrance of the town. It was like he took himself as the manager of the mountain area already.
Seeing that, the crowd in the training ground did not dare to be unrespectful and they quickly followed. If they had any trace of suspicion towards the manager Lin before, after seeing the army of the Golden-purple City, their suspicions disappeared like smoke and they completely believed what he said before.
Seeing the large group of people surging out, although Chu Feng was unwilling to, he could not do anything about it. He could only follow the flow of people to the entrance of the town and to welcome the lord of the Golden-purple City.
Although in his heart, he did not put the Golden-purple City in his eyes, before having absolute power, he had no choice but to temporarily yield. At least he could not offend him for no reason.
"Chu Feng, your Chu family did not kneel even after seeing the Golden-purple Commanding Badge. I will report that to the city lord." After reaching the entrance of the town, manager Lin coldly said that to Chu Feng.
"Do what you wish." Chu Feng shot him a glance and did not bother to waste time on the little person who enjoyed his success.
"Hmph, just wait a while. The pain will come for you." Manager Lin also coldly snorted and the cold smile on the corner of his mouth became even more dark.
*rumble rumble*
Under the gazes of countless people, the rumbling sound got closer and closer. Very quickly, they saw the silhouettes of the Golden-purple City army within the dust.
Seeing the armored, organized Golden-purple Army, almost everyone were shocked by the grandeur.
At that instant, those who had conflicts with the Chu family hiddenly rejoiced in their hearts. They felt that the Chu family would have another calamity heading their way. To think of Chu Feng's arrogant manner and to think of the situation Chu Feng was going to face, there was no need to mention how excited they got.
Under the tense gazes of the crowd, the Golden-purple City army majestically arrived at the entrance of the Leaning Mountain Town under the lead of Chen Hui.
"We pay our respects to the city lord!"
Seeing that, manger Lin quickly kneeled down and at the same time, many people on scene also knelt down. Even the Chu family knelt down. Facing the one who had the most control over the Golden-purple City, they did not dare to be disrespectful in any way. However, Chu Feng still stood up.
"Outrageous Chu Feng! Kneel before the city lord!" Manager Lin pointed at Chu Feng and bellowed.
"Men have gold at the knee. Other than parents and those who I owe favours to, I, Chu Feng, will not even kneel to the heavens. Why would I even kneel to others?"
Chu Feng's words were directed towards Chen Hui. Within his gaze, there was not a single trace of fear. Instead, it was extremely honest because they was the words from his heart. Other than parents and those whom he owed favours to, even if he got beaten to death, he would not kneel to others. That was related to his dignity.
For humans, even if they yielded, there would be a bottom line. Chu Feng's bottom line was being fine even if he was hit or insulted. However, even if he got beaten to death, he would not kneel to others.
When Chu Feng's words came out, that terrified Chu Yuan and the others. They felt that Chu Feng would anger Chen Hui.
As for manger Lin and the others, they were extremely joyful. Although they knew that Chu Feng was bold, they never would have thought that he would be that bold. He was simply provoking Chen Hui and it was also like slapping his face in front of the crowd.
However, when the crowd was waiting for a good show to see how Chen Hui was going to take care of Chu Feng, Chen Hui only lightly smiled, leapt off the horse, and walked towards Chu Feng.
At the same time, several officers behind him also jumped off from their horses, followed Chen Hui and walked towards Chu Feng.
"You are Chu Feng?" Chen Hui smiled as he assessed Chu Feng. Within his gaze, there was even a bit of admiration.
"That's me." Chu Feng said neither humbly nor proudly.
"What a heroic young man, having such an atmosphere at such an age. This is really quite rare." As he faced Chu Feng's attitude, Chen Hui was not angry. Instead, he smiled and then he swept his gaze towards the Chu family and said, "Who is Chu Feng's father?"
"I am Chu Feng's father. This boy is still young so his words may be a bit straightforward. I hope that he can be forgiven." Chu Yuan even thought that Chen Hui would harm Chu Feng so he quickly pleaded for Chu Feng.
"Ahh, no need to speak like that. Having such a son is your good fortune, and it's also my Golden-purple City's good fortune! This person must be well developed."
"Your Chu family has done a good service by discovering the black iron mine. So, I reward your son Chu Feng 1000 Spiritual Beads so his cultivation can increase one step further and fight for the glory of my Golden-purple City in the Azure Dragon School."
"As for the black iron mine, your Chu family is responsible for extracting them. None of the extraction is required to be handed over to my Golden-purple City. All of it belongs to your Chu family."
"Other than that, from today on, this mountain area will be managed by the Chu family. Those who dare to not listen to the Chu family's orders means that they not listening to me, Chen Hui. I will punish accordingly without any mercy."
Chen Hui's voice was extremely clear, and in addition to the silence everywhere, his words were clearly imprinted into the ears of the crowd.
At that instant, other than the people from the Golden-purple City, almost everyone widened their eyes and mouths and were endlessly shocked. Not to mention manager Lin and those who wanted the Chu family to be humiliated, even Chu Yuan and his own Chu family felt that it was ineffable and they did not know what to do.
What was this situation? Not only did the lord of the Golden-purple City not punish the Chu family because of Chu Feng's attitude, he even rewarded 1000 Spiritual Beads to Chu Feng. 1000 Spiritual Beads!
Not only that, he even handed the black iron mine to the Chu family. The worth of the black iron mine far exceeded 1000 Spiritual Beads. If all of it was extracted, it would certainly be worth dozens of thousands of Spiritual Beads. It was inestimable wealth.
The most important thing was that he let the Chu family manage the mountain area. What was that? If the Chu family was managing, what was manager Lin doing?
"Milord, this...you...didn't you say before that the mountain area would be managed by my Fierce Tiger Escort Office?"
Indeed, at that moment, manager Lin could not continue kneeling and he quickly stood up, walked in front of Chen Hui while trembling from fear. He used a petty and low tone to ask quietly.
Hearing that, Chen Hui's expression slightly changed and he used an extremely icy gaze to look at manager Lin while saying, "Your moral conduct is improper and you are not qualified to serve me. Someone take this person's Golden-purple Commanding Badge away and behead him!"


MGA Capitulo 100 – Extermination
Under the command of Chen Hui, two officers aggressively rushed over and dragged manager Lin away from the crowd.
"City lord, please have mercy! City lord, have mercy!!!"
That broke manager Lin from fear. However, no matter how much more he begged, be it Chen Hui or the two officers, they were expressionless.
When the two officers dragged him to an empty land, one of them pulled out a blade from his waist, raised it up, and with a snapping sound, the head of manager Lin fell on the ground.
"Hu~"
That scene terrified the crowd. Almost everyone had expressions of shock and their heads were full of fog without knowing what to do.
"Milord." After beheading manager Lin, one of the officers put the Golden-purple Commanding Badge into Chen Hui's hands.
Chen Hui accepted the commanding badge while smiling as he said to Chu Feng, "Chu Feng, have you heard of the Vermilion Bird City?"
"Mm?" Chu Feng couldn't help but stare blankly. His experiences were limited so he never heard of the Vermilion Bird City.
Seeing that, Chen Hui lightly smiled and explained patiently, "Chu Feng, I believe that you should know that our Nine Provinces is ruled by the Jiang Dynasty. For better governing, the Jiang Dynasty let the 9 Prince's Mansions to manage the Nine Provinces. The one who rules the Azure Province is the Qilin Prince Mansion."
"As for the Qilin Prince Mansion, for more order while managing the Azure Province, 8 first-rate cities and 160 second-rate cities were chosen throughout the Azure Province. They covered the entire Azure Province as if they were throwing a net out. As for the cities, they had the authority of jurisdiction over various areas."
"My Golden-purple City is a second-rate city. The one who manages my Golden-purple City is not the Qilin Prince Mansion. It's the first-rate city, the Vermilion Bird City."
After hearing Chen Hui's words, Chu Feng had a complete new understanding of the various powers in the Azure Province.
Chu Feng always felt that the Jiang Dynasty was the overlord of the Nine Provinces and the various schools commanded the various areas. He even thought that within the Azure Province, what the Linyun School said was how everything went. However, it seemed like that was clearly not the case.
It could be said that the methods of the Jiang Dynasty were very ingenious because of the management system classification. Although it would not interfere with the development of various schools, in reality, it still tightly grasped the Nine Provinces within its hands.
"If the Azure Province was divided into 8 sections, the highest supervisor in the cities in this section would be the Vermilion Bird City. In 10 days, the Vermilion Bird City will organize a New Excellence Assembly."
"This so-called New Excellence Assembly is a comparison of skill between the young generation. However, the age is limited and only those under 18 years old can join."
"Although you are still young, you can still be counted as one of the outstanding people in the young generation. So, I would like you to represent my Golden-purple city to join this year's New Excellence Assembly." Chen Hui continued speaking.
"What benefits do I get from joining this assembly?" Chu Feng asked.
"If you only join, there would be no benefits. However, if you can get first place, there's a reward of 5000 Spiritual Beads." Chen Hui explained.
"That's fine, I'll join." Chu Feng nodded. 5000 Spiritual Beads were too attracting to him.
"Then it's decided. I'll give the Golden-purple Commanding Badge to you. With it, you can freely enter and exit my Golden-purple City. Find me 5 days later and I will send people to bring you to the Vermilion Bird City."
After Chen Hui handed the Golden-purple Commanding Badge to Chu Feng, he led his thousand men army away. What remained was the group of people that did not recover from the shock earlier.
Looking at the commanding badge in his left hand and the 1000 Spiritual Beads in the tray on his right hand, Chu Feng slightly frowned. He felt that there was something fishy but he could not find the reason.
After thinking for a while yet not getting the answer, Chu Feng did not continue on. He raised the commanding badge in his hand and said to the crowd, "Are there any more who refuse to obey my Chu family?"
"We are willing to follow the Chu family and we vow to be loyal and devoted."
The instant Chu Feng finished talking, the surrounding people all kneeled down. With a thunderous sound, they vowed.
If it was said that they acknowledged their allegiance before to Chu Feng because they were forced to by his strength, then at that instant, they had to acknowledge their allegiance because they were forced to by his background. With the lord of the Golden-purple City as a supporter, they really did not dare to offend Chu Feng.
"Very good. But like I said before. I don't need your mouths to obey, I need your hearts. I, Chu Feng, will not leave the ones who are not loyal around me."
"So, those who wish to devote themselves to my Chu family, they must do something."
"Kill all the people from the Fierce Tiger Escort Office, the Xu, Ma, Wang, Zhao, and Li family."
"Hu~"
When Chu Feng's words came out, it greatly surprised the crowd. Even Chu family members were endlessly shocked. No matter what, they never would have thought that after making the Zhao and Li family surrender, he would exterminate all of them.
That method of handling things had to be said to be ruthless. It was something that many adults couldn't even do. However, Chu Feng who was only 15 years old said that.
After that, the shock only lasted for a while. Very quickly, people started to attack people from the Zhao family, the Li family, and the Fierce Tiger Escort Office. To display their devotion, they had no choice but to do that.
Under Chu Feng's lead, even though the Fierce Tiger Escort Office, the Zhao family and the Li family resisted, very quickly, they still lost their lives. The powers from those families who came to the Leaning Mountain Town were all killed. None lived.
That was not even the end. After finishing off those people, Chu Feng gathered the people who were on scene and separated them into groups. He then sent them towards the Fierce Tiger Escort Office, Xu family, Wang family, Ma family, Zhao family, and the Li family to completely remove their roots in the mountain area.
As Chu Feng personally directed the slaughter, Chen Hui was leading his army and returning to the Golden-purple City.
"Milord, is the black iron mine really going to be completely given to the Chu family? What about our taxes to the Vermilion Bird City this year?" One officer asked worriedly.
"What else could have done? How do I dare to go against that person? If the taxes for the Vermilion Bird City this year isn't given, at most I would get punished. However, if that person is offended and she says some bad words in front of her father, perhaps even my head cannot be kept."
As that issue was mentioned, Chen Hui had a face of helplessness. When he thought of the scene earlier today, he still felt some lingering fear.


MGA Capitulo 101 – Arrival of Ill-Intent
"I really don't know where that Chu Feng got such good luck. He actually got connections with lady Su Rou! He was able to get lady Su Rou to hiddenly help him but she didn't even let me tell Chu Feng that she was helping."
Admiration surged onto the face of that officer as he thought of Su Rou's sweet, beautiful face, perfect figure, talent that exceeded others and her shocking background. She was simply a goddess that countless people wanted to have connections with.
"They were both in the Azure Dragon School so having connections is normal. Although Chu Feng is young, his unbending attitude is unseen on ordinary people. More or less, that person is a genius." Chen Hui explained.
"Even if he is a genius, he is too young. I checked his aura before and he only had the cultivation of the 7th level of the Spirit realm. If that spot is given to him in the New Excellence Assembly, he would certainly hold our Golden-purple City back." The officer said aggrievedly.
"Why didn't you say those words in front of lady Su Rou? You personally saw the commanding badge as well and she is really the daughter of the city lord. Do I dare to not give Chu Feng a spot in the assembly when she told me to?" Chen Hui was a bit displeased.
"Milord...I...I just feel that lady Su Rou said to give Chu Feng a spot because he could maybe help our Golden-purple City get first place and to extinguish the fire on our brows. I feel that lady Su Rou overestimated that Chu Feng."
"After all, in the New Excellence Assembly, all sorts of excellent people from cities everywhere gather together like the clouds. With Chu Feng's cultivation, he is simply too weak. Not to mention getting first, he would even be at rock-bottom."
"I've also thought of that problem and perhaps lady Su Rou is reminding me to treat this New Excellence Assembly seriously."
"I've heard rumours that this year's New Excellence Assembly would be very special. The city who gets first are exempt from taxes. Although they were only rumours, from what lady Su Rou said, perhaps it was true." Chen Hui sank into thought.
"Milord, you aren't entrusting that hope on Chu Feng right?" The officer was a bit worried.
"Of course not. Although Chu Feng is a genius, it's as you said. Currently, his strength is still too weak. If we want to get first place in the assembly this year, it seems like it's time to call Wanxi back." Within Chen Hui's gaze, there was a touch of longing.
"Big miss? She is indeed a rare genius and she's already a core disciple in the Lingyun school. If she can return, she can certainly take first place in this New Excellence Assembly."
"But it's just that...big miss left quite sulkily that year. She never went to the New Excellence Assemblies in the past so would she come back this year?" That officer was slightly concerned.
"Today is different from the past. Unless she can bear seeing me, her father, sink into a predicament and ignore it, she will certainly return." Speaking to that point, Chen Hui couldn't help but close his eyes and the past events that happened that year reverberated in his brain.
With a single day's worth of time, Chu Feng led many powers and flattened his former enemies in the mountain area.
Not only was he removing hidden diseases, it was a show of might. It let everyone know what the ending was if they opposed the Chu family.
After those things, everyone in the mountain area had a whole new look towards Chu Feng. Not only was his talent impressive, his methods were not ordinary. It made people both admire and fear him. If he could do all this in the age which he in right now, his future achievements would be immeasurable.
After handling everything, the Chu family started to rebuild the Leaning Mountain Town. Chu Feng did not return to the Azure Dragon School as instead, he prepared for the New Excellence Assembly in a few days.
5000 Spiritual Beads. To Chu Feng, that had infinite attraction. Especially when he remembered about the battle in one year and that time was currently counting down, his desire for strength became even stronger.
He must win one year later. So, he must become strong within the one year. Even if he could not reach the Profound realm, he had to be able to defeat those in the Profound realm.
However, the current him was only in the Spirit realm. He was not even in the Origin realm and the challenges that he was going to face were going to be extremely grim.
But, Chu Feng took that as a test. Took it as motivation. The reason why he dared to say "1 year" before was because he had a bit of certainty.
Since he had a special body, as long as he had enough Spiritual Beads, breaking through realms was not a problem. So that was why to Chu Feng, the thing that he was most lacking in was cultivation resources. He was insanely gathering Spiritual Beads and he did not give up any chance to get them.
At that instant, on the mountain behind the Leaning Mountain Town, Chu Feng was cultivating.
His aura thickened quite a bit again. He broke through, and by using the 1000 Spiritual Beads that Chen Hui gave him, he finally broke into the 8th level of the Spirit realm. According to Chu Feng's estimations, if he could win the 5000 Spiritual Beads in New Excellence Assembly, there would be no problem for him to step into the 9th level of the Spirit realm.
However, the New Excellence Assembly would include geniuses that were meticulously selected from cities everywhere. Chu Feng did not have 100% confidence that he could get first place.
Although in the Azure Dragon School, within the ones who were under 18 years old, Chu Feng was still considered to be one of the outstanding disciples, he had no way of confirming that he was the strongest within the area that the Vermilion Bird City controlled.
To guarantee victory, he must become strong. So, Chu Feng was currently training in the Bow of Hundred Transformations. That was the only method Chu Feng had to become stronger at that moment.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
Within Chu Feng's hands, he was holding a golden pike. The pike had rays of light lingering around it as if it could even easily break through black iron. It was a lot stronger than the weapons Chu Feng created with the 3rd Thunder Style.
When the pike was in Chu Feng's hands, it was extremely tyrannic. It was like a serpent and when it swept everywhere, it had strong grandeur and it was very vigorous. When it stuck out, just with the wind, it could bore holes through a huge tree from a distant.
The Bow of Hundred Transformations. With 3 days, it was mastered by Chu Feng. That was the scariness of Chu Feng.
What was a genius? Chu Feng was a real genius. In front of him, no matter how much harder the martial skill was, he could understand it. What he lacked were only resources.
"Who's there?"
However, suddenly, Chu Feng felt that a person was hiddenly approaching. That person concealed his aura but it was still caught by Chu Feng's Spirit power.
There was a person who was secretly observing him and his aura was concealed very well. That person's strength was certainly above Chu Feng's and that tensed him up. He cast his serious gaze tightly into the distant forest.
"You really do have Spirit power and it's even so sharp. No wonder that old guy had good impressions of you."
Just at that moment, strange laughter suddenly rang out in the forest. Following those words, a person also unhurriedly walked into Chu Feng's line of sight.
That person was not too old and at most, he would only be a few years older than Chu Feng. He was quite handsome and there was even a faint smile on his face. Although he looked amiable, Chu Feng felt killing intent within that person's gaze.


MGA Capitulo 102 – Helpers for All
"Who are you?" Facing the male in front of him, Chu Feng was very careful and on guard.
"No need to be so nervous. As for my identity, you should even call me ‘senior'. As for my name, Leng Wuzui." Leng Wuzui lightly smiled and said.
"You're Leng Wuzui? I don't think that we have anything between us. You want to help that Gong Luyun?" Obviously, Chu Feng heard of the famous Leng Wuzui. Within the core disciples, he was the only person other than him who had Spirit power.
"Ahh? You are indeed worthy of having Spirit power. Already saw through the reason why I was looking for you huh?"
"However, I am not helping Gong Luyun. He is not qualified to let me do things for him. I am only sweeping away obstructions for myself." Leng Wuzui chuckled as he slowly went near Chu Feng.
"How do you know I have Spirit power? Sweeping away obstructions? We haven't even met before so how did I even become an obstruction?" As Chu Feng delayed, he backed away and spread out his Spirit power to the extreme. He was still finding a chance to escape.
"You don't need to know about that. Also, I would advise you to give up the thought of escaping. You cannot escape in front of me." Leng Wuzui was filled with confidence.
"That may not be so."
Seeing that his thoughts were seen through, Chu Feng did not try to delay anymore and at the same time that he operated the Mysterious Technique, he also used the Imperial Sky Technique. Spiritual energy passed under his foot and strong wind rose from under his feet.
With a whoosh, Chu Feng flew past like the wind and escaped towards the depths of the forest.
"You have quite some methods, but sadly, your cultivation is too low." Leng Wuzui coldly smiled, stepped forward and he also became like the wind while chasing after Chu Feng.
He had that kind of speed not because of some special bodily martial skill. He was relying purely on his own cultivation. The 2nd genius in the Azure Dragon School who was only 19 years old had the cultivation of the 9th level of the Origin realm. With one more step, he could enter the Profound realm and be equal to Gong Luyun.
"This guy is unexpectedly strong." Chu Feng already used the Imperial Sky Technique to the extreme yet he could not get rid of Leng Wuzui. In addition, he was even quickly getting closer. The pressure of the Origin realm's 9th level started to suppress his speed.
"Give it up. With your current cultivation, no matter how much better your talent is, you will not be able to escape from my hands."
Leng Wuzui pointed at Chu Feng with his finger and a ray of light exploded out. The power was strong and with a blink, it bore holes through several huge trees and it locked onto Chu Feng's position.
"Want to kill me? It won't be that easy." Chu Feng grinded his teeth and his steps changed. The white-coloured wind instantly dissipated and replacing it was lightning.
The lightning was clearly different than Chu Feng's Three Thunder Styles. It was a dark-blue colour and his speed became extremely fast. It was like several small lightning snakes surrounding Chu Feng's feet and it separated the sole of his feet from the ground.
*whoosh* Suddenly, the tip of Chu Feng's feet touched the ground and with a blink, he appeared a dozen or so meters away. Every step was like that and his speed was unbelievably quick. Not only did he succeed in dodging Leng Wuzui's attack, he started to use that terrifying speed to quickly escape far and he left Leng Wuzui behind.
"What a mysterious technique. That is absolutely not a martial skill from my Azure Dragon School. Where did this boy get it from?" Leng Wuzui's gaze flashed and he expressed unexpectedness.
Following that, his steps changed as he performed abstruse footsteps. With that, his speed instantly increased by several times and he was catching up to Chu Feng again. However, this time, his chasing speed got even quicker.
"Damn it. I still can't get rid of him huh?"
Chu Feng was a bit bitter. He clearly succeeded in using the middle stage of the Imperial Sky Technique, however, facing Leng Wuzui who was at the 9th level of the Origin realm, he was still obviously helpless. After all, the distance between the realms was too large. Even if Leng Wuzui used the most basic bodily martial skill, he could still catch up to Chu Feng.
"Chu Feng, don't think of escaping today." Leng Wuzui pointed with his finger and several radiant lights shot out. They swept past Chu Feng like rain and they were almost undodgeable.
It was a rank 5 skill. Especially under Leng Wuzui's use, that power was not something Chu Feng could defend against. If he got hit, he would certainly get made into a human sieve.
"This aura?" But just at that time, Chu Feng rejoiced. He felt a familiar aura coming near him.
*whoosh* Indeed, just as Chu Feng felt that aura, a white figure appeared behind Chu Feng like a ghost. It was Su Rou.
*bang bang bang* Su Rou waved her sleeve and a strand of Profound power condensed out. It formed into a mirror in front of her, and when Leng Wuzui's attack struck the mirror, they forcefully bounced back. The speed of the attacks even doubled in an instant.
Seeing that, Leng Wuzui did not panic and he stepped away. As his body moved, all the reflected attacks were dodged.
"Elder Su Rou."
At that moment, Chu Feng was joyful. He had seen Su Rou's strength before and it was extremely strong. When he felt the aura she emitted just now, Su Rou was not in the Origin realm. She already entered the Profound realm.
Although he did not know why Su Rou appeared at this place, Chu Feng knew that the crisis in front of him would most likely be dissolved.
"Although I knew that people would harm Chu Feng, I never would have thought that it would be you. I thought you didn't get along with Gong Luyun? Why are you helping him?" Su Rou charmingly smiled and it was as if she was not facing an enemy.
"Ho...Interesting. Why do you two think that I must be helping Gong Luyun if I attack Chu Feng? Can't it be for of personal grudges?"
"However senior Su Rou, I quite admire your methods. Gao Le and the Zhao Shi brothers, no matter what you say, were the core disciples of the Azure Dragon School. It could even be said that you knew Gao Le. How did you have the heart to kill him?" Leng Wuzui smiled and asked.
"I killed Gao Le? I don't understand what you mean!" Hearing those words, Su Rou's expression changed and confusion was all over her face.
"Oh? Your acting is quite nice and you are quite vicious. It seems that you cannot be left alone." The corner of Leng Wuzui's mouth rose into a dark and cold smile.
"Quite a tone you have there. You dare to speak to me like that with your mere 9th level of the Origin realm?"
"Although I don't know why you need to attack Chu Feng, being disciples from the same school, you dare to do these kinds of things to juniors. As an elder of the Azure Dragon School, I must give you a lesson." Su Rou's face turned cold and as she spoke, she was going to attack as well.
But just at that time, a boundless pressure engulfed the mountain forest. At the same time, an aged voice rang out,
"If you want to give Zuier a lesson, you need to pass through me first!"


MGA Capitulo 103 – Spirit Formation
The boundless pressure engulfed them and even the sky-high trees shook. The flowers and grasses under their feet flew everywhere and the area was not peaceful any more.
Profound realm?!
Chu Feng and Su Rou were even more shocked. They felt, from the aura, that he was an expert of the Profound realm. The aura was even stronger than Su Rous.
Under the envelopment of the pressure, an old man unhurriedly walked out from the forest and arrived next to Leng Wuzui.
The old man was wearing black clothing and he was not even 5 feet tall. His appearance did not look like anything special but on his old face that was filled with wrinkles, it emitted waves of fierceness.
The old man was quite old. He shook and wobbled as he walked as if he was going to fall at any moment and die just like that. His life seemed to have reached the very end, but Chu Feng and Su Rou did not dare to underestimate him because the aura that engulfed them did indeed come from that old man.
Ancestor. Seeing that person, Leng Wuzui respectfully greeted him.
Ancestor of the Leng family. I never would have thought that even you came out. It seems that your Leng family is really determined to take care of Chu Feng.
Im just curious how Chu Feng offended you to the point that he must die. Su Rou seemed to know that Leng ancestor.
Zuier is the hope of my Leng family. Those who block his path will be removed at all costs by my Leng family. Even if lady Su Rou has a special identity, my Leng family will not have any mercy. The Leng ancestor faintly smiled but his smile was extremely frightening.
Your meaning is that you will eradicate me, Su Rou, as well? Su Rou asked in a cold voice.
Lady Su Rou. Why ask when you already know the answer? The Leng ancestor had a very sinister smile.
Hmph. Thatll depend if you have the ability or not. Su Rou grabbed Chu Fengs arm, turned around and wanted to escape.
However, before she even moved, the pressure that engulfed that area strengthened. It was like a formless cage that tightly locked the two of them.
3rd level of the Profound realm!! Su Rou was greatly stunned. Every level of the Profound realm was an impassable gap. Unless they had extremely good talent, it was impossible to resist against that.
Although the Leng familys ancestor was only 2 levels above Su Rou, she was already unable to free herself. She even lost her ability to escape while being in front of him.
That was the scariness of the Profound realm. Every level was higher than the previous and every level was extremely hard to breakthrough. That was why, within the Azure Province, there were quite a few Profound realm experts yet not a single person who could enter the Heaven realm.
In the journey of martial cultivation, one used the aura of the sky and the earth to open up the extremes of the body. The quality of ones body, strength of ones comprehension ability determined the length of their journey in martial cultivation.
The only thing that could be confirmed was the farther one cultivated, the harder it was to control ones aura and the mysteriousness of their body was extremely difficulty to open as well. However, the gained power got more and more stronger.
Lady Su Rou, if you need to blame something you can only blame yourself for being so nosy and thus, you used your life as the price.
The Leng familys ancestor got closer one step at a time as he looked at Chu Feng and Su Rou who were restricted by his own pressure. The smile on his face got wider and wider like he was looking at two ants within his palm. It was as if with a slight movement of his finger, he could easily crush the two of them to death.
Old man Leng, if you dare to attack me and my father knows about it, he will exterminate your Leng family. Seeing that, Su Rou panicked as well. The strength of the old guy was no small matter and she really did not have any ability to resist.
As for Chu Feng, he did not even have the ability to struggle. That ancestor Leng was too strong. If it wasnt for Su Rou who used her aura to protect Chu Feng, just with the pressure of the Leng ancestor, it would be enough to suffocate Chu Feng.
No need for you to say that. I know what situation my Leng family would be if your father knew about this. Sadly, he will never know that you were killed by me. The ancestor of the Leng family slowly raised his palm and a terrifying energy converged by Profound power was gathering within his palm.
How do you know that Su Rous father wont know about this? But just at that time, another voice rang out within the forest.
That voice was extremely strange because it did not come from a single point. It came from everywhere. It was not that loud yet it shook ones soul as if the voice came from their own hearts.
Who?
That voice completely horrified the ancestor of the Leng family and Leng Wuzui. Just by hearing that voice, they could tell that the old man was a cultivating expert.
*humm* Feeling that something was wrong, Leng Wuzui quickly spread out his Spirit power and wanted to find the direction of that person.
Ahh! However, just as he used his Spirit power, he cried out in pain. He hugged his brain with both of his hands and with a poof, he kneeled down.
Zuier, what happened? Seeing the bizarre scene scared the ancestor. He threw his body forward and he arrived next to Leng Wuzui to support him up.
Leng Wuzui had a pale face at that moment. Both of his eyes were perfectly round from widening and terror filled his eyes. With his trembling lips, he said in a low voice, ItsIts..Its a World Spiritist!
What? Hearing those words, the ancestor Lengs expression greatly changed. World Spiritist? That was an extraordinary character! Why did he appear here?
Ancestor, run!! But just at that time, Leng Wuzui suddenly thought of a person and he quickly yelled out loud.
The Leng ancestor did not even think after seeing Leng Wuzuis terrified expression. He grabbed Leng Wuzui and wanted to escape.
*bang*
Ahh! But just as he ran two steps away, he yelled in pain and he bounced back. It was as if he collided into a wall.
*bzz* Just at that time, Chu Feng and the others also discovered with astonishment that there really was a half-transparent wall in the area in which the ancestor collided with. The wall was spreading out and it quickly sealed the two Leng family members within.
Haa! The ancestor Leng stood up, raised his hand into a fist and threw it towards the half-transparent wall.
That punch had quite some power. Not only did it contain condensed Profound power, it was also a martial skill. However, when that attack contacted the wall which seemed to be as thin and as weak as ice, it only made a huge boom and it did not move the wall in the slightest. There was not even a single crack. Looking back at his fist, blood started to flow and he was quite injured.
What is this thing?!
The ancestor of the Leng family panicked. The half-transparent wall already locked the two of them in every single direction be it over their heads or under their feet.. It was currently retracting and if that continued, the two of them would be compressed alive.
Thinking to that, the ancestor of the Leng family displayed an even stronger martial skill and kept on striking that mysterious wall. The strong power endlessly shook the ground and cracks even appeared under Chu Fengs feet.
The attacks that disturbed the outside world did not even move the mysterious wall. It did not even change the speed that the wall was retracting at.
As the ancestor of the Leng family tried to resist with everything, Leng Wuzuis face was ashen and he stood there blankly. His body couldnt help but tremble as he said,
Ancestor, thisthisthis is a Spirit Formation!


MGA Capitulo 104  Test
Spirit Formation?
When Leng Wuzuis words came out, not only the Leng ancestor, even Chu Feng was shocked.
The Spirit Formation was the methods of World Spiritists. If the strange wall in front of their gazes really was the Spirit Formation, that also meant that there was a World Spiritist helping them at that instant.
*poof* Suddenly, Leng Wuzui kneeled on the ground and started to hit the ground with his forehead repeatedly.
As he strongly pounded, he begged, Master, I know I have wronged. Please give me one more chance and this will not happen a second time.
Leng Wuzuis actions made others not know what to do and just at that moment, that aged voice rang out once again,
You clearly knew that you shouldnt have done that yet you still did. You are simply not putting me in your eyes.
A person appeared outside of the Spirit Formation like a ghost. He did not make any sound and it was as if he stood there all along without being detected.
After seeing that person, Chu Feng and the others were shocked because no matter if it was Chu Feng or Su Rou, or even Leng Wuzui, they all recognized him.
A white-coloured long robe filled with symbols that covered the entire body, only being able to see the pair of hidden eyes. That was the guest elder of the Azure Dragon School, Zhuge Liuyun.
Elder Zhuge! Su Rou spoke first.
What? Hes that Elder Zhuge?
Chu Feng was hiddenly stunned in his heart because he already recognized that person. It was the World Spiritist who was in the Imperial Sky Sages tomb.
However, Chu Feng never would have thought that the World Spiritist was the Azure Dragon Schools World Spiritist. The Elder Zhuge that even the head of the school did not dare to offend.
Master, I really know that Ive wronged. Please give me another chance.
Leng Wuzui still continued to plead. His face was filled with fear and his forehead already bled from all the knocking. He understood that old man too well. His methods of dealing with things were several times more ruthless than him.
I already gave you a chance but you did not hold onto it. If you did what I told you to do, today, I would have officially taken you as my disciple and passed down the Spirit Formation Technique to you.
But regrettably, at the end, you were unable to pass my test and you chose to walk on the road that I did not wish for you to tread on.
Actually, I already gave you sufficient warnings and told you to not attack Chu Feng. However, you were too slow. Before I appeared, you still didnt know that the person who was hiddenly protecting Chu Feng was me.
Speaking to that point, Zhuge slightly raised his hand. The Spirit Formation that locked Leng Wuzui started to retract even quicker.
Facing that situation, the ancestor of the Leng family gave everything he had to attack but there was not a trace of damage.
Seeing that Zhuge was going to take his life no matter what, Leng Wuzui did not beg anymore. He stood up, pointed at Zhuge and started to loudly curse,
Zhuge Liuyun. I, Leng Wuzui, followed you for a full 3 years and faithfully handled matters for you without any complaint. Why are you killing me for that little boy?
Do you even have a heart? You are even worse than pigs and dogs! You are a cold-blooded monster!!!
However, no matter how much more Leng Wuzui cursed and insulted, Zhuge Liuyun was not moved at all.
Only when the Spirit Formation forcefully squished the two of them into blood did he wave his big sleeve and called the Spirit Formation which was full of blood in front of him.
Just at that time, a weird scene happened. The Spirit formation that contained Leng Wuzui and the ancestor of the Leng family was absorbed into Zhuge Liuyuns body.
Thats
That scene endlessly shocked Chu Feng. That was the blood and flesh of two people! How could it be consumed by Zhuge Liuyun just like that? There wasnt even a trace left!
Was it possible that a human being was not behind the white robe and as Leng Wuzui said, it was a monster?
Not only Chu Feng, Su Rou also tightly frowned and she was slightly appalled in her heart.
Putting aside Zhuge Liuyuns strange methods, just by being able to kill Leng Wuzui who served him for 3 years showed that in killing, Zhuge was a decisive and ruthless person.
Elder Su Rou, please step away for a moment. I have something that I want to say to Chu Feng alone.
Zhuge Liuyun said with an extremely gentle tone and his emotions were not affected in the slightest. It was as if consuming Leng Wuzui was just a very normal matter.
Yes sir. At that instant, Su Rou hesitated a bit but after thinking for a while, she still left.
Although Zhuge Linyun was very dangerous, since he did all this for Chu Feng, most likely, he would not make things difficult for him. Also, when she remembered about Chu Fengs special traits, she could also guess what Zhuge Linyun wanted Chu Feng for.
Elder Zhuge, on that day, I did not know who you were so I had offended you. Please forgive me. Chu Feng quickly apologized for that day.
Haha, Chu Feng, no need to hang onto the things from that day in your heart. If I really had investigated, you wouldnt have lived until today.
Actually, the reason why I came to look for you is to take you as my disciple. Zhuge Linyun laughed and his words were quite direct.
Is that true? At that instant, Chu Feng widened his mouth in shock and he felt that it was extremely hard to believe.
World Spiritists. Chu Feng understood that they were a group of people who grasped special abilities.
For example, the Spirit Formation Technique was called as the strongest defense method. After he personally saw the power of the Spirit Formation, he wanted to be able to use such methods even more.
The most important thing was that World Spiritists were highly regarded by powers everywhere and they were invited with high prices. As long as he became a World Spiritist, it also meant that Chu Feng did not need to worry about cultivating resources.
In front of his eyes, this World Spiritist was going to accept him as a disciple. The good fortune came so suddenly and it really made Chu Feng feel that pie fell from the sky and confused himself.
Dont be so happy yet. To become the disciple of me, Zhuge Liuyun, you need to pass my test. Zhuge Liuyun chuckled and said.
Master, no matter what test it is, I am willing to accept it. Chu Feng half-knelt on the ground and firmly paid his respects to his master.
Seeing such a clever Chu Feng, Zhuge Liuyun nodded his head with satisfaction. He took out an old book from his Cosmos Sack and gave it to Chu Feng,
This is the cultivating methods of the Spirit Formation Technique. If you can grasp the early stage of the Spirit Formation power, I will accept you as my disciple.
Thank you master. Seeing that, Chu Feng rejoiced and quickly took the old book.
Dont be happy too early. Within a month, without my guidance, it would be quite good if you could comprehend 110 of it.
Remember. If you cannot comprehend 110 of it after a month, not only will I not accept you as my disciple, I will kill you as well.
Haha After speaking those words, Zhuge disappeared amidst the strange laughter.
Within Chu Fengs heart, coldness rose because he could tell that Zhuge Liuyuns words did not seem like he was joking.


MGA Capitulo 105  The Background of the Gong Family
The current Su Rou was strolling in the forest by herself. She was frowning slightly as if thinking of something. Chu Feng got Zhuge Liuyun's attention but she did not know whether that was a good thing or a bad thing.
"Elder Su Rou, I have something that I want discuss with you." But suddenly, Zhuge Liuyun appeared in front of Su Rou without making any sound.
At that instant, Su Rou was more or less nervous in her heart. She was somewhat fearful while facing Zhuge Liuyun.
Although his strength was also in the Profound realm, he hid his power very well. At least, she was unable to determine what stage his real cultivation was at.
However, an undeniable fact was that this person's strength exceeded the Six Protectors of the Azure Dragon School. He was publicly recognized as the 2 expert in the Azure Dragon School.
"Elder Zhuge, if you have anything please go ahead and say it." Su Rou organized her emotions and said respectfully.
"I don't want to know what goal you have by helping Chu Feng. But, from now on, you cannot follow behind him."
"I want him to face challenges by himself and only then can he grow up even faster. I'm sure you understand what I mean." Zhuge Liuyun's said gravely and there was even a trace of threatening within his tone.
"I understand." Su Rou did not dare to retort in any way.
"Mm, bid farewell to that boy and then do what you need to do."
Zhuge Liuyun waved his sleeve and disappeared where he stood. His tone was icy cold and the difference in attitude while facing Chu Feng was just like the sky and the earth.
Su Rou slightly frowned while facing Zhuge Liuyun who acted like that and she was quite angry. She originally wanted to say something, but after thinking of what he could do, she swallowed her words back down her throat.
The current Chu Feng was sitting where he was. He flipped through the Spirit Formation Technique book. Suddenly, he turned his head and chuckled, "Elder Su Rou, thank you for your help earlier."
"You people with Spirit power are really quite scary. It's simply like you have eyes behind your back." Su Rou charmingly smiled while displaying thousands different types of grace and she was even quite enchanting.
She walked in front of Chu Feng, lightly smiled and said, "But no need to thank me. It was Su Mei who entrusted me to look after you."
"That being said, you're quite bold. You even dared to challenge Gong Luyun and set a bet like that. I don't even know whether to praise your courageousness or to scold your idiocy."
"Hehe." Chu Feng only scratched his head and laughed foolishly since he did not know how to reply.
"Mm? What are you reading?" Seeing the laughing Chu Feng, Su Rou was quite helpless and she couldn't help but cast her gaze towards the book in Chu Feng's hands.
"Heh, this is quite the impressive thing. With it, I can become a World Spiritist." Chu Feng opened the book and three big words, "Spirit Formation Technique", appeared in front of Su Rou.
"Elder Zhuge took you as a disciple?"
Su Rou was endlessly shocked. Her beautiful little face instantly changed colour and although she had a premonition, she never would have thought that Zhuge Liuyun would pass the Spirit Formation Technique down to Chu Feng so soon.
To know that Leng Wuzui pretty much sold his life to Zhuge Liuyun for a whole 3 years yet got nothing. He even got consumed by Zhuge Liuyun at the end.
However, Chu Feng who clearly met Zhuge Liuyun for the first time got the cultivation method of the Spirit Formation Technique already. The difference was too big right?
"How would it be that easy? He wants me to grasp the early stage of the Spirit Formation within 1 month. But this book is quite difficult and it seems that it will not be a small challenge."
Chu Feng acted that he had hardships by curling his lips. He did not say that if could not pass the test within 1 month, Zhuge Liuyun would take his life.
He also did not say that after looking for a while, he got some knack for it. If he wasn't considering about Su Rou who was still there, he would have certainly tried it out.
"You must have gotten the good luck from your past life. If you can become Zhuge Liuyun's disciple, you should be able to keep your life in the arranged battle in a year."
Su Rou truly felt happy for Chu Feng. If Chu Feng could become a World Spiritist, it was a heavenly happy occasion for her family.
After all, the reason why she helped Chu Feng was because of Chu Feng's Spirit power and because her family needed a person like Chu Feng.
"No. One year later, not only will I keep my life, I will kill him." Chu Feng gravely said and determination was filled within his eyes.
Seeing Chu Feng's serious expression, Su Rou's heart was startled. For whatever reason, she had a strange thought. It was as if one year later, Chu Feng could really do what he said.
Especially after she personally saw Chu Feng leading the Chu family to kill his hated enemies, she looked towards Chu Feng in a completely different way.
Her evaluation was, Chu Feng was too impressive. Although he was only 15 years old, his mind surpassed those of the same age. It was even no worse than her and the most important part was that his methods were ruthless enough.
If he continued developing like that, his accomplishments in the future would be unmeasurable. She even felt that not only the Azure Dragon School, even within the Azure Province might not be able to keep Chu Feng. He would certainly stand on top of the Nine Provinces.
"Chu Feng, do not underestimate Gong Luyun. His family has control over a first-rate city."
"In the entire Azure Province, that city is ranked within the top three. It's strength is no weaker than the Azure Dragon School and it may even exceed it."
"The most important thing is that Gong Luyun's grandfather has a very close relationship with the Qilin Prince Mansion. If something bad happened to his Gong family, the Qilin Prince Mansion would not put their hands within the sleeves and ignore it."
"So, in the arranged battle one year later, you can win against Gong Luyun but you cannot kill him or else even Zhuge Liuyun cannot protect you." The more she felt that Chu Feng was valuable, the more Su Rou did not want anything happening to Chu Feng.
Hearing those words, Chu Feng also sank into deep thought. He was not an ignorant person so even though he really wanted to kill Gong Luyun, after knowing that he had a huge background behind his back, he had no choice but to carefully think it through.
Or else even if he could safely escape, after leaving, those around him may not be able to escape. He did not want his family to carry the consequences after attracting troubles for himself.
After that, Su Rou chatted with Chu Feng for a while and most of it was to advise him to be less rash. Something about "10 years is not long for a man's revenge".
It was to let Chu Feng focus on cultivation and to not have too much pressure. If necessary, her family would help out and at least protect Chu Feng's life.
After hearing those words, Chu Feng could hiddenly understand that Su Rou's family also controlled a first-rate city and their strength was extremely strong as well.
So, he already guessed why the Golden-purple City had such an abnormal attitude. It was certainly because of Su Rou. However, she did not mention about it so he did not ask.
After Su Rou left, Chu Feng returned to the Chu family. After closing the doors to his room, he started to seriously study the Spirit Formation Technique. The thing that would change his destiny.


MGA Capitulo 106  World Spirit Space
The power of Spirit Formation. Only useable by World Spiritists because normal people had no way of even touching it.
The power of Spirit Formation. It was not power from this world. It came from the Spiritual World, a mysterious world.
World Spiritists used their own body to link to the Spirit World and they drew the power of Spirit Formation into their body before using it.
In order to be able to link to the Spirit World, one must use their own Spirit power to create a World Spirit Space in their Spiritual world.
As long as a World Spirit Space was created, they could open the gates towards the Spirit World and use the power of Spirit Formation. So, what Chu Feng needed to do was to condense his Spirit power and create the World Spirit Space.
That was a method that required extreme skill. They had to have enough control over their Spirit power and it would also consume a lot of Spirit power. It was an extreme process.
It was like building a house with Spirit power as the raw materials. The controlling strength over their Spirit power determined the quality of that house.
However, just as Chu Feng was able to use those methods and entered his Spiritual World to create his own World Spirit Space
He discovered with astonishment that within his own Spiritual World, there was a World Spirit Space built already.
"What is this?" At that instant, Chu Feng already entered his own Spiritual World.
It was a boundless and vast world and it was like he was within the stars in space. However, the lights lingering around him were not stars. They were strands of floating gas.
Chu Feng could walk in the air and wander anywhere in the world as he wished. He could reach any corner and everything was within his grasp.
In front of him, not far from Chu Feng, a huge palace appeared. It was extremely beautiful with brilliant colours and dazzling lights as if it was made by crystals.
The shape was very strange as well. It was indescribable but it was a very bizarre sight that sat within his boundless Spirit world. It stretched up and the end could not be seen, as if it entered another world.
Chu Feng believed that it was the World Spirit Space. However, he could not understand how the boundless World Spirit Space appeared within his own Spiritual World.
How much Spirit power was required to create a World Spirit Space like that? How perfect would one's control had to be to create that? At least, it was impossible for him to do.
"Oi, what are you thinking about? Why aren't you coming in you bastard? How long are you going to keep me waiting for!"
Just as Chu Feng was at a loss, a sweet voice suddenly rang out in the World Spirit Space. It was very pleasant to listen to and it was the most lovely voice Chu Feng had ever heard of.
However, after that voice rang out, Chu Feng was greatly shocked because he had heard that voice before. He heard it when he thought he was dreaming.
"So everything was real?" Chu Feng felt that it was inconceivable but he still jumped straight into the World Spirit Space.
The World Spirit Space looked like a palace from the outside, but it was better said to be a tall tower that pierced the heavens. It had no doors, however, Chu Feng could go through the walls and enter it.
After Chu Feng entered it, he quickly lost the ability to walk where he wished and the ability to roam towards the horizon as he firmly landed on the ground.
Chu Feng had seen the scene in front of him before. A crystal-like wall that extended up without seeing the end.
On a certain wall, there was a weird, big door. On top of the doors were layers of chains and terrifying aura emitted from within.
The most important thing was that nearby, there was a huge black egg. At that moment, it was like a chatterbox as it yelled non-stop at Chu Feng.
Was that not everything that Chu Feng saw that day in his dream? However, Chu Feng knew that he was not within a realm of dreams. It was his World Spirit Space.
"Ahh, idiot Chu Feng, you finally got in again."
"You're too stupid, too stupid. Do you know how long I have waited for you? 15 years!"
"Damn it. Bastard. Mm, Your comprehension skills are bad right? They are simply horrible."
That voice which was pleasant to hear endlessly rang out from within the huge black egg. The words were in disarray yet they were very nice to hear. It was like a child who was difficult to deal with.
But the most important thing was that not only did she know Chu Feng's name, she even said that she waited an entire 15 years for Chu Feng. That made Chu Feng feel endlessly shocked.
"What are you? How do you know my name?" Chu Feng questioned as he assessed the black egg from a distance and did not go closer.
"You're a ‘what are you'! You call me as ‘Milady Queen'. Milady Queen okay?"
"I've shared your vision and sense of hearing in your Spiritual World. I've experienced everything that you experienced in all these years. How would I even not know what you are called? I even know everything that you've done!" Within the black egg, a displeased voice rang out.
"In my Spiritual World? You said that you've waited in my Spiritual World for 15 years? How did you enter my Spiritual World?" Chu Feng was quite stunned.
"How should I know? When I woke up, I was in your Spiritual World. I'm even sealed by this damned Spirit Formation and I can't even move."
[TN When she uses "I", she refers to herself as "queen".]
"It's most likely what your bastard parents did." The black egg continued to yell.
"Then do you know who my parents are? What their names are? Where they came from? Where they are right now?" Chu Feng closely questioned.
"I even wanted to ask you that. You better not let me know who they are or else I will make them pay the price. They dare to seal me in your smelly Spiritual World! Damn it."
Although the voice was very pleasant, Chu Feng could hear that the black egg that called herself "Milady Queen" was very angry at that moment. He could even hear the black egg grinding her teeth.
"So my parents built this World Spirit Space for me?" Hearing the black egg's words, Chu Feng also sank into deep thought.
"Rubbish. If someone didn't build it for you, did you build it then? Could you even build such an impressive World Spirit Space?" The black egg struck blows at Chu Feng.
"So the person who helped me build this World Spirit Space should be very strong right and they would also be a World Spiritist?" Chu Feng asked.
"Of course the person who was able to create this World Spirit Space was strong. Wait, what do you mean? Are you saying that I'm very weak?"
"Let me tell you. If it wasn't for me being injured, no one could have sealed me. It doesn't matter how strong the person who helped you was. As long as I know who that person is, I will make them pay the price. I will."
"Eggy, I never looked down on you. I was just curious."
"Curious? What's there to be curious about? Wait. Eggy? You're Eggy! You're a chicken egg! Dog egg! Bastard! You need to call me ‘Milady Queen'."
"Okay Eggy. Can you tell me what your name is? Where did you come from?"
"Shoo! Don't even think of trying to get information from me!!!"
[TN"Bastard" and "Shoo" have the character "egg" within them.]
Chu Feng originally wanted to see if he could get something from the black egg, but later on, he discovered that she replied with three "don't knows" to every question.
Her mouth was very tight as well and she was not willing to reveal her identity. However, Chu Feng felt that if someone intentionally sealed her in his Spiritual World, there must had been some hidden meaning.
At least, that person would not harm him or else with the methods of that person, they could killed him before.
Why would they help him build a World Spirit Space and then seal something that could harm him? It was simply a waste of effort..
So, Chu Feng determined that that person would not harm him. Instead, they would be helping him and he felt that it was most likely the doings of his family.


MGA Capitulo 107  Undoing the Seal
After knowing all that, there was indescribable warmth within Chu Feng's heart because he knew that his family did not abandon him. Rather, they already created a sturdy foundation for him.
He felt that there must had been some reason why his family left him. He had to know that reason, he had to find his family, his parents, in order to discover what actually happened.
"Oi oi oi, what are you thinking? Hurry up and release me out!" Seeing that Chu Feng submerged into contemplation, that black egg started to bellow.
"I say. Are you underestimating my intelligence or overestimating yours? Your resentment is so heavy. If I let you out, I'm just looking to die."
Chu Feng fiercely cast a glance at it and did not pay any attention to it anymore. He sat cross-legged and started to organize the thoughts in his brain in order to connect to the Spirit Formation power.
"Oi, Chu Feng you stinking boy. You dare to ignore me?"
"Bastard, you want to link with the Spirit Formation power right? I can teach you."
"Do you still want to defeat that Gong Luyun? I can help you. Hey!!!" The black egg started to violently shake as if afraid that Chu Feng would not care about her.
"Can you really help me link to the Spirit Formation power?"
Chu Feng looked at it with suspicion and it wasn't that he wanted to trick her into anything, but he tried to link it just now. Only then did he know that even if the World Spirit Space was built, it was still very hard to link to the Spirit Formation power.
"Of course I can. You think that I'm just for looks?"
"Right now, the power of Spirit Formation is already within the World Spirit Space. It's just not letting you use it."
"If you use your Spirit power to link, you need to search it one at a time and comprehend it bit by bit. That would consume several days of your time and you would only be able to connect to a tiny bit of Spirit Formation power."
"However, I have a incantation here. As long as you use this incantation, you would be able to use the power of Spirit Formation."
"Of course, how much you can use will still rely on your personal strength because the strength of the Spirit Formation power is equal to the strength of your Spirit power." The black egg explained.
"Incantation? It wouldn't be the incantation that will undo your seal right?" Chu Feng did not believe what the black egg said.
"Oi oi oi, what are you afraid of? This is your own Spirit world and everything is controlled by you. I have no way of harming you."
"Also, I told you that I got sealed. Not only did my body get bound by this damn thing, my cultivation also got restricted. My current strength is far from yours."
"Or else why would I need you to help me undo this seal? I would have broken this thing already." The black egg was a bit angry.
Chu Feng thought about what the black egg said and he felt that it was not unreasonable. He then asked, "Tell me the incantation and let me see if it's useful."
"Ha! You want to take this for free?!" A voice of disdain came from the black egg.
"Then what do you want in order to tell me that incantation?"
"Very simple. Help me undo this seal."
"Don't even think about it!"
"Hey! Are you even a man or not? Why are you so cowardly? I already said that my cultivation was sealed and I have no way of harming you. Besides, this is your own Spirit world."
"Don't try to trick me. This World Spirit Space is extremely bizarre and it's not even controlled by me. Or else, why can't I use the Spirit Formation power? Why do I still need connecting?"
"Idiot idiot idiot. I swear to the heavens, I won't harm you okay? Actually, I'm a very kind person."
[TN Idiot contains the character "egg".]
"I just heard that a certain person said that she better not know who sealed her in this place or else she would let that person pay the price."
"It's just needing that person to pay the price, but not taking any lives okay? If you were me, after being closed in one place for 15 years, without anything to eat or drink, without even a person to talk to you, wouldn't you have any resentments as well?"
"Even though you were quite bullied and grieved by the Chu family, at least someone could bully you. As for me? Even if I want to get bullied I can't."
"I've always been waiting for you here intently. When you finally got in after so many difficulties, you aren't willing to help me out. You are simply a super matchless big bastard" Speaking to there, weeping sounds came from within the black egg.
Such a sweet voice cried so sorrowfully and it was unbearable. Especially after hearing her words, Chu Feng's heart couldn't help but soften.
After careful deliberation, Chu Feng felt that she was not without reason. So, he asked, "How can I help you to undo the seal?"
"You can't undo the seal within my body, but you can help me break this thing so at least I can gain freedom in your Spirit world."
"The method of breaking it is simple. You just need to use your power and strongly punch out once.."
"That simple?" Chu Feng was slightly in doubt.
"It's that simple. If you don't believe me then just try it right?" Within the black egg came a voice that was like a spoiled child.
"That's fine. Back away as much as you can so my punch won't injure you."
Chu Feng walked in front of the black egg and at first, he used his Spirit power to investigate it. He found out that the black egg was very weird and he could not see through it at that moment.
As he grinded his teeth, suddenly, Chu Feng threw his fist out. With a bang, a fist-shaped indent appeared on the black egg. Countless small cracks appeared and started to spread out.
*crackle crackle crackle*
The cracks quickly extended and it kept on creating the clear sounds. The strange black egg really was broken with one punch from Chu Feng and pieces started to fall off.
At the end, the huge black egg was cut into two and it split apart. At the same time, a beautiful figure also appeared in front of Chu Feng's eyes.
It was a youthful girl with white skin like the winter snow yet a rosy lustre was emitted on the skin. With a single glance, one could tell that her skin was so smooth and it really made people want to have a feel.
However, in front of him, the thing that Chu Feng was most attracted to was this girl's face. On the perfect goose-like face were a pair of shiny big eyes. Within the black pupils, it was as if there was a river of stars and it was both deep and captivating.
Under her beautiful eyes was a delicate nose. Under her nose was a soft and pink little mouth. Her lips slightly stuck out and it was enchantingly beautiful and extremely seductive.
Her black hair scattered on her snow-white shoulders and it was very alluring. Her figure can be said to be perfect. Sticking in and out where needed and it was very well-developed.
Her skirt was very special as well. It was weaved together by black feathers and although no one knew what feathers they were, they was extremely beautiful.
Especially when the black skirt was extremely short. It revealed snow-white shoulders on top, snow-white legs on the bottom, and the alternating between black and white made her look just like a fairy. The beauty coming from her could suffocate people.
Beautiful. She was extremely beautiful. She was simply the most beautiful female that Chu Feng had ever seen in his life.
If it was said that the sisters Su Rou and Su Mei could destroy a city with their beauty, this girl's looks could absolutely stun all living things.


MGA Capitulo 108  Two Monsters
"What are you looking at? If you're already so lewd at such a young age, what would happen when you grow up?" The girl blinked as she cast a gaze of disdain towards Chu Feng.
"You're wrong. This isn't called lewd. This is called appreciation." Chu Feng wiped his mouth and only then did he discover that he was drooling.
"Tch. Quite a few reasons you have there." The girl shot another glance at Chu Feng. Then, corners of her mouth faintly rose and the incomparably sweet smile was blossomed.
"Waa, the feeling of freedom is still the best!"
The girl became very happy and first, she spread her arms open and spun around where she stood then she started to run everywhere in the World Spirit Space.
She was like a child that only wanted to have fun, but in reality, she was more like a little bird that gained freedom.
"Young lady, I wonder how I should call you?" Chu Feng spoke and asked.
"What lady? Call me ‘Milady Queen'!" The girl corrected.
"Milady Queen? You're clearly just a small little girl. Tell me how I should call you or else I will call you Eggy." Chu Feng evilly smiled and said.
"Bastard. You're Eggy! Your whole family are Eggies!" The girl stuck out her little tongue towards Chu Feng and pulled her face. Now that was called being naughty.
If it wasn't because she waited 15 years in his own Spiritual World and already gained mature intelligence 15 years ago, Chu Feng really would have suspected that she was still a little brat.
"Oi, Eggy, being humans means that you need to be honest. Isn't it time to tell me the incantation for condensing the Spirit Formation power?"
"I'm not a human, so does that mean I don't need to be honest?"
"You" Chu Feng was speechless. He had seen shameless people before but he had very rarely seen anyone more shameless than himself so he never would have thought that he lost to a little girl today.
"Haha, fine. Although I'm not human, I am very honest. How about this. From now on, as long as you promise me to call me ‘Milady Queen', I will tell you that incantation."
"Milady Queen!" Chu Feng firmly shouted.
"Damn. You really don't have any integrity." The girl cast a glance at Chu Feng then said phrases in a language in which Chu Feng did not understand.
The moment she started speaking, Chu Feng could feel within the World Spirit Space, countless strange, transparent gas appeared and started to swirl around the girl.
"Go." Suddenly, the girl used her finger to point at Chu Feng and the gas surged into Chu Feng's body.
"Spirit Formation power?" At that instant, Chu Feng discovered that the strange transparent gas was the Spirit Formation power.
"Only I can use the incantation. But, as long as I am here, the Spirit Formation power will be available for you to use." After transmitting the Spirit Formation power into Chu Feng's body, the girl smiled proudly.
"Milady Queen, you're quite impressive. Before, you said that you can help me beat that Gong Luyun. I wonder how you plan to do that?" Chu Feng chuckled and asked.
"Of course I can help you. As long as you become a qualified World Spiritist, you will be viewed as a guest everywhere and countless people will give you benefits."
"Although I don't know what the thing within your dantian is, that thing can help you quickly refine spiritual medicine. With it, your cultivation speed will be very quick."
"However, if you want people to view you as a guest, you need to do things for them. So, what you need to do right now is to become a qualified World Spiritist." The girl explained.
"A qualified World Spiritist? How can one be regarded as a qualified World Spiritist?" Chu Feng asked.
"To most people, they view themselves as a World Spiritists as long as they are able to use the power of the Spirit Formation, able to cast Spirit Formation spells, and able to create defense formations. But in reality, those people cannot be counted as a World Spiritist."
"A qualified World Spiritist not only needs to grasp the strongest defense methods, they also need to grasp the strongest attacking methods. Those who use the Spirit Formation for defense and World Spirits for attacks are real World Spiritists."
After hearing the girl's words, Chu Feng was quite excited. He finally knew the uses of the girl. She was an instructor that taught him how to become a World Spiritist!
"I know what Spirit Formation is, but what are World Spirits?" Chu Feng excitedly asked.
"The power of the Spirit Formation comes from the energy of the Spiritual World like the spiritual energy, Origin power and Profound power of the human world."
"As for World Spirits, they're the organisms that come from the Spiritual World. They have extremely strong power and they can reside within your body."
"Which also means if there was a Profound realm World Spirit that was willing to serve you, it wouldn't matter if you were in the 8th level of the Spirit realm. You would be a Profound realm expert with it behind your back." The girl explained.
"It's that strong? What do I need to do to be able to link to a World Spirit? Are there World Spirits in this World Spirit Space as well?" Chu Feng started to look everywhere and tried to find even a silhouette of a World Spirit.
"Of course not. World Spirits live in the Spirit world. With your current Spirit power, you have no way of linking to it."
"Not to mention you. Even that dogbutt Elder Zhuge cannot get a World Spirit to serve him. In reality, he can't be even counted as a real World Spiritist." The girl said with contempt.
"What? Even Elder Zhuge can't do it?" Chu Feng was a bit lost for words. Elder Zhuge's Spirit power was certainly far stronger than him. If Elder Zhuge couldn't do it, he had even more distant hope.
"No need to be so discouraged. Someone prepared a huge present for you. They caught at least 2 World Spirits and locked them within your World Spirit Space." Suddenly, the girl smiled.
"Really? Where are the World Spirits?" Chu Feng understood the meaning of the girl. Without a doubt, it was his family that prepared the World Spirits for him.
"For now, there are two World Spirits. One is very strong, the other is very weak. However, neither one of them will serve you for nothing. So, I want to know, which one are you interested in right now?" The girl giggled as she looked at Chu Feng.
"Let's talk about the weak one." Chu Feng thought for a bit and felt that it was more appropriate to control the weaker one.
"The weaker one is behind that huge door." The girl pointed her finger towards the door that was emitting a terrifying aura.
"There's a World Spirit locked behind there?" Chu Feng couldn't help but swallow his saliva. Although he never seen the so-called World Spirit, he also knew that the World Spirit in there was certainly very horrifying.
"That's right. What did you think was locked behind there? That World Spirit is extremely violent and it would certainly not serve you."
"Although I said that it was very weak, it's not weak for you. If you release it out, your Spirit power will not be able to control it."
"It would take over your body, and with your body as the medium, it would continue living in the human world. With its temper, your Nine Provinces would probably get destroyed by it."
"It's that strong? Such a scary monster like that is locked in my body?!" Chu Feng was stunned. However, the more he thought, the more impressive he felt that his family was.
Not only did they force the unmeasurably strong man into insanity and made him lose his mind, they even put a monster that could destroy the Nine Provinces within his body. Perhaps that was a bit too impressive.
But just at that time, Chu Feng suddenly remembered what the girl said. The monster which could destroy the Nine Provinces was only the weak one. It also meant that there was a more scary monster.
Thinking to that point, cold sweat couldn't help but form, both his hair and bones were terrified as he nervously checked around the area. However, he discovered that other than the big door, there was no other place that locked monsters.
"Where's the other one? Where's the extremely strong one?" Chu Feng asked tensely.
"Heh." Hearing Chu Feng's question, the girl strangely smiled, pointed at herself and said, "The strong one was already released by you!"


MGA Capitulo 109  Im Really Strong
"It's you?"
Chu Feng was greatly alarmed. With a whoosh, he leapt several meters back.
After pulling apart the distance between the girl, Chu Feng used his Spirit power to observe the cultivation of the girl. However, he discovered that she had a normal aura and she did not seem to be a person who cultivated.
He still did not dare to have any trace of carelessness. Although she was absolutely beauty and seemed completely harmless, she was not human. She was a World Spirit. A monster that did not need to eat nor drink and could wait in Chu Feng's Spirit world for 15 years. Only the heavens knew how she did that.
"Haha, am I that scary?" Seeing Chu Feng's fearful look, the girl covered her mouth with her hand and giggled.
"You were toying around with me?" Seeing the girl who rocked back and forth from laugher, Chu Feng frowned and felt that he might have been tricked.
"What would I toy you for? Don't I look that strong? I'll warn you, you better not anger me or else I'll eat you."
*whoosh* Suddenly, Chu Feng's shot forward and he arrived behind the girl like lightning. Both of his hands suddenly stretched out, grabbed the girl's wrist, put them behind her back, and he pushed her onto the ground.
"Ahh, what are you doing? Let me go!!!"
The girl panicked. As she sharply cried, she struggled. However, her tiny bit of strength was simply insignificant to Chu Feng and it did nothing.
"You stinking Eggy, you were tricking me." Seeing that the girl really did not have any cultivation, Chu Feng's tense heart finally calmed down.
"Bastard. Release me or else I will not forgive you."
"Oh? You still dare to resist? If I don't give you a lesson, you really wont know who's the master here!" In the heat of the moment, Chu Feng raised his hand and patted towards the girl's well developed bottom.
"Ahh~~~~~~" When Chu Feng's hand just went down, a sky and ground shaking cry rang out.
Originally, Chu Feng only wanted to give the girl a lesson and pat once. However, he didn't control it well and the pat turned into a grab.
Although it did not seem significant, the feeling was amazing. Although it was separated by the black feather skirt skirt, it still felt like he touched her smooth and soft skin. Within softness was flexibility, and within flexibility was softness. It simply heated his entire body in fire. He wished to stop yet could not and Chu Feng couldn't bear to let go.
"Bastard. You dare to take advantage of me. I will kill you!" The girl was completely enraged. Her snow-white face reddened like a ripe apple. Within her eyes, the fires of anger flared and it was as if they were almost going to spray out.
"A mistake. That was absolutely a mistake. It was not intentional."
Chu Feng was still young and being looked at like that by the girl, he felt slightly embarrassed and he released his hands with a red face.
"I'll kill you." Just as he let go, the girl suddenly spun around, and with "bared fangs and claws", she leapt towards Chu Feng with steaming bloodlust.
Seeing that, Chu Feng panicked a bit. In the instant that he met the girl's eyes, he felt a dangerous aura and he subconsciously extended his hands and grabbed on her wrists again. He then pushed her down once again, but he used too much force, and like a hungry tiger leaping towards food, he pushed his entire body down along with hers.
"Ahh~~~~~You bastard, what do you want to do with me?!"
At that instant, the girl loudly cried because as she was pushed down by Chu Feng, she felt an abnormal object towering over her. She thought of something instantly and she was deeply afraid that Chu Feng would do anything bad to her so she could only go for the "pitiful and weak" plan.
"Ehh....Sorry, natural reactions."
Chu Feng also reacted and he knew that unintentionally, he did a shameful thing. He quickly shifted away from her, however, both of his hands were still pressed on the girl and he was afraid she would leap towards him again.
"Bastard. No one has ever dared to treat me like this. You are dead!" Just as Chu Feng shifted away, the girl bellowed again and it could be seen that Chu Feng really touched the bottom line.
"You stinking Eggy. You really 'bully the weak and are afraid of the strong'. I give you some face just now yet you dare to threaten me. Do you believe that if you dare to threaten me again, I'll take you down?"
Chu Feng menaced with malicious words. However, the current Chu Feng didn't even dare to look straight into the eyes of the girl because after doing all that, Chu Feng's body really heated up and he almost lost control.
If it wasn't because he worried about her not being human and the possible detrimental effects after doing certain male and female things, perhaps Chu Feng really would had pressed the girl down and felt the wonderful taste of woman.
"You dare? If you dare to do those things to me, I will self-explode and bring you down with me." The girl grinded her teeth and within her eyes, they were filled with resolute determination.
"I was joking. You should understand that, I, Chu Feng, am not those kinds of people."
Seeing that, Chu Feng lacked some confidence. Although the girl really did not have any cultivation, he felt that she was not joking so he could only let her go while laughing softly.
*amm* Just at that time, the girl grabbed Chu Feng's arm and took a huge bite.
Seeing that, Chu Feng originally wanted to yell out loud because it looked like she really would have bit off a chunk of meat. However, after biting down, Chu Feng completely relaxed.
The girl did not have any cultivation, and after all, Chu Feng was at the 8th level of the Spirit realm. Because of the Divine Lightning lodging in his dantian, his spiritual energy was extremely strong and it ran through his entire body, making his body seem as if it was made out of steel tendons and iron bones. After the girl bit, it did not hurt nor even itch and he could not even feel anything.
"Ahh, you bastard! Is your arm made by iron?!" Indeed, after biting, the girl covered her red lips with her hand and started to bawl. Not only was she unable to bite Chu Feng, her teeth became extremely painful from that.
For whatever reason, seeing the sparkling tears flowing out of the girl's eyes, Chu Feng's heart felt sour and it hurt like there were needles stabbing at it. It was the first time that she had a feeling of a child.
"Okay Eggy, I was wrong okay? Who told you trick me!"
Although he did not know where that feeling came from, Chu Feng did not want that girl to cry. So, he quickly admitted his wrongs and apologized while sweet-talking the girl like sweet-talking to a child.
On that topic, the girl called herself as queen and she did indeed seem like she had profound experience about the world, yet, her temper really did seem like a child's and after a few words from Chu Feng, everything was fine.
"You bastard. How did I trick you? I'm really strong, but it's just that my cultivation was sealed by someone." The girl had a grieved face it looked like she didn't want Chu Feng to disbelieve her.
"Do you know how to undo your seal?" Chu Feng tightly frowned and he was a bit worried.
"I don't know." The girl shook her head.
"Good." Chu Feng took a breath of relief.
"You bastard." The girl howled and leapt towards Chu Feng once again.


MGA Capitulo 110  Spirit Connection Contract
After all the contacting over her body, Chu Feng confirmed that the girl did not threaten him in any way.
Rather, it was the girl who was in a dangerous position. After all, she was extremely pretty and she was imprisoned in the Spirit world with no way of escaping. The most important part was, while being in the Spirit world, Chu Feng was able to touch and feel her.
It was simply locking an unrivaled beauty within his body. She was even so light, soft, easy to push downBut luckily, Chu Feng wasn't that type of person, or else...
"Oi, bastard, what are you thinking about?" Seeing Chu Feng who kept on staring at her with an evil smile on the corner of his mouth, the girl bellowed.
"I say, Eggy. You said that as long as you and me combined into one, you can help me defeat Gong Luyun. Was that true?" Chu Feng laughed as he said that but his laugh was very wicked.
"Go die. No one would combine with you." The girl grinded her teeth in anger and smoke came out from her ears. Her pair of round eyes were glaring at him, but no matter how he saw it, she was still cute and it asked for one's cherishment.
It was true that when a person reached a certain realm of beauty, even if they did any unbearable expressions, they were still a type of beauty.
"Look. Didn't you say as long"
"You bastard! It's residing, not combining!"
"Residing? How do you do that?" Chu Feng was quite curious.
"As long as you and me establish a Spirit Connection Contract, I will be able to share the Spirit world with you. Also, as long as you are willing to, I can enter your body from your Spirit world and send my power to you."
"However, since my current cultivation is completely sealed and I don't know how to undo it, I can only start from the bottom. So, if you want my help, you need to help me cultivate. As long as you can help me get into the Profound realm in 1 year, naturally, you would be able to fight against Gong Luyun." The girl explained.
"What? Help you cultivate? The time that I spend helping you reach the Profound realm would probably be enough for me to reach the Heaven realm." Chu Feng said depressedly.
"Hmph. Is it even possible for you to reach the Heaven realm in 1 year? Even reaching the Profound realm would be difficult. But, if you are willing to help me, without a doubt, I can reach the Profound realm in 1 year."
"Also, my cultivation will not disturb your cultivation. Rather, helping me cultivate will even increase your Spirit Formation technique." The girl curled her lips and said.
"Is that true?" Chu Feng had doubts.
"Of course." The girl was very confident.
"Tell me how I can help you." Chu Feng asked.
"There is no free lunch in the world and World Spirits will not serve you humans for free. The reason why World Spiritists can gain the power of World Spirits is because they need to provide ‘Source energy' to the World Spirits."
"Source energy? What's that?"
"In your world, all cultivators will have Source energy. Whether alive or dead, as long as their body were not exterminated, their Source energy would not be exterminated."
"This Source energy does not have any use for you, however, it has huge enticement towards us World Spirits because it can help us quickly raise our cultivation."
"For example. If you can find a cultivator at the Profound realm and let me completely suck their Source energy, I can reach the so-called Origin realm. How about it? It's a lot quicker than your cultivation right?" The girl giggled and said.
"A Profound realm cultivator? Don't make it seem so easy okay? If I could catch a Profound realm cultivator and let you suck their Source energy, why would I even need your help?" Chu Feng was incomparably gloomy.
"Idiot. Did you not hear what I sad? I said, no matter if they were alive or dead, as long as their body remains, there would be Source energy for absorption. If you can't catch them alive, can't you just find dead ones? Remember, you're a World Spiritist!" The girl was a bit gloomy as well.
"It's fine even if they're dead?" Chu Feng was endlessly shocked.
"Of course! Or else, why did that dogbutt Elder Zhuge need to consume Leng Wuzui and that old man? Also, did you not discover when you entered the Imperial Sky Sage's tomb, you couldn't find his remains?"
The girl shared Chu Feng's vision and sense of hearing so she knew everything that Chu Feng experienced from his childhood up until now.
"If you say it like that, I do understand. But, didn't you say that Elder Zhuge doesn't have a World Spirit that serves him? How did he consume the Source energy then?"
"He does not have the ability to have a World Spirit that would serve him but I'm sure that he has already linked to a World Spirit. Currently, he would be providing offers to that World Spirit so the World Spirit would establish a Spirit Connection Contract."
"However, your luck is quite good. I am willing to set up a Spirit Connection Contractwith you but the condition is that you must obtain enough Source energy for me."
Speaking to there, the girl crossed her hands and hit out a strange handprint. At the same time, her skirt fluttered and her slim body emitted bizarre rays of light.
The reason why the rays of light were bizarre was because the light was black. Black represented darkness, and darkness was the direct opposite of light. But, in front of his eyes, the extremely dark black was emitting light, so naturally it would be incomparably bizarre.
However, the even more bizarre thing was that the black light flowed down along the girl's body and formed a strange pattern on the ground.
The pattern seemed to be the face of a monster that was sinister and scary. It was constantly squirming and with a glance, one's hair would stand up and their heart would be frightened while they trembled.
"What are you thinking about? Quickly stand in here."
The girl spoke and the current her was being encircled by the bizarre black light. However, not only did her absolute beauty not change, it looked even more beautiful as if that was the real her.
"What? You want me to stand on the face of that monster?" Chu Feng was a bit afraid. He felt that the face was a living organism that could swallow everything.
"Bastard. This is my Spirit Connection Spirit Formation. Thinking back in the days, how many top-level World Spiritists wanted to establish a contract with me but were all ignored by me? Now, I am willing to create a contract with you yet you refuse?" The eyebrows of the girl slanted inwards and she was slightly angry.
Seeing that, Chu Feng grinded his teeth but he still stepped onto it. However, the moment he stepped in, Chu Feng felt an engulfing power that swallowed himself. Instantly, his brain went white and he lost consciousness after that.
"Mm."
After who knew how long, Chu Feng gradually opened his eyes. He found out that he was still within his room in the Chu family residence and he maintained the position that he was in before he entered the Spirit world.
"Mm? I'm actually alright!" Chu Feng exhaled deeply in relief. Originally, he thought that disaster struck and he was tricked by the girl. However, from what he saw, he was not and he was still nice and alive.
"Oi, smelly Chu Feng, go and find Source energy for me!" But just at that time, the voice of the girl rang out next to Chu Feng's ears.
"Eggy!! You came out too? Where?" Chu Feng jumped in surprise as he observed his surroundings, but he did not see the girl.
"Idiot, I'm still in your Spirit world." The voice of the girl rang out again.
Hearing those words, Chu Feng rejoiced and he said quietly, "That means we succeeded?"


MGA Capitulo 111  Wan Wenpeng
After the Spirit Connection, Chu Feng and Eggy could chat with their minds and outsiders would not be able to detect it.
Under the guidance of Eggy, not only did Chu Feng quickly grasp the Spirit Formation power, he could even lay down simple Spirit Formations and use the most basic Spirit Formation techniques. He could already be counted as half a World Spiritist.
On that day, Chu Feng arrived in the Golden-purple City. After all, the so-called New Excellence Assembly was nearing. Today, coincidentally, was the day that Chen Hui let Chu Feng enter the Golden-purple City.
The Golden-purple City. It was indeed worth of being called a second-rate city. Heavy traffic was on the wide roads and dazzling jewels were everywhere on the shops beside the roads. Everyone was quite wealthy and the flourishment of that city was simply not comparable to the Ancient City.
Ultimately, the Ancient City was only a normal city whereas the Golden-purple City was a supervised second-rate city as they were protected by the Jiang Dynasty. The position of the two cities were like heaven and earth.
Chu Feng wore the clothing for the Azure Dragon School core disciples as he walked in the Golden-purple City. He did get quite a few gazes of admiration. After all, Chu Feng was still young and having that achievement at that age could light up one's eyes.
However, the gazes of admiration only appeared within the eyes of normal people. When Chu Feng arrived in front of the city lord's residence, he met two people that looked down on Chu Feng.
"Oh? Look, isn't that a disciple from the second-rate Azure Dragon School?"
"That's quite funny. A core disciple who only has the cultivation of the 8th level of the Spirit realm. To think that us two brothers are at the 9th level of the Spirit realm yet only inner court disciples in the Lingyun School."
"Ah, but they're only a second-rate school. How can they even be compared to our Linyun School? Our core disciples are the dragons and phoenixes within people and their core disciples are even inferior to our inner court disciples."
Two young men walked down from a luxurious carriage. After seeing Chu Feng, their words were cold and their gazes were filled with scorn.
They were not too much older than Chu Feng and their clothing was indeed the clothing of the Lingyun School. They were also there to represent the Golden-purple City to join the New Excellence Assembly.
However, Chu Feng ignored the mocking and ridicule of the two. He walked straight towards the city lord's residence. However, just as he walked in front of the big doors, he was stopped by a group of guards.
"I was invited by Chen Hui to represent the Golden-purple City in the New Excellence Assembly." Chu Feng spoke.
Hearing those words, the guards slightly frowned and their expression were quite displeased. After all, directly saying the name of the city lord was a taboo.
However, after looking up and down at Chu Feng in detail, they did not get angry. However, they said unkindly, "Please show your invitation letter!"
"Invitation letter?" Chu Feng blanked out. Chen Hui did not give him any invitation letter.
"A pretense? You don't even have an invitation letter!" At that moment, the two Lingyun disciples walked over. As they smiled and looked at Chu Feng, both of them took out their invitation letters and handed them over to that guard.
"Young masters, please follow me." After confirming that the invitation letter was genuine, the guard was quite polite.
"This little bro, did you not know that those who participate in the New Excellence Assembly are the elite of the Golden-purple City? Not to mention your cultivation, purely based on your status of an Azure Dragon School disciple, you are not qualified to participate in the assembly."
"That's right. A mere second-rate school wants to represent the Golden-purple City to join the New Excellence Assembly? Idiotic thoughts!" The two Lingyun School disciples did not follow the guard in. Instead, they started to mock Chu Feng.
"Hey. Quickly leave. The participators of the New Excellence Assembly are personally chosen and invited by the city lord. If you did not get the invitation letter, that means you are not qualified." Even the guard tried to chase Chu Feng away as he thought that Chu Feng recommended himself and not by the city lord.
"You think I'm feigning?" Chu Feng's expression did not change as he calmly asked.
"This is the city lord's residence. You better not continue pestering here or else you'll have it coming." The guard turned cold and he was slightly impatient.
"Hmph. Open your eyes wide and look clearly." Seeing that, Chu Feng did not waste any more words. He took out the Golden-purple Commanding Badge out and threw it straight at the face of the guard.
*bang*
As he caught the commanding badge, the guard originally wanted to act violently, however, when he focused onto the commanding badge, his face greatly changed because the Golden-purple Commanding Badge was an item equal to the status of the city lord. Only the city lord's closest people would have it.
At that instant, the guard knew that he made a huge mistake. No matter who Chu Feng was, as long as he had the Golden-purple Commanding Badge, he was certainly an existence that he could not offend.
"I should die ten thousand times for my crimes!"
Thinking to that point, the guard knelt on the ground with a poof and started to beg for forgiveness. Even his body was trembling and it could be seen that he was truly afraid.
At the same time, all the surrounding guards knelt down. Seeing the commanding badge was like seeing the city lord and they had to kneel in respect.
As for the two Lingyun School disciples, their faces were ugly and as white as paper. No matter what, they never would have thought that the disciple from a second-rate school would have the Golden-purple Commanding Badge. Even they did not have it.
Luckily, their status was special since they were disciples from the 1 school of the Azure Province, the Linyun School. If they had to kneel to Chu Feng, they would have lost a lot of face.
Chu Feng was even lazy to care about them. Under the lead of the guards, he entered the residence and arrived into a big hall.
There were already 5 young males and females within the hall. Looking at their appearances, their ages did not exceed 18 years old. All of them had outstanding appearances and they were all out of the ordinary. They were the disciples from first-rate schools.
Even the guards of the Golden-purple City did not dare to be disrespectful to those people because all of them had extremely good talent with a future that would have unmeasurable achievements. Sooner or later, they would become the pillars of the Golden-purple City. Perhaps even exceeding that.
As for the reason that they were there, naturally, they were the Golden-purple City representatives for the New Excellence Assembly. Including Chu Feng, there were 8 people there.
When Chu Feng and the two Lingyun School disciples entered, the eyes of everyone lit up. However, their stunning gazes were cast towards the two people behind Chu Feng.
As for the gazes towards Chu Feng, more or less, they were a bit off. After all, as a disciple from a first-rate school, from the bottom of their hearts, they looked down on disciples from second-rate schools. They did not put even core disciples in their eyes.
On the other hand, Chu Feng also didn't bother with them. All in all, those people only had the cultivation of the 9th level of the Spirit realm. Although they were higher in the cultivation realm, if it was on the topic of killing methods, Chu Feng could kill them as easily as squishing ants.
"Look, it's Wan Wenpeng!" But just at that time, several people in the hall suddenly stood up as they looked outside of the hall with astonishment.
Seeing that, Chu Feng also cast his glance over. He found out that under the escort of a group of guards, a handsome young man was slowly coming over.
That person was also a disciple of a first-rate school. However, he was not an inner court disciple. He was a core disciple of a first-rate school.
"Finally, there's a decent one." Seeing that person, Chu Feng also faintly smiled because the young man's cultivation was quite a bit stronger when compared to the others. He was in the Origin realm.


MGA Capitulo 112  Face Contest
"Wan bro, I never would have thought that you already became a core disciple of the Wind Listener School. You are really the strongest in the young generation of our Golden-purple City!"
"You entered the Origin realm when you were 18 years old! You really make me admire you."
"With Wan bro, this time, our Golden-purple City will certainly get first place in the New Excellence Assembly."
When Wan Wenpeng appeared, the remaining males and females in the hall all stood and went up. They seemed fairly close to him so they should have met before.
"Everyone, you really glorify me too much. Not to mention the many geniuses within other cities, even within this Golden-purple City, I, Wan Wenpeng, do not dare to call myself the strongest."
Wan Wenpeng humbly shook his head. However, from his smile, one could tell that he really enjoyed the praise of others.
"Oh? There's a person stronger than Wan bro within the young generation of the Golden-purple City?" Everyone expressed astonishment.
"Everyone, don't you know that the eldest daughter of the Golden-purple City's lord, Chen Wanxi, already entered the Origin realm a year earlier and became a core disciple in the Lingyun School?"
"Wan bro, you are quite well-informed. Actually, we only knew about this recently so we never would have thought that you knew it as well."The two people who mocked Chu Feng earlier spoke. As inner court disciples of the Lingyun School, obviously, they knew about the things that happened within their own school.
"So that means it's true?" At that instant, some others were shocked. The Lingyun School was the 1 school in the Azure Province! To be able to become a core disciple in that school meant that they were the pride of the heavens. Their position were absolutely not comparable to theirs.
Although Wan Wenpeng was also a core disciple in a first-rate school, there was still a chunk of difference when compared to core disciples from the Lingyun school.
"Chen Wanxi is indeed strong. However, I've heard that because her mother died many years ago, she left in a rage. She hasn't returned to the Golden-purple City in many years so I'm afraid she won't return for this year's New Excellence Assembly. Perhaps within her eyes, the honor or disgrace of the Golden-purple City has no relation with her." Someone sighed and said.
"Who said that I wouldn't return." But just at that time, a fierce voice suddenly rang outside of the hall. Those who looked over were stunned.
A young lady was standing outside of the hall and coldly staring at those who were within. Behind her, Chen Hui and several officers were standing there. Without much thinking, that person was the Chen Wanxi that everyone was talking about.
"This" After seeing Chen Wanxi, the young man who spoke before paled and did not dare to speak any more.
"Sister Wanxi, is it you? Do you recognize me, Wan Wenpeng?"
Seeing that, Wan Wenpeng tidied up his clothes and moved closer to her. That year, when Chen Wanxi left the Golden-purple City, she was still a little girl. But now she already grew to be a slender young lady. Although her facial changes were the biggest, that special cold yet elegant airs was still there.
"Chen Hui, the distance to the Vermilion Bird City is quite far so let's leave early." However, the shocking thing was that Chen Wanxi did not even look at Wan Wenpeng and she even directly called her father's famous name.
While facing that situation, Chen Hui could only dryly laugh and he arranged the carriages to prepare to bring Chu Feng and the others to the Vermilion Bird City.
As for Wan Wenpeng, his face was full of unpleasantness. He stood there stupefied and did not know what to do. No matter what, he never would have thought that Chen Wanxi would treat him like that.
"Hehe, this girl is quite prideful. However, she does have quite a few reasons to be proud."
On the other hand, when Chu Feng faced that scene as a bystander, he only faintly smiled because he could tell that Chen Wanxi had the cultivation of the 2nd level of the Origin realm. Having that kind of strength at that age really was unordinary. At least, it was extremely rare within the Azure Dragon School.
After that, Chen Hui called 10 carriages over. Every single carriage was very luxurious and within the carriage, there were all sorts of delicious foods. There were even servants to treat them. It could be seen that Chen Hui really valued Chu Feng and the others.
But after thinking about it in more detail, his actions were quite normal. After all, these 10 people were the most outstanding young generation within a thousand miles. Every single one had excellence talent and their future was unlimited.
Any one of them could become a famous person that would be extremely influential in the Azure Province. At that time, not to mention his Golden-purple City, perhaps they would not even put the Vermilion Bird City within their eyes.
Even as a city lord, Chen Hui did not dare to offend these kinds of people. He could only flatter them to gain their good impressions.
So, under the escorting of the city's army, 10 luxurious carriages headed towards the Vermilion Bird City. Finally, 5 days later, they arrived at their destination.
The Vermilion Bird City was built partially on a mountain and it was not as sumptuous as expected. It was an old city and it was filled with the aura of ancient mysteriousness.
The strength of the Vermilion Bird City was close to the second-rate Azure Dragon School. However, in terms of status, it was not inferior to a first-rate school. As for the reason, naturally, it was because it had the protection of the Jiang Dynasty.
So, even though they were geniuses from everywhere or disciples of first-rate schools, they did not dare to have half a point of disrespect while being in the territory of the Vermilion Bird City. Rather, they would even want to have connections to the Vermilion Bird Cty.
Of course, in the world where strength ruled all, they were certainly not afraid of the Vermilion Bird City. They were afraid of the Jiang Dynasty that was behind the Vermilion Bird City. The huge monster that ruled the Nine Provinces.
At that instant, within the Vermilion Bird City, on a vast, wide plaza, 20 groups of carriages stood there neatly. The 20 second-rate cities managed by the Vermilion Bird City had arrived.
The 20 city lords brought their carefully invited young geniuses down the carriages. The disciples from schools everywhere, wearing all sorts of special clothing all gathered in the middle of the plaza.
"Oh? Isn't it Chen Hui?"
A group of people walked towards Chen Hui and the others. The one who led was a fat-faced, big-eared, fatty. He was the city lord of a second-rate and he had some history with Chen Hui so the both of the were always on bad terms.
There were a group of young males and females behind the fatty. All of them had prideful expressions and they had no one in their eyes. They were looking down so badly that their faces were raised to the sky.
"Problem?"Chen Hui slightly frowned. Looking at the 10 young males and females behind the fatty, he could see that all of them came from the Lingyun School. One of them was even a core disciple so he knew that the fatty was going to flaunt.
"From how you're talking, we've already known each other for a long time. Even if there's nothing, can't I just come and greet you?"
The fatty lightly smiled and narrowed his eyes. He started evaluating Chu Feng and the others who were behind Chen Hui. After seeing Chen Wanxi, he coldn't help but slightly frowned and a displeased look flashed into his eyes.
He originally thought that since he invited so many strong geniuses, he could use that power to pressure Chen Hui a bit and take the chance to mock him. However, he did not expect that Chen Hui also got a core disciple from the Lingyun School. That way, it was quite difficult for him to speak.
However, when his gaze landed on Chu Feng, he instantly rejoiced and said, "Chen Hui, do you have no one else in your Golden-purple City? Why are disciples from the Azure Dragon School even here?"
"If you can't find any decent people in the Golden-purple City, you can ask me and I can lend you two! Haha"
His words were said extremely loudly and he was intentionally letting the surrounding people hear it. Indeed, when his words came out of his mouth, the people from various cities all cast their gaze over. After seeing Chu Feng, a smile of contempt rose from their mouths. In situations like these, disciples from second-rate school really could not be brought.
While facing that situation, Chen Hui did not know how to rebuke. If it wasn't for Su Rou's request, he would have never been willing to invite Chu Feng. After all, all the cities invited disciples from first-rate schools. Only his Golden-purple City got a disciple from a second-rate school. In terms of face, it was not too good for him.
"Are you looking down on the people from the Azure Dragon School?"
But just at that time, a woman's voice suddenly rang out. Looking over, everyone couldn't help but stare blankly. They saw two absolute beauties slowly walking over. On their bodies, they were wearing the clothes of the second-rate school, the "Azure Dragon School".


MGA Capitulo 113  Cheating
The sisters had devastatingly beauty. The big one was charming and appealing whereas the small was sweetly beautiful. Both of them had their types of graces and both of them had their types of flavours.
When those two appeared, the beauties in the plaza instantly lost all colour. Only Chen Wanxi who had elegant coldness was able to be compared to those two.
Everyone in the plaza were attracted to the sisters. Not to mention their beauty, their status made people shocked. Behind them, there were many powerful people from the Vermilion Bird City. The cultivation of every single one of them were not any weaker than the present city lords. They were all at the peak of the Origin realm.
The most important thing was that the powerful people were very respectful and polite to the two beauties as if they were subordinates. That made others very curious. Who were the sisters to be able to have such treatment from such powerful people from the Vermilion Bird City?
"Those two are the daughters of the Vermilion Bird City's lord, Su Rou and Su Mei." However, there was a sharp-eyed person who knew who the sisters were and that person loudly shouted out.
After that person spoke, that made people even more stunned. Why were beauties that had such special status from the Azure Dragon School? With their status, it would be completely fine if they wished to enter the Lingyun School right? Why did they need to enter a second-rate school?
All sorts of questions never-endingly rose from the crowd's hearts. However, the most depressed person was the fatty because at that moment, Su Rou and Su Mei were currently leading the strong people from the Vermilion Bird City and aggressively walking towards him.
"You just said that the disciples of the Azure Dragon School are just here to fill in as inferiors? Are you not putting the Azure Dragon School in your eyes?" Su Rou was lightly smiling, however, her gaze was like a blade and the fatty quivered as he saw that without knowing how to explain.
At that instant, the fatty's intestines turned green from regret. He regretted using Chu Feng to humiliate Chen Hui because he never would have thought that the two daughters of the Vermilion Bird City's lord were from the Azure Dragon School. One of them was even an elder.
"I'm asking you!" Seeing that the fatty did not reply, Su Rou suddenly fiercely yelled and displayed the pressure of the 1st level of the Profound realm. That forced the fatty city lord back several steps in fear and with a poof, he sat on the floor.
"1st level of the Profound realm! At such an age?!"
At that instant, everyone was greatly shocked. Even the expressionless and always cold Chen Wanxi lit up her eyes. It was because Su Rou was a 20 year old or so female that was at the prime of her youth. To be able to step into the Profound realm at that age meant that her talent was unimaginable.
"Listen up everyone. Don't look down on the people from second-rate schools as a disciple from a first-rate school. When the Azure Dragon School was in its glorious times, no one dared to look down on it in the entire Nine Provinces." Su Rou cast her glance everywhere and said proudly.
At that instant, it was absolutely silent in the vast plaza. Not to mention that no one dared to rebuke Su Rou, in reality, what Su Rou said was indeed true.
Even today, within the borders of the Azure Province, the most grand Lingyun School was only grand within the Azure Province. If it was compared to the other 1 schools in the 8 provinces on the continent, the Lingyun School could not even be compared to them.
However, the Azure Dragon School was different. Although it was only a second-rate school currently, under the guidance of the Azure Dragon Founder back in the days, the Azure Dragon School was a school that could directly match the Jiang Dynasty. The Azure Dragon Founder that year was even called as the strongest person on the continent of the Nine Provinces. His strength was so strong that people panicked just by hearing his name.
The glory of the Azure Dragon School was not repeatable and it had no precedents like that before in history. Although the Azure Dragon School had indeed fallen, no one could deny that it was once glorious.
"Rouer, what are you doing?" But just at that time, a thick and powerful voice exploded in the air. It was like thunder roaring as it boomed into everyone's ears.
Looking over, everyone's face greatly changed. The 20 city lords all knelt down on the floor and said with unison, "We pay our respects to Lord Su Hen!"
The lord of the Vermilion Bird City, Su Rou and Su Mei's father, Su Hen, finally appeared. He was 2.3 meters tall with a healthy physique, handsome face and a big body. He wore golden armor and he was like a battle god that just entered. The ground would shake every time he stepped out.
Seeing that person, even those unordinary disciples from first-rate schools tightened their expressions. They did not dare to have a single trace of disrespect because Su Hen could be said to be the 1 person in the Azure Province.
His strength was unpredictably deep and his status was even higher than the head of second-rate schools. Even the head of first-rate schools did not dare to be rude to him, not to mention the disciples.
"Be at ease everyone." Su Hen's smile was very amiable as he walked next to Su Rou and said, "You little girl, how can you speak to the elders like that?"
"Father, this cannot be blamed on Su Rou, it was them who looked down" Seeing that, Su Mei quickly tried to help out Su Rou.
"Ahh, I'll let this slide. Just don't mention it again."
Su Hen waved his hand and said a few words as apology to the fatty city lord. In reality, he was just like "giving sweet dates after a slap". He personally saw everything that Su Rou did, and the reason why he spoke just at that time was because he wanted Su Rou to suppress the fatty city lord in his place.
After all, it was him that sent Su Rou and Su Mei into the Azure Dragon School. From the bottom of his heart, he also did not like others saying anything bad about the Azure Dragon School because that would be saying that his decision was bad. However, as a city lord, those things were really too difficult to say.
At that instant, the many city lords led their geniuses from their own area and went closer to one another. Everyone politely gathered together, and at that moment, Su Mei pulled Chu Feng to the side.
"Chu Feng, all of you will enter the Ghost Horn Forest for this year's New Excellence Assembly. The Ghost Horn Forest is a cursed land and some violent Fierce Beasts live within it. Those would be the Ghost Horn Beasts."
"The Ghost Horn Beasts have the cultivation of the 1st level of the Spirit realm just as they were born. Following the growth of their body, their strength increases as well. Mature Ghost Horn Beasts will have a purple horn on their forehead, and those who have horns on their foreheads have the strength of the 9th level of the Spirit realm."
"Your mission this time is to hunt mature Ghost Horn Beasts. With the Ghost Horns as evidence and the limit of one day, the top 10 who kill the most Ghost Horn Beasts will return here for a competition. The city of the victorious one do not have to pay this year's tax and 5000 Spiritual Beads will be the cultivation reward." Su Mei went close to Chu Feng's ears and quietly said.
"So not only does the winner get 5000 Spiritual Beads, tax does not need to be paid as well. That old guy Chen Hui has more benefits than me!" Chu Feng was hiddenly speechless.
"What are you thinking about? Quickly, put this away." Su Mei stuffed a rolled up scroll into Chu Feng's hands.
"This is" Chu Feng opened it and looked. It could be seen that the little scroll was a map.
"This is the map of the Ghost Horn Forest. The black sections are the areas where mature Ghost Horn Beasts gather. Larger the black-coloured area, the more mature Ghost Horn Beasts there will be. This will benefit your Ghost Horn Beast hunting."
"But remember, do not go into the red-coloured sections. Those areas often have strange red-coloured fog. The moment the fog appears, one will die with certainty. It is as scary as the Thousand Bone Graveyard in the Azure Dragon School." Su Mei said in a low voice.
At that instant, Chu Feng finally understood Su Mei's intentions. After putting the scroll in the Cosmos Sack, he moved close to Su Mei's ears and said while chuckling, "Does this count as cheating?"


MGA Capitulo 114  Ancient Tomb
"Of course this isn't cheating!" Su Mei quickly explained.
"Then what is this?" Chu Feng was quite curious.
"This, ehh, this is just me giving you a little help because of friendship." Su Mei sweetly smiled, but then she quickly pointed towards a nearby crowd and said in a quiet voice,
"However, do not be careless. Those are not the disciples from the Azure Dragon School. They are disciples from first-rate schools, and in certain areas, what they learn are indeed stronger than us."
"But, I still have good impressions of you. Although, currently, their cultivation is higher than yours, they are also older than you. I believe when you reach 18 years old, you will certainly be stronger than all of them."
After saying that, Su Mei put her hands behind her back and skipped towards Su Rou. After the two sisters waved their hands at Chu Feng, they left together.
Chu Feng's heart had all sorts of complications as he looked at the sisters. Although he already guessed that Su Rou and Su Mei's identity would be special, he never would have thought that it was that impressive.
At that instant, Chu Feng was a bit perplexed. He felt that his estimation before was wrong. The reason why the sisters were in the Azure Dragon School shouldn't have been for roping in those who had potential because with their family's strength, so many strong people would be willing to serve them. So, why did they even need to get him close to them?
"What goal do you two have to need to rope me in like this?"
Chu Feng heart was very nervous. Although Su Rou and Su Mei treated him very good at that moment, he would not forget that there was a reason why the sisters approached him in the first place.
"The little girl called Su Mei probably likes you. Boy, don't let her down!" Suddenly, a pleasant voice rang out and the Eggy in his Spirit world spoke.
"Oh? How do you know that?" Chu Feng chuckled as he asked.
"A woman's intuition. However, you better not have any bad thoughts towards her. She is still young so don't do anything bad to her. So, I suggest that you go for that elder sister first."
"Damn. What are you thinking in your brain?" Chu Feng naturally understood what Eggy meant within her words. But, he never would have thought that she could say it so bluntly.
"Don't pretend that you're a decent person. You dare to say that you don't want to go for those sisters?" Eggy said disdainfully.
"I want to go for you the most right now." Chu Feng sinisterly smiled.
"You dare?!" Eggy became a bit timid and she quickly changed the topic, "Perhaps you'll get extremely lucky this time."
"What do you mean?" Chu Feng was confused.
"Most likely, there's an Ancient Tomb under the red-coloured fog that Su Mei talked about!"
"Ancient Tomb? That is?"
"You wouldn't understand even if I told you. When you enter the Ghost Horn Forest and look around that red-coloured fog, you will know. If there really is an Ancient Tomb, you will certainly get good things there."
Eggy created some suspense and Chu Feng didn't bother asking any more because he knew that Eggy wouldn't harm him. After all, the two of them established a Spirit Connection Contract. If something really did happen to Chu Feng's life, his Spirit world would collapse as well. At that moment, with Eggy's current cultivation, most likely, her life would be lost to the Yellow Springs.
[TN Yellow Springs = Hell]
From then on, the lord of the Vermilion Bird City announced the method of this year's New Excellence Assembly. Indeed, it was exactly the same as how Su Mei said it was. With the limit of one day, only the top 10 who kill the most Ghost Horn Beasts gain the qualifications for the competition. The final victor, naturally, would be the winner of the New Excellence Assembly.
After that, Su Hen gave a map of the Ghost Horn Forest to all 200 participators. On top of that, certain sections were marked with red and he clearly told everyone that the red area were not to be entered or else they would take responsibility for their own life and death.
Su Hen did not state the reason. He only said that the area was extremely dangerous. Also, on the maps that were handed out, only red sections were drawn on them and there were no black sections like on the map that Su Mei gave him.
After some explanation of the rules, Chu Feng and the others were led out of the Vermilion Bird City and they entered the Vermilion Bird Mountain Range. With that, they arrived at the so-called Ghost Horn Forest.
The black-coloured forest was everything that their eyes could see. The wood was like iron and the leaves were like needles. They did not even seem like trees. They were simply sharp weapons, and the most important thing was that within the forest, there was not a single sound from animals. The silence was a bit weird.
"Brat, don't pull us back or else you'll have it coming." Within the forest, the people from the Golden-purple City used threatening gazes to look at Chu Feng before leaving towards the deeper parts of the forest.
Chu Feng only faintly smiled to their disdain. Chu Feng really was too lazy to bother with people like them and it would only dirty his hands if he attacked them.
With his eyes, he saw their figures, with all sorts of fancy techniques, head deep into the forest. On the other hand, Chu Feng took out the map from his Cosmos Sack unhurriedly, then took out the map that Su Mei gave him.
After some thinking, Chu Feng chose a special path. He would go through several areas that the Ghost Horn Beasts were most condensed at, then the destination of the path was the red-coloured section that Su Mei and Su Hen clearly forbidden to enter.
Chu Feng used the Imperial Sky Technique and he was swept by the wind. He was quickly going through the forest and very soon, he found the so-called Ghost Horn Beasts.
It had the appearance of a horse yet it was as big as an elephant. It was pitch-black as if it was covered by black-coloured armor. It had violent behavior, and other than those of the same species, when it saw any other living organism, it would start to fiercely attack. It was no different than other Fierce Beasts.
However, Fierce Beasts were still Fierce Beasts. They could not even take one hit from Chu Feng. Even if they were mature Ghost Horn Beasts that had purple horns, they had no way of beating Chu Feng.
As Chu Feng wandered around, he did not let any Ghost Horn Beasts go. After killing, he used their spirit connection to borrow Eggy's World Spirit power for consuming their Source energy. Although their cultivation Source energy was very weak and it had very little help towards Eggy, Chu Feng did not waste it.
After killing 200 Ghost Horn Beasts, he finally arrived at the so-called red-coloured fog area. However, it was only slightly more silent and he did not see the so-called red-coloured fog.
"Are you sure that there are good things here?" Chu Feng felt quite disappointed. Using his Spirit power to observe, he did not find anything abnormal in that area.
"It's better not to make a fool of yourself with your tiny bit of Spirit power. If the Ancient Tomb could be seen through with your Spirit power, it wouldn't even be an Ancient Tomb."
"What do I do then?"
"Take out your World Spirit Compass and use it to probe."
Only after hearing Eggy's words did Chu Feng get enlightened as he quickly took out the World Spirit Compass. When he took it out, a strange instructional map did appear. Although Chu Feng could not see the reason why, Eggy saw it.
Following Eggy's instructions, Chu Feng started to lay a Spirit Formation in a special area. But because Chu Feng had stiff techniques and lacking Spirit power, he used a large amount of time and he only finished it when it was late at night.
When the Spirit Formation was opened, the formation disappeared. Replacing it was a hole that had an unseeable bottom. Everything was pitch-black but strange noises came from the hole. If one listened more carefully, they would discover that it seemed like the weeping of a female.


MGA Capitulo 115  Tomb Classification
Night. Stars filled the sky yet it was still dim without light. Only the round moon was bright and clear, but it was always concealed by the never-ending black clouds that floated in the air. The serene moonlight sprinkled down as the clouds appeared and disappeared.
Ground. Rows of iron trees stood upright. They were like "wolf teeth clubs" that rose from the ground. There was complete silence around Chu Feng and not a single trace of blowing wind. However, that special type of silence emphasized the strangeness of the cave noise.
"Damn. Are you sure that I need to go down there? What is that thing that's screaming down there? Is it a ghost?"
Chu Feng felt slightly uneasy. It was the first time that he heard such a miserable voice and it even came from the bottomless cave. It was just like a ghost that came from hell and screaming their grievances. It was extremely horrifying.
"What is there to be afraid of? Don't forget, you're a World Spiritist! You are already fated to deal with things like ghosts or else how are you going to absorb Source energy for me?!" Eggy reprimanded.
"Really... So after everything, World Spiritists are just natural tomb robbers?" Chu Feng was speechless.
"What did you think they were? World Spiritists spiritually connect to World Spirits and because of that, they can catch things that normal people cannot. Within tombs of cultivating experts contain large amounts of treasures. It is simply the best shortcut for martial cultivation."
"The path of martial cultivation is quite difficult as well. Only idiots won't walk on shortcuts." Eggy said scornfully.
"From what you said, the thing that's howling down there really is a ghost?"
Chu Feng's heart tightened. Although demons and ghosts were only legends, with his broadening experiences, he discovered that in the world, there were Monstrous Beasts, Strange Beasts, and also those who corruptly cultivated and walked onto the path of evil. By massacring common people, they were viewed as demons. Extrapolating like that, the so-called ghosts really might exist as well.
"What's so scary about ghosts? Didn't you already see one before?" Eggy spoke.
"When have I seen ghosts before?" Chu Feng thought back carefully, however, he could not remember when he saw the so-called ghosts.
"When you were in the Thousand Bone Graveyard, was the old man you saw not one?" Eggy reminded.
"What? He was a ghost? How is that possible? He was so strong!"
Chu Feng was hugely stunned. The old man he saw that night had extremely deep impressions on him. Although he did not emit any aura, Chu Feng still felt his powerfulness. So powerful that it was ineffable, so Chu Feng absolutely would not have thought that he was a ghost.
"When one reaches a certain realm in martial cultivation, their consciousness becomes extremely strong. Their consciousness would not even be extinguished after death and they would only float and wander to various places. That would be the so-called ghost."
"However, if a World Spiritist has extremely strong Spirit power, after death, their Spirit power would combine as one with their consciousness. With that, they could control everything their consciousness did and they would live as another type of life form."
"Although they would not be as strong as when they were living, they would still have overpowering methods. The old man you saw that day was someone like that. Your sealed Spirit power was also awakened by that person."
Eggy narrated in detail. On that day, although Chu Feng lost consciousness, Eggy did not. So, she saw everything that the old man did to Chu Feng.
After hearing her words, Chu Feng also suddenly realized that he already had Spirit power, but because of special reasons, it was not awakened. That also meant that his Spirit power was inborn.
"Usually, areas like these which has such a strong consciousness are Ancient Tombs. However, because that Thousand Bone Graveyard had so many bones and also because of the inconceivable old man, most likely, it isn't just a simple Ancient Tomb. It's very possible that it was an Evil Tomb." Eggy continued to explain.
"What's an Evil Tomb?" Even though Chu Feng was very confused, he could still hear the impressiveness of it.
"You idiot. You really don't know anything. Whatever. For you to become a qualified World Spiritist, I'll explain everything so you won't be a disgrace."
"Remember. The tomb of normal people is called a Tomb. Although there may be some mechanisms in Tombs and some treasures hidden, even normal people can break through them. Only low-level World Spiritists go look for Tombs and the tomb of the Imperial Sky Sage was a Tomb."
"As for the tombs that contains a consciousness, those are Ancient Tombs. It's not related to how long they were buried and it's just a classification title for tombs. It is very dangerous within Ancient Tombs. They have traps and mechanisms that normal people cannot detect, and even in some strange situations, traps and mechanisms that only World Spiritists can detect and decipher. So, Ancient Tombs are where World Spiritists show their worth."
"As for Evil Tombs, those who were buried are not just simple cultivation experts. Very likely, they would be extremely vicious things. No one can be sure on what they are. They could be humans, or beasts. They could be living, or dead."
"Most of them are so strong that even after death, they can still cause disasters for the world. Or perhaps, monsters that were not dead only got just suppressed and sealed somewhere. Those tombs are very dangerous. After entering, more than half will not be able to return. They could even release demonic creations and cause a calamity for the world."
"These tombs are called Evil Tombs. Unless it's an extremely powerful World Spiritist, no one would dare to go and open the tomb to cause a catastrophe."
"So there's things like these. No wonder. No wonder Elder Zhuge was so interested in the Thousand Bone Graveyard." Chu Feng was enlightened and he finally knew that the value of World Spiritists laid in tombs.
"That Thousand Bone Graveyard is very impressive. Most likely, it's an Evil Tomb. It is indeed dangerous, but there is certainly huge treasures contained within. Not to mention anything else, but if the old man's Source energy could be absorbed, my strength will undoubtedly rise significantly as well. Sadly, the current you should not even touch that Thousand Bone Graveyard or else even ten thousand yous won't be enough to die."
"However, that old man seems to have something that requires your help so that's why he left that map on your body. But, there are hidden mysteriousness within that map, and without reaching a certain strength, you have no way of opening that Evil Tomb."
"In the future, when you can open the Thousand Bone Graveyard and enter it, that old man must wish to borrow your strength. At least, he would give you some benefits and naturally, as long as there are benefits, a certain price must be paid as well."
"Also, Evil Tombs are too dangerous for you. Even if you have the map, you have no way of opening it. So right now, don't think of going to that Evil Tomb and you should search around in this Ancient Tomb."
As she spoke to that point, Eggy seemed a bit excited. After all, within a complete Ancient Tomb, there would be remains of martial cultivation experts. The strong Source energy was the thing that she yearned for the most.
"Mm, since we're here, we can't leave empty-handed right?"
Chu Feng nodded but he did not leap and go straight down. After jumping into the black hole, he quickly used the Bow of Hundred Transformations and condensed two daggers into his hands. He stabbed the daggers into the walls of the black hole and slowly lowered himself down.
At first, Chu Feng's speed was extremely slow, but very soon he got used of the actions and he started to quickly slide down. The more he went down, the clearer the cry of the female was. The usually daring Chu Feng couldn't help but have chills go down his spine and he felt the coldness in the air.
"No need to be afraid. This is probably just a roaming soul. Perhaps it was an expert when it lived, but after death, it cannot beat you. Your Spirit Formation Technique can restrain it." As if she felt the panic within Chu Feng's heart, Eggy reminded seriously.
"Mm." Chu Feng nodded, stabilized his heart and continued to slide down. Finally, both of his foot were steadied and he arrived at the bottom.
It was a huge cave. Although it was still pitch-black, he could still feel the vastness. Chu Feng took out the World Spirit Compass and sent a strand of Spirit power into it. Instantly, light flowed everywhere and the dark cave was lit up by light.
"This is!!" After that, when his vision became clear, Chu Feng's face greatly changed and he was stupefied by the scene in front of his eyes.


MGA Capitulo 116  Su Rous Birth Mother?
On the jagged cave walls, there were strange patterns engraved on them. They seemed like symbols, yet did not. It gave people an indescribable feeling and it made one's heart extremely uncomfortable.
Not too distant from Chu Feng, there were even piles of bones. Although it was not like the oceans of bones in the Thousand Bone Graveyard, the amount in front of his eyes were still shocking.
"Waa, so much Source energy! Quick, help me absorb all of them." Eggy was incomparably joyful as if she discovered treasure.
"Wait, there's a ghost watching us!" Chu Feng's heart tensed up, and behind a pile of bones, he discovered a silhouette.
It was a beautiful woman. She wore a silk cheongsam and her long hair went behind her head. Her clothing was fitting and she had a grand atmosphere. She was currently staring with alert at Chu Feng and weeping noises kept coming out from her mouth.
That was the so-called ghost. To be precise, it was a consciousness that was formed after death, and because her body was near transparent while faintly flickering with light, it was absolutely not a physical body.
However, after some more detailed observation, Chu Feng was shocked. He felt a familiar feeling from the face of that woman. She really looked similar to Su Rou and Su Mei.
"You are?" After thinking of a frightening possibility, Chu Feng quickly spoke to question.
*whoosh* However, just as Chu Feng spoke, that consciousness displayed fear. She spun its body and flew away. Her speed was extremely quick and with a blink, she disappeared.
"That consciousness does not have intelligence, only instinct. She will not answer any questions you ask because she does not even have memories."
"Also, she should have died a long time ago. Her consciousness will disappear soon and her power is currently very weak. She will have no way of harming you so no need to bother."
"Right now, quickly help me absorb these Source energy. There are so many complete remains of cultivators and they have very strong Source energy. They can certainly raise my cultivation significantly and maybe I can even enter the peak of the Spirit realm!"
Eggy said as a reminder. Her cultivation by consuming Source energy was extremely terrifying because after letting Chu Feng consume the Source energy of 200 mature Ghost Horn Beasts for her, the girl who had absolutely no cultivation before already had strength that was not inferior to Chu Feng. Currently, she already reached the 8th level of the Spirit realm. If she engulfed the Source energy of the bones, she could indeed break through to the peak of the Spirit realm.
"Mm."
Chu Feng nodded and did not waste any words. He started to consume the Source energy from the remains while a formless absorption power spread out. Within the mountain-like bones, invisible gas appeared. That was the Source energy. Unseeable by the naked eye, and only detectable by Spirit power.
Layer after layer, the Source energy surged into Chu Feng's body and all of it was absorbed by Eggy. Within the Spirit world, the girl sat cross-legged as if cultivating. She was refining the Source energy and her cultivation also started to suddenly increase by huge chunks.
"Quickly go and find me the remains of that consciousness. Those who are able to form a consciousness after death will have at least the cultivation of the Profound realm when they were alive. If I can refine her Source energy, I can certainly enter the Origin realm."
After absorbing all the bones there, Eggy really did enter the 9th level of the Spirit realm. She was clearly more excited because she felt that she could gain many benefits in the Ancient Tomb.
"This girl is just too freaky."
Chu Feng was extremely speechless. Normally, his cultivation speed could be said to be completely overpowered, however, when compared to that girl, it was not even worth mentioning. Within half a day, she went from completely no cultivation to the 9th level of the Spirit realm. That was quite a bit frightening.
Sighs of surprise were sighs of surprise and Chu Feng's feet did not stop. He held the World Spirit Compass and went deeper into the cave while following the crying to find the remains of that lady. In the path of searching, Chu Feng couldn't help but ask curiously, "Where did the bones come from? Seeing how they were, they should have died for a long time right?"
"Do you even need to ask that? No matter if it was intentional or accidental, those were the sacrifices that intruded the Ancient Tomb." Eggy explained.
After hearing those words, Chu Feng was hiddenly shocked. Although those people already became bones, from their Source energy, Chu Feng could feel that they were at the Origin realm when they were alive. So many people from the Origin realm died just like that and at least, it meant that the Ancient Tomb was dangerous.
However, as he currently had the World Spirit Compass within his hand, he could predict all the dangers so Chu Feng was not too worried. His thoughts still remained on that beautiful lady. He had a premonition that the lady might have been related to Su Rou and Su Mei.
"She wouldn't be the mother of those two girls right? Would that mean that this is the tomb of the city lord's wife?"
However, after some thinking, Chu Feng felt that it was wrong. If that lady really was Su Rou and Su Mei's mother, and also Su Hen's wife, how could she possibly be buried here, where there wasn't even a tombstone? Why did she need to weep? Why was her weeping so sorrowful?
As he brought up all sorts of questions, Chu Feng walked within the cave. Under the guidance of the World Spirit Compass, finally, he heard that dreadful crying sound again. When Chu Feng went closer, he shockingly discovered that there really were remains next to the lady.
It had already decayed into bones but the clothing on the body were still there. Although they were a bit tattered, he could still tell that the lady was wearing a cheongsam made out of silk. Very clearly, it was the corpse of the beautiful lady.
"This is great! It's really the remains of Profound realm person! Although it's only the 1st level, that's not too bad. As long as it is refined, I can certainly breakthrough into the Origin realm." Within his brain, Eggy's joyful voice rang out.
"That won't do. I cannot let you refine this lady's Source energy." Chu Feng stopped her and said. Although he could not confirm, he felt that the beautiful lady was very likely the birth mother of Su Rou and Su Mei. Chu Feng did not want to destroy the body of his friends' mother.
"Are you stupid? It's just absorbing Source energy. It won't destroy the remains and besides, she already died a long time ago. This consciousness does not have any intelligence and it is getting weaker and weaker right now. Very soon, it will disappear."
"If I refined her Source energy, I can reach the Origin realm. There will be huge advantages for you and me. At that time, you can most likely even defeat experts of the 3rd level of the Origin realm. Do you want to miss such a good chance?"
Hearing Eggy say it like that, Chu Feng was slightly moved as well. The Origin realm. If it was really how Eggy said it was and she gave her power to him to make his strength reach the Origin realm, that did indeed quite attract Chu Feng.
According to Chu Feng's current strength, if he could reach the Origin realm, not to mention the 3rd level of the Origin realm, he could probably put out quite a fight towards those of the 4th level of the Origin realm. How could Chu Feng not thirst for such strong battle prowess? Especially when the clock for the arranged battle in 1 year was already ticking.


MGA Capitulo 117  Land of the Evil Graveyard
"Will it really not damage the body of the remains?"
Chu Feng asked with doubt. In fact, since he had already absorbed the Source energy from various bones, he knew that it would not damage the bones. However, he was still worried. On the bottom of his heart, he still felt that it was disrespectful to absorb other people's Source energy.
Chu Feng would not blame himself if it was a stranger's. Rather, he would feel that it was reasonable and justifiable because if he didn't take it, other World Spiritist would take it. However, this person could possibly be Su Rou and Su Mei's mother so naturally, Chu Feng would have some hesitation.
"It will absolutely not harm her body."
As if knowing the burdens in Chu Feng's heart, Eggy guaranteed with a serious tone and she also added, "This is certainly also not her tomb. Looking at it, she might have also intruded in this place and was killed by something."
"If you let me absorb her Source energy, perhaps I can even help you figure out her cause of death. I'm sure that since you are the friend of those sisters, you would really want to know how their mother died right?"
Eggy was very smart. It wasn't only Chu Feng who saw that the lady could be Su Rou and Su Mei's mother. She also saw the inklings.
"Mm. I'll follow what you said."
Chu Feng nodded. The area was way too mysterious and it was very possible that it was the same as what Eggy said, that there were huge treasures there. If there really were the remains of a Heaven realm expert and Eggy absorbed its Source energy, she could reach the Profound realm.
To Chu Feng, it was a heavenly good occasion because that meant he would have the ability to defeat Gong Luyun. Although it wasn't his cultivation, at least it was his own method.
"Waaa!"
However, just as Chu Feng was getting near the remains, the lady leaped towards Chu Feng viciously and from her mouth, she made ghost-like howling sounds. It was extremely terrifying.
That aura was very special and strange, but he could confirm that it was extremely strong. It could even be comparable to experts of the 5th level of the Origin realm. That was not something Chu Feng could take care of.
*whoosh* Feeling that something was wrong, Chu Feng subconsciously used the Imperial Sky Technique. Lightning surged and he retreated a few meters back.
*boom* Her strike hit nothing but the air and the lady violently crashed into the ground. Although the cave rocks were very hard, a half-meter deep hole appeared while debris flew everywhere. It could be seen how much overwhelming power the lady had.
"Waaa!" After hitting nothing, the lady attacked again. This time, her speed was even quicker and she almost arrived with a blink.
"Don't panic. Use the Spirit Formation Technique."
Eggy's voice rang out again, and at the same time, a hot roasting feeling came from within Chu Feng's body. A strong wave of spiritual energy started to emerge from his body and in an instant, it filled his entire body. Chu Feng's cultivation reached the 9th level of the Spirit realm.
Chu Feng already expected that change. He knew it wasn't his personal cultivation that became stronger as he only borrowed Eggy's cultivation that she lent to him.
*hummm* Chu Feng could link to the Spirit Formation with just a thought. The power of Spirit Formation surged out from his brain and appeared in front of him without a sound. It formed into a invisible wall and blocked his front.
*bang*
The lady and the Spirit Formation collided and a huge sound boomed out. Several cracks appeared on the Spirit formation but at the same time, she also howled and flew back.
As she landed, Chu Feng shockingly discovered that the area she collided with the Spirit Formation was steaming and her face had terror on it.
"Strong."
Chu Feng was quite frightened. The defense power of the Spirit Formation was certainly something. He only grasped the basic methods yet he could defend against enemies of the 5th level of the Origin realm. In the future, with more proficiency, he could simply invisibly defend against the enemy and it would become his strongest defense method.
"Use the Spirit Formation to seal her right now. Although she does not have any intelligence, she will still subconsciously guard her remains. However, with the Spirit Formation Technique restraining her consciousness, even if she has power to break your Spirit Formation, she will not dare to get close." Eggy reminded.
Chu Feng did not hesitate as well and with a thought, layers of Spirit Formation kept on condensing and layer after layer, it sealed the lady within. Chu Feng only stopped when he felt that his Spirit power was going to be depleted.
Spirit power and the power of Spirit Formation were equal. As a World Spiritist, the stronger your Spirit power was, the stronger Spirit Formation power you could use was. So, at the same time that he was laying down the Spirit Formation, his Spirit power was being exhausted as well. With Chu Feng's current Spirit power, it was his limit to lay down so many Spirit Formations.
"Quick, absorb the Source energy!" Eggy excitedly cheered.
At the same time, Chu Feng arrived next to the body and started to absorb the Source energy for Eggy. That time, because Eggy was already lending her power to Chu Feng, when Chu Feng absorbed the Source energy, he could clearly feel that his own aura was rising abruptly.
Very soon, the aura of his body had some changes. It was no longer Spiritual energy but Origin power. After absorbing the Source energy, Eggy really did enter the Origin realm.
‘Haha! Success!" Eggy was wildly happy and she was jumping and skipping in Chu Feng's Spirit world. No need to mention how beautiful she was.
However, at the same time, Chu Feng discovered that the lady he imprisoned in his Spirit Formation was quickly disappearing and she already became transparent.
"Damn it! You tricked me!" Chu Feng suddenly understood that he was fooled. It really would not harm her body if he absorbed her Source energy, but her consciousness would completely disappear.
"Isn't it just a consciousness? Even if I didn't absorb her Source energy, she would have disappeared nonetheless. Are you being bitter to me because of her? The one who can help you is me, not her!" Not only did Eggy not admit her wrongs, she even seemed grieved.
"Whatever. What happened already happened. I don't want to argue excessively with you, but I don't want this to happen a second time. Also, remember that I, Chu Feng, do indeed need your power, however, it is not absolutely necessary."
Chu Feng was really angry. After all, that was possibly Su Rou and Su Mei's mother. Even if she did not have intelligence, Chu Feng would feel some guilt if she completely disappeared because of him.
"Okay, I get it. I won't trick you next time okay? I'll even tell you a secret." Eggy smiled and said naughtily.
"What secret?"
"I dare to be sure that the sisters' mother was killed by someone. Because of her status, it would be impossible for her to have no treasures. However, look at her. Although her clothing is complete, her Cosmos Sack is gone. Her breastbone is shattered and it was obviously caused by other force."
"Of course, I saw that too. But the problem is, who killed her? Who took away her Cosmos Sack?" Chu Feng questioned. He really wanted to help Su Rou and Su Mei find out the killer of their mother.
Chu Feng also wanted to get the treasures that were there because not only did he discover that the lady's Cosmos Sack was gone, there were no treasures around the bones that he absorbed the Source energy from earlier.
Which most likely meant that the treasures on their body were taken away by someone. So, Chu Feng really wanted to know who that person was. More importantly, whether that person was alive or not.
"How should I know? I didn't even personally see it. However, I am sure that it was by a person."
"You damn girl." Chu Feng was quite annoyed because he felt that he was toyed by Eggy again.
"Hehe, no need to get all worked up. If I'm not mistaken, the person who killed the sisters' mother is already dead because there's an even more terrifying thing. This is probably not Ancient Tomb but an Evil Tomb!"


MGA Capitulo 118  Endless Treasures
"Evil Tomb?!" Chu Feng was greatly stunned. Although the him who knew the level of tombs did not know what Evil Tombs meant, he still knew that it was an ominous place.
"That's right. The symbols on the wall are Anti-Demon Symbols and they are spells for sealing Evil Spirits." Eggy explained.
"Evil Spirits? What are those?" Chu Feng asked.
"Evil Spirits are actually just World Spirits. However, when a World Spirit escapes from the World Spiritist's control and lives in this world in their own original shape, they are called Evil Spirits."
"The ‘Evil' in Evil Spirits represents them hugely annihilating living things for Source energy absorption because of their thirst for power. That's why they are called Evil Spirits."
"The most important thing is that after the agreement between a World Spirit and a World Spiritist, they had to use the body of a World Spiritist as a medium in order to use their own power after entering the Spirit world of a World Spiritist. All in all, World Spirits are restrained by World Spiritists."
"However, when a World Spirit becomes strong to a certain point, they can break the agreement and escape the bindings of the World Spiritist. Then, by using their own willpower, they would step into the world of living. To break that agreement requires the cultivation of at least the Heaven realm or else they would have no way of doing that."
"Heaven realm?" Chu Feng was greatly shocked again. In the continent of the Nine Provinces, that was the realm only the peak of experts could reach.
"So, that's why the strength of all Evil Spirits are strong and they would have at least the cultivation of the Heaven realm. Since the exit is filled with Anti-Demon Symbols, it means that there is certainly an Evil Spirit being sealed here."
"Think of it. Will an area that imprisons an Evil Spirit be a simple Ancient Tomb? Will those who are able to imprison an Evil Spirit be simple people?"
"On that topic, I really did underestimate these Nine Provinces. At least within the Azure Province, quite an impressive fellow should have appeared once. The tomb owner already proved his methods by catching an Evil Spirit to guard his own tomb." Eggy sighed and said.
"That strong? Do we continue going deeper in?" Hearing Eggy say it so terrifyingly, Chu Feng had no more confidence anymore in his heart.
The Heaven realm was like a realm from the legends to him. If there was an Evil Spirit who had the strength of the Heaven realm, probably with a single breath, it could blow and shatter him into pieces. If he saw it, most likely, his little life would be gone.
"No need to be afraid. These Anti-Demon Symbols can restrain the Evil Spirit so you are safe as long as you are in the areas with the Anti-Demon Symbols. At least the Evil Spirit would not be able to harm you."
"There will certainly be endless treasures within the Evil Tomb. You can continue searching for them, and even if you get just a corner of an iceberg, you will still be able to rise significantly and you will be able to get great benefits. Perhaps you can even get cultivating resources required for you to enter the Profound realm." Eggy said.
Hearing Eggy's words, Chu Feng instantly received motivation and started to continue probing forward. The more he walked, the wider the world in the cave got. The more he walked, the more vast it became, and the so-called Anti-Demon Symbols also became denser and denser. Although he could not see the walls that surrounded him, at least he saw that the Anti-Demon Symbols under his feet got more and more.
According to what Eggy said, the Evil Spirit that was sealed there would certainly be very fierce or else there wouldnt be such strong Anti-Demon Symbols laid all around there. Those symbols were not set up by ordinary World Spiritists.
The deeper he entered, the more frightened Chu Feng got. That area was simply too big and it was just like an underground world. It was as if there was no end and he didn't even know how long he walked himself nor how many miles he walked for. However, he could hear the roar of water splashes in front of him.
"What a beautiful lake!"
As he continued forward, a vast lake appeared in front of Chu Feng's eyes. The water of the lake filled his sight and it continuously slammed against the shore. It made rumbling noises, and on top of the lake, there were countless fireflies that emitted a dark-green glow. It was their glow that let Chu Feng recognize that it was a vast lake.
However, looking at it in more detail, Chu Feng discovered that it could not possibly be fireflies. It was a lot bigger than fireflies and he could not say what it was. But it did emit a dark-green glow and it was very bizarre.
It was too distant so Chu Feng's Spirit power had no way of reaching it. He could not determine what it was or whether it was dangerous or not.
He continued forward. His range of vision became more and more broad and he could see that the shore had countless bones on them. It was densely filled and it extended into the lake.
It was too terrifying. Who knew how many people died there? There were at least several tens of thousands, however, the exterior of the bones were quite different. Most of them were shattered and they died by external force. Those were only the amounts on the shores and who knew how many more bones there were within the lake.
"What happened here? How did so many people die?" Chu Feng was endlessly shocked. He carefully approached and he discovered, under the white bones, all sorts of strange, faint lights were flickering.
"Spiritual beads! Not only spiritual beads, there are also Origin beads! Heavens, there really are boundless treasures here."
At such a distance, Chu Feng's Spirit power finally came into use. He could examine the ocean of bones, and within them, countless of spiritual beads and Origin beads were hidden underneath. Who knew how many there were? It could be said to be uncountable.
"Do not enter." However, just as Chu Feng wanted to step into it, he was stopped by Eggy's voice.
"Why?" Chu Feng was confused.
"The area in front is covered by the bones so you cannot see whether there are Anti-Demon Symbols there or not. However, it is certain that there are no more Source energy within the bones. The Source energy in them was already sucked dry."
"That range is the attacking range of the Evil Spirit. Whoever enters will die and it's a trap. It's a trap that baits people to step into." Eggy reminded seriously.
"So that means there really is an Evil Spirit guarding? Is there a way to escape its perception and let me enter? Not only are there spiritual beads in there, there are even tons of Origin beads. If I can get them, my cultivation will certainly rise significantly."
To Chu Feng who urgently needed cultivating resources, the treasures within the bones were too attracting. Not to mention taking them all, even if he took a portion, Chu Feng's cultivation could be increased greatly. He could certainly enter the Origin realm and even possibly the Profound realm.
"If you want to die, then go ahead. Do not be blinded by the benefits. Within the several tens of thousands of bones, every single one of them had higher cultivation than you when they were alive. Didn't they also just die wretchedly?"
"This would be the end of the Evil Tomb exploration. As long as no Heaven realm World Spiritist find this place, the treasures here will sooner or later be yours. In the future, when you have more success in your cultivation, you can come here again to take it. However, absolutely do not rashly enter when you are not certain."
Chu Feng was not an unintelligent person so naturally, he knew what Eggy said was correct. So, after looking at it for a while while being unwilling to part with it, he could only wipe away the drool next to his mouth, turn around, and leave.
"Waa~~~~~~~~~~"
But just at that time, an ear-piercing howl suddenly exploded from the middle of the lake. The sound was extremely frightening as if it was a demon that came below the 9 hells and was there to take one's soul.
At the same time, the calm ripples abruptly rolled into waves. the dark-green dots of light on the surface of the lake also emitted a strange sharp cry as it flew towards Chu Feng with lightning fast speed.


MGA Capitulo 119  A Worthwhile Journey
*humm humm humm*
The dark lights broke through the air and they were closely-packed. It was like a group of dark-green shooting stars. As they quickly flew, they let out strange cries.
It turned out that they were not fireflies and they were just a group of dark-green monsters. They had the appearance of mosquitoes and flew in the air with a pair of wings. Their body was as high as a person and they had a pair of red eyes. Their entire body gave out dark light and they were extremely dreadful.
Every single monster had quite some strength as they were comparable to the Origin realm experts of humans. Several tens of thousands were gathered together. The might was terrifying and it was simply like an army formed by Origin realm experts as they headed towards Chu Feng.
"Run!"
Eggy yelled in alarm as she lent her power to Chu Feng in order to raise his cultivation.
Chu Feng did not dare to be slow in any way as he worked the Origin power in his body, used the Imperial Sky Technique and quickly started to escape.
*humm*
But just at that time, dazzling light was released under Chu Feng's feet. The Anti-Demon Symbols engraved on the wall emitted a red-coloured light and it flooded the cave in that area.
*poof poof poof*
At the same time, the dark-green light already rushed into the red-coloured area. But just as they entered, all of them exploded. No remains were left and they completely disappeared.
"These Anti-Demon Symbols are strong!" Chu Feng was stunned in his heart. If it wasn't for the obstruction by the symbols, he really would not be able to escape.
"Don't stop, run!" Just as Chu Feng stopped moving to watch, Eggy yelled in alarm once again.
*rumble rumble* Only then did Chu Feng discover while being stupefied, in the middle of the lake, huge waves were already lifted up. The wave was several dozen feet tall and it was like a wild, fierce beast as it surged towards him.
The most important thing was that within the dark-blue wave, two rays of dark-green light shot out. It was a pair of eyes. It was inordinately big. So big that it was ineffable.
Just with a glance, it made Chu Feng's body violently quiver. A hint of indescribable fear rose from his heart. There was no pressure. There was no deterrence. Nothing but the gaze was enough to make people "hear the wind and lose all courage".
Without much thinking, Chu Feng already knew what it was. It was most likely the Evil Spirit that Eggy talked about. The thing that made Chu Feng not dare to continue thinking was If the pair of eyes were already like so, how enormous would its body be?
Feeling that something was wrong, Chu Feng started to run for his life. However, the speed of the Imperial Sky Technique could already be said to be scary yet it could not even match the surge of the wave.
The huge wave that reached the sky rumbled and it already rushed into the Anti-Demon Symbol area that was flooded with red light. However, the force was too strong and even if its speed and size was not the same, it was proportional and it continued to force its way to Chu Feng.
"What's happening? Did the Anti-Demon Symbols fail?" Chu Feng was slightly fearful when the Anti-Demon Symbols did not block the huge wave. If that Evil Spirit caught up, he would die without a doubt.
"Waves are not Evil Spirits so how can the Anti-Demon Symbols block it? Don't worry, the Evil Spirit will not dare to near the Anti-Demon Symbols. You will be fine as long as you don't get swept by the lake waves." Eggy reminded.
Just at that time, the huge wave already approached. A huge spray of water already fiercely slammed down at Chu Feng.
"Don't look down on me!"
He was already unable to avoid the wave. Seeing that he was going to be submerged by the water, Chu Feng tipped with his toes against the wave and actually advanced forward borrowing the power of the huge wave. The crisis of the wave had resolved.
"Waa~~~~"
At that moment, Chu Feng could hear the horrifying roar that was sent out. Luckily, the deafening sound was far or else if it was emitted near him, Chu Feng felt that he would have been jolted to death just by that roar.
"That's too terrifying! That's an Evil Spirit?"
As the Evil Spirit did not dare to enter the area of the Anti-Demon Symbols, the stirred up waves started to slowly vanish. Looking at the disappearing waves, Chu Feng finally took a breath of relief.
That Evil Spirit was too terrorizing. If he did not listen to what Eggy said and left the Anti-Demon Symbol area, he would have certainly been killed and his Source energy would even be absorbed. He would have died very thoroughly.
"Evil Spirits are not scary, it's just that you're too weak. Look carefully. The wave just now surged in quite a bit and some of the bones that were in the lake might have got thrown up here. Perhaps it contains somes of the things you want." Eggy reminded.
"You're probably right." While stepping on the wet cave rocks and borrowing the light from the World Spirit Compass, after some searching, Chu Feng was delighted.
Indeed, like how Eggy said it was, under the surge of the wave, many bones got flushed into the cave. Not only bones. There were even spiritual beads. Right in front of his eyes, there were several spiritual beads scattered everywhere. Within the thin water, it emitted sparkling radiance.
"The force of the wave just now was very big and you can find some spiritual beads right in front of your eyes. If you searched with even more detail, perhaps you could find even more spiritual beads. You may even find Origin beads so you better look thoroughly."
Eggy was also happy for Chu Feng. Although spiritual beads were useless to her, they were useful to Chu Feng. Right now, in the Evil Tomb, she already profited greatly so naturally she didn't want Chu Feng to return with empty hands.
"Mm."
Chu Feng did not hesitate and he started to search in detail in that area. After around 4 hours of searching, Chu Feng found over 3000 spiritual beads and 7 Origin beads.
One Origin bead was equivalent to a thousand spiritual bead which meant that Chu Feng got over 10 thousand spiritual beads. If he could get first place in the New Excellence Assembly and get 5000 more spiritual beads, Chu Feng could hopefully enter the Origin realm. That harvest could not be said to be not plentiful. At least, it was a worthwhile journey.
Knowing that he could not continue forward, Chu Feng started to return to where he started at. When he climbed out of the dark cave, he astonishedly discovered that it was already noon as the bright sun was hung up high in the sky.
"Damn! This isn't good. I won't miss the time of the New Excellence Assembly right?"
Chu Feng was quite speechless. When he was in the Evil Tomb, he was a bit too careful and he forgot about the issue of time. He never would have thought that he stayed in the Evil Tomb for such a long time. A day's worth of time already passed, and if he did not hurry, he might miss the New Excellence Assembly.
Although Chu Feng already got over 10 thousand spiritual beads in the Evil Tomb, to him that desperately needed cultivation resources, he also needed to get his hands on the 5000 spiritual bead reward from the New Excellence Assembly.
Thinking to that point, Chu Feng quickly dissolved the Spirit Formation. After doing that, the black hole towards the Evil Tomb disappeared and it was replaced by green grass. Normal people could not see the inklings. After doing all that, Chu Feng ran for his life towards the Vermilion Bird City.
In reality, the New Excellence Assembly really did enter the late stages. Within the Vermilion Bird City's plaza, all of the new excellent disciples that were participating in the New Excellence Assembly started to carry their spoils and they were returning.
Within the plaza, there were 5 battling stages and they were set up for choosing the victor. Outside of the plaza, people formed mountains and oceans. Even the famous people in the Vermilion Bird City came and they wanted to see what kind of actions the people from all sorts of cities would bring.


MGA Capitulo 120  Su Meis Fiancé
"What happened? Why is Chu Feng still not back yet!"
In a certain area in the plaza, Su Mei tightly frowned. Her eyes swept everywhere as she tried to find Chu Feng.
"Don't worry. With his cultivation, as long as he doesn't enter that area, he would not have any troubles within the Ghost Horn Forest. I'm sure that he's a bit too greedy, and for better achievements, he must still be hunting Ghost Horn Beasts."
Su Rou stood next to Su Mei while wearing a white skirt. She stood up elegantly and every single frown or smile could hook one's soul. She was extremely attracting. No matter where the sisters went, they would become the focal point of everyone's eyes. They would move the males' heart and cause jealousy for the females.
"Sister Su Rou, Meier, long time no see!"
An extremely magnetic voice rang out and a very handsome, beautiful young man walked over. He was holding a fan in his hand and waved in front of his chest. He could really be said to be elegant and graceful. Countless females on scene shot a sidewards glance then cried in surprise.
The reason why he had so much attention not only was because he was handsome, his clothing that he wore was the clothing for Lingyun School's core disciples. He was also a disciple of the 1 school in the Azure Province, the "Lingyun School". His cultivation already entered the 8th level of the Origin realm.
"So it's Shangguan Ya. Did you also return for the New Excellence Assembly?" After seeing that person, Su Rou's eyes narrowed as she politely smiled to him.
The Shangguan family was quite important in the Vermilion Bird City. Although the current Vermilion Bird City was controlled by the Su family, the power of the Shangguan family was not too much weaker than the Su family. This Shangguan Ya was the representative in the Shangguan family's young generation and he was the hiddenly approved successor of the Shangguan family.
"What's so interesting about this New Excellence Assembly? It's just a group of ‘wine sack and food bags' chosen from second-rate cities."
"If the capable people from the Vermilion Bird City joined, not to mention the top 10, the people from the second-rate cities could not even enter the top 100. All of the spots would certainly be taken by the people from the Vermilion Bird City." Shangguan Ya swung his foldable fan and he had plenty of arrogance.
"This is the New Excellence Assembly. You are already 19 years old right now so even if they let you join, you would not even be qualified." Su Mei shot him a glance and obviously, she did not like this Shangguan Ya.
To Su Mei's words, not only did Shangguan Ya not get angry, he even faintly smiled, "Meier, how can you say those words to your future husband?"
"Ha! You aren't even my fiancé. I never acknowledged this marriage so you better pay attention to how you speak. Don't call me Meier. I dislike being disgusted." Su Mei fiercely glared at him then quickly walked away, as if not willing to stand with that person.
"Sister Su Rou, Meier is too fierce. However, since she is my fiancée, I don't mind her speaking to me like that. But, it just lets others see us as a joke." Shangguan Ya had an expression of being wronged as he complained about his hardships to Su Rou.
"Ho" After hearing his words, Su Rou first charmingly smiled, then she said, "Since you know that she has an aggressive temper, don't say those things to her anymore. After all, she is still young and her temper is fairly normal. You should forgive her a bit."
"Although you two already have an arranged marriage, you should move her more sincerely. Or else, even if you get the body, you can't get the heart. It will not be good for both you and her."
"As an elder sister, although I won't betray my father's meanings, I won't let little Mei go marry a person that she does not love."
"So, even if you have an arranged marriage, you need her to heartfeltly love you or else even if it's me, I will not agree on the marriage." After saying that, Su Rou chased after Su Mei.
The smile on Shangguan Ya's mouth instantly retracted and a chilly gaze appeared in his eyes. He coldly said, "Those I want to have, I will have. No one should even think of stopping me!"
Just at that time, almost all the participants of the New Excellence Assembly returned. The host of the New Excellence Assembly chose the top 10 people who hunted the most Ghost Horn Beasts.
All 10 of them were disciples of first-rate schools and all of them were core disciples. The Wan Wenpeng from the Golden-purple City was ranked 10th, whereas the Lingyun School disciple, Chen Wanxi, was ranked 2nd.
As for the 1st, it was a young man who came from the Wind Cloud City. The Wind Cloud City could be said to be the strongest city within second-rate cities. The Wind Cloud City would get 1st in the New Excellence Assembly every year.
The young man representing the Wind Cloud City was also impressive. He was also a disciple from the Lingyun School and his cultivation was also at the 2nd level of the Origin realm, being the same as Chen Wanxi.
However, the atmosphere that he gave out was completely different. Although no one could say what wasn't right, the general feeling was that he seemed to be stronger than Chen Wanxi.
It was because in the Ghost Horn Beast hunt, although Chen Wanxi killed 203 beasts, the young man killed 415 beasts. It was almost double what Chen Wanxi had.
"It's almost time. Everyone, please go on the stages." The host spoke.
"Wait." But just at that time, Su Mei walked over.
"Third lady, what's the matter?" The host was very respectful towards Su Mei.
"There's still one more person that did not hand in their prey. How can it be started like this?" Su Mei had a very displeased attitude.
"Is there another person?" The host cast his gaze towards the guard who counted up the achievements.
"Eh" Seeing that, the guard quickly flipped through the book in his hands. After looking at it in detail, he said loudly, "There is indeed one more person who did not hand in their results."
"Who?" The host asked.
"Chu Feng, from Golden-purple City, core disciple of the second-rate school, the Azure Dragon School, and has a cultivation of the 8th level of the Spirit realm." The guard loudly said.
"Hu~~~"
When those words came out, a commotion rose outside and inside of the plaza. Not to mention being a disciple from a second-rate school, he was only at the 8th level of the spirit realm. He simply had the worst cultivation and status within everyone who participated. Everyone felt that there was no need to wait for that kind of person.
"Third lady, even if that person handed in their results, I'm afraid that he could not enter the top 10. I see that there's no need to wait right?" Seeing the people's reactions, the host was clearly in a difficult position.
"How do you know he cannot enter the top 10?!" Su Mei curled her lips and her attitude became fiercer.
"This" The host's face turned ashen and he was very speechless. He really did not dare to offend that third lady.
"Let's just follow the rules. Since time is not up yet, wait. If the time is up and he still hasn't come, it's not late to start then." Su Rou walked over.
"As you wish, second lady!" Seeing that, the host nodded. Compared to Su Mei's savageness and unruliness, Su Rou had some more prestige in the Vermilion Bird City.
Although it was only waiting, the people inside and outside of the plaza were discontented. They felt that there was no need to wait for a person like that. However, seeing that the time was almost up, they still chose to wait.
As for the 10 people who were ranked as the top 10, they were even more leisure and at ease. Their hearts were focused on one another and they did not even put Chu Feng in their eyes. They felt that it was a waste to wait for Chu Feng.
"Sorry everyone, I'm late!"
Just as the crowd were boiling up, a thin and small figure squeezed himself out from the crowd and entered the middle of the plaza. Chu Feng finally arrived!


MGA Capitulo 121  I Only Need One Strike
"That's Chu Feng! He seems quite young!"
After Chu Feng showed himself, he became the focus of everyone on scene. After all, everyone was waiting for his appearance. However, Chu Feng's young and tender face shocked everyone.
Although the New Excellence Assembly had an age limit of 18 and under, to gain more outstanding results, all of the cities would choose those who were 18 years old to participate. After all, if everyone was a genius, naturally, the longer one cultivated, the stronger their strength would be.
However, Chu Feng was clearly far from being 18 years old and he was quite a young man. Although having that cultivation at that age was really quite unordinary, compared to the core disciples from first-rate schools, Chu Feng still seemed rather weak.
The thing that confused everyone was why the Golden-purple City chose Chu Feng who was such a young man as a representative. Even if he had potential, all in all, his cultivation right now was still too weak. He was simply unpresentable when he was compared to the other participants who were there.
"Where did you run off to? Why were you so slow?" Su Mei pouted from anger as she ran over and worry was still on her face.
"Heh. I was a bit tired yesterday so I slept for a bit." Chu Feng scratched his head and embarrassedly smiled.
"You... Others were killing Ghost Horn Beasts with everything they had yet you had the mind to sleep?!"
"Did you even concentrate on killing Ghost Horn Beasts? You wouldn't be excluded from the top 10 right? You are really underestimating everyone too much!" Seeing Chu Feng like that, Su Mei pouted her little mouth from anger and she did not know whether to chuckle or weep.
"Although I did not concentrate on killing Ghost Horn Beasts, there shouldn't be many problems for me to enter the top 10." Chu Feng was very confident.
Seeing that scene, the surrounding observers were suddenly enlightened. After all, those who had eyes could see that Su Mei, the third lady of the Su family, did not have a simple relationship with Chu Feng. Most likely it was Su Mei that made Chu Feng able to participate in the New Excellence Assembly.
"So after so much, it turns out that he had some assistance from the third lady of the Su family. No wonder he had the city lord's Golden-purple Commanding Badge!"
"Hmph, so what if he has connections? This New Excellence Assembly is about strength. The top 10 has already been chosen. With his cultivation, is he going to push one out from the top 10?"
Several of the Golden-purple City participants harbored ill-feelings towards Chu Feng. They felt that Chu Feng should not have joined the New Excellence Assembly with his strength. Not only would it lose the face of the Golden-purple City, it would also lose their face.
After a short chat with Su Mei, Chu Feng also went in front of the guard who collected the results. Under the stares of the crowd's gazes, he threw the 200 or so purple horns of the Ghost Horn Beasts in front of the guard.
"Heavens, he killed so many Ghost Horn Beasts?"
"How is that possible? With his cultivation, how was he able to hunt so many? Looking at that amount, there should be around 200 right?"
Seeing the large pile of sharp, purple-coloured horns, the people inside and outside of the plaza went into an uproar. No matter what, they would not have guessed that with Chu Feng's cultivation, he could hunt so many Ghost Horn Beasts in which the amount was even comparable to Chen Wanxi's results.
"Impossible. Absolutely impossible. He cheated. He must have cheated!"
Compared to others, Wan Wenpeng was endlessly depressed. He was ranked as 10th this time, and currently, Chu Feng's results was far above his so he was certainly going to be kicked out.
If the person who kicked him out was another person who had strength that was far above him, he could accept it. However, when a person like Chu Feng who he deeply looked down upon kicked him out, he had no way of accepting it.
In reality, not only Wan Wenpeng had those thoughts. Many other people who were on scene also thought like that. After thinking of Chu Feng and Su Mei's relationship, they felt that Chu Feng used some underhanded way to get so many purple horns from the Ghost Horn Beasts and they were not killed by him personally.
However, even though they had those assumptions, they did not dare to speak those words out loud. After all, no one would offend the Su family's third lady for things like that.
Just like that, because of Chu Feng's exceptional results, he gained the spot in the competition. As for Wan Wenpeng, he got pushed out of top 10 and he was knocked out in advance.
"Hmph." Looking at Chu Feng who took his place and was walking onto the stage, Wan Wenpeng was limitlessly angry and his expression was extremely ugly.
"Wan bro, no need to be angry at little people. With his cultivation, he would only disgrace himself when he is on the stage."
"That's right. In a while, let's see how he will get beaten off the stage." Some of the people from the Golden-purple City soothed him.
"The person who will fight with Chu Feng is a core disciple in my Wind Hearing School. I understand his strength very well. When Chu Feng exchange blows with him, he will only shame himself."
"However, not only is he losing his own face, he is also losing my Golden-purple City's face. He doesn't need any face, but we, being people of the Golden-purple City, don't want to lose any." Wan Wenpeng had plenty of fury yet he seemed to speak selflessly and every word seemed to be just.
After hearing his words, those from the Golden-purple City felt that Wan Wenpeng was correct and they couldn't help but deepen their enmity towards Chu Feng.
"Originally, I wanted to beat up that Wan Wenpeng, but I never would have thought that it became you. I could still beat him a bit fiercerly if it was him. However, I really don't feel like I would accomplish anything by beating you up. Concede so I don't need to dirty my hands." The disciple from the Wind Hearing School disdainfully looked at Chu Feng and he did not put Chu Feng in his eyes at all.
"Of course you won't feel that you accomplished anything by hitting me since you can't even hit me. However, I'm sure you will feel quite some accomplishment by being defeated by me because not everyone is qualified to be beaten by me."
Chu Feng smiled while squinting at the disciple from the Wind Hearing School. That was not simple disdain, nor did he not put him in his eyes. He completely looked down on his opponent.
"You really &8216don't shed tears unless you see the coffin'. I only need one strike against people like you."
The Wind Hearing School disciple seemed to be enraged by Chu Feng. He coldly snorted, stepped forward, and he displayed a gorgeous martial skill.
His body instantly became several as it appeared and disappeared. On the stage, he vanished then reappeared. His speed became quicker and quicker, so quick that one would be dazzled. At that moment, Chu Feng was completely surrounded by silhouettes from every single direction.
As that spectacular martial skill was used, it made countless people sigh in admiration. The young females that knew nothing even sharply cried in adoration.
"This is my Wind Hearing School's rank 4 bodily martial skill. It is called Layers of Blurred Shadows. He already cultivated this martial skill for 3 years so he already grasped the essence of it and he can use it perfectly."
"Not to mention that Chu Feng, even if it's me, I would need to carefully face it or else it would cost me quite a bit." Wan Wenpeng described to the crowd.
"That means Chu Feng already lost?"
"Not only will he lose, he will lose extremely miserably!"
Wan Wenpeng was full of confidence. That martial skill was that person's strongest killing card that even he was fearful of. Naturally, Chu Feng would be defeated without a doubt.
In actuality, it was just as how Wan Wenpeng said it was. The Layers of Blurred shadows was an extremely superb bodily martial skill. If it was others, they would certainly be baffled by the grand methods. However, Chu Feng already seen through it. From the start, he already knew which one was his opponent's real body.
*whoosh* Suddenly, that person attacked. The figures ran with flying speed towards Chu Feng and the might was magnificent.
At that instant, those who were waiting for Chu Feng to become a joke couldn't help but raise the corner of their mouths into an angle. They felt that the moment of Chu Feng losing his face had arrived.
After that, clearly, Chu Feng was going to disappoint those people. They only saw that Chu Feng did not dodge nor avoid it. He directly punched towards one of the figures.
He did not use any fancy methods and he simply punched. However, his fist was as fast as lightning and his position was crafty. With a bang, his fist fiercely landed on that person's face.
"Ahh!"
The fist landed and with a cry of pain, the figures that filled the air around Chu Feng all disappeared. The Wind Hearing School disciple violently landed on the floor and he was holding his own face, rolling on the floor while howling wretchedly.
Looking at the person on the floor, Chu Feng faintly smiled and said, "You were correct. Against people like you, I really do only need one strike."


MGA Capitulo 122  A Real Genius
"Damn! What's going on?"
"Heavens! What's this situation?"
The scene on the fighting stage shocked everyone. Before, because of the densely packed silhouettes, many people did not even see Chu Feng attack. They only saw the figures abruptly dissipate and the person from the Hearing Wind School becoming like that on the floor.
"What a strong attack."
However, compared to the perplexed crowd, the lord of the Vermilion Bird City, Su Hen, lit up his eyes. He was always focused on Chu Feng's stage so he saw the scene in which Chu Feng attacked.
"Father, like I said. Chu Feng has Spirit power so martial skills that trick the eyes are useless against him." At that instant, Su Rou, who was standing behind Su Hen while being well-behaved had loveliness all across her face.
"Not only because of his Spirit power. Even if he had Spirit power, he only cultivated the beginning level Mysterious Technique. He should not be able to so easily defeat a person who was at the 1st level of the Origin realm with a cultivation of the 8th level of the Spirit realm. His talent is quite something so that's why he has that strength."
"Within the Azure Province, cultivators who have slightly quicker speed are named as geniuses. But in reality, those are just aptitudes that a cultivator should have. A real genius is like Chu Feng who can do things that other cannot."
Su Hen's gaze was focused on Chu Feng. Admiration was filled within his eyes and then he said to Su Rou, "Rouer, you sisters did not make a mistake. This Chu Feng must be roped in with us diligently. Our Su family might even need to rely on him in the future."
"Strong. That Chen Wanxi is indeed worthy of being a core disciple of the Lingyun School. With one strike, she defeated her opponent."
Just at that time, there were suddenly yells of surprise because on another stage, Chen Wanxi also defeated her opponent with lightning speed. She used only one strike as well.
However, her strike was not as mysterious as Chu Feng's. It was displayed right in front of everyone and she let everyone personally see how she extinguished the might of her opponent with the might of her one strike.
"Sister Wanxi is really too strong. It seems like my Golden-purple City has hope for being first this time."
"Not only hope. We can certainly get it. Right now, on the stage, there are only 2 experts who are at the 2nd level of the Origin realm. Sister Wanxi defeated her opponent with one strike. On the other hand, that person is still struggling with his opponent. His opponent is clearly only at the 1st level of the Origin realm. An entire level of cultivation lower!"
"That's true. Although he is very strong as well, he's a lot worse than sister Wanxi and it is as if he doesn't have the might of the 2nd level of the Origin realm. Strange. How did a person like him get such a better result in the Ghost Horn Beast hunt?"
"Hmph. Perhaps he played around with some tricks like Chu Feng."
The people from the Golden-purple City cast their gaze towards the other core disciple from the Lingyun School. Everyone paid the most attention to that person and there was no other comparable to him.
It was because in the Ghost Horn Beast hunting earlier, his result was way too eye-grabbing. However, the fight in front of them made everyone feel quite disappointed.
As the representative of the Wind Cloud City which continuously won in previous assemblies, as a core disciple of the Lingyun School, as an expert of the 2nd level of the Origin realm, the outcome was undetermined against his opponent who was at the 1st level of the Origin realm.
No matter if it was speed or power, he was quite similar to his opponent's. Even his martial skills were ordinary and there really was not a single special point.
"Haa!"
Suddenly, the young man who was at the 1st level of the Origin realm displayed his power. When heavy punches with the might of three hundred thousand catties were thrown out, the entire stage shook. It was a rank 4 martial skill, but by the hands of the young man, its might had an entirely new appearance. That attack was no small matter.
*whoosh*
Facing his opponent's attack, the young man from the Wind Cloud City was not rushed nor slow. Not panicked nor impatient. He also threw out a punch and it was also a rank 4 martial skill.
Normally, with his cultivation and being also a rank 4 skill, his power should be far stronger than his opponent. However, it did not. It could only be said to be fairly equal and it made others feel that his skill was not proficient enough.
*bang*
Finally, the two of them fought. Both of their fists collided and layers of Origin power endlessly surged out. The emitted energy ripples even made tiny cracks on the stage.
"Haa!" The young man from the Wind Cloud City loudly yelled and suddenly used more strength. It jolted his opponent's heavy punch and also his entire body away. At the end, his opponent fell on the ground.
He won. Finally, the person from the Wind Cloud City won. However, compared to Chen Wanxi who defeated her opponent with one strike, he won with too much effort. People couldn't help but think that his cultivation was far below Chen Wanxi's.
"Hiding strength? Interesting!"
At that instant, Chu Feng already won and he was waiting for the start of the next fight. He also focused his gaze on the young man from the Wind Cloud City and with a glance, he could tell that the young man was intentionally hiding his strength.
When that person won, the curtains of the first competition fell. Chen Wanxi who had the best results in the first round could temporarily rest.
Chu Feng stepped onto the stage again. At that moment, his opponent was quite a bit stronger than his previous opponent because he was a core disciple of the Lingyun School. Although they were both at the 1st level of the Origin realm, his atmosphere was a lot more powerful.
"I know you. You were with that fatty city lord!" Chu Feng lightly smiled and said.
"Being sharp with words is useless and I will beat your mouth shut!" That person was very cold.
"The person just now had quite a similar tone with yours, however the one who laid on the ground was still him."
Chu Feng really did not put his opponent in his eyes. When he was at the 7th level of the Spirit realm, Chu Feng could defeat those at the 1st level of the Origin realm. Right now, he was at the 8th level of the Spirit realm. Even those at the 2nd level of the Origin realm could not beat him. No matter how much stronger his opponent was, in Chu Feng's eyes, they would all fall with one strike.
"Hmph. You think that I will be as useless as him? You underestimate the disciples from my Lingyun School too much."
He suddenly made his move. He operated the Mysterious Technique, used his martial skill and his entire body emitted a golden glow. It was as dazzling as the sun and at the same time, his body also became golden-copper-coloured.
It was not a simple body anymore and it was even harder than black iron. He could chop black iron swords with his hand, break black iron bells with his body and it was an extraordinary strengthening martial skill. Not only did it turn his entire body into a weapon, the shine pierced one's eyes and it made them unable to observe any actions.
"Chu Feng is dead this time. This person's attack is several times stronger than the person from the Wind Hearing School. Aggressive and direct without any false bravado. Chu Feng has no way of picking up advantages."
"That's right. Although we don't know why that Hearing Wind School disciple lost, against this person who has steel tendons and iron bones, Chu Feng has zero chance of victory. He has no luck here."
On the stage that Chu Feng was on, golden light shot in every direction. No matter how much better people's vision were, they had no way of seeing the two people on the stage clearly.
However, they could feel the might that was emitted by the Lingyun School disciple. They felt that this time, it would be impossible for Chu Feng to pick up any small advantages. After all, without absolute power, there were no ways of beating strengthening martial skills.
"Waa~~~~~~"
But just at that time, a miserable cry suddenly rang out. The golden light on the stage started to vanish. When the light completely disappeared, everyone instantly had their eyes and mouths wide open and they were infinitely shocked.
They discovered with astonishment that Chu Feng still stood there and was not harmed in the slightest. As for the Lingyun School disciple, he already laid on the ground with white foam coming from his mouth, overturned eyeballs and he already lost consciousness.


MGA Capitulo 123  Enjoying the Process
"This"
At that moment, everyone was thoroughly bewildered. The scene on the stage really made them not know what to do. Even the cold Chen Wanxi couldn't help but turn her head over and cast her gaze towards Chu Feng.
Was Chu Feng really that strong? So strong that he was equal to Chen Wanxi, and with the cultivation of the 8th level of the Spirit realm, he was easily able to defeat those at the 1st level of the Origin realm?
Although there was no lack of outstanding talented people in the world that could defeat the strong while being weak, those were well-known people. Was the young man who seemed normal also a genius like that?
All sorts of inconceivable thoughts kept on emerging into their minds. For the first time, people felt that they might have underestimated Chu Feng. Perhaps, from the start, Chu Feng did not cheat and he used his own strength to reach this stage.
"City lord, this"
The guards of the Golden-purple City had shock written all across their faces. Before, they kept on looking down on Chu Feng and felt that Chu Feng was using his relationship with Su Rou to come here and to lose the face of their Golden-purple City.
Especially after Chu Feng replaced Wan Wenpeng, their hatred towards Chu Feng rose to the extreme. However, at that instant, they started to doubt their thoughts on Chu Feng before and whether it was correct or not. They couldn't help but reflect on it.
"Perhaps lady Su Rou was correct. Maybe this Chu Feng could bring us a surprise."
On Chen Hui's face, he was brimming with a relieved smile. In reality, before, he also had the same thoughts as his guards and felt that Chu Feng was a burden. However, right now, not only was Chu Feng not a burden, he was even the bargaining chip of the face of his Golden-purple City.
"How is this possible? How does he have such strong power? He didn't give his opponents any benefits and let them intentionally throw the match right?"
However, compared to others, those from the Golden-purple City were not willing to accept that fact. After all, from the bottom of their heart, they looked down on Chu Feng and looked forward to his humiliation.
Yet right in front of their eyes, not only did Chu Feng not humiliate himself, he even became the focus of attention. In the fights, it was no longer Chu Feng who could not bear through it, it was them.
After all, they didn't even enter top 10 yet Chu Feng was standing on that stage. He defeated two core disciples from first-rate schools and one of them was even the core disciple of the 1 school, the Lingyun School. He was way too strong. At least they could not have done that. Even Wan Wenpeng could not have done that.
Under the countless shocked gazes of the crowd, Chu Feng brought a light smile as he slowly walked down the fighting stage. The gazes towards him turned from disdain into admiration.
When Chu Feng finished the fight with lightning speed, the young man from the Wind Cloud City became the focus of the entire plaza.
Once again, the young man was the same as before. After some fighting, he achieved victory with difficulty. That made everyone not know whether he was hiding his strength or if his opponents were too strong.
"No need to come down. I've already lost patience in this New Excellence Assembly. Let's quickly end it!"
Just as the young man from the Wind Cloud City was preparing to walk down the stage, Chen Wanxi's skirt fluttered as she jumped up the stage. She took the initiative to fight with that young man.
"I am Ding Chou. Please give me your guidance!"
The young man from the Wind Cloud City only lightly smiled at Chen Wanxi's actions. He politely clasped his hands towards Chen Wanxi, seemingly not having any burdens from the strength that Chen Wanxi displayed earlier.
"Hmph." Chen Wanxi coldly snorted and palmed in the air. It was not a beautiful martial skill yet was filled with strong Origin power. Her previous opponent was forcefully struck and defeated by that palm.
"Ho." However, facing Chen Wanxi's attack, Ding Chou did not move nor dodge it. With a random wave of his hand, a layer of Origin power spread out from his palm and easily dissolved Chen Wanxi's attack.
"So you did hide your strength. Is that meaningful?" Chen Wanxi was not too shocked. Rather, her gaze had a hint of fury.
"Heh, I'm just enjoying the process of fighting. Is there anything wrong with that?"
"Both of us enjoy fighting, however you only aim for the result. I enjoy the process because the result is not important to me. After all, the one who will win will still be me at the end." The light, calm smile was still hung on Ding Chou face. Although, looking at it now, it was not calmness but confidence.
"Quite some words you have there. I would really like to see how you can win against me."
Chen Wanxi attacked once again. She patted several palms through the air and every time she struck with her palm, the air would tremble. Bright and golden palms were also condensed out.
Under her extremely quick hand speed, the entire fighting stage was filled with dense, golden-coloured palm marks. They were like golden shooting stars as they attacked Ding Chou.
"Lady Wanxi's methods are so strong! Although it's only a rank 4 martial skill, she is using it perfectly without any errors. It could simply be matched with rank 5 martial skills." The Golden-purple City guards endlessly sighed in admiration.
"This Wanxi really is a true martial genius. On the side of cultivation talent, she really does exceed me." As for Chen Wanxi's father, Chen Hui, he was extremely proud and he could not hide his smile.
"Meteor Palm Techniques. Quite nice usage, but regretfully, it lacks a bit of maturity."
Ding Chous eyes narrowed and his aura revolved. Following several palm marks, he used the exact same martial skill as Chen Wanxi. In terms of might, they were even stronger than Chen Wanxi's.
*rumble rumble rumble*
The golden palm marks on the stage continuously exploded and layers of Origin power constantly spread out. Even the people outside of the plaza could feel that might. It was the strength that two Origin realm experts should have.
At that instant, everyone also knew that Ding Chou did indeed hide his strength. Thinking back to his former fights, it wasn't that his strength was too weak, it was intentional. Not only was he no weaker than Chen Wanxi, he was even a bit stronger.
"Impressive! That Ding Chou is indeed worthy of being the representative of the Wind Cloud City. In terms of strength, he is quite a bit stronger than Chen Wanxi. It seems that the winner of this year's New Excellence Assembly belongs to the Wind Cloud City again!" Su Hen judged and said.
"Father, those words are said a bit too early right? Even if Chen Wanxi can't win against Ding Chou, the monster from my Azure Dragon School still hasn't went on stage yet!" Su Rou sweetly smiled and said while standing behind Su Hen.
"Chu Feng is indeed a genius and there is no need to doubt that. However, this Ding Chou is not ordinary as well. Did you not find out that he hasn't used his full strength up until now? He didn't even use any Mysterious Techniques and the martial skills he used weren't the strongest he had. I estimate that if he used his full strength, he may be comparable to those of the 3rd level of the Origin realm."
"Although Chu Feng has quite some fighting strength, he is only at the 8th level of the Spirit realm right now. If he had the cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm, perhaps he would have a chance to defeat Ding Chou. However, as long as he is in the Spirit realm, no matter if he's at the 9th level of the Spirit realm, he will absolutely not be able to beat Ding Chou." Su Hen shook his head.
"Father, you don't understand Chu Feng enough. You know that Ding Chou hasn't used his full strength, but does that mean Chu Feng used his full strength?" Su Rou did not agree on Su Hen's views.
"You're quite confident in Chu Feng huh? Do you want to have a wager?" Su Hen smiled very strangely and said.


MGA Capitulo 124  Stepping Stone
"Wager what?" Su Rou smiled and asked.
"Chen Wanxi will certainly be unable to beat Ding Chou, so it's only a matter of time before she loses."
"So, naturally, Chu Feng will fight Ding Chou. I bet that Chu Feng will lose to Ding Chou. If I win, I will decide your marriage." Su Hen said.
"Father, why are you talking about my marriage again? I already said it before. I will decide my own marriage." Hearing those words, Su Rou was obviously unwilling to.
"It's fine if you don't dare." Su Hen smiled indifferently.
"What don't I dare? Why not? If I win, trash the marriage between little Mei and that Shanguan Ya. What about it?" Su Rou seriously said.
"That's" At that instant, Su Hen slightly frowned and he was clearly in a difficult situation.
"What, you don't dare?" Su Rou's eyes formed into two crescent moons as she squinted and smiled at her own father, seemingly enjoying her father being in a difficult situation.
"You jest. Why wouldn't I dare? Then just as you said, if Chu Feng defeats Ding Chou and win the New Excellence Assembly, I will go and find the Shangguan family and cancel the marriage. Of course, only if little Mei agrees." Su Hen solemnly vowed.
"Heh, my lord father, don't worry. Little Mei yearns for you breaking the promise of the marriage." Su Rou's smile was extremely happy and her happiness came from her heart.
She first looked at the not too distant Su Mei, then she cast her gaze towards Chu Feng and said quietly, "Chu Feng. Little Mei's happiness will depend on you."
Not a single person heard the conversations of the father and daughter because at that moment, everyone's gazes were all concentrated on the stage of Ding Chou and Chen Wanxi. The battle between the two people entered the climax.
Chen Wanxi unceasingly sent out strong attacks and used all sorts of powerful martial skills. However, the thing that shocked everyone was that Ding Chou could use all the skills that Chen Wanxi used. Also, no matter which martial skill Chen Wanxi used, he would use. Every time he would slightly pressure Chen Wanxi a bit more.
In front of their eyes, everyone could see that Ding Chou was too strong. After such a long period of time, he did not even seriously fight Chen Wanxi. It was as if he were completely playing around with Chen Wanxi.
In front of Ding Chou, Chen Wanxi did not have the atmosphere that she had against her previous opponents. Her cold and proud face was filled with sparkling and translucent drops of sweat as she breathed roughly while taking in large breaths of air. She was almost forced to a dead end by Ding Chou.
"Wanxi, you must hang in there."
Within Chen Hui's sleeve, both of his fists were already tightly clenched. He deeply broke into cold sweat for Chen Wanxi. Their Golden-purple City had to win this New Excellence Assembly or else they would meet the situation in which they were unable to hand in their taxes.
Not to mention the punishment they would get from the Vermilion Bird City by not paying their taxes, they would even become the laughingstock of other cities. No matter what they did in the future, they would always be one level lower than others and it would be very difficult for them to raise their heads again.
"Lady Wanxi, you must win!"
"You can do it!"
Compared to Chen Hui's silent cheering, the guards of the Golden-purple City loudly yelled out and openly cheered for Chen Wanxi because the honor of their Golden-purple City was all on Chen Wanxi. Only victory was acceptable and not defeat.
However, reality was cruel. When Chen Wanxi almost completely exhausted her body strength, Ding Chou finally started his counter attack. His fierce attack surpassed everyone's expectations.
Although they were only the most simple attacking methods and he didn't even use any martial skill, his might made people sigh in admiration. In front of him, any attack by Chen Wanxi was useless. She could only stare at Ding Chou as he neared one step at a time.
At that instant, everyone finally knew how strong the seemingly ordinary young man was. Although Chen Wanxi was quite excellent when compared to people of the same generation, she was still greatly lacking in front of Ding Chou.
"This junior, you have lost!"
Finally, Ding Chou arrived in front of Chen Wanxi and his female-like thin palm already pressed down on Chen Wanxi's shoulder. Although it seemed very gentle and weak, the strength of that palm forcefully pressed Chen Wanxi into a kneeling position on the ground and she had no power to rise.
"This bastard!!"
Seeing his own daughter being pressed into kneeling on the fighting stage by Ding Chou, Chen Hui abruptly and furiously stood up and a visible flame of anger filled his entire face. However, he endured. He had to endure in that situation.
Defeated. Chen Wanxi was defeated, and she was completely and thoroughly defeated. That ending exceeded everyone's expectations as they never would have thought that Ding Chou hid so much strength. He was so strong that he was invincible on the same level of cultivation.
At that instant, cheers rang out everywhere be it inside or outside of the plaza. No matter what the ending was, Ding Chou and Chen Wanxi provided them with a feast of fighting and Ding Chou's title of being the first was really well deserved.
Everyone from the Wind Cloud City were happy and excited. Especially the city lord of the Wind Cloud City. His smile was extremely proud as his Wind Cloud City was the champion of the New Excellence Assembly once again and he successfully guarded the boss position of the 20 second-rate cities.
In contrast to the people from the Wind Cloud City, the people from the Golden-purple City were all dispirited. Originally, they thought that they had the position of victor with Chen Wanxi's strength, however, they did not expect that she would lose to Ding Chou.
Given another New Excellence Assembly, if they lost, they lost. At most there would be some regret. However, it was different this time. They could not lose in this New Excellence Assembly because if they did, huge disgrace was awaiting them. However, they had no other solutions.
Chen Wanxi already walked down the stage and although she still had her cold and elegant countenance, within her eyes were minuscule bits of tears. It could be seen that she felt sorrowful because of her defeat.
As for that Ding Chou, he had a smile as he looked at Chen Wanxi's departing back. The corner of his mouth raised to form a smug smile and he also started to slowly walk down the stage.
"This New Excellence Assembly isn't over yet. Where are you so hurried to go?" But just at that time, a clear voice suddenly rang out behind Ding Chou.
Turning his head and looking back, a tiny bit of uneasiness couldn't help but surge onto Ding Chou's calm face because he shockingly discovered that a young man suddenly appeared on the fighting stage. The most important thing was that he did not detect it at all and he did not know when he arrived on the stage.
At that instant, everyone inside or outside of the plaza were attracted to that scene. Almost no one sensed when that young man went on the stage. Naturally, that person was Chu Feng.
"Chu Feng? Why did he go on the stage? Does he want to die?"
The people from the Golden-purple City were filled with fury. Even Chen Wanxi was defeated by Ding Chou's hands so they felt that Chu Feng had no way of gaining victory. Rather, they felt that Chu Feng would only lose more face.
"Are you challenging me?" After assessing Chu Feng, Ding Chou lightly smiled and said.
"Challenge? No need to even mention that right? I'm just interested in being the champion of this New Excellence Assembly. As for youYou are just one of the stepping stones on my path towards being the victor."
Chu Feng had a faint smiling expression on his face but his gaze was filled with laziness. After the battle between Ding Chou and Chen Wanxi, Chu Feng still did not put Ding Chou in his eyes.


MGA Capitulo 125  Pinnacle Confrontation
"You are quite brave. You are actually the first person who dares to speak to me like this after my display of strength."
Ding Chou's smiling expression did not change and it seemed extremely kind. However, people already knew that he was not a person who distanced himself from worldly matters. Rather, he was an extremely conceited person. It was just that he hid his conceit extremely deeply.
"That meant that your previous opponents were a bunch of weaklings, or perhaps your Lingyun School doesn't even have any experts either." Chu Feng smiled mockingly.
"In the Azure Province, you are also the first person who dares to say that my Lingyun School has no experts." Ding Chou's sword-like brows slanted inwards and strands of cold glint surged within his gaze. He seemed to quite mind people saying bad things about his Lingyun School.
"Just saying the truth." Chu Feng shrugged his shoulders and seemed rather indifferent.
"Since it has come to this, go ahead. As long as you defeat me, this championship will be yours. However, there's no harm in telling you that I will make you more lose more miserably than Chen Wanxi!" Ding Chou formed his hand into a hook and indicated Chu Feng to bring it on.
"As you wish!"
*whoosh*
Chu Feng attacked. He operated the Mysterious Technique and his grandeur was as impressive as a rainbow. His body leaned slightly forward and he arrived in front of Ding Chou like the wind. His speed was extremely quick and everyone was taken quite aback.
Chu Feng's arms danced as they opened widely and closed. Every single skill and style could be said to be fine and outstanding. His attacks were as fast as lightning and as strong as mountain peaks. His fists were like iron and his legs like whips. His punches weaved into attacks that were like the storm and they surrounded Ding Chou within them.
"How can this guy have such strong power? With the cultivation of the Spirit realm, he has might that is no weaker than the Origin realm."
Chu Feng's attacks stirred up exclamations of surprise from the ground. Everyone's gaze were attracted to Chu Feng's punching methods.
Even the brows of the various city lords were tightly locked and their eyes lit up. Although they already guessed that Chu Feng was a genius before, they never would have thought that he was strong to this point.
"You know your stuff."
Facing Chu Feng's strong and fierce attacks, Ding Chou unexpectedly could not face it effortlessly. He was continuously forced back and he even gradually lost the power to resist.
Since Chu Feng's body was abnormally hard, as long as he forcefully collided with Chu Feng's body, a numbing feeling would come from that body section. He simply did not dare to use his body to block Chu Feng's attacks because he could not block it.
*whoosh* Suddenly, Chu Feng threw another heavy and vicious punch out. Wind rose from his fist and it headed straight towards his face. Ding Chou no place to dodge.
"Hmph."
Seeing that, Ding Chou gnashed his teeth and coldly snorted. The air around him instantly straightened and a layer of invisible power exploded out. The Origin power in his body was like an explosion of a volcano and it engulfed everything as it came out. The strong power formed into a formless hurricane and forcefully pushed Chu Feng back.
At the same time that Chu Feng was pushed back, Ding Chou rushed forward, waved both of his arms, randomly threw his fists out and from Chu Feng's earlier attack, he started counterattacking Chu Feng.
"You finally used the Mysterious Technique?"
Seeing Chu Feng who had the advantage enter a disadvantage within a blink, Su Rou slightly frowned. She knew that Ding Chou got serious and the him who operated the Mysterious Technique had strength that was comparable to the 3rd level of the Origin realm. Chu Feng was really hugely pressed.
"Heh. Rouer, like I said, Chu Feng cannot beat Ding chou. However, to be able to do all this with the cultivation of the 8th level of the Spirit realm, he could already be said to be creating miracles."
"If the two of them were in the same cultivation realm, Chu Feng could certainly win over Ding Chou. But regretfully, their cultivation is not the same." Su Hen rubbed the dry beard on his chin and smiled gloatingly.
"Tch. Father, the result is not certain so don't say those words too early." Su Rou curled her lips and continued watching the two people on the stage.
"Mm. As a matter of fact, I would like to see what degree Chu Feng can endure to. If he can preserve longer than Chen Wanxi, he would be quite impressive and he must be earnestly roped in with us."
Su Hen also seriously observed. Although he felt that Chu Feng could not win, the talent Chu Feng displayed already made him think highly of him. No matter if he won or lost, he would try to get Chu Feng closer to him.
"How about it? This is called giving a taste of your own medicine!"
Ding Chou operated the Mysterious Technique and the strength of his Origin power instantly rose by several times on every part of his body. He raised his hand and his leg, and the surrounding Origin power which he could control deeply restrained Chu Feng.
"You got serious, but I haven't yet."
Chu Feng strangely smiled and he suddenly stopped his retreating steps. With a single hand, he waved it against the fist and leg that Ding Chou was throwing towards him. Several palms appeared and it was like countless big hands extending as they clammed towards Ding Chou.
"Martial skill?!"
Ding Chou was greatly astounded by the sudden change because all of Chu Feng's Illusionary Palms were materialized and he could not figure which ones were real or fake and he could not see through it.
"It is merely a rank 3 martial skill. You dare to show that in front of my face?"
However, being shocked was being shocked and Ding Chou did not panic. He suddenly yelled out and the Origin power within his body revolved around his body through special meridians. His body emitted a dazzling golden light and a feeling of indestructibility was also emitted out. At that instant, radiance was shot everywhere with a threatening atmosphere. He did not seem to have the body of blood and flesh anymore. He was simply a battle god made out of gold and copper.
That was right. Ding Chou used the unique martial skill that only the Lingyun School had. Rank 4 strengthening martial skill, "Golden Armor Steel Body".The Lingyun School disciple that Chu Feng fought earlier used it as well, however the might was completely different when Ding Chou used it this time. He truly reached new heights with that.
"False bravado! Watch as my Golden Armor Steel Body breaks it!" Ding Chou threw out several punches and forcefully scattered Chu Feng's Illusionary Palms. His final punch fiercely linked with Chu Feng's Illusionary Palm.
*bang* A fist and a palm collided and made a huge sound like when steel connected with one another. Huge energy ripples shock and pushed the two people back several steps.
At that moment, everyone thought that Chu Feng was heavily injured. After all, Chu Feng was only looking for death if he met force with force with a rank 3 martial skill compared to Ding Chou's rank 4 martial skill.
However, when people thought that the palm Chu Feng used to stop Ding Chou's fist was broken, Chu Feng's body was like a cheetah as he abruptly jumped towards Ding Chou.
"Nice Golden Armor Steel Body. I, Chu Feng, will see who's breaking who."
Change was happening to Chu Feng's body at that moment. White-coloured lightning snakes surrounded his entire body and strong lightning shot everywhere. Between the surges, ear-piercing booms kept on being let out and also with dazzling sparks, his demeanour was extremely scary.
"This power, it's a rank 5 skill? No, it's a rank 4 skill that has the power of a rank 5 skill."
Ding Chou's expression changed greatly. He never would have guessed that Chu Feng had such a strong technique. A rank 5 martial skill was not something that ordinary people could grasp.


MGA Capitulo 126  Blackened-Gold Blade
The current Chu Feng had curled lightning all over his body. The lightning snakes roared and he did not even seem like a person anymore. He was just like a battle god created by lightning.
The might Chu Feng displayed stupefied everyone. In order for a martial skill to condense Spiritual energy into substance, it had to be a rank 5 martial skill.
To know that within the Azure Province, the strongest were only rank 6 martial skills. Rank 5 martial skills were something that many hoped for yet could not get. However, such an outstanding martial skill was grasped by a young man like Chu Feng. Naturally, many people would admire and respect him.
However, Ding Chou who was completely confident in his Golden Armor Steel Body was not afraid at all. He raised his arm and rushed towards Chu Feng. In the instant of collision between the lightning snake and the golden light, the two people who had martial skills that protected their bodies started a vicious physical body confrontation.
However, just as they attacked, the advantaged and disadvantaged was quickly determined. Chu Feng's lightning snakes were extremely overbearing and they had absolute attack power. Ding Chou's martial skill was coincidentally a defense martial skill so he was quickly pressured by Chu Feng.
*bang bang bang* Their fists and feet swung and kept on colliding. Every time they connected together, a deafening boom would be made. Every time they exchanged blows, strong ripples would surge. The most important thing was that when every ripple emitted out, Ding Chou would back off one step and Chu Feng would press forward.
"Heavens, what kind of person is Chu Feng? He can use the cultivation of the 8th level of the Spirit realm to pressure Ding Chou who's at the 2nd level of the Origin realm!"
People endlessly exclaimed and many people's blood boiled from watching because the scene in front of them told them a terrifying truth. Chu Feng who relied on the martial skill which was condensed by Spirit energy from the body was pressuring Ding Chou who had Origin power.
"So strong! I never would have thought that Chu Feng was this strong. It seems that maybe he really can help my Golden-purple City and be the champion."
Chen Hui and many guards of the Golden-purple City were happy and excited. Originally they had great hopes on Chen Wanxi, but they never would have guessed that Chu Feng "amazed everyone with one cry". It made the originally depressed them see the light again.
"Weren't you going to use this Golden Armor Steel Body to break me? Why are you being beaten down by me like this?"
Lightning coiled around Chu Feng's body and they would move with a thought. He did not even need to personally attack and he only need to press himself forward. With that, he could make Ding Chou continuously retreat and even if he had a strengthened body, he could not oppose Chu Feng's lightning whip.
"Beat me down? You are not worthy!" Ding Chou started to be slightly anxious because of Chu Feng, so, he took out two big, jet-black blades from his Cosmos Sack.
The blades were jet-black and one could not tell what they were made out off. The edge was not sharp yet it gave people a feeling of it being abnormally hard. It was certainly not a normal weapon.
*whoosh whoosh*
The double blades in Ding Chou's hands were waved and they formed two rays of black. It was extremely bizarre and it was as if it could cut through Spiritual energy and chop through Origin power. It did actually cut off Chu Feng's lightning whip as it dissipated into the air. After cutting off the attacking whip, Ding Chou turned defense into offense and started to attack Chu Feng.
Chu Feng tightly frowned as he did not expect that there would be such a strange weapon in the world that could chop through martial skills. However, being surprised was being surprised. Chu Feng did not retreat and with a switch in thoughts, the spiritual energy in his body exploded out.
*roar*
Violent lightning was shot out from his body and it formed into several long, huge lightning dragons. The lightning dragons roared and the sound jolted everywhere. The strong might even made the stage intensely tremble.
"Hmph. At the end, it is only a rank 4 martial skill. No matter how much stronger it is, I can still cut through it."
Ding Chou coldly snorted and his attack did not diminish at all. Several rays of black slashed through the air and the huge lightning dragons were all cut off by him. As they disappeared, he sliced towards Chu Feng's body.
"Damn it. This guy's blade really can break my Three Thunder Styles." Chu Feng was quite stunned and he finally experienced the power of that blade.
"Those areBlackened-gold blades. They're created by blackened-gold and they can cut down all martial skills under rank 5!" Someone yelled that out as they recognized where the black-coloured blade came from.
"They're blackened-gold blades! Those are a type of treasure and they cost quite a bit. Where did this Ding Chou come from to be able to have blades like those? There are even two!" After knowing that the weapon in Ding Chou's hands were blackened-gold blades, people were ceaselessly shocked because blackened-gold blades had quite considerable costs.
"It's him! I know who he is!" At that instant, Chen Wanxi who stood behind Chen Hui slightly opened her small mouth and within her shiny eyes was a hint of astonishment.
"Wanxi, what? What about that Ding Chou?" Chen Hui also felt that something was wrong so he quickly asked.
"Those two blackened-gold bladesI should not be mistaken. It's him. In the core disciple exam of my Lingyun School, a disciple killed a Monstrous Beast that had the strength of the 3rd level of the Origin realm and became the 1 person in that year's core disciple exam."
"However, no one saw that person's appearance clearly so no one knew who that person was, and from that, it became a mystery. But, someone did see that it was a young man that held two blackened-gold blades." Chen Wanxi said gravely.
"What? That Ding Chou is that strong?!" Not only Chen Hui, the other Golden-purple City guards widened their mouths and shock was filled on their faces.
Monstrous Beasts were very strong existences. A Monstrous Beast that was at the 3rd level of the Origin realm was really quite something. To be able to kill that Monstrous Beast meant that Ding Chou was a terrifying person and he was undoubtedly a genius!
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
On the fighting stage, rays of black flickered and Ding Chou's attack was abnormally fierce. At that instant, Chu Feng could only rely on the definite speed of the Imperial Sky Technique to flee randomly on the stage and to attack with the Three Thunder Styles at Ding Chou's blindspots.
But Ding Chou really could not be underestimated. His reactions were extremely quick and Chu Feng's attack were in vain against him. Every time when his attacks were going to land, they would always be cut apart by his blackened-gold blade.
"It's useless. This blackened-gold blade can cut apart all martial skills under rank 5. Although your lightning methods are no weaker than rank 5 martial skills in terms of power, at the end, it is still a rank 4 martial skill and it will not threaten me in any way." Ding Chou leaped forward and threw himself at Chu Feng. His speed was even quicker than last time.
"Rank 5 martial skills? Thank you for reminding me!"
At that instant, Chu Feng did not dodge anymore. Instead, on the corner of his mouth was a faint smile as he stood where he was, waiting for Ding Chou to come forth.
"Is Chu Feng an idiot? Why isn't he dodging?"
When people saw that scene, they were greatly stunned because the power of the blackened-gold blade was not to be looked down upon. It could even cut through martial skills. If it landed on Chu Feng's body, the result was unimaginable.
*whoosh*
However, at that point of time, Chu Feng suddenly clenched both of his fists and a golden-coloured pike condensed into his hands. He stepped forward, waved his arms and the golden-coloured pike within his hands became a golden dragon as it swept towards Ding Chou.
With a huge bang, the blackened-gold blade in Ding Chou's hand flew away into the air. Looking back at Ding Chou, he backed away for a few steps, and on the left-hand palm which was holding the blackened-gold blade, was blood.


MGA Capitulo 127  Murderous 7-Injuring Fists
One blackened-gold blade left Ding Chou's hand. It flew off the fighting stage and stabbed into the ground. Blood kept on dripping from Ding Chou's left hand and he was clearly not lightly injured.
Looking back at Chu Feng, both of his hands were tightly holding onto a golden-coloured pike. The golden pike was sparkling and although it was condensed by golden light, it was abnormally powerful and it emitted repressing strength.
"You said, as long as it isn't a rank 5 martial skill, you can cut it off."
"So, I might as well let you see what a rank 5 martial skill is." Chu Feng pointed the golden pike at Ding Chou.
"Heavens, that power is undoubtedly a rank 5 martial skill. It's really a rank 5 martial skill. That Chu Feng can actually control a rank 5 martial skill!"
At that instant, cries of surprise rang everywhere. It wasn't that no one on scene couldn't use a rank 5 martial skill, it was just unheard of to be able to use a rank 5 skill at Chu Feng's age.
After all, there were extremely high body and comprehension requirements for rank 5 martial skills. If one's body did not reach the standard, even if they understood the mysteriousness of the skills, they could not use it. If their comprehension power was not enough, even if their body reached the standard, they could not cultivate it.
Most people had cultivated for many years and after reaching a certain understanding on the road of martial cultivation, and also after reaching a certain level in cultivation, they could successfully cultivate rank 5 martial skills.
With Chu Feng's age and cultivation, it did not make sense how he was able to use rank 5 martial skills.
"Is this person really a genius that is hard to see even in a hundred years?"
At that moment, that thought popped into many people's minds because Chu Feng's performance really shocked people too much. Time after time, he smashed the views of other people towards him.
At first, they thought that he was only there to fill in the space as an inferior and they even mocked how the Golden-purple City found a person like him. However, looking back at it, how did he even seem like a weak person? He was simply a genius that one could not even meet in a hundred years.
Especially the participants from the Golden-purple City. In that instant, their emotions were the most complex. They kept on looking down on Chu Feng before and felt that he was losing their Golden-purple City's face.
However, looking at it now, it was impossible for them to even be compared to him because Chu Feng really was way more outstanding than them. It made them feel quite ashamed.
"The Azure Dragon School will rise abruptly since a disciple like him appeared. In the future, they will certainly have great accomplishments and they will not be a second-rate school anymore."
Some people even predicted that Chu Feng could bring the Azure Dragon School up to a new position because his performance was too eye-catching right now. Although he had the status of being a disciple of a second-rate school, he had the strength to pressure a disciple from a first-rate school.
He was even so young. No matter if it was cultivation time or battle experience, he was far from others. Those things just so happened to emphasize Chu Feng's overwhelming areas.
"He's too strong. This person is so strong. No wonder, no wonder lady Su Rou would say those words."
Chen Hui and the others were rather astonished and they saw the hope for victory once again. However, only Chen Wanxi tightly frowned and said,
"It won't be this easy. Do not ever underestimate that Ding Chou. He is unquestionably not an ordinary person since he was able to get first place in the Lingyun School's core disciple exam."
"Besides, it was one year ago that he killed the Monstrous Beast. Within the year, it would be impossible for him to have no improvement. After all, rank 5 martial skills don't only belong to the Azure Dragon School. My Lingyun School has plenty of those as well."
"Wanxi, your meaning is?" After hearing Chen Wanxi's words, Chen Hui and the others felt a wave of uneasiness because they suddenly remembered that the Lingyun School was the 1 school in the Azure Province. It was the gathering ground for the most excellent geniuses within the Azure Province.
Furthermore, as Ding Chou was able to get first place in the core disciple exam, he was a genius within geniuses. His strength was most likely not only up to there.
"You think only you know rank 5 skills? I've played around with you enough for today. I've gotten tired of it and I've decided that I will finish you off. I will open your eyes and experience what real rank 5 martial skills are."
Suddenly, Ding Chou's aura started to change. A wave of indescribable strong power was exploding out from within his body. His cultivation was rapidly rising.
Even his injured left hand began to heal. It was as if he was being reborn. Even the stage violently trembled from his change and under his feet, cracks were spreading out. Layers of Origin power visible by the naked eye started to surround and revolve around him like a shield made out of a layer of Origin power.
"This aura is strong. His strength is changing and it's increasing. Heavens! He already reached the peak of the 2nd level of the Origin realm! What martial skill is this? It can perform changes to his own essence!" Feeling Ding Chou's aura which was constantly strengthening, everyone unendingly exclaimed in surprise.
"Impossible. He actually cultivated this skill, but how is it possible? So many core disciples studied it for years yet they were not successful. However, he was?" Chen Wanxi's beautiful eyes were perfectly round and on her cold and proud face was shock.
"Wanxi, what martial skill is it?" Chen Hui and the others asked simultaneously.
"It is titled as the rank 5 martial skill which is the hardest to cultivate in my Lingyun School. It is also named as the strongest rank 5 martial skill, the Murderous 7-Injuring Fists!" Chen Wanxi's tone was filled with surprise and admiration.
"Haa!"
Just at that time, Ding Chou suddenly explosively yelled, separated his legs and stamped down with power. Two deep holes got punched out on the stage and he put both of his legs in them. After that, he clenched one of his hands and punched towards Chu Feng through the air.
*wuuaaa*
The fist howled as it was punched out. Formless Origin power surged out and it gradually materialized. It formed into a half-transparent Origin power fist with might that was seemingly unstoppable as it flew towards Chu Feng.
The fist was extremely quick and there was almost no way to dodge nor avoid it. Facing that situation, Chu Feng immediately waved his right arm and threw the golden pike out.
*bang* The two things collided and instantly, an ear-piercing boom exploded out. The strong energy ripples permeated through the air and formed into a tornado made out of streams of air and it started engulfing everything.
"Quite some methods, but let me see how you're going to block the next ones."
Ding Chou coldly smiled and angrily yelled out again. He threw out several fists and the densely packed Origin power fists howled in the air. The power of every single fist was no weaker than the first one. That might was rather terrifying.
"Hmph. I'll show you how I will block this."
Seeing that, Chu Feng coldly snorted and suddenly grasped with his left hand. A golden shield came into shape. The shield was very large and after putting it in front of him, it was exactly big enough to be able to defend himself.
*boom boom boom boom*
Just at that time, the Origin power fists arrived and started to endlessly strike the golden shield. Strong force quickly dimmed the golden shield as it was unable to hold back against the force and it was going to disappear soon.
"I do not believe that I will lose to you today!"
Chu Feng grinded his teeth and started to continually channel the Spirit power within his body into the golden shield on his left hand. With that, it maintained the status of the golden shield and held back against Ding Chou's Murderous 7-Injuring Fists.


MGA Capitulo 128  Extraordinary Genius
"He blocked it?"
Everyone on scene took in a breath of cool air. The power of the Origin power fist was no small matter and even some experts who were there had to seriously treat it.
That was because the Murderous 7-Injuring Fists were not comparable to normal rank 5 martial skills. It was one of the best skills within rank 5 martial skills. However, Chu Feng blocked such a strong attack.
In contrast to others, Chen Wanxi tightly frowned and said pessimistically, "This won't do. Chu Feng can't go on for too long. The Murderous 7-Injuring Fists are not simple rank 5 martial skills. It is absolutely not as simple as you think it is!"
In actuality, it was just as how Chen Wanxi said it was. Although Chu Feng successfully defended against Ding Chou's attack, he only defended against it. He was not even able to counterattack.
"I'd like to see how long you can go on for."
Suddenly, the air around Ding Chou quivered and his aura changed once again. The Origin power fists he was throwing out abruptly strengthened again and its speed kept on increasing. Its might was extremely fierce.
*bang bang bang*
The Origin power fists were half-transparent and they continuously exploded on the golden shield. Chu Feng had troubles bearing against the strong force and he started to back away step by step.
"Damn it. How is this guy's strength so strong?"
Chu Feng had no choice but to look directly at Ding Chou. With his strength, even if his opponents were at the 2nd level of the Origin realm, he could still easily defeat them. However, Ding Chou was different. Common sense could not be applied to him.
His methods were extremely strong. Up until now, he was the strongest opponent Chu Feng had faced within his generation.
"Hehe idiot, do you want me to lend you my strength?" Within Chu Feng's brain, Eggy's naughty voice came ranging out.
"No need. I will use my own strength to defeat him." Chu Feng was very stubborn because he did not reach a dead end yet where he would need to rely on Eggy's cultivation. He was going to use his own power to defeat Ding Chou.
With a thought, a layer of Spirit Formation power surged out and it covered the golden shield. At that moment, the hardness of the golden shield immediately increased by several times. Despite that the Origin power fists got even fiercer, they had no way of breaking the shield.
After using the Spirit Formation power to raise the defense of the golden shield, Chu Feng formed his right hand into a fist and a golden-coloured longsword appeared within his hand. He operated the Mysterious Technique and his spiritual energy boiled. Not only did he stop his retreating steps, he even started to advance forward.
"Look, that Chu Feng is going forward! He is withstanding the Murderous 7-Injuring Fists!"
"Heavens, how is that possible? To be able to hold back such a strong martial skill is already a miracle, and now he can still go forward?"
Everyone exclaimed in surprise and the crowd stirred up. That kind of battle already exceeded their imagination and it could be said to be the most intense battle in the history of New Excellence Assemblies.
It surpassed everyone's understanding towards the young generation and completely overturned their imagination. It wasn't only a match between two new, outstanding participators in the assembly. It was a match between geniuses. Two real geniuses.
At that instant, Chu Feng was holding a golden shield in one hand and a golden longsword in the other. Even though Origin power fists were endlessly exploding all around him, Chu Feng was not affected by that as if nothing could stop his steps forward.
One step. Two steps. Three steps. Four steps. Every step that Chu Feng took would violently shake the stage and leave a deep footprint there. Every step he took, he would exhaust a huge amount of spiritual energy and pay a extremely large price.
But even so, it did not diminish his determination. He clenched onto the shield in his left hand tighter and tighter, as well as holding the longsword in his right hand stabler and stabler. If one looked in detail, they would discover that there were lightning flickering within his eyes.
That was not caused by the Three Thunder Styles but rather the reaction that came from Chu Feng's body. At that moment, Chu Feng already brought his power out to the extreme. That was Chu Feng at his peak.
"How is this happening? How can Chu Feng do all this? He's only at the 8th level of the Spirit realm!" Su Hen gaze tightened and tension was on his strong and healthy face.
Not to mention Su Hen, even Su Rou widened her little mouth in shock. Although she already knew that Chu Feng was a genius that was hard to come by, she did not expect that Chu Feng would be strong to this degree.
"I do not believe that you can hold off my Murderous 7-Injuring Fists!"
Seeing that his own offense could not shake Chu Feng, Ding Chou also got thoroughly angered. He roared again and the surrounding Origin power spread out and away. His aura strengthened by several times once again and at that instant, he entered the 3rd level of the Origin realm.
"What is happening? Ding Chou's cultivation changed again? Why is he suddenly emitting the aura of the 3rd level of the Origin realm?"
"Was he already at the 3rd level of the Origin realm at the start and used special techniques to conceal his true strength? Is it that his current cultivation is his real cultivation?" As they felt Ding Chou's change in cultivation, people felt that it was unbelieveable.
"No. He did not hide his strength but rather he increased his strength. This is the power of the Murderous 7-Injuring Fists. He used that to increase his cultivation."
"I never would have guessed that Ding Chou's talent was like this to be able to cultivate the Murderous 7-Injuring Fists to the 3rd layer."
Chen Wanxi had disbelief written all across her face. In the eyes of many, she was already a cultivating genius. However, when compared to Ding Chou, she was only mediocre.
As she was a core disciple of the Lingyun School, she deeply knew the strength of the Murderous 7-Injuring Fists. Although it was a rank 5 martial skill, it was one of the core martial skills of the Lingyun School and it was not able to be grasped by ordinary disciples.
"What? He used a martial skill to increase his strength from the 2nd level to the 3rd level? How is there such a strong martial skill in the world?"
After hearing Chen Wanxi's words, Chen Hui and the others were astonished and they could not remain calm anymore. The Murderous 7-Injuring Fists were way too strong. That martial skill was certainly the strongest martial skill that they had ever seen.
"Wait, Chu Feng did not stop moving forward. He's still continuing yet his aura hasn't changed. What is this? How can he do this? How is he supporting himself with the cultivation of the 8th level of the Spirit realm to hold back against such strong attacks?"
However, after looking more carefully, the complexion of Chen Hui and the others changed greatly once again. They were stupefied as they discovered the one who was pressing forward was still Chu Feng even when Ding Chou's cultivation changed from the 2nd level of the Origin realm to the 3rd level of the Origin realm in addition to the strengthening in essence of his Murderous 7-Injuring Fists.
"This is too terrifying. Is that Chu Feng a monster? This defies common sense!"
Everyone was ceaselessly shocked. An appalled expression was hung on their faces and some people even trembled because they felt that they were witnessing the birth of an extraordinary genius.


MGA Capitulo 129  Kiss of Deep Emotion
Under the gazes of innumerable people, Chu Feng continued forward step by step. Finally, he arrived in front of Ding Chou. With a golden shield clenched by his left hand and a golden longsword held by his right hand, he pointed at Ding Chou then said, "This is the end."
*whoosh*
In the instant that he finished talking, Chu Feng attacked with a flash. Lightning under his feet surged and he disappeared within a blink. When he reappeared, he was behind Ding Chou.
"Don't underestimate me."
Ding Chou's reactions were extremely quick. He spun his body around and threw out a punch. In the range in which they could almost reach, an Origin power fist went straight towards Chu Feng.
"Hmph."
Chu Feng coldly snorted and dissipated the golden shield in his left hand. Both of his hands tightly clenched the golden longsword as he slightly leaned to the side and dodged the Origin power fist.
Chu Feng then arrived in front of Ding Chou. Putting power in his arms, he stabbed straight. With a poof, the golden longsword piercing into the chest of Ding Chou.
"Waa!"
The longsword went straight through Ding Chou's chest and his complexion instantly became ghastly-white. Not only did he stop the attacks from his hands, he opened his mouth and a mouthful of blood sprayed out.
"Ahh~~~~"
Suddenly, he howled towards the sky as if releasing all the bitterness in his head. After roaring for a good while, he fell on the ground with a poof and laid on the stage without power. Both of his eyes were dull as if they did not even have any strength. It could be seen that the overwhelming Murderous 7-Injuring Fists had a great burden on him and he had already reached the limit.
Looking back at Chu Feng, although his countenance was pale as well with dripping drops of sweat which were as big as beans, clothing completely soaked by sweat, rough breathing, and was clearly tired, he was still standing. Nothing was the same as he stood on the seemingly desolate stage after the great battle.
Won. Chu Feng won. At the end, Chu Feng won in the confrontation between two geniuses at their peak!
A disciple from a second-rate school successfully defeated a core disciple from a first-rate school, a genius-level disciple from the Lingyun School, and successfully became the champion of the New Excellence Assembly.
*clap~*
At that instant, thunder-like clapping sounds resonated everywhere. They were cheering for Chu Feng because after the young man who was at the 8th level of the Spirit realm successfully defeated a person who was at the 2nd level of the Origin realm, they could not control the excited emotions within their heart and they couldnt help but want to clap and cheer for the young man.
"Chu Feng, you're the best!"
Other than the resonation of excited cheering, a beautiful figure suddenly lept onto the stage and hugged Chu Feng.
Looking at that scene, everyone couldn't help but be dumbfounded because that person was none other than the 2nd daughter of Su Hen, the Vermilion Bird City's lord, Su Mei.
"What's this? Isn't that the Su family's third lady, Su Mei? Isn't she the fiancée of Shangguan Ya? Why is she so close to Chu Feng like this? What relationship do those two have?"
The crowd neverendingly guessed. After all, people from the Vermilion Bird City knew that Su Mei was Shangguan Ya's fiancée. Their marriage was already determined when Su Mei was born.
However, at that instant, what did Su Mei's actions mean? She embraced Chu Feng in front of so many people! Wasn't that slapping the face of the Shangguan family, slapping the face of Shangguan Ya?
"Damn it." Shangguan Ya who was standing outside of the plaza tightly clenched his fists. Cold glint shot out of his eyes because Su Mei's actions were undoubtedly showing that she had a relationship with another man instead of him and it made him lose all face.
"Rouer, this" Even Su Hen greatly changed his expression and he was aware that the situation was amiss.
"Father, in any case, you already promised me that as long as Chu Feng won against Ding Chou, you would cancel the marriage between little Mei and that Shangguan Ya. Since this marriage will get canceled sooner or later, why do you need to worry about other people's views?"
"You should be able to see that Chu Feng is a lot more outstanding when compared to Shangguan Ya right? Wouldn't it be better to give little Mei to Chu Feng?" Su Rou charmingly smiled as if she already predicted that ending.
"This matter isn't as simple as you think it is." Su Hen didn't know what to do and he was obviously in a difficult position.
But just at that time, Su Mei did something that astounded the crowd even more. She stuck out her soft red lips and kissed Chu Feng's face. Chu Feng did not avoid it either and that became a scene that made everyone stupefied.
The third lady of the Su family, the fiancée of the Shangguan family, Shangguan Ya, kissed Chu Feng in front of everyone.
"Damn it. I will kill that Chu Feng." Shangguan Ya had no way of accepting that. The flames of fury assaulted his heart and as he spoke, he was preparing to attack.
*bam* But at that moment, a dried up yet powerful palm patted Shangguan Ya's shoulder. A wave of strong Profound power surged into his body and within an instant, all of the Origin power fluctuations got pressed back down.
"Grandfather?" Turning his head and looking back, Shangguan Ya couldn't help but be at a loss because at that moment, standing behind him was a single-eyed old man who had a blind eye. The old man also had white hair and beard and that person was the current family master of the Shangguan family, Shangguan Yue.
"What are you doing? You want to attack him in front of Su Hen? Do not forget that Su Hen is the lord of this Vermilion Bird City." Shangguan Yue's voice was very calm.
"But." Shangguan Ya cast his gaze towards Chu Feng and he grinded his teeth in anger.
"The time is not ripe yet. My Shangguan family cannot be hostile towards the Su family yet." Shangguan Yue said in a low voice.
"Then do we leave him and do nothing?" Shangguan Ya was indignant.
"No." Shangguan Yue shook his head and viciously said, "This person must be removed!"
At that instant, Chu Feng was completely submerged in the happiness of victory and only when Su Mei kissed with deep emotion did he suddenly pull himself together. He couldn't help but hold onto Su Mei's tender small waist and said while chuckling,
"Have you been captivated by my handsome bravery and wish to give yourself to me?"
"IWho wants to give themself to you. Bastard."
She did all that from the heat of the moment as she got over-excited, so that was why she took it a bit too far. At that moment, being held by the waist by Chu Feng, Su Mei's little face became pink and she embarrassedly pushed Chu Feng away.
"Waa~~~~"
However, at that moment, Ding Chou who was laying nearby started to painful bawl. His body convulsed and his aura became extremely weak. At the end, his pale-white skin became ashen and both of his eyes overturned. White foam came out from his mouth and it was as if he was going to die.
"Damn it! This is just a round of sparring but you dare to murder Ding Chou!" Seeing that the situation wasn't right, the city lord of the Wind Cloud City rushed forward, pointed at Chu Feng and angrily rebuked.
"Ha! Before, Ding Chou's attacks were even more ruthless than Chu Feng. If it wasn't because Chu Feng had strength that exceeded others, he would have already died by Ding Chou's mad explosions."
"Now you blame him for murdering? If he really did have intentions to murder, Ding Chou would already be dead. How would he be laying down here panting?" Su Mei who stood next to Chu Feng resentfully refuted.
".."
The Wind Cloud City lord was speechless while facing Su Mei's reprimands. He was clearly very embarrassed. He could point and blame Chu Feng and even attack him, however, when facing the Su family's third lady, he did not even dare to say anything back.


MGA Capitulo 130  The Su Familys Secret
"The injuries that Ding Chou's has right now were not inflicted by Chu Feng. They were done by himself." Just at that time, Chen Wanxi slowly walked over.
"What do you mean?"The city lord of the Wind Cloud City was confused.
"There are 7 layers to the Murderous 7-Injuring Fists. Every layer can stimulate hidden strength within one's body and gain power that exceeds the standard. A price also comes with power as every layer will do a certain amount of damage to the body."
"According to legends, after cultivating to the 7th level, one could gain power that was dozens of times stronger than themself. However, when that power disappears, they will be paralyzed and lose all their cultivation."
"The Murderous 7-Injuring Fists. When the fists are thrown out, they will certainly have the power to murder their enemies but it is also a true double-edged sword. The stronger power that they gained, the larger the price they had to pay."
"Ding Chou cultivated to the 3rd layer. Although he did not reach the point in which he destroyed his cultivation, he will be injured greatly. He will require at least 2 months worth of rest before he can leave the bed." Seeing Ding Chou who was endlessly howling and enduring extreme pain, Chen Wanxi explained in detail.
After hearing those words, Chu Feng and the others couldn't help but cast their pitiful gazes towards Ding Chou. The principle of "when things reach the extreme, they can only go in the opposite direction" was currently proven by Ding Chou.
However, at that moment, Chen Wanxi cast her meaningful gaze towards Chu Feng. To be able to force Ding Chou to that step, gain victory at the end, and also stand there along with those of the unrelated, Chu Feng left an extremely deep impression on her.
She did not know whether her Lingyun School had a genius like that. However, at least within the people she had seen, he was the one with the more terrifying innate aptitude. It was unimaginable how strong Chu Feng would be when he reached the same age as her.
After that, the curtains of the New Excellence Assembly fell and Chu Feng gave everyone a huge surprise. The battle between him and Ding Chou could be said to be the most exciting match from all the New Excellence Assemblies.
The impression Chu Feng left was unerasable. Everyone felt that they witnessed the emergence of a genius. A genius that appeared from the Azure Dragon School.
That genius that could change the destiny of the Azure Dragon School. He could also very possibly bring the formerly most glorious school in the Nine Provinces back on its magnificent road. Even if it wouldn't return to its flourishing past, it was likely that it could become a first-rate school.
Even the Golden-purple City received attention. Many people that looked down upon the Golden-purple City started to getting closer to Chen Hui. The reason for that was naturally also because of Chu Feng.
Since Chu Feng was the champion of the New Excellence Assembly this time, the Golden-purple City were exempt from this year's taxes. That made Chen Hui very happy, but the thing he was most happy about was not that he was free from taxes, it was that a genius like Chu Feng appeared in the Golden-purple City. It made his face shine and he could finally raise his head in front of the many city lords.
The New Excellence Assembly ended there. The name "Chu Feng" was centered around everyone as they discussed. As for Chu Feng himself, he did not leave the Vermilion Bird City. He accepted the invitation of Su Hen and stayed for a few more days in the Vermilion Bird City.
Everyone could understand that. Chu Feng already showed his talent, and those who had a bit of intelligence would do their best to get closer to him. Not to mention Su Hen, even the city lords of other cities started to inquire news about the Chu family and wanted to hiddenly be in good terms with Chu Feng's family.
"Chu Feng, you didn't listen to me again. Did you forget what I told you? Cultivating requires gradual progress. If you continue like this, it will cost greatly sooner or later."
In a certain garden in the Vermilion Bird City, Chu Feng and Su Mei walked shoulder-to-shoulder. Although she felt happy because of Chu Feng's victory, the little girl still worried about Chu Feng's rapidly increasing cultivation.
"Heh, don't worry. Don't you understand what kind of person I, Chu Feng, am? I'm not someone who is shortsighted. I know what to do about my cultivation and I won't harm myself."
"Besides, if I can't defeat Gong Luyun in one year, even if he doesn't kill me, I wouldn't have any face to continue living. After all, the words that should have been said were said." Chu Feng chuckled.
"You really are too rash."
Mentioning that issue, Su Mei's little face was full of worry. Gong Luyun was the 1 disciple in the Azure Dragon School, but in reality, even 1 disciples in some first-rate schools were not as strong as Gong Luyun.
Gong Luyun was a true genius. At the age of 20, he was already at the 1st level of the Profound realm and fairly equal to Su Rou. It would really be a fantasy story in order for Chu Feng to chase up to Gong Luyun in one short year.
"Heh, don't worry. I know what I'm doing. Believe me."
"On the other hand, you sisters are born in such a wealthy and powerful family. Why did you choose to enter the Azure Dragon School?" Chu Feng felt that Su Mei's emotions were off so he quickly changed the topic.
"That's" Mentioning that matter, Su Mei's sweet and beautiful little face changed and a complicated expression rose from her face.
"Whatever. If it's an inconvenience, just pretend that I never asked." Chu Feng tactfully smiled.
"It's not." Seeing that, Su Mei instantly tensed up as though afraid Chu Feng would have any bad thoughts towards her. After carefully observing her surroundings, she tugged Chu Feng's arm and pulled him into a room.
After closing the doors to that room, Su Mei looked through the door cracks and watched for a while. Then, she said to Chu Feng, "Use your Spirit power to feel if there's anyone nearby."
"I did. It's extremely safe." Chu Feng also knew that the matter was not normal. However, the more he thought, the more curious he was because he felt that there was some secret hidden away.
"It's not that I don't trust you, but this issue is extremely important. Originally, it should not be mentioned to any other person, however, since you asked, I" Su Mei was in a slightly difficult situation.
"If it's a secret, then it's fine." Chu Feng smiled. He did not want to make things difficult for Su Mei.
At that instant, Su Mei gnashed her teeth before saying, "Who do you think is the strongest person in the history of the Azure Province?"
"Of course, it's the school founder of the Azure Dragon School, the Azure Dragon Founder. Wasn't he the strongest expert that year in the continent of the Nine Provinces and even the Jiang Dynasty was fearful towards him?" Chu Feng replied.
"Nope." Su Mei shook her head and said, "The Azure Dragon Founder is indeed strong, but he is not the strongest person that appeared in the Azure Province."
"Oh? There's other people even stronger than that old man?" Chu Feng got even more curious.
"Mm. However, this is just a legend that has no verification. It was said that 10 thousand years ago, the continent of the Nine Provinces was still just a wilderness. The population that time was not even 1100 of the population right now."
"The Jiang Dynasty did not appear yet and the various schools were not created either. The word ‘martial cultivation' was very unfamiliar to people because people who had the cultivating methods would not pass their martial cultivating methods down to outsiders."
"So, there were extremely few martial cultivators at that time. Only 9 powerful families knew the martial cultivating methods and those 9 families occupied the Nine Provinces. The family that occupied the Azure Province was called the Qing family."
[TN Although "Qing" is "Azure", but for naming sakes I will leave it as "Qing".]


MGA Capitulo 131  Emperor Tomb
"Qing family? So the Azure Province is originated from this Qing family?" Chu Feng asked.
"That's right. The names of the Nine Provinces are taken from the 9 martial cultivating families."
"The 9 powerful families had equal strength and they all occupied one province each and formed the situation in which no one attacked each other. That was maintained for roughly 200 years, but it was all changed by one unforeseen event." Su Mei said.
"Unforeseen event? What event?" Chu Feng was increasingly curious.
"On that year, a boy was born into the Qing family. On the day that the boy was born, golden, colourful light engulfed the entire sky. Four enormous beasts surged and roared mid-air and they shook the entire continent."
"That boy was naturally intelligent. According to the legends, one month after he was born, he could speak. On the second month, he could stand up and walk. When he was 1 year old, he started to learn the Four Arts. He was familiar with all the ancient books in the world at the age of five." Su Mei said.
"There was such a child prodigy?" Chu Feng was shocked. That speed of growth really surpassed the cognition of normal people.
"That wasn't even much. The most important part was when that boy was 7 years old, the bones in his body were at their best and they were equivalent to the physique of 12 year old normal children. So, when he was 7 years old, he started martial cultivation."
"The most scary thing was that he was also extremely impressive in martial cultivation. He entered the Origin realm when he was 9 years old, Profound realm when he was 11 years old, and Heaven realm when he was 13 years old. He swept across the Nine Provinces and made the Qing family the overlord of the Nine Provinces."
"He was that strong? Entering the Heaven realm at the age of 13, swept through the Nine Provinces and united the continent?"
Chu Feng was shocked again. Up until now, the Heaven realm was the known peak of martial cultivation. It was quite terrifying when that person entered it at the age of 13.
Chu Feng was 15 years old this year and with the cultivation of the 8th level of the Spirit realm, he was already viewed as a genius by many people. To enter the Heaven realm at the age of 13 was too impressive. Even Chu Feng was quite stunned because when compared to that person, he was simply as ordinary as he could be.
"Strong? The strong part hasn't even come yet. When he was 15 years old, he entered a completely new world of martial cultivation."
"A completely new world of martial cultivation?"
"He had might that was like a lord's arrival to the world and power that could move mountains and fill oceans. With a wave of his hand, he could destroy any city and he could slaughter living things like stepping on ants. He was the true lord of the world and he ruled the fates of all. So, people called those who were in that realm as ‘Martial Lords'!"
"Martial Lord? So after the Heaven realm, there's still a Martial Lord realm?" Chu Feng was quite astonished and he couldn't help but ask, "Who is that person called?"
"He is called Qingxuantian." Su Mei replied.
"Qingxuantian." Chu Feng deeply remembered that name because he had to remember such a character. A true genius. A true influential person.
"Qingxuantian is the strongest person that appeared in the continent of the Nine Provinces. However, because that matter happened too long ago and many changes occurred to the Nine Provinces, very little people know about it now."
"However, the strangest thing is that just after Qingxuantian became a Martial Lord, he suddenly disappeared. There were many thoughts on why he disappeared. Some people said he left because the continent of the Nine Provinces could not contain him anymore."
"Some people also said that his martial cultivation went against the heavens and broke the rules of martial principles. From that, he received the punishment of the heavens and died on the year that he became a Martial Lord. Up until now, that was the most reasonable way of death that people said."
"Is he really dead? Such a strong person died just like that?" Chu Feng did not really believe it. How could such a strong person die because someone said so?
"He did indeed die. According to legends, he knew that he didn't have much time left so before death, he created a tomb for himself. The tomb ran through half of the Azure Province and he set up 4 entrances. The names of the 4 entrances are called Azure Dragon, White Tiger, Vermilion Bird and Black Tortoise!"
"These 4 entrances, is it?"
Chu Feng was enlightened. At that instant, he suddenly understood that the two Evil Tombs in the Azure Dragon Mountain Range and the Vermilion Bird Mountain Range were possibly interconnected. However, there were two more places. It meant that there were two more Evil Tombs within the Azure Province!
"That's right. One of the entrances is in the Vermilion Bird Mountain Range of the Vermilion Bird City."
"Other than that, there's also the Azure Dragon Mountain Range of the Azure Dragon School, the White Tiger Mountain Range of the White Tiger Villa, and the Black Tortoise Mountain Range of the Black Tortoise City. Gong Luyun's family is the overlord of the Black Tortoise City right now." Su Mei explained.
"That means that Gong Luyun and you two sisters went to the Azure Dragon School for Qingxuantian's tomb?"
"Qingxuantian's tomb has many layers of mechanisms and it is not something that we can open. However, my Su family always felt that the reason why the Azure Dragon Founder could become the 1 person in the continent a thousand years ago was because he opened the tomb of Qingxuantian and got some benefits from it."
"When he left the mountain, he was known as the Azure Dragon Founder. After being successful in his martial cultivation, he created the Azure Dragon School at the Azure Dragon Mountain Range. It was very possibly a type of gratitude towards Qingxuantian."
"Although the Azure Dragon School declined quite a bit, that is because the absolute technique that the Azure Dragon Founder used that year was not passed down. However, it's very possible that it is still within the Azure Dragon School."
"This is the reason why me and my sister entered the Azure Dragon School. As for Gong Luyun, his Gong family is occupying the Black Tortoise City at all costs so I'm sure he must know something about this and is staying in the Azure Dragon School for the same reasons as us." Su Mei spoke the truth.
"So it's like this." Chu Feng who knew the truth was endlessly excited. He never would have thought that there were 4 more Evil Tombs within the Azure Province.
He was unable to explore the Azure Dragon Mountain Range and the Vermilion Bird Mountain Range, but it did not mean that he could not explore the two other Evil Tombs. After all, he did gain some benefits in the Vermilion Bird Mountain Range so perhaps he could get even better benefits in the other two tombs.
"This is a secret that cannot be spread. If the Lingyun School or the Qilin Prince Mansion knows about it, a crisis will certainly be stirred up."
"It may even affect the Jiang Dynasty. If that huge monster knows about this, I'm afraid they would instantly start moving and at that time, we wouldn't get any benefits at all." Su Mei reminded solemnly.
"Don't worry. I will not tell anyone else about this." Chu Feng raised his hand to promise then chuckled and said, "On the other hand, you have really fallen for me to tell me a secret like this right?"
"You..Shameless! Who would like you!" After Chu Feng said that, Su Mei's small face instantly reddened and even her white, soft neck became red. She pushed opened the doors and ran out, then pointed at Chu Feng and said, "This is your room. If there's nothing, don't run around everywhere."
"Hehe, this girl really likes having a red face." Seeing the departing back of Su Mei, Chu Feng chuckled and said.
"Idiot. You've gotten really lucky this time." Just at that time, Eggy's pleasant voice rang out and he could hear that she was extremely excited.
"I know. There's two more Evil Tombs for exploration right?" Chu Feng smiled.
"Ha! You know nothing. How can an Evil Tomb be as large as to run through half of the Azure Province?" Eggy said disdainfully.
"Your meaning is?"
"If these four Evil Tombs really are one, it would certainly not be Evil Tombs. They would be Emperor Tombs!"


MGA Capitulo 132  Roping Trap
"Emperor Tomb?" Chu Feng failed to understand it but he could still hear the impressiveness of it.
"In short, an Emperor Tomb is quite an impressive thing but you wouldn't understand if I said too much. Just see an Emperor Tomb as boundless treasure."
"If there really is an Emperor Tomb in the Azure Province, that guy called Qingxuantian would certainly not be as simple as a Martial Lord. The records of history could very possibly have been slightly wrong." Eggy said.
"Not only a Martial Lord? How many more realms are there in the journey of martial cultivation?" Chu Feng was incessantly excited and he suddenly felt that he still lacked experience and did not have knowledge about a lot of things.
"Those realms are too far off from you so it is useless if I say too much to you. In any case, a huge person appeared in the Nine Provinces and it was enough to shake the world."
"If the tomb is still undamaged, you will need to quickly get strong. After that, kill everyone who knows about this Emperor Tomb in the Nine Provinces to avoid any information leak."
"Actually, that's not enough. You should completely annihilate the Nine Provinces. Anyway, this information cannot be spread out." Eggy reminded solemnly.
"What? Annihilate the Nine Provinces? You want me to kill everyone on this continent? Isn't that a bit too crazy?"
After hearing those words, Chu Feng felt chills going down his spine. Although he could be heartless while killing enemies, he could not slaughter ordinary citizens and those completely unrelated to him for his own personal goals.
"What do you know? Emperor Tombs are the biggest treasures in the entire world. Not to mention what cultivation I will reach after consuming the Source energy of that Qingxuantian, you can rely on this Emperor Tomb and become an invincible person."
"Don't you want to know what happened with your family? Don't you want to know why your parents left you and did not look after you? There will undoubtedly be reasons within the tomb."
"From my estimations, I believe that your family were met with a huge catastrophe and were forced to send you here. As for whether your family still exists or not, I have no clue. It is possible that your parents are dead and your family perished."
"Those who are able to destroy your family and kill your parents are an even greater power. Think about it. If you can't even control the World Spirit that your family left for you in your body, how can you face the power that is even stronger than your family?"
"Wake up. This world is not as small as you think. There are countless experts and geniuses are everywhere. Powerful powers have been around for several million years and they stand on the high and steep peak of the world."
"You are only ‘viewing the sky from the bottom of a well'. However, you're very lucky. Lucky that in this deep well, there are boundless treasures. As long as you get these treasures, you will have the ability to go against the experts that are outside of the well. You can even rely on them to avenge your family." Eggy narrated.
"Don't try to trick me into doing that. On what basis do you say that my family is perished? On what basis do you say that my parents are dead? There is absolutely no evidence and perhaps they have other reasons." Chu Feng coldly snorted. He was a bit angry because from the bottom of his heart, he really did not hope that anything bad happened to his parents and his family.
"Okay, I admit. Your family may still exist and your parents living well. However, even if your family still exists, do you have any face to return with your current cultivation? Do you have any face to see your parents?"
"You are too weak right now. In the world of martial cultivation, you are a real ant. They don't even need to use their fingers to squish you to death. They could just randomly fart and your body would be torn with shattered bones. They could just randomly blow and you would disappear like a strand of smoke."
Eggy's words were like as sharp as blades as they pierced Chu Feng's ears. She kept on stabbing Chu Feng's pride. Yet, those direct words were what made Chu Feng understand how weak he was.
It was true. He did need to become stronger. He needed to become extremely strong. Right now, he was no genius. It was just that the people around him were too mediocre so he was made into a genius. A true genius should be like Qingxuantian, and perhaps there were many geniuses like him outside of the continent of the Nine Provinces.
"Fine. The treasures within Emperor Tombs will all belong to me, but I will not kill innocent people because of my own greed." Chu Feng said gravely.
"Soft-hearted. Wait until someone really spreads this secret away from the continent. When those real experts all flock over, you will regret it."
"That's right. I'm still human so I can't be as cold-blooded as you. If the news of Emperor Tombs really spreads out one day and the treasures get taken by others, I would not have half a word of complaint. Even if I don't rely on these treasures, I can still become strong by myself." Chu Feng was very firm on his decision.
"Whatever, whatever. I won't argue with you. Even if you tried to slaughter the people on this continent, you wouldn't even have that ability. However, let's depart now." Eggy urged.
"Leave right now? That's not too good right? After all, I already promised Su Rou and Su Mei's father to stay a few extra days."
"Then leave tomorrow. You must leave tomorrow because this cannot be delayed."
"That's fine."
After deciding, Chu Feng originally wanted to refine all the spiritual beads he got. However, after some thinking, he was afraid that Su Mei would say that he aimed for short-term benefits so Chu Feng did not refine them. He had the spiritual beads within his hands so he could breakthrough at any time he wished.
When the sky became dark, the feast that Su Hen specially prepared for Chu Feng also started. On the table, there were only 4 people. Su Mei, Su Rou, Chu Feng, and Su Hen.
Nevertheless, the table was extremely big and it was filled with sumptuous food and drinks. Chu Feng had never eaten those things before, and with a glance, they made one's appetite increase dramatically. It was just that because of the large-sized table, the 4 of them sat very scatteredly.
"Idiot. Why do you only know how to eat meat? Try this. The taste of vegetables are sometimes even more delicious."
However, the thing that made people speechless was that Su Mei took the initiative to sit near Chu Feng and constantly helped Chu Feng to some food. She even occasionally fed Chu Feng. Of course, Chu Feng did not push it away in the slightest and the two of them helped each other to food and fed each other. That was called sweet.
Facing that scene, Su Rou who already knew her younger sister's heart chuckled while covering her mouth with her hand. On the other hand, Su Hen had black lines all over his forehead but he could not say anything and he sank into the realm of embarrassment.
During the feast, Su Hen took out the reward for the New Excellence Assembly. Ten Origin beads.
Ten Origin beads were equivalent to ten thousand spiritual beads. It was double the supposed reward for the New Excellence Assembly and regarding that action, Chu Feng did not decline them because he had no reason to. After all, he knew that the Su family wanted to rope him closer to them.
Chu Feng had Spirit power and he had the chance to become Zhuge Liuyun's disciple. Sooner or later, he would become a World Spiritist and since the Su family also knew about Emperor Tombs, naturally, they would want Chu Feng to be closer to them so he could serve them to a certain extent.
After the feast, Chu Feng returned to his own room. However, just as he returned, someone knocked on the door. A servant came for Chu Feng and said that second lady, Su Rou, seeked him.
Chu Feng had quite good impressions towards Su Rou so naturally he did not decline. Under the lead of the servant, he entered the palace that Su Rou was living in.
Just as Chu Feng entered the palace, two figures walked out from the shadows. One was the lord of the Vermilion Bird City, Su Hen. The other was a thin old man who had white hair.
"Is everything set up?" Looking at the palace of his own daughter, Su Hen spoke.
"Milord, don't worry. From today on, this Chu Feng will be part of my Su family." The old man strangely smiled and said.


MGA Capitulo 133  Poisoned
Although the palace that Su Rou was living in was not big, it was very exquisite. The decorations within the palace were quite unique and grand. As fragrance was emitted everywhere in the palace, one could tell that it was the residence of a girl in an instant.
"Young master Chu Feng, please drink some tea. This is fragrant tea of the highest quality and the second lady specially asked me to prepare it for you." The servant served a pot of tea.
"Thanks!"
Chu Feng ate quite a bit of food and drank quite a bit of wine in the feast. At that moment, tea was something that Chu Feng needed. The fragrance of the tea was very special and there was an indescribable attraction.
"Ha~~Nice tea."
Chu Feng finished the cup of tea with one gulp but he still felt thirsty. So, he raised the entire pot of tea and poured it into his mouth. After finishing the entire pot of tea, he still wished for more as he wiped his mouth and said, "Where is the second lady?"
"The second lady said she is waiting for you on the top floor." The servant smiled and said.
"Oh? I need to go up?" Chu Feng felt that it was a bit strange. Why did she invite him yet not personally welcome him? Instead, he needed to go up himself to find her?
However, after some more careful thinking, Chu Feng could understand it. Although Chu Feng was a guest in the Su family, at the end, Su Rou was an elder in the Azure Dragon School. No matter if it was on the topic of identity or strength, she was above him so it was normal for him to look for Su Rou himself.
Thinking to that point, Chu Feng started walk up the stairs. The servant smiled strangely, closed the door to the palace and silently left that area.


THE FOLLOWING CONTAINS EXPLICIT CONTENT AND IT CAN BE SKIPPED


 Link to censored text
[collapse]




MGA Capitulo 134  Hungry Wolf Pouncing on the White Rabbit
"Mm—"
Chu Feng massaged his aching brain and gradually opened his eyes. As he was in a daze, there was a smile on the corner of his mouth because he remembered that he had a very beautiful dream. So beautiful that he was not even willing to wake up from it. Within the dream, he did a very comfortable thing. Although he forgot about the details and people, it was very beautiful and hard to forget.
"Su Rou!" But when Chu Feng saw Su Rou who was completely bare-naked next to him and the bloodstain on the ground, he was instantly disarrayed.
Associating back to the fragments of memory, Chu Feng thought of an inconceivable thing. It was that he forced Su Mei's elder sister, the second lady of the Su family, Su Rou, down.
"My Gods, why did I do such a thing?" Chu Feng was completely dumbfounded and he did not know what to do.
"No need to blame yourself. This was not your fault." Su Rou's had a very cold expression and her voice was very calm. It seemed that she already woke up a long time ago and organized her own emotions. Su Rou stood up, and her pure white, perfect body appeared in front of Chu Feng's eyes again.
"This" Seeing that, Chu Feng subconsciously turned his head away and didn't dare to look.
"No need to put up an act. You've already seen enough last night."
Su Rou grinded her teeth and bit her lower lip. She was really furious because not only did Chu Feng look all over her body last night, he even took away her most precious chastity.
Although she knew that Chu Feng's actions yesterday were not done voluntarily, when she saw Chu Feng currently having such upright behavior and had such an ashamed expression, Su Rou was still extremely angry.
From Su Rou's words, Chu Feng thought about it, and he agreed. As a man, one should be able to dare to act courageously and dare to take responsibility. Since it already happened, how could he escape his responsibility? So, he turned his already turned head back and looked at Su Rou's so-called perfect body.
Although that glance seemed insignificant, Chu Feng instantly reacted to it. It wasn't that Chu Feng had uncontrollable lust, it was just in front of such a beautiful woman, those who were male would have a reaction. Not to mention that Chu Feng monopolized the sight in front of him.
Su Rou didn't pay attention to Chu Feng either. She wore her pink dudou in front of him and also her snow-white cheongsam. However, when she turned her head and saw an upright object, her expression couldn't help but change as she coldly reprimanded,
"My cultivation has already returned. If you dare to have any evil thoughts towards me, I will break you."
"I will take responsibility." Chu Feng was not afraid and instead, he solemnly vowed.
"I don't need you to take responsibility, and I hope that you don't spread this out. Alsodon't turn your back on little Mei." Su Rou gnashed her teeth and said the last few words.
"Don't worry. I won't betray little Mei, but I won't betray you either. I will marry you two sisters." Chu Feng said extremely seriously.
"You" After hearing Chu Feng's words, Su Rou's little face paled from anger and after that, she fiercely shot Chu Feng a glance and said, "You really are too greedy."
After saying those words, Su Rou quickly walked out of the bathroom. However, after turning the corner, she stopped and leaned against the wall. She muttered to herself, "Strange. Why am I so angry? What is that sour feeling in my heart?"


MGA Capitulo 135  I Want Both Sisters
Su Rou did not understand and felt unfathomably strange. Although her chastity was taken away by Chu Feng just like that and she was extremely angry, when Chu Feng said that he would marry both her and Su Mei, what was that sour feeling?
Was it that she fell for Chu Feng? But how was that possible? Chu Feng was her own sister's lover. How could she fall for him? The current Su Rou was tangled up and for the first time, she discovered that she did not understand herself.
At that moment, Chu Feng walked out as well. He wore his clothes, entirely new, because the clothing he wore last night was already ripped to shreds by him.
"Will this be kept secret or opened to the public?" Chu Feng spoke and asked.
"What are you thinking about? How can this be publicized? If it is, how will little Mei look at you? How will little Mei look at me?" Su Rou was very nervous.
" I'll listen to what you say right now since it will be made public sooner or later." Chu Feng seemed rather calm.
"What is your meaning?" Su Rou's willow-like eyebrows slanted inwards and she was nervous that Chu Feng would stir something up.
"It's nothing. I'm just saying that you're mine, sooner or later." The corner of Chu Feng's mouth slightly raised and he revealed an unruly evil smile as though everything that happened last night did not burden him at all. Rather, it was like he indulged in reminiscence.
Su Rou viciously shot a glance at Chu Feng, then she turned her head around and did not bother with Chu Feng anymore. With a strangely emphasized tone, she said to drive him away, "Quickly leave. Take advantage of the unlit sky and don't let anyone know that you passed the night at my place."
"Mm. I was planning to leave anyway. Speak to little Mei and your father on behalf of me." As Chu Feng spoke, he prepared to walk down the stairs.
"Wait." Su Rou's expression changed greatly as she questioned closely, "You said that you're leaving the Vermilion Bird City?"
"That's right." Chu Feng nodded.
"How can you be like this? We did all this without understanding why, yet you don't even bother to figure out what happened and leave just like that?"
Su Rou's gaze flickered and her fury was increased because she felt that Chu Feng was too irresponsible. After all, what he took away last night was her body.
"Figure out what happened? Last night, your servant from your residence invited me over. She said that there was something you needed me for and said that you even specially prepared a pot of tea for me. After drinking that tea, I became how I was last night."
"Also, there was a fragrance in the bathroom. That fragrance was extremely strange and it could restrain one's cultivation and make them completely powerless. Last night, you didn't even have enough strength to hold a chicken so I'm sure that it was caused by that fragrance."
"Who do you think, within your own Vermilion Bird City, is able to command your servant to betray you, and also take out such strong drugs?" Chu Feng asked tranquilly.
"You" At that instant, Su Rou was dumbfounded. She never would have thought that Chu Feng could analyze everything so quickly and determine who the person behind the scenes was. That calm judgemental power and exceptional observation skills was really quite unbelievable.
"Looking at your expression, it seems that you know who that person is as well. As for that person's goal, you and I mutually understand. I don't blame him, rather, I want to give him my gratitude."
"If he didn't do that, perhaps I would only marry his little daughter. But right now, I'll take both of his daughters." Chu Feng smiled and walked down the building.
"For what reason do you say that? How do you know that I will marry you?" Su Rou interrogated.
"I cannot be sure that you will marry me, but you are already mine. You better not like another person or else I'll kill him."
"No matter what, you cannot deny that from today on, you are mine. You and little Mei both are. You two sisters better not think of going anywhere." Chu Feng's attitude was resolute and directly overbearing. After saying those words, he didn't even look at what expression Su Rou had and quickly left.
Su Rou stood there blankly without knowing what to do. Her, who was steadily maturing, got muddled up for the first time.
Before Chu Feng left for long, Su Hen walked in. When he arrived on the 5th floor, he saw Su Rou. He had an apologetic face but he did not say anything. He walked into the bathroom, and after seeing the bloodstain on the ground, he sighed, "Daughter, I am sorry for wronging you."
Su Rou was also very calm as she asked, "Why did you need to do this?"
"Sigh. The strength of the Shangguan family cannot be underestimated. If little Mei and Shangguan Ya's marriage was forcefully canceled, the Shangguan family would certainly feel resentful. If he revolts against my Su family, even if we win, we will be greatly damaged and this Vermilion Bird City will be in a crisis."
"Little Mei has fallen in love for that Chu Feng and everyone can see that. If it was another person, I could forcefully cut off their relationship. However, that Chu Feng just so happens to be a genius and when he grows up in the future, his power cannot be obstructed. My Su family cannot offend him, so I can only rope him in with us."
"So, you had be wronged. A relationship happened between you and him, so naturally he would feel guilt in his heart and I believe he will not go for little Mei anymore."
"From what I can see, Chu Feng does not seem to be a person who doesn't take responsibility. So, in the future, even if he doesn't work for my Su family, he will certainly protect us. Not for anyone else, but just for you, he would do all that." Su Hen did not hide anything and he explained everything in detail.
After hearing Su Hen's words, Su Rou suddenly smiled. Her smiled was abnormally strange and Su Hen who looked at it had his hair stand up, "My lord father, you are indeed correct. Chu Feng really is a responsible person, so you better not give little Mei to that Shangguan Ya. Or else, not only will he exterminate the Shangguan family, he will even exterminate my Su family and leave only me and little Mei, the two of us, behind."
"What do you mean? Will Chu Feng still think about little Mei after doing that to you? Exterminate my Su family? Chu Feng would dare to exterminate the family of his lover? Wouldn't he be afraid of the ridicule of the world?" Su Hen's face changed greatly and he was clearly slightly anxious because he could tell that Su Rou did not seem to be joking.
"My lord father, if you had to blame something, you can only blame your lack of understanding towards Chu Feng. He does not live for the world, he lives for himself and those who he care about. Other people in his eyes can be useful, or they can be useless. It would be in vain to hold that against him."
After speaking those words, Su Rou turned around and walked down. Although her expression was calm, her own father sold her out for his family. How could she not be furious? That fury could very possibly last an entire life.
Seeing Su Rou who left the palace and headed towards the outside of the Vermilion Bird City, Su Hen's had an extremely complex expression on his face. After a good while, he said in a low voice, "Could it be that I really made a mistake?"


MGA Capitulo 136  Ferghana Horse
After leaving the Vermilion Bird City, Chu Feng set his goal at the White Tiger Villa. As for the reason, it was very simple. The Black Tortoise Mountain Range was occupied by the Black Tortoise City, and the Black Tortoise City was the territory of Gong Luyun's family. If Chu Feng's identity was revealed, he would very likely die. So naturally, without absolute power, he could not rashly go there.
Although the White Tiger Mountain Range was also occupied by the White Tiger Villa, the White Tiger Villa was not the only overlord of the White Tiger Mountain Range. According to what Chu Feng heard, other than the White Tiger Villa in the White Tiger Mountain Range, there were also many other villas. They all shared the resources of the White Tiger Mountain Range so accordingly, it should be easier for Chu Feng to enter the White Tiger Mountain Range.
Since the journey was long and he didn't really greet anyone while leaving the Vermilion Bird City, when Chu Feng left the city, he went to a station for horses and wanted to purchase a fast horse there. If he walked to his destination, even if Chu Feng had more abundant spiritual energy, he would completely exhaust it.
"Esteemed guest, our horses here are all good horses. Every single one can travel a thousand miles every day. This Ferghana horse is even quicker. It can easily travel 8000 miles every day and it's the king within horses." The attendant at the horse station pointed at a red-coloured horse that was tall and big as he bragged.
"Travel 8000 miles easily?"
Chu Feng had his doubts. That horse was blood-red coloured and it did seem more sturdy and healthy when compared to other horses. It was quite similar to the treasured horses of the Golden-purple City and the other cities. It was even slightly more excellent and it was quite a good horse.
However, within the horse's eyes, there was some unruliness. That proud attitude always faced Chu Feng with a hint of disdain. It would probably not easily let people ride it and it was like a wild horse that was not trained.
"Esteemed guest, how can I be lying to you? This really is a good horse. It was tamed by the combined force of several cultivating experts. However, this horse still has its wild nature. If you aren't a cultivating expert, there really would be no way to ride it." The attendant quickly explained.
"Oh, it really is a wild horse." After hearing his words, Chu Feng got even more interested in that horse and it hooked onto Chu Feng's taming desires. So, he said, "How much does this horse cost? I'll buy it!"
"This esteemed guest, are you sure that you want to buy this Ferghana horse? It is not cheap!"
When he heard that Chu Feng wanted to buy it, that attendant was quite shocked. The reason why he introduced the horse to Chu Feng was to let him know that their horse station was quite concrete. However, he did not expect that Chu Feng would be able to buy it. After all, the price of the horse was not able to be bought by normal people. Not to mention a young man like Chu Feng who wore plain clothing.
"Do I look like I'm joking?" Chu Feng faintly smiled.
"Ehh, to be honest, the normal horses in this horse station roughly costs a couple dozens taels of silver. The more excellent ones cost one tael of gold. As for this Ferghana horse, it is a lot more expensive than the previous two types." The attendant stirred up some suspense.
"How much?" Chu Feng was a bit impatient. If it was before, he might have worried about the cost. But the current him could really be said to be a real wealthy person. At least, when compared to these ordinary citizens, he was an absolute rich person.
"Heh, 1 spiritual bead!" The attendant extended one finger up, smiled, and said.
"What? One spiritual bead is equivalent to 100 taels of gold! A horse like this costs that much money?"
When the attendant's words came out of his mouth, Chu Feng did not have any reactions. On the other hand, many of the surrounding crowd exclaimed in surprise because something of interest came up. They all gathered around and seriously evaluated the Ferghana horse. They wanted to see what was so special about it that made it cost so much.
Chu Feng only smiled while he looked at the curious gazes of the crowd. To him, 1 spiritual bead really was like a hair from 9 oxens and it was not a problem in any way.
"One spiritual bead is worth it for such a precious horse." However, not waiting for Chu Feng to speak, a rough voice suddenly rang out.
Looking over, a group of big persons were slowly walking over. The one who led them had net-like sideburns. He revealed well-built muscles from his body and there was even a frightening scar on those muscles. The words that were said just now was from him.
After seeing those people, everyone quickly rushed to the side because just from their appearances, they could see that they should be martial cultivators and they were certainly not kind people. They were unoffendable existences.
"I will take this Ferghana horse!" The big person who had net-like sideburns took out a golden, shiny spiritual bead from his pocket and unhesitantly threw it to the attendant.
After accepting it, the attendant was all smiles from unexpected happiness. No matter what, he never would have expected that the Ferghana horse really sold for such a heavenly high price. However, at that moment, Chu Feng spoke.
"Wait. The so-called first come first serve. I didn't even say that I wouldn't buy it so how can you sell it to other people?"
"Little bro, I can see that you are a cultivator as well. But you also know that this Ferghana horse is worth one spiritual bead. One spiritual bead! Think about it more carefully. Are you able to pay for it?"
The big person smiled while examining Chu Feng. Disdain could be seen from his gaze and the group of big persons behind him roared with laughter. They felt that Chu Feng really overestimated himself if he was trying to fight over the horse with their boss.
Even many observing citizens started to point at Chu Feng and felt that Chu Feng "had eyes but could not recognize Mount Tai" as he should not offend a group of people like them.
Chu Feng ignored the gazes of the crowd. He slowly raised his hand and extended it towards the Cosmos Sack on his waist.
"Heavens! IsIs that the legendary Cosmos Sack?" Suddenly, someone couldn't help but cry out.
"What? Cosmos Sack?!" At that instant, the surrounding people all cast their gazes towards the Cosmos Sack on Chu Feng's waist.
After all, the Cosmos Sack was an extremely precious thing. Only people who were rich to a certain realm could use them and only those from real rich families were able to own them. Was the young man in front of them a person from a rich family? However, why would a person from a rich family come here to buy horses?
"Hmph. That's no Cosmos Sack. It is just some imitation that looks like one. Real Cosmos Sacks do not look like that." The man with sideburns sneered and said.
"So it's an imitation. I even thought it was a real one."
"Sigh. The young people these days really love admiration too much. In order for the higher opinions of others, they use imitations. How shameless."
After hearing the words of that big person, the crowd all sighed and their gazes towards Chu Feng were no longer curious. Instead, they were filled with contempt.
Chu Feng paid no attention to their words. In the instant that he touched the Cosmos Sack, a strange light radiated out and two golden and sparkling spiritual beads appeared on Chu Feng's palm.
Chu Feng threw the spiritual beads to the attendant of the shop and said, "One spiritual bead to buy this Ferghana horse, the other one is for you as appreciation."


MGA Capitulo 137  Divine Body Bestowed by Heaven
"This"
Chu Feng's actions tied up the surrounding people's tongues and they were dumbfounded. They were so shocked that their jaws fell to the ground. Especially that big person with sideburns. His face was ashen and it was as ugly as it could get.
Spiritual beads. How precious were they? For that Ferghana horse, he looked everywhere and he only got one after extreme difficulties in order to buy that horse.
Who would have thought that such an ordinary looking young man would take two out as he wished? One of them was even for the attendant! It really made him want to vomit blood out because he knew that the Ferghana horse in which he admired for a long time was fated to belong to another person.
Compared to the big person's blood vomiting, the others were admiring and envying. Admiration towards "the fallen riches from the sky" that the attendant got. One spiritual bead was equivalent to a hundred taels of gold and it was given to the attendant just like that. It was enough for him to richly live his life with no worries.
At that instant, all of the gazes towards Chu Feng changed. No one dared to have even a single strand of scorn, rather, they were incomparably deferential. Some people even started to smile while facing Chu Feng and hoped that Chu Feng would reward them with something from a burst of happiness.
"Young master, this Ferghana horse belongs to you. I will go right now to prepare some good wine and dishes for you." That attendant was so pleased that flowers blossomed on his face and his huge smile was even going to reach behind his ears and he could not even stop smiling.
"Prepare a top-class room for me as well." Chu Feng lightly smiled and waved his hand.
"No problem. The best room will certainly be prepared and provided for your resting." The attendant first returned the spiritual bead back to the big person, then carefully put the two spiritual beads away, and finally he joyfully went to prepare a room for Chu Feng.
Chu Feng smiled while sweeping a glance at that big person with sideburns and said, "Does my Cosmos Sack look like a fake one anymore?"
"Hmph. So what if you have money? This Ferghana horse cannot be tamed without a certain cultivation. You better be careful or else you won't even be able to leave." The big person coldly snorted and said.
"No need to worry about that." Chu Feng smiled and went towards the direction of the rooms. The funniest thing was that the ordinary citizens rushed and surrounded Chu Feng, wanting to lead the way for him.
"Boss, this Ferghana horse is given to him just like that?" As the looked at the departing back of Chu Feng, the group of big persons all gathered around.
"Give it to him?" The big person with sideburns put the returned spiritual bead back to his pocket and quietly said, "Ask around and find out where this little child is going. How can we miss such a huge, fat sheep?"
Chu Feng arrived at the area with the guest rooms and the attendant already prepared a top-class room for him. Very quickly, he brought good wine and food over for Chu Feng. His attitude was enthusiastic and his service was thorough.
After the lesson of the fragrant tea, Chu Feng became more cautious. He first used his Spirit power to scan over it, and after confirming that the wine and dishes were without problem, he started to fill himself with food.
After eating, Chu Feng did not hurry to leave the horse station. He laid a Spirit Formation in the room first and started to refine the spiritual and Origin beads in his Cosmos Sack. After all, he did not know whether he was going to have good or bad luck on his journey so it was better to raise his own cultivation first.
Chu Feng started with the spiritual beads. Following his growth in strength, his spiritual bead refinement speed got even more terrifying. Several thousand spiritual beads were finished after a short while and they were all consumed by the Divine Lightning within his dantian. However, after refining the several thousand spiritual beads, despite having great changes in his dantian, there was no feeling of breakthrough.
"Heavens, your appetite is getting bigger and bigger! Who can even continue raising you up like this?"
Chu Feng was very speechless. Suddenly, he cherished the times when he could breakthrough with just a few Saint Spirit Grasses. Looking at it now, he could not even breakthrough a single level with several thousand spiritual beads.
If he arrived at the Origin realm, Profound realm, or even the Heaven realm, Chu Feng did not dare to imagine how much wealth he would need to exhaust in order to make himself grow. His future was his present, and he was facing a huge and difficult problem.
"Don't complain about this. There is a knack for your Divine Lightning in your body. If I'm not mistaken, you should also have aDivine Body that is bestowed by heaven." Just at that time, Eggy's light and pleasant voice rang out.
"Divine Body bestowed by heaven? What's that?" Chu Feng was greatly shocked.
"It is a special type of body. When that body is born, it is be accompanied by unusual displays in the world. Those unusual displays usually represent the special abilities grasped by a person who has a Divine Body as well as the strengths and weaknesses of the abilities."
"If I'm correct in my estimations, Qingxuantian, who created the Emperor Tombs, should be a person with a Divine Body. His achievements that year and his special physique has an inseparable relationship with it." Eggy explained.
"That means the Divine Lightning in my dantian was originally one with me?" Chu Feng rejoiced because he always felt that the Divine Lightning in his body was an organism that forcefully entered his body. Chu Feng was always muddled by its objective.
However, after hearing Eggy's words, he felt a lot relieved because most likely, the Godly Lighting was originally one with him. It entered his body only to make him become stronger and it would absolutely not harm him.
"Don't celebrate too early. A Divine Body is brought innately and the unusual displays also appears when one is born. The special abilities are also revealed after martial cultivation."
"However, you.. Although there was indeed an unusual display on that year, only after you grew up did the Divine Lightning enter your body. Cultivating up until now, other than being quicker in cultivation than others and having a lot higher spiritual energy quality than others, no special abilities were discovered."
"So, I cannot be sure that you have a Divine Body. However, I can be sure that the Divine Lightning in your body is a good thing and it will make you stronger. As long as you find the resources in the Emperor Tombs, perhaps you can even exceed a person like Qingxuantian." Eggy reminded.
"Mm. I don't care whether I have a Divine Body or not, but as long as there are enough resources, I can certainly rapidly become stronger." Chu Feng's confidence instantly multiplied as he started to refine the Origin beads.
One Origin bead entered his belly. It did not disperse into spiritual energy, but Origin power. It had to be said that there was an extremely huge difference in quality between Origin power and spiritual energy.
However, within Chu Feng's body, the Origin power converted into huge amounts of spiritual energy. To the current Chu Feng, even if he took in 100 spiritual beads, there wouldn't be too big of a reaction in his dantian. However, when that single Origin bead entered his belly, he clearly felt change in his dantian. That also showed the impressiveness of Origin beads.
"These Origin beads really are good things." Chu Feng was very pleased and he just swallowed the Origin beads he had all at once.
After consuming them, they instantly changed into the boundless spiritual energy. But that strong spiritual energy could not even wreak havoc in his body before being consumed by the Divine Lightning in Chu Feng's dantian in one bite.
It was so straightforward as well, as if it was not even worth mentioning such strong spiritual energy in front of it. It was like it was not even enough to fill the cracks within its teeth.
However, the most exciting thing to Chu Feng was when the boundless spiritual energy got consumed all at once by the Divine Lightning, Chu Feng's aura quickly started to rise. Change happened in terms of quality and he already entered to the peak of the Spirit realm, the 9th level of the Spirit realm.
The thing that thrilled Chu Feng was that not only did the strengthening feeling not slow down, it kept on increasing.
"Is it possible that I can break through into the Origin realm all at once?"


MGA Capitulo 138  Special Ability
Chu Feng was endlessly excited. Unprecedented change was currently happening to his dantian.
9 Lightning Beasts. 9 colours. 9 shapes. They were constantly changing and constantly roaring. Every single roar could shake the world but at that instant, only Chu Feng and Eggy could hear it.
*wuaa*
Suddenly, a golden Lightning Beast left the group. Bringing its dazzling golden lightning, it abruptly dashed out of the dantian and bore headfirst into Chu Feng's heart.
*bum bum*
At that instant, Chu Feng could clearly hear his own heart violently jump two times. Also, an unfathomable feeling spiraled around his mind.
The golden Lightning Beast split apart in Chu Feng's heart. It turned into countless tiny little golden streams of lightning that were like little golden snakes. They went along Chu Feng's veins and roamed within them. Very quickly, they occupied the blood in Chu Feng's entire body.
An indescribably strong feeling spread out from Chu Feng's blood. Just then, Chu Feng's blood was no longer a normal person's blood. It was blood that was filled with golden lightning.
At that instant, the 8 Lightning Beasts in Chu Feng's dantian all stopped surging and roaring. They gathered into a lump again and settled down. At the same time, spiritual energy was no longer emitting from his dantian. Origin power started to cleanse every single part of his body.
A breakthrough. Chu Feng finally had a breakthrough as he broke the bindings of the Spirit realm and entered the long awaited Origin realm. As he felt the strong Origin power in his body, Chu Feng was abnormally joyful.
Although Chu Feng already felt the feeling of being in the Origin realm, under the assistance of Eggy, it was completely different this time. Not only was it Chu Feng's own power, the most important thing was that there were golden lightning added in his blood.
The golden lightning linked up with the Origin power and caused harmonization with Chu Feng, for the purpose of being used by him. If Bodies of God had special abilities, the current Chu Feng was as though he grasped the special ability that should have belonged to him.
"Haa!"
Suddenly, Chu Feng explosively yelled. Within his eyes, two golden lightning emerged out. The golden lightning surged within his eyes and his entire atmosphere seemed completely different.
At the same time, the golden lightning wandering around in his bloodstreams started to surge and roar. With Chu Feng as the center, the Origin power around Chu Feng formed into a human-shaped shield. Chu Feng's cultivation entered the 2nd level of the Origin realm from the 1st.
"Waa! This is your ability? Impressive. It can directly raise your cultivation by one level and it was after the lightning merged with your body. If all 9 lightning blend into your body and be able to be used by you, how strong would you be?"
"Good guy, this Divine Lightning really isn't simple. If you get the power of one lightning every time you break through a big realm, your future accomplishments really would be overwhelming."
Eggy excitedly cheered and happily shouted out. Even she felt admiration towards Chu Feng's special power that he got.
After all, the reason why Chu Feng could directly raise a level in cultivation was because of the lightning that merged with his body. If the 8 Lightning Beasts in his dantian were all able to be used by Chu Feng, it was simply unimaginable what kind of power he would gain.
After all, currently, it was only the power of the golden lightning. It was unknown what mysterious effects the other 8 would have. However, the thing that could be confirmed was that the 9 Lightning Beasts would bring terrifying power for Chu Feng.
"It's really strong and this feeling is very good as well. I don't need to fear anyone at the 5th level of the Origin realm, even if they're at the 6th level of the Origin realm, I can still fight them. As for those at the 7th level of the Origin realm, even if I cannot win, they would have quite some difficulty in harming me. As long as I am willing to, no one can stop my steps within the Origin realm."
Chu Feng was also madly happy because compared to Eggy who lived in his Spirit world, Chu Feng could feel the changes to himself. The brutal Origin power surging from his dantian and the tyrannical lightning in his blood made Chu Feng extremely confident.
He felt that he could easily kill those at the 5th level of the Origin realm. As long as he gave it his all, those at the 6th level of the Origin realm could not beat him. Even if he could not face those at the 7th level of the Origin realm, with the superb rank 7 bodily martial skill, the Imperial Sky Technique, as long as Chu Feng wished to escape, no one could stop him within the Origin realm.
"It seems that your arranged battle with that Gong Luyun really isn't too big of a problem. He is at the 1st level of the Profound realm right now, but even if he had better talent, he is still a normal person and at the time of the arranged battle, his cultivation would not exceed the 2nd level of the Profound realm."
"Although you just entered the Origin realm, you have a Divine Body. You are crowned with the title of a real genius with the body that grasps special abilities. With the methods you currently have, you don't even need to step into the Profound realm. As long as you reach the 9th level of the Origin realm at the date of the arranged battle, you can easily defeat Gong Luyun."
"With this, you only need to raise your cultivation by 7 more levels to win against Gong Luyun. Although it's extremely hard to do that within the time of one year, don't forget you have me overseeing everything."
"As long as you can absorb enough Source energy for me before the arranged battle and let my cultivation reach the 9th level of the Origin realm, naturally, I can guarantee your victory." Eggy giggled and said.
"At the end, you still want me to find Source energy for you. I want to rely on my own strength in the battle against Gong Luyun so unless I am forced to with no other choice, I won't use your power."
Naturally, Chu Feng knew that continuously breaking through 7 levels of cultivation straight to the 9th level of the Origin realm in less than one year was quite difficult because he required large amounts of Origin beads as resources.
Compared to large amounts of Origin beads, the Source energy from the remains of Profound realm experts really were quite a bit better. After all, within the Azure Province, there were many Profound realm experts. As long as Chu Feng firmly grasped the Spirit Formation Technique, Source energy was not as hard to find as imagined.
However, Chu Feng still wanted to rely on his own power to defeat Gong Luyun because he wanted to depend on himself to defeat and kill the person that humiliated him before.
After the breakthrough in cultivation, Chu Feng left the horse station and chose to continue his journey. Although Chu Feng would not feel any burden while using the power of the golden lightning, he would still seem different than the others with his eyes which were sparkling with golden lightning and also from the shield formed by Origin power.
So, when it was peaceful, Chu Feng would obviously not use that special method. Also, for better infiltration into the White Tiger Mountain Range, Eggy even gave Chu Feng a technique that hid his realm cultivation through the Spirit Formation power.
That technique was quite something and it really could hide his true aura. Unless it was an extremely strong World Spiritist, even a cultivating expert of the Profound realm could not see through Chu Feng's cultivation.
Chu Feng rode the Ferghana horse and galloped with flying speed. Very quickly, he left the influential range of the Vermilion Bird City. However, just at that time, in front of the broad road, there was a group of familiar faces. It was the big person that fought over his Ferghana horse.
"Hehe, damn brat. We've waited a long time for you."


MGA Capitulo 139  Encountering a Surrounding Attack
Seeing the group of big persons that swarmed over and surrounded him, Chu Feng couldn't help but be at a loss. He could tell what the group of people wanted to do, but he could not tell how did they know he was going to go on this specific road.
"Damn it! That wretched attendant!" Suddenly, Chu Feng thought of something and he cursed in his heart.
Before, the shop attendant asked Chu Feng where he was heading towards. It was so that he could give Chu Feng some pointers to some shortcuts for the goal of reaching the White Tiger Mountain Range quicker. So, Chu Feng told him, but he never would have thought that the attendant sold him out and informed the group of big persons what his route was.
"Hehe. Boy, you've got quite the nerve to dare to steal our boss's treasured horse."
As they held big blades while rubbing them against their pants, they quickly walked towards Chu Feng. Looking at their aggressiveness, it seemed that they did not plan to leave him alive.
Chu Feng did not put the group of people in his eyes. Other than the big person with sideburns who was a cultivator at the 9th level of the Spirit realm, all the others were weak and not worth anything. They were simply looking to die if they wanted to rob and kill Chu Feng.
"This aura." But just at that time, Chu Feng tightly frowned and he couldn't help but cast his gaze behind.
He saw dust flying up and he could vaguely see dozens of quick horses that were rushing towards them. The horses were good horses, and almost every single one were not worse than the Ferghana horse that he was riding on. They were even extremely well taken care of.
The people on the horses were not ordinary as well. Not only did they have fitting clothing, their cultivation were not bad as well. The weakest was still at the 4th level of the Origin realm. Chu Feng could even faintly feel the aura of a Profound realm expert within the group of people. Although it was only the 1st level of the Profound realm, it was still, without a doubt, the Profound realm.
"This"
The appearance of the group of people also attracted the attention of the big persons. They quickly hid their blades behind them, stood on the side of the road and acted as if they were peaceful.
It was because they were afraid that the people and horses who were arriving came from the Vermilion Bird City. If they were discovered by the people from the Vermilion Bird City that they were currently robbing a young man, they would most likely die.
Chu Feng also stood where he was and silently looked at the group of people. He wanted to wait until they passed by before taking care of the big person who did not have eyes.
However, the unexpected thing was that as the group of people and horses neared, they surrounded Chu Feng and the big persons. A handsome and beautiful male who was riding a white-coloured fine horse coldly looked towards Chu Feng and said,
"Boy, you're quite clever huh? You chose to leave the Vermilion Bird City during the night. However, did you think you could escape just from that?"
"Who are you? I don't recall having any history with you." Chu Feng carefully examined the handsome male and he found out that his cultivation was not weak, being at the 8th level of the Origin realm.
But compared to that person, Chu Feng was more fearful towards the cold-faced middle-aged man behind him because that man was the person at the Profound realm that Chu Feng felt before. An expert of the 1st level of the Profound realm.
"Ho? You don't recognize me? I'll introduce myself. I am Shangguan Ya, Su Mei's fiancé. Do you understand now?" Shangguan Ya sneered and said while his gaze was filled with chilly killing intent.
"Fiancé?! When did Su Mei have a fiancé like you? I never heard her mention that before. You didn't grant that title to yourself right?"
Chu Feng's eyes narrowed and a cold gaze surged out. Although he already felt that they might not have come for kind reasons, when he heard Shangguan Ya say that he was the fiancé of Su Mei, Chu Feng instantly got angry.
It was because Chu Feng already had good feelings towards Su Mei, and Su Mei also hiddenly loved Chu Feng. The two of them just didn't poke through the layer of window paper. However, in Chu Feng's heart, Su Mei was already his so how could he bear letting others call themselves as Su Mei's fiancé?
"Hmph. The marriage between me and Su Mei has been set for many years. This is something that everyone in the Vermilion Bird City knows." Shangguan Ya loudly said and he was very smug. It could be seen that he really liked Su Mei.
"Brother, there is no need to waste words on a person who is going to die. Just directly kill him and it would be fine." Just at that time, the male behind Shangguan Ya spoke
The cold-faced male was called Shangguan Tian and he was Shangguan Ya's elder brother. When he was 30 years old, he entered the Profound realm. Although his potential was lower than Shangguan Ya, his cultivating talent was not bad and he was still quite the character in the Shangguan family.
"Brother, you are correct. While facing people who are going to die, I really shouldn't waste any words." Shangguan Ya smiled and replied. Although he was the secretly determined future family master in the Shangguan family, he was still very respectful towards his elder brother.
"‘Mm, attack." Shangguan Tian coldly spoke. He did not personally attack because he felt that a person like Chu Feng was not qualified for him to personally attack.
In the instant that he finished speaking, dozens of Shangguan family experts attacked simultaneously. Even the group of big persons suffered. With a blink, several fell on the ground, dead.
"Milords, don't kill us. We don't know who this boy is." The big person with sideburns was terrified. He never would have thought that Chu Feng had such a group of enemies. They were people that truely "killed without blinking"! Also, from their strength and cultivation, it was clear that they had quite an important status.
If they knew about that, how would they have even dared to rob Chu Feng? Not only were they not successful, they even lost their little lives.
However, how could the people from the Shangguan family let them go? An expert waved his hand and directly shattered the big person's brain and he died quite wretchedly.
After killing the group of big persons, the Shangguan family crowd all swarmed and surrounded Chu Feng. The atmosphere they were giving off showed that they were planning to take Chu Feng's life.
"Hmph. Want to kill me? I'm afraid all of you aren't capable."
Seeing that the situation was not good, Chu Feng fiercely kicked the Ferghana horse under him and the horse suddenly jumped and galloped towards the two people who were blocking Chu Feng in front of him.
"Where do you think you're going?"
The two of them attacked at the same time. They did not use any martial skills but the most direct attacks. They threw a punch out, and the Origin power ripples were like invisible boulders. With lightning speed and unconcealed might, they were smashing towards Chu Feng.
"Hmph."
Chu Feng only coldly snorted when facing their attacks. Golden lightning flashed into his eyes and a layer of Origin power shield encircled him. His cultivation instantly rose to the 2nd level of the Origin realm and he waved his big sleeve, dispelling the two Origin power fists.
At the same time, Chu Feng clenched both his hands and two golden, long flickering rows condensed out. Chu Feng's arms moved and the two rays of golden light cut through the air. The two experts at the 5th level of the Origin realm had their bodies and heads in separate locations.
*whoosh* After decapitating the two people, Chu Feng broke through the surrounding trap of the Shangguan family. While driving the Ferghana horse, he rushed straight out.


MGA Capitulo 140  Running Towards an Impasse
"How is that possible? He's at the 2nd level of the Origin realm!"
At that instant, all of the people from the Shangguan family were dumbstruck and greatly shocked. They never would have guessed that Chu Feng had the cultivation of the 2nd level of the Origin realm. However, the hardest thing to imagine was that Chu Feng could kill two experts of the 5th level of the Origin realm with one strike and escape right in front of their faces.
"Want to escape? It won't be that easy."
Shangguan Tian and Shangguan Ya coldly snorted as they chased after him on their horses. A large portion of the crowd behind them closely chased after, however, two people were left behind to take care of the Shangguan family's dead. Their methods were extremely experienced and they did not even leave a single trace behind. On their attack on Chu Feng, it could be seen that they were afraid of the Su family knowing about it.
"Damn it. Luckily I bought a good horse or else I really would have died here."
The Ferghana horse under Chu Feng ran as if it flew. Its speed really was quite something and it was not too much slower than Chu Feng's Imperial Sky Technique.
However, the thing that made Chu Feng speechless was that the white-coloured horses that the Shangguan family were riding on were no worse than his Ferghana horse. It even surpassed it and they were pulling the distance closer, bit by bit.
"Damn. It won't do if this continues."
Chu Feng panicked a bit. He just left the Vermilion Bird Mountain Range and plains were as far as his eye could see. He could only go along the road to escape, but if that continued, very quickly, he would be caught up.
Chu Feng was not afraid of the others, however, when facing that Shangguan Tian, more or less, Chu Feng had some fear. Although he was only at the 1st level of the Profound realm, after all, it was the Profound realm. If he got near to him, Chu Feng really did not know whether he could escape or not.
"Idiot, why aren't you infusing Origin power to the horse? Won't you get caught if this continues?!" Just at that time, Eggy anxiously yelled out.
"Infusing Origin power to this Ferghana horse?" Chu Feng was quite shocked. It was the first time that he heard such a trick.
"You idiot. Normal people can't, but you can. Don't forget, you're a World Spiritist."
Eggy had a look of "hating iron for not being steel" as she gave Chu Feng a type of Spirit Formation power that reduced the Origin power. With that, the two of them could harmonize together and it was a method to increase the physical capabilities of the Ferghana horse.
When Chu Feng infused the Origin power, the Ferghana horse neighed and both of its eyes became blood-red. It was like it went insane. Four of its hooves moved at the same time and it was as if it already left the ground. That speed was called fast, and with a wisp of smoke, the Shangguan crowd were left behind after great difficulty in nearing Chu Feng.
"Damn! What horse is that guy riding? How is it so fast?"
"That's impossible. It was clearly only a normal Ferghana horse. How can it be faster than my Shangguan family's meticulously trained little white dragons?"
Looking at Chu Feng who got rid of them with an absolute advantage, the people from the Shangguan family were all dumbfounded because his horse was the quickest horse than they had ever seen and it was so fast that it surpassed their imagination.
"Hmph, quite some methods, but it's too immature."
Shangguan Tian narrowed his eyes, his body leaped and he jumped off from his white horse. After that, he strided with long steps. Wild wind danced and his speed was a lot quicker than the horse as he chased Chu Feng.
"Okay, no need to chase anymore. With big bro, Chu Feng will die without a doubt!"
Seeing that, Shangguan Ya waved his hands towards the people behind him and indicated them to stop. In the current situation, it would be impossible for them to rely on the horses they were riding on to chase Chu Feng. They had the heart, but not the power.
However, Shangguan Tian was different. What he cultivated was a middle level Mysterious Technique and he also grasped a very abstruse bodily martial skill. Combining the robust Profound power and the excellent martial skill, it was only the issue of time before he caught up to Chu Feng because even if they were completing in terms of stamina, Shangguan Tian would not lose to the Ferghana horse. That was the scariness of the Profound realm.
"Damn it. How is this guy's body so good? Can the Profound power in his body not be used up?"
The two of them kept on insanely running. Chu Feng rode the horse, Shangguan Tian ran with his feet. They ran from day straight until night and they had ran for over 10 thousand miles. However, the thing that Chu Feng was helpless against was that Shangguan Tian could not be left behind as he was chasing, and there was not a single trace of fatigue on his face.
"Nonsense. That's an expert of the Profound realm and it is not comparable to the Origin realm. Do you really think the distance between Profound power and Origin power was like a star or half a dot? Luckily the person you met was only at the 1st level of the Profound realm. If he was at the 2nd level of the Profound realm, he would have already caught up with you." Eggy explained.
"What should I do? This Ferghana horse is being overworked and he won't be able to continue soon."
Chu Feng had Spirit power so he could feel the state of the Ferghana horse. Although Chu Feng's Origin power greatly raised the physical abilities of the Ferghana horse, its body was unable to endure such high pressure and it had reached its limit.
"It seems that you can only abandon the horse to escape. Go. Go to that mountain. It would be difficult for him to catch you in the forest." Eggy reminded.
At that moment, Chu Feng also noticed a mountain range that was nearby. So, Chu Feng urged the horse towards it. However, just as he arrived at the foot of the mountain, the Ferghana horse was completely exhausted and it started to decelerate.
"Horsie, sorry."
Chu Feng stroked the Ferghana horse that ran for over 10 thousand miles while being unwilling to part with it. After that, he leaped, did a beautiful flip in the air, and landed on the ground from the horse's back. After his feet touched the ground, lightning snakes surged as he used the middle stage of the Imperial Sky Technique.
"Waa~~~~"
However, before even walking two steps, the wretched cry of a horse came from behind. Turning his head to look, Chu Feng discovered that the Ferghana horse was split into half by Shangguan Tian and blood was scattered on the ground.
"Damned Shangguan family. If I, Chu Feng, can escape this calamity, I will annihilate your entire family."
Chu Feng was furious. It was the first time that he was forced into a situation like that as Shangguan Tian wanted to kill him with no room for discussion. It was also Shangguan Tian's bloodlust that initiated Chu Feng's flames of anger. He already put the Shangguan family into his "Elimination List". As long as he could escape that disaster and grow up, in the future, he would certainly go and slaughter the Shangguan family without even leaving a single chicken or dog alive.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
Chu Feng rushed into the mountain range and he looked with his Spirit power. Relying on the speed of the Imperial Sky Technique, Chu Feng ran west and east in the forest. But even so, he had no way of getting rid of Shangguan Tian. For the first time, he understood the powerful strength of Profound realm experts.
Between the Origin and Profound realm, there was indeed a gap that was unable to be passed over. Even if it was Chu Feng who had a Divine Body, even if he had Spirit power, he could not fight against a Profound realm expert with insufficient cultivation, despite Shangguan Tian only being at the 1st level of the Profound realm.
"Boy, you can't escape."
Suddenly, the bellow of Shangguan Tian came behind Chu Feng. At the same time, his expression changed greatly because he suddenly found out to his left, and to his right, two auras appeared. Those auras were both at the 1st level of the Profound realm. At that instant, from behind as well, Chu Feng was surrounded.


MGA Capitulo 141  Life and Death on a Thread
The auras that abruptly appeared greatly changed Chu Feng's expression because he discovered that the aura belonged to Shangguan Tian. However, clearly, Shangguan Tian was still closely chasing behind him. How did he surround him from both left and right?
"This..It's a martial skill?
After looking to his sides, Chu Feng couldn't help but be astounded. He shockingly discovered that the aura really seemed like Shangguan Tian's, but they were not actual bodies. They seemed to be translucent, illusionary bodies. They were similar to consciousnesses, yet they were clearly not.
"Hmph. This is a rank 6 martial skill, Illusionary Body. I would not usually use it, but today, I will let you open your eyes."
As he spoke, Shangguan Tian's Profound power on his body moved around and two more illusions came out from his body. They separated and almost blocked Chu Feng's retreating path. making it so Chu Feng could only continue forward and without being able to change directions.
"Damn it. Why is there such a twisted martial skill in the world?"
Chu Feng was extremely speechless. That martial skill was simply too revolting. The auras were same as the original body, which meant that they grasped the same amount of power. If that skill was used while fighting an enemy of the same strength, he could create a state in which he completely crushes the enemy.
"Hmph. Being startled for such an insignificant thing. It is merely a rank 6 martial skill, and since the road of martial cultivation is broad and profound, there are countless more strange and odd things."
"His martial skill just looks a bit more spectacular. If he meets someone with absolute strength, it would be useless even if he had more people. However, it is quite efficient for him to use this martial skill to catch you." Eggy said.
"Rubbish. If I keep on being pressured by him like this, sooner or later, I will reach an impasse. Can't you think of anyway that would let me get rid of him?" Chu Feng was quite anxious. He did not want to be killed in the wilderness while he did not know all the reasons why.
"In these kinds of situations, you can only leave it up to fate. If there's a tall mountain that blocks the road, you climb it. If there's a cliff in which you cannot see the bottom, you jump. As long as you can escape his pursuit, you will have a strand of chance to live. If you get caught by him, without a doubt, you will die." Eggy said.
Damn it.
It was just like how Eggy said it was. Chu Feng had no other methods. He could only leave it to the heavens and rely on luck. Who told him to have worse skill than others? Even if he was forced to death, he would not have any words of complaint.
As he madly ran, Chu Feng climbed higher and higher. In front of him, there really was a steep cliff as an obstruction. But luckily, it wasnt too steep and with Chu Fengs methods, he could climb on it.
Within the boundless mountain range, after running away for 6 hours, Chu Feng suddenly felt that something was wrong. There was a dead end in front of him as there was an extremely tall cliff.
Does the heavens really want, I, Chu Feng, to perish?
Standing on the peak of the cliff, Chu Feng looked down. He found out that the cliff really was the end. It was steep to the extreme and if Chu Feng jumped down like that, he would not have much luck.
"Don't be afraid Chu Feng. Listen carefully. There are water sounds so there is a river current down there. Even if this place gets higher, you will only be badly injured but you shouldn't die." Eggy calmly interpreted.
"Run! Let me see where you're going to run! This is called the Suicide Cliff. The rocks are special, and even those at the Profound realm cannot grab onto the cliff wall."
"At the bottom of the Suicide Cliff, it's the Dragon River. The Dragon River's water rushes extremely quickly and it is incomparably vicious, just like a sharp knife. Living things would be shattered into pieces by the water sprays and there are even Monstrous Beasts in the Dragon River. Even if the water does not slam you to death, or if the whirlpools don't roll you to death, the Monstrous Beasts will swallow you."
Shangguan Tian walked over. He no longer chased and his steps slowed down. He had a smug expression all over his face and his gaze towards Chu Feng was filled with mock. So, from the start, he was already planning to force Chu Feng to this dead end.
"Jump! If you jump, at most, your body would be shattered and your bones crushed. But if you die from my hands, you will disappear like a strand of smoke." As Shangguan Tian neared, he sneered.
At that instant, Chu Feng suddenly smiled. His smile was very eerie as his spoke, "Shangguan Tian, pray. Pray that I will die just like this. Pray that you won't see me again."
"Or else I, Chu Feng, will find you. When that day arrives, it will not only be your end. It will be the extermination of your Shangguan family."
After saying that, Chu Feng suddenly leaped and elegantly jumped down the cliff. Very quickly, he sank into the fog as it concealed any trace of him.
Seeing that, Shangguan Tian immediately rushed to where Chu Feng was standing before. He focused and looked carefully. For some reason, a hint of worry was created in his heart. He suddenly regretted it. He regretted not killing Chu Feng personally and instead forcing him down the cliff.
It had to be said that the cliff was extremely high. After jumping, quite a while passed before he passed through the fog and saw the bottom. At the bottom, it was exactly as Shangguan Tian described as. There was a wide and fierce river.
That river was extremely bizarre. The spray of water were very brutal and there were countless underflows. Even in an instant, he could see several whirlpools swirling within the water currents.
At that moment, Chu Feng quickly revolved the Origin power through his body to protect himself. The drop from the cliff really was too high and even if he dropped into the river, a huge force would still be brought on impact. If it were others, they would directly become meat sauce. However, even Chu Feng did not have much luck.
*bang*
Powerful water sprayed everywhere as Chu Feng sank into the Dragon River. In the instant that he sank in, Chu Feng completely lost consciousness as he was swept away by the violent currents.
Chu Feng drifted along the water flow and his consciousness was in a mess. He was really heavily injured and despite of Eggy's yells, Chu Feng could not concentrate his awareness. Life and death really was on a thread.
Roughly 5 days passed under that situation and Chu Feng's consciousness finally started to gradually recover. When he felt the piercing pain coming from his body, he vaguely heard a sweet and beautiful voice of a young female.
"Oi! Are you alright? Wake up!"
As he was in a daze, Chu Feng slowly opened his eyes. Only then did he discover that he was lying on grass. Near him was the fierce Dragon River. It was like a vicious, wild beast and it was still surging and roaring.
"Saved? Not dead!" That were Chu Feng's subconscious thoughts because everything that he saw, and also including the pain coming from his body, let Chu Feng acknowledge that he was still alive.
"Oi, I'm talking to you. Why aren't you replying?" Just at that time, the sweet and beautiful voice rang out again.
Turning his head to look, Chu Feng found out that there was a young female standing behind him. She was around 15 years old, with a tall stature, delicate facial features, pretty appearance, and her pair of clear, big eyes were staring at him while blinking.
Behind the young female stood a big person and an old man. In contrast to her curiosity, they were filled with alert.
"Miss, it seems that he is fine. Let's quickly leave as we must reach the White Tiger Villa before the sky gets dark." The old man spoke and urged.
"Mm." The young female meaningfully shot Chu Feng a glance before turning around and leaving.
"Wait, all of you are heading towards to the White Tiger Villa?" Chu Feng quickly spoke.


MGA Capitulo 142  White Tiger Villa
"Wait, all of you are heading towards to the White Tiger Villa?" Chu Feng quickly spoke.
He hiddenly thought Did the Dragon River lead straight to the White Tiger Mountain Range, and without him knowing, he already reached his destination?
Wasn't the White Tiger villa the most famous villa in the White Tiger Mountain Range? It was the villa he wanted to sneak into!
After all, the name "White Tiger Villa" meant that the villa was most likely similar to the Vermilion Bird City, Black Tortoise City, and the Azure Dragon School. The White Tiger Villa most likely grasped a certain kind and degree of secret in the White Tiger Mountain Range.
"You want to head towards the White Tiger Villa as well?" The young female revealed an unconvincing expression.
"That's right. I wonder if you could bring me along?" Chu Feng revealed a non-evil smile.
He found out, other than the 3 people, there was a stopped carriage nearby. That carriage had no one inside so it was obviously theirs.
Although Chu Feng's speed on foot was not slow, at that instant, he was sore all over and and it was as though his body framework was going to break up. The Origin power in his body were extremely sparse, so naturally, he wanted to take the free ride.
"Since we're going to the same place, come with us." The young female thought for a bit, then she nodded and agreed.
"Miss, this" However, seeing that, the old man and the big person tensed up.
"It doesn't matter. The carriage has extra spots anyway right? Look at him. If he walked to the White Tiger Villa, who knows how long he would need to take?" The young female lightly smiled and she seemed quite kind.
Seeing her determined like so, the old man and the big person looked at each other, then said nothing as they could only silently approve.
"Thanks a lot."
Chu Feng did not restrain himself as he rose and walked towards the direction of the carriage. He knew that the group of people were certainly more familiar in this area than him, so it was absolutely correct to follow them.
"Miss Wang, what are all of you going to the White Tiger Villa for?" On the carriage, Chu Feng curiously asked.
After some information, he knew that the young female was called Wang Lin and her home was located at a small town within the range of the White Tiger Mountain Range. Also, Chu Feng could feel that she was a martial cultivator. Although her cultivation was very weak, being only at the 2nd level of the Spirit realm, she did cultivate.
"It's fine if you call me Wang Lin." She sweetly smiled, then said proudly, "Of course it's to join the White Tiger Villa's servant exam."
"Servant exam?" Chu Feng revealed a questioning expression.
"You don't know? It's the White Tiger Villa's servant exam! Every month, the White Tiger Villa accepts servants from the outside. Those under 17 years old and has the cultivation of the 2nd level of the Spirit realm can join."
Wang Lin started to narrate to Chu Feng. From that, Chu Feng also knew that the White Tiger Mountain Range was rather desolate and there were very few schools nearby. So, in order to let common people cultivate, the White Tiger Villa passed out martial cultivation methods.
Those who were under 17 years old and raised their cultivation to the 2nd level of the Spirit realm could enter the White Tiger Villa. They would use their status as servants to cultivate martial skills or even Mysterious Techniques, and Wang Lin wanted to improve and get promoted to a cultivator.
"So that means you're a martial cultivator?" Chu Feng chuckled and said. He decided to pretend to be a beginner in martial cultivation to join the servant exam. With that, he would sneak into the White Tiger Villa.
"Hmph. My family's miss already reached the 2nd level of the Spirit realm half a year ago."
"How would a bumpkin like you see my family's miss's strength?" Before even letting Wang Lin speak, the big person who was driving the horse roared and also looked at Chu Feng with deep disdain.
Since Chu Feng laid next to the river and his clothes were all broken and tattered, no matter how you looked at him, he seemed like a bumpkin that came out from a village. So, from the bottom of his heart, he looked down at Chu Feng and felt that he knew nothing.
"Cough cough." Feeling that the atmosphere was not right, Wang Lin lightly coughed two times then asked Chu Feng, "Chu Feng, what business do you have in the White Tiger Villa?"
Facing Wang Lin's question, Chu Feng calmly smiled and replied arbitrarily, "The same reason as you."
"What did you say?" When Chu Feng said those words, the three other people on the carriage were greatly stunned.
"What did you say? Say it one more time!"
Wang Lin, the big person, and also the old man who was driving the carriage closely stared at Chu Feng. They had doubt written all over their faces and they even suspected that they heard wrong. They did not even dare to trust Chu Feng's words.
"I said, I have the same goal as Wang Lin and I am going to join the White Tiger Villa's servant exam." Chu Feng emphasized each and every word.
"You're saying that you're a martial cultivator as well?" The old man narrowed his eyes and he was filled with doubt.
"Why? Do I not look like one?" Chu Feng smiled.
"Young man, as a person, be honest. It's not right to speak lies." The big person did not believe Chu Feng's words.
Although the White Tiger Villa already passed down martial cultivation methods to common people, that did not mean everyone could grasp it. It had to be known that money was required to buy martial cultivation methods, so, many poor people had no chance to cultivate. In their eyes, Chu Feng was a person like that.
"Suit yourselves." Chu Feng shrugged and did not give any extra explanations.
Seeing that Chu Feng did not refute, the old man and the big person thought that he was talking big and they couldn't help but deepen their disdain towards Chu Feng. On the other hand, Wang Lin looked at Chu Feng while half-believing and half-doubting, and didn't say anything.
However, on the latter of the journey, the carriage seemed to be more awkward. Other than Wang Lin who chatted with the old man and the big person, almost no one spoke to Chu Feng again.
The carriage continued on, and when the sun set at the west, they finally entered the White Tiger Villa.
The White Tiger Villa was extremely large. Although it was called White Tiger Villa, in reality, it was a beautiful city that was created with a mountain on the side. It was built by white-coloured, mysterious bricks and the palaces were very special as well. Within the dark emerald-green mountain range, it was rather gorgeous.
"This White Tiger Villa is really quite nice." Chu Feng looked at the nearby White Tiger Villa and he felt the aura of the large groups of people. After experiencing such a life and death calamity, more and more, he felt that it was wonderful to be living.
"Bumpkin." The big person shot Chu Feng a glance and contempt came from the bottom of his heart.
The carriage went along the wide mountain road and they finally reached in front of the huge city gate of the White Tiger Villa. There was a plaza in front of the city gates, and at the center of the plaza, there was a temporary tent and it was the area where the White Tiger Villa accepted servants.
At that moment, the sky was slowly darkening and there weren't many people lining up outside of the tent. The exam was going to end, so Wang Lin and the other three quickly walked towards the tent after going down the carriage.
"Halt." But before even letting Wang Lin and the others near, a young man blocked their path.
He was not even 20 years old and there was a white cloth at his chest. On it were the three words "Middle-rank Servant" and his cultivation was only at the 3rd level of the Spirit realm. It could be said that he was weak to the utmost degree.
Naturally, from that, Chu Feng slightly looked down on the White Tiger Villa. As a martial cultivating family that had been around for generations, those servants, who were equivalent to disciples from schools, were a bit too weak if they only had that kind of strength.


MGA Capitulo 143  When You Should Attack, Go Attack
"Brother, my family's miss came to join the White Dragon Villa servant exam." The big person chuckled as he explained.
"What time is it now? The exam has already concluded so come next month." That servant did not even look straight into their eyes and his attitude was very stubborn.
Seeing that, Wang Lin slightly frowned but she was helpless against their status. She did not dare to be too aggressive so she could only force out a light smile out and say,
"We hurried here from a far place and it was quite difficult, so could you help out a bit?"
Wang Lin had quite a nice appearance, so after that servant saw her, he couldn't help but hesitate and his expression clearly turned for the better. Yet, he still said resolutely, "I cannot."
At the same time, many other servants all around the plaza appeared and almost all of them closed their tents. Everyone was forbidden from nearing.
At that instant, the three of them were stupefied. Although they could still come next month if they couldn't make it this month, the three of them did not want to travel for nothing.
"Here are some of my kind feelings, please accept them." As he panicked, the old man took out 10 taels of silvers out from his pocket and passed them over.
"Old bastard? You think I need your 10 taels of silvers?"
"Get out of here, or else I'll catch all of you." The actions of the old man actually angered the servant as he started pointing and cursing.
"Sorry, sorry"
That terrified the old man. They quickly apologized, and turned around at the same time, not daring to nag anymore.
However, as the three of them gave up, Chu Feng swaggeringly walked over, brushed by their shoulders, and walked straight towards the tent.
"Stop. Did you not hear what I just said?"
"Shoo." The servant already had flames of fury burning, and when he saw a person who dared to go up, he instantly bellowed.
"What did you say? I couldn't hear it clear enough." Chu Feng extended his ear forward and acted as if he did not understand.
"I said, sho..."
*bam*
Before the servant even finished speaking, Chu Feng's clear slap landed on his face.
At the same time, Chu Feng raised his foot and kicked. He directly kicked the servant until his face pointed up into the sky and he ferociously fell to the ground.
"This"
That scene happened way too fast, but there were still quite a few people that saw it. The servants of the White Tiger Villa all surrounded over and they seemed to want to attack Chu Feng.
Wang Lin was dumbstruck. She never would have thought that Chu Feng would directly attack. It was unimaginable.
"Miss, let's quickly leave."
The old man and the big person grabbed onto Wang Lin at the same time and pulled her away. They both felt that Chu Feng was dead. Commoners who attacked people from the White Tiger Villa were simply looking to die. so, they tried their best to distant themselves from Chu Feng to erase all relationships with Chu Feng.
"Block them, they're together."
But just at that time, the servant who got hit pointed and yelled at Wang Lin and the others.
The other servants speedily obstructed their path. They surrounded Wang Lin and the others along with Chu Feng.
"You bumpkin. We've been dragged down by you!"
At that instant, the old man and the big person were extremely frightened. Both of their bodies were trembling and they couldn't help but blame Chu Feng.
Although Wang Lin was a bit stronger than the other two, she was clearly scared as well. Only Chu Feng remained calm and both of his hands were looped in front of his chest. There was even a trace of disdain in his gaze.
"Dammit! You dare to hit me? Beat him to death." The servant that was beaten got himself up and rushed towards Chu Feng. The other servants also surged forward.
"Stop." But before they even attacked, an angry shout suddenly resounded.
After hearing that voice, the faces of the servants changed greatly. Not only did they stop their movements, they even went to the side and formed a path. Looking over, an old man was walking towards them.
The old man wore cloth clothing and it was very simple and plain. However, there was fierceness between his eyebrows. In addition to the respectful attitude that the servants were treating him with, everyone subconsciously felt that the old man came from an unordinary place.
Chu Feng could feel that the old man was a cultivator at the 5th level of the Origin realm. Although those at the 5th level of the Origin realm were not much in Chu Feng's eyes, the old man's cultivation was a lot stronger when compared to the servants from the White Tiger Villa.
"What is happening?" The old man asked.
"This boy dared to attack us." The servants said the same things as they pointed at Chu Feng.
"Oh?" The old man looked at the servant who was attacked, then assessed Chu Feng. Not only was he not angry, shock even emerged into his eyes.
The reason was very simple. The servant had the cultivation of the 3rd level of the Spirit realm, and those who were able to beat him certainly had strength that surpassed him. Chu Feng was so young yet had that kind of strength so naturally, he would be viewed in another light.
"You are here to join the servant exam?" The old man looked at Chu Feng and his tone was very gentle.
"Yes." Chu Feng's attitude was very polite as well.
"Enter." The old man spun around and walked towards the tent.
That change endlessly stunned the crowd. Not to mention the surrounding people, even the servants didn't know what to do.
A commoner attacked a person from the White Tiger Villa. Not only did he not get punished, he even got accepted to the servant exam. That did not make sense.
"Manager Zhang, this"
"What &8216this? The sky isn't dark so the exam for servants will continue. Don't think I don't know what all of you are doing."
"If you dare to break the rules without permission next time, don't blame me if I don't restrain myself."
The servant who was beaten felt bitter so he wanted give his point of view, but what he got instead was the strict reprimand of manager Zhang.
After being rebuked, the expressions of the servants were very ugly and no one dared to speak anymore.
The surrounding people could also hear that exam was not finished, but it was just that the servants wanted to return early to the residences so they blocked the people who wanted to participate in the exam.
At that instant, not only Chu Feng, everyone who wanted to join the exam went over.
Looking at the people who ceaselessly entered the tent, Wang Lin stood where she was. She silently lowered her head. She wanted to go, yet she had no courage.
Their current chance was fought for by Chu Feng. However, when Chu Feng was in danger, not only did she not help him, she cowered back. That made her feel guilty towards Chu Feng and she had no face to go over.
"Oi, what are you waiting for? Why aren't you coming?" But just at that time, a familiar sound suddenly rang out.
Raising her head to look, Chu Feng was standing in front of the tent while chuckling and looking at Wang Lin.
At that instant, Wang Lin felt very touched in her heart. She did not expect that he would treat her so friendly even after her previous treatment towards Chu Feng.
After a split moment of hesitation, Wang Lin still walked over because she did not want to miss that chance. After arriving next to Chu Feng, the two of them looked at each other, smiled, then walked into the tent together.


MGA Capitulo 144  Murong Xiaoyao
The sun set in the west. When the torches were lit in the plaza, the sky already darkened.
The exam truly ended. The young males and females who passed it were all brought into the White Tiger Villa by the servants one by one, and with that, they became members of the White Tiger Villa.
However, Wang Lin and Chu Feng did not come out from the tent. That made the big person and the old man ineffably uneasy.
After the scene before, they knew that Chu Feng was a martial cultivator. Then, they thought about their mocking towards Chu Feng before. At the same time that they felt ashamed, they worried that Chu Feng would harm Wang Lin.
After all, anyone could tell that manager Zhang had favourable impressions towards Chu Feng or else even if the servant broken the rules at first, he would not permit commoners to attack people from the White Tiger Villa.
"Uncle Zhao, uncle Liu." However, when Wang Lin appeared within their line of sight, their worries faded away like the clouds.
"Miss, you passed?" The big person looked at the lower-rank servant symbol on Wang Lin's chest and he was incomparably excited. After all, being able to enter the White Tiger Villa meant that the road of cultivation would be even more smooth.
"Rubbish. Our miss is the real stuff and there is no reason she would not pass." The old man also chuckled and he felt happiness for Wang Lin from the bottom of his heart.
Although Wang Lin's family situation was not bad, it was still incomparable to the White Tiger Villa. Even if she was a servant of the White Tiger Villa, she had status and position in the White Tiger Mountain Range.
So, any martial cultivators would want to enter the White Tiger Villa. They would not feel shame as they had the identity of being a servant. Rather, they would feel pride. It was like becoming a disciple from a school.
"Wang Lin, it seems that you and me will part here. I still have to thank you for transporting me here." Just at that time, Chu Feng walked over.
"No need to say it like that. If it wasn't for you, how could I pass this exam today?" Wang Lin felt a bit embarrassed.
"Okay, no need to be too polite to each other. Since we've already entered the White Tiger Villa, perhaps we can even meet in the future." Chu Feng smiled and waved his hand before turning around and leaving. From nearby, manager Zhang was waiting for Chu Feng.
However, when the old man and the big person saw the servant symbol on Chu Feng's chest, they stood there blankly and astonishment was all over their faces.
After a good while, they came to their senses and said inconceivably, "He directly got promoted to upper-rank servant! That requires at least the cultivation of the 4th level of the Spirit realm right?"
"Heh." Seeing that, Wang Lin bitterly smiled and said, "Yeah. The high-rank black rock was shattered by one of his punches. Even that manager Zhang endlessly sighed in praise."
"I think that he would have quite the development in the White Tiger Villa right? This time, we've really looked down on people with dog eyes."
After hearing Wang Lin's words, the old man and the big person felt even more ashamed. To think of all the humiliating they did to Chu Feng, they really had the heart to die at that moment.
In that continent, strength ruled all. With Chu Feng's talent, after entering the White Tiger Villa, he would certainly skyrocket up. Gaining fame and status was only the matter of time.
Thus, their actions really was equivalent to offending a future well-known person in the White Tiger Mountain Range. Not only did they feel shame, they also felt fear in their hearts. Fear that Chu Feng would take revenge on them in the future.
"Don't worry, he isn't a person who is narrow-minded." As if seeing their worries, Wang Lin comforted them.
"Ahh, it seems that people really cannot be judged by appearances." But even so, the old man and the big person had no way of calming down.
Their intestines greened from regret and if they knew that Chu Feng was a genius like that, how would they have dared to taunt him before? They would even rush to gain good impressions for him.
However, if they knew that being at the 4th level of the Spirit realm was only Chu Feng hiding his strength, and his real strength was at the 1st level of the Origin realm, who knew what expression they would have.
After parting, Wang Lin and Chu Feng were both sent into the White Tiger Villa, but since their positions were different, their location of residence were different as well.
In the White Tiger Villa, within the group of buildings that were as boundless as the ocean, there was a fine little house. That was the living location of upper-rank servants, the resting place for Chu Feng today.
"I never would have thought it would be this successful."
Chu Feng sat cross-legged on the bed. He shot a glance at the upper-rank servant symbol over his chest, looked at the book in his hand, and he couldn't help but lightly smile.
It was a rank 2 martial skill and it was given to him by manager Zhang. However, not every servant could receive that treatment. Although the servants of the White Tiger Villa could indeed cultivate martial skills, it was restricted to upper-rank servants.
It was the rare within rare to be able to get a martial skill for cultivation like how Chu Feng did when he just entered the White Tiger Villa.
However, to Chu Feng, there was no need to cultivate the rank 2 martial skill, and also because the current him was extremely exhausted, he threw the martial skill at the head of the bed, then laid down and slept.
From then on, Chu Feng concealed himself for a full 10 days in the White Tiger Villa. Although he had the status of a servant, since he was a upper-rank servant, Chu Feng did not need to do servant-like things. Mostly, he instructed the work for middle-rank and lower-rank servants.
As for Chu Feng, most of the time, he inquired about the secrets of the White Tiger Villa. From the 10 days that he had been there, Chu Feng had some results and he had a certain amount of understanding about the White Tiger Villa.
The White Tiger Villa had the history of 500 years and in terms of foundation, they were no worse than some schools. Their strength was not simple as well and there were many experts in the villa. However, because they were rather remote, very few people within the Azure Province noticed that place. However, the creator of the White Tiger Villa really was quite a person.
In the White Tiger Mountain Range 500 years ago, there was no such thing as the White Tiger Villa. At that time, there were even more poor common people in the mountain range because of the terrain. It was very hard for them to walk out of the mountain and most of them spent their last years there.
At that time, within the White Tiger Mountain Range, there were actually a few martial cultivating families that had been around for generations. It was just that the families did not pass down the methods to outsiders and commoners had no way of even touching martial cultivation.
The creator of the White Tiger Villa, Murong Xiaoyao. was born as a commoner. At that time, he was still a young man and since he could not bear being useless in his entire life, he sneaked into a martial cultivating family as a servant. He even got together with a young lady from that family. From her, he got the martial cultivating methods and he even learnt Mysterious Techniques and martial skills.
However, when that was unveiled, Murong Xiaoyao was chased by that family. At the end, he was forced to escape to an area that was viewed as a danger zone.
At that moment, everyone thought that Murong Xiaoyao was dead. However, 5 years later, he walked out of that dead zone and became a martial cultivating expert of his generation. He was invincible within the White Tiger Mountain Range.
When Murong Xiaoyao came out from there and discovered that the lady who taught him the martial cultivating methods was killed by that family, from his fury, he slaughtered them. He then returned and created the White Tiger Villa.
After the White Tiger Villa was established, it quickly became the overlord of the White Tiger Mountain Range. Many experts outside of the White Tiger Mountain Range heard about it, came, and joined the White Tiger Villa. Murong Xiaoyao even spread the martial cultivating methods down to commoners so that everyone in the White Tiger Mountain Range could touch upon the road of martial cultivation and change their destinies.


MGA Capitulo 145  Consciousness Guardian
According to legends, the Murong Xiaoyao that year could absolutely be called as a first-class character. He grasped an extremely strong martial skill and his attacking methods were matchless in the world. Almost no one could block him off.
Even a famous World Spiritist in the Azure Province who had extremely strong defense methods fought him, yet he was still killed in one strike.
At that moment, some people felt that Murong Xiaoyao would be the same as the Azure Dragon Founder and become the heaven's pride of the generation. However, no one expected that he would suddenly disappear just as his power emerged.
On the year that he disappeared was the year in which he got out of the dead zone. It was the year that he established the White Tiger Villa, and in that year, he was only 20 years old.
Some people said that, since he gained great benefits in the dead zone, he paid the equivalent price and was fated to not live for long.
There were also others that said he was tired with worldly disputes and he could not get rid of the guilt in his heart towards the miss that gave him the martial cultivating methods. So, he lived in the forests in isolation.
But no matter how Murong Xiaoyao disappeared, after he disappeared, many powerful people from the Azure Province rushed into the White Tiger Mountain Range and they wanted to get Murong Xiaoyao's transcendent martial skill, but at the end, they could not find the dead zone.
Later on, someone suggested to completely flatten the White Tiger Villa and even if they needed to dig 3 feet down, they had to find it. However, just as the top experts within the Azure Province prepared to level the White Tiger Villa, Murong Xiaoyao suddenly appeared.
It was said that Murong Xiaoyao at that time only disappeared for two months, yet when people saw him again, huge changes happened to him as he became an old man. His black hair turned into snow-white, long hair. His face was as though it was paper, he wore white clothing and he was like a dead person who was alive.
He used but one attack to completely annihilate the peak experts of the Azure Province at that time. It could be said that he shocked the world with one attack. With a thought, blood formed rivers and he had power that seemed peerless and invincible.
After killing those who intruded, Murong Xiaoyao disappeared once again. He disappeared very thoroughly and no one knew where he went. Even people from the White Tiger Villa did not know.
However, the strangest thing was from that day forth, corpses of exceptional experts would unfathomably appear in the White Tiger Villa. They were all murdered and they died with one attack. The efficient killing method belonged to the skill that only Murong Xiaoyao had.
After that, people knew that Murong Xiaoyao did not die. It was just that he got fed up with worldly clashes. But, he still hiddenly guarded the White Tiger Villa and did not allow anyone to intrude.
Despite of that, the martial skill that Murong Xiaoyao grasped that year was too attracting. For that martial skill, there were still many experts who ignored the dangers to their lives and hiddenly sneaked into the White Tiger Villa. However, at the end, they could not escape their fate of being killed.
The oddest thing was that several hundred years after the disappearance of Murong Xiaoyao, the same things still often happened. The most recent one happened 200 years ago and the way of death was the same as the people back in those years.
To know that even if Murong Xiaoyao still lived 200 years ago, he would be over 300 years old and it was not an age that humans could continue surviving for.
So, some people felt that Murong Xiaoyao had already died from the start. The thing that was living was nothing more than a hint of his consciousness because with a certain, absolute power, Murong Xiaoyao's consciousness could forever not be extinguished and he could guard the White Tiger Villa forever.
From then on, no one dared to come to the White Tiger Villa to snoop and the White Tiger Villa didn't really take part in external dealings so gradually, they faded away from people's eyes.
But even so, that hooked onto Chu Feng's interest even more. He knew that the dead zone that year was most likely the entrance to the Emperor Tomb located in the White Tiger Mountain Range. Murong Xiaoyao must had been the same as the Azure Dragon Founder and gained something within it.
As for where the entrance was, or whether Murong Xiaoyao was alive or dead, Chu Feng had no clue. However, since he already sneaked in, Chu Feng would certainly not give up and he vowed to find some results.
Early morning when the sky had not been lit up yet, the door to Chu Feng's room was knocked. Opening it to take a look, it was manager Zhang.
"Your complexion is quite nice."
After seeing Chu Feng, manager Zhang nodded with satisfaction. He gave the clothing in his hands to Chu Feng and said, "Tidy up a bit. I have an errand for you."
Chu Feng changed his clothing then followed manager Zhang to a garden. Within the garden were several carriages.
Several of them were filled with goods while there was one beautiful carriage for passengers. It was extremely luxurious and even the horses that pulled the carriage were good horses.
Chu Feng was not surprised. Although he interacted with lower class people these days, he understood the foundation of the White Tiger Villa. At least, it was no worse than the Vermilion Bird City or the Azure Dragon School. There were many experts hidden there and its economic power was very strong as well.
There were dozens of servants standing next to the carriages. On their hands, if they were not holding pastries, they were holding flowers. The most important thing was that all of the servants were upper-rank servants.
However, all the servants were older than Chu Feng. When they saw the upper-rank servant symbol over Chu Feng's chest, they showed strange expressions. After all, to be able to become an upper-rank servant at such a young age attracted their envy.
"Chu Feng, today is the date in which the big Miss offer sacrifices to her mother. All of you, be more sharp." After saying those words, manager Zhang left.
"Oi, you're new right?" Just as he left, a group of servants surrounded him.
They were males and females within the group, but they already passed their youthful times. They surrounded Chu Feng and they had evil smiles on their mouths and also unkind gazes.
Chu Feng felt very disgusted when facing those gazes. But, he also knew that the new servants would be bullied by the old ones. It was an unwritten rule of the White Tiger Villa.
In order to successfully trick people and for future conveniences in searching around this villa, Chu Feng endured his anger and forced a light smile out, "Older brothers and older sisters, is there a problem?"
"Who are you calling as older sisters? Do I look that damn old?" Just as he finished speaking, a woman who was at least 20 years old sent a slap towards Chu Feng.
That slap had quite sufficient power and its speed was rather fast as well, but within Chu Feng's eyes, it was abnormally slow. He leaned slightly to the side and easily dodged it.
"Oh? You dare to dodge? Don't you know the rules here? Today, I must teach you a good lesson."
Seeing that, the female servant felt surprised but fiercely raised her palm again. At the same time, everyone surrounding him prepared to attack. Chu Feng could feel the attack of strong wind from all directions. Those servants didn't know "what shame was" as they surrounded and attacked a young man like Chu Feng.
At that instant, Chu Feng clenched both of his fists. He was hesitating. Hesitating whether to counterattack or not. If he exposed his current cultivation, most likely, the White Tiger Villa would suspect that he was a spy and things would not go well for him.
"Stop."
Just that time, a fierce yell rang out. However, that voice was unusually sweet and after listening to it, Chu Feng's heart tightened.
Looking towards the source of the voice, Chu Feng's eyes were instantly fixed because from nearby, there was a tall and beautiful girl.


MGA Capitulo 146  Assassins Within the Woods
The girl had snow-like skin, white with smoothness and although her appearance could not be matched with the beauties of the country, she still had a unique demeanor. The most important thing was that her figure was extremely good. Her front stuck out and her rear rose, and they were well developed, smooth, and round. In addition to her pair of pencil-like straight long legs, she had a devil-like body that was comparable to Su Rou.
Chu Feng genuinely could not look away from such a nice figure because he couldn't help but think of the euphoric night with Su Rou.
Seeing Chu Feng staring at her so plainly, the girl slightly frowned and a hint of disgust clearly emerged into her gaze.
"Ho, not even willing to now. Isn't such a good body for others to look?" Chu Feng coldly laughed in his heart and his gaze still swept back and forth on her long, beautiful legs. He completely disregarded what expression she had.
"We pay our respects to big Miss." However, as Chu Feng looked with great interest and was extremely absorbed, respectful voices rang out from around him. At the same time, the dozens of upper-rank servants bent their bodies and paid their respects.
"Big Miss? Really? She's the big Miss of the White Tiger Villa, Murong Xinyu?"
Chu Feng suddenly realized it. Murong Xinyu was the eldest daughter of the master of the White Tiger Villa. From when she was born, she was unable to cultivate. However, she was an extremely smart person.
"I'm finished."
Chu Feng hiddenly cursed because he discovered that the colour of Murong Xinyu's current face was ashen. Clearly, she was angered by him. At that instant, Chu Feng felt a bit of regret because he knew that he made a huge mistake.
The servants around Chu Feng rejoiced in his misfortune. What Murong Xinyun hated the most was others looking at her beauty. Chu Feng touched upon a huge taboo so they looked forward to what punishment Chu Feng was going to receive.
"Uncle Zhang, let's go." The thing that bewildered others was that no punishment was given to Chu Feng by Murong Xinyun and she only went straight onto the carriage.
Seeing that, manager Zhang breathed a sigh of relief, meaningful looked at Chu Feng, then followed her.
"You've offended the big Miss. You're dead."
"Hold a bit more of this. If I'm happy, perhaps I can plead a bit for you."
The servants forcefully stuffed the sacrificial items to Chu Feng and only when Chu Feng could not carry anymore, they chased after the moving carriages.
As for Chu Feng, he paid no attention to them either because his heart was completely submerged into uneasiness. He was also worried how the big Miss would take care of him. It was not good for him, who was preparing to search for the entrance to the Emperor Tomb in the White Tiger Villa.
After the carriages left the White Tiger Villa, they went deep into the White Tiger Mountain Range. Only when it went a thousand miles out did it stop at a forest.
There was a mountain grave there. Without any thinking, Chu Feng knew that it was the grave of Murong Xinyu's mother.
At that instant, the servants started to set up the offerings. However, the main labour was done by Chu Feng.
They were clearly bullying Chu Feng, and both Murong Xinyu and manager Zhang saw that but they did not stop them. Chu Feng could only endure the humiliation and swallow his complains. Who told him to offend Murong Xinyu right?
The more he did that, the more excessive they got. They felt that they were venting Murong Xinyu's anger for her, so even if they were bullying, it was right and just. At the end, all of the work was given to Chu Feng.
It was because it was noon and Murong Xinyu needed to eat. So, the servants just went and served her. Only Chu Feng, by himself, served the big Miss's dead mother.
"They really are natural slaves." Seeing the servants who had smiles all over their faces and were surrounding Murong Xinyu, contempt rose from the bottom of Chu Feng's heart.
"This Murong Xinyu isn't anyone good either. If you're going to offer sacrifices to your mother, you should kowtow in front of your mother's grave. Yet she didn't. What kind of offering is this?"
"This aura?"
But just at that time, Chu Feng slightly frowned and swept his fierce gaze towards his surroundings. He was able to feel that there were a dozen or so cultivators nearing. Every single one was at the Origin realm. The weakest was at the 1st level of the Origin realm, whereas the strongest reached the 5th level of the Origin realm.
*rustle rustle*
Before discovering the situation for long, stepping sounds came from the surrounding forest. Very soon, over 10 figures came out from the forest.
Those people wore black and they only revealed their vicious eyes. They held blades that glittered with cold light and their killing intent was completely revealed.
"Who are you?" Seeing that the situation was wrong, manager Zhang fiercely yelled and ran in front of Murong Xinyu, putting her behind him to protect her.
*whoosh whoosh* When those black-clothed people saw Murong Xinyu, they said nothing, waved their weapons within their hands, surrounded Murong Xinyu and attacked. Their target was very obvious.
"They are assassins! Protect the big Miss!" Manager Zhang explosively yelled again. Both of his arms moved and afterimages were created.
He surrounded Murong Xinyu by himself. It was as if he became a copper and iron wall. The group of assassins that carried weapons could not penetrate through.
But the so-called "two fists cannot fight four hands" and besides, there were so many people surrounding and attacking him. There was even a person who was no weaker than manager Zhang so he would quickly be unable to continue.
*clang clang clang clang*
Suddenly, manager Zhang sent out several palms at the same time and forcibly broken a person's weapon. After that, he fiercely landed an attack on that assassin's chest and just like that, he died by a hit. However, at the same time on his body, he was also had two blade wounds and blood flowed.
"Big Miss, quickly run!"
Enduring the huge pain on his body, manager Zhang grabbed Murong Xinyu and threw her out of the encirclement. Murong Xinyu who had absolutely no cultivation ferociously fell on the ground.
"Protect the big Miss."
Seeing that, two servants righteously went up to support Murong Xinyu, but when two cold flashes streaked across, without any cry of pain, the two servants fell within a pool of blood. It turned out that two black-clothed people at the 2nd level of the Origin realm were already pouncing towards Murong Xinyu.
"This"
That scene terrified the remaining servants. Not only did they not block anymore, they even started to flee and left Murong Xinyu alone.
But that was quite understandable. When it was related to their lives, most people would do the same thing as well.
"You bunch of bastards."
Looking at the servants that abandoned her and ran for their lives, Murong Xinyu grinded her teeth in anger. After a furious curse, she spun around and wanted to escape. However, her speed was far from being equal to those servants.
With some carelessness, she tripped and fell again. At the same time, the two black-clothed people already neared. They waved the sharp blades in their hands and stabbed towards Murong Xinyu.
Before death, fear finally appeared on Murong Xinyu's face. She couldn't help but close her eyes and didn't dare to continue looking. She felt that she was, without a doubt, dead.
*poof*
However, when a heavy sound rang out and warm blood sprayed onto her face, she astonishedly discovered that she did not feel any pain coming from her body.
While feeling all sorts of confusion, Murong Xinyu gradually opened her eyes. But when she clearly saw the scene in front of her eyes, she was dumbfounded.


MGA Capitulo 147  Displaying His Abilities
In front of Murong Xinyu, Chu Feng was standing there. Under Chu Feng's feet, two black-clothed people who were at the 2nd level of the Origin realm laid within a pool of blood.
Chu Feng attacked. He did not have any goals nor did he think about it too much. He just did that because he didn't want a girl, who did not even have the strength to tie up a chicken, to be killed by Origin realm experts in front of his face.
While looking at that scene, Murong Xinyu had astonishment all over her face because she didn't see what just happened. But, she knew that the two people who wanted to kill her were abruptly dead.
If it was a normal situation, that scene would not be difficult to comprehend. Clearly, the person in front of her killed the two black-clothed people. However, when the person who was standing in front of her was a servant and a young man like Chu Feng, obviously, Murong Xinyu had no way of accepting that fact.
"Little child, you are looking to die."
Just at that time, two more black-clothed people rushed over. They were at the 3rd level of the Origin realm and when they saw their comrades being killed, they were incomparably furious. They revolved their Origin power and sent out two strong martial skills.
*huu huu huu*
The two martial skills were not to be underestimated. Their strong might shook the ground into trembling. Wisps of flames were tracing in the air as they emitted ear-piercing roaring sounds.
"Ahh~"
Facing such a frightening attack, Murong Xinyu screeched in fear because to her, who did not even have spiritual energy, that strong Origin power was too terrifying.
"Hmph."
But as Murong Xinyu felt that she was definitely going to die, Chu Feng coldly snorted and without even moving, the two strong attacks exploded 3 meters away from Chu Feng.
*boom*
That might was extremely terrifying. Energy ripples became hurricanes of formed Origin power as they engulfed outwards. They snapped all the surround big trees into ashes. One escaping servant was even shattered forcibly by the energy.
However, such a strong explosion was stopped 3 meters away from Chu Feng. It was as though there was an invisible wall and it did not even harm half of Chu Feng's hair.
"How did that happen?"
Murong Xinyu who personally saw everything had her eyes wide open from shock. Her small mouth slightly opened and astonishment was all over her face. She did not know what happened, and obviously, she did not know that it was the Spirit Formation from the legends.
In reality, even the two black-clothed people who attacked couldn't help but hesitate for a bit. Originally, they thought that they could kill Chu Feng with the attack, but they never would have thought that he would not be injured in any way.
*bzz*
As they were at a loss, suddenly, lighting appeared on Chu Feng's body and snakes of lightning surged as they roared towards the sky. In an instant, they pounced towards the two black-clothed people, forcibly swallowed them and the people became ashes.
"This"
This time, everyone saw everything clear. They saw that Chu Feng did not even move but used overwhelming martial skills to kill the two black-clothed people who were at the 3rd level of the Origin realm.
"This auraIt's the 1st level of the Origin realm. However, how can someone who is at the 1st level of the Origin realm be so strong? Killing those at the 3rd level of the Origin realm is like squishing ants?"
Although manager Zhang was still bitterly fighting with the black-clothed people, he still noticed what Chu Feng did. With his old and hard-to-deal with experience, he was aware that Chu Feng was a bit off. He pointed at Chu Feng and yelled out loudly, "Who are you? Why did you sneak into my White Tiger Villa?!"
"What? Sneak into the White Tiger Villa?"
Everyone reacted to manager Zhang's words. Normally, servants could not possibly have cultivation like Chu Feng's, and with his cultivation, although he would not be at the peak even in the White Tiger Villa, he would still certainly be considered as an expert. It would be impossible for him to be such a petty servant.
At that instant, fear emerged onto Murong Xinyu's shocked face. She started to climb backwards frightenedly. Because of the White Tiger Villa's secret, there were indeed many cultivating experts that sneaked in and those people had malicious intents. She was kidnapped once before and she almost lost her life.
"If you want to live, don't run around." Chu Feng turned his head and said indifferently.
"Ehh" As she saw Chu Feng's fierce gaze, for some reason, Murong Xinyu couldn't help but be at a loss. After that, she stopped her body's movements and blankly sat where she was.
*swish swish swish*
Just at that moment, whooshing noises were emanated from the surrounding forest. There were a good hundred black-clothed people that came out from the forest. All of them held blades and all of their auras belonged in the Origin realm.
"Kill everyone with no mercy." A cold voice rang out and the black-clothed people started their massacre. Almost all the servants who did not run away were killed.
In actuality, even the servants who did run away died as they were killed within the forest. Clearly, the group of people had already planned to not leave any survivors from the start.
Under the surrounding group attack, even manager Zhang had no way of continuing and he quickly fell down. However, on Chu Feng's side, no one would even get near him. Those who came within the range of 10 meters would die.
"Friend, I see that you aren't a person from my White Tiger Villa. Can you not get involved in my White Tiger Villa's private matters?" A black-clothed person at the 5th level of the Origin realm spoke and it was evident that he was aware that Chu Feng was not simple.
"Who are you? Why do you need to harm me?" After knowing that the black-clothed people were people from the White Tiger Villa, Murong Xinyu was enraged because she could not think who would dare to kill her even after knowing her position and identity in the White Tiger Villa.
"As long as you help out a bit, my White Tiger Villa will heavily reward you." The black-clothed person completely ignored Murong Xinyu and politely clasped his hands towards Chu Feng.
At the same time, dozens of black-clothed people already carefully encircled them. If there were any unsuited words, they would attack with their full strength.
Facing that situation, Murong Xinyu had no choice but to stand up and closely follow behind Chu Feng. Thinking about it, even she felt that it was amusing. The grand big Miss of the White Tiger villa needed the protection of an outsider.
She even offended that outsider and he received quite a bit of grievance, yet currently, that outsider was the only person that could protect her. A person that she had to rely on.
"My friend, do you think you will be victorious?" Since Chu Feng did not speak, the black-clothed person's voice finally became icy cold.
"If you want to attack, go ahead. This girl is under my protection." Chu Feng faintly smiled and didn't even put those people in his eyes.
"Attack." Seeing that, the black-clothed person did not waste anymore words. With a cold shout, over a hundred black-clothed people moved and started their attack on Chu Feng.
There were different strong and surly martial skills, but the same thing that they all had was strength. Just with that pressure, it was enough for those at the Spirit realm to die. However, Murong Xinyu who was currently under Chu Feng's protection was astsounded as she discovered that she was not threatened in any way.


MGA Capitulo 148  Decisive Slaughtering
An invisible wall was formed in front of them. It was like a transparent fort that that protected both Chu Feng and Murong Xinyu.
Despite the martial skills that endlessly bombarded over and continuously exploded, they were stopped by the fort and there was no way to penetrate it in any way.
"Is this a Spirit Formation Technique?"
Murong Xinyu was stunned. Although she could not cultivate, after all, she was the big Miss of the White Tiger Villa so she had heard about a lot of things. Naturally, she would have heard of World Spiritists, so she also knew that the Spirit Formation Techniques were the strongest defense methods in the world.
However, no matter what, she never would have thought that a young man who was so much younger than her was a World Spiritist and even had such strong cultivation.
There was no one who had that kind of strength at that age in her White Tiger Villa. With that, Murong Xinyu couldn't help but look at Chu Feng in another light and thought "Could it be that outside of the White Tiger Villa, there are countless experts and geniuses form crowds?"
"Damn it. What strange method did this boy use? How are my attacks not landing on him?" Facing that situation, the black-clothed people felt very helpless.
"Impossible. Is he a World Spiritist? A World Spiritist at such a young age... Where did he come from?" Even the leader of the black-clothed people tightly frowned and felt that Chu Feng was too hard to deal with.
"What? You're done? If you're done, it's my turn!"
Chu Feng waved his big sleeve and the Spirit Formation quickly contracted. From a Spirit Formation fort that was as large as a house, it became an extremely small space that could only fit Chu Feng and Murong Xiyun.
At that time, Chu Feng raised his feet and took a step forward. He stepped out from the Spirit Formation. His left hand formed into a fist and a golden longbow appeared. His pulled with his right hand and a golden arrow condensed and appeared.
From then on, Chu Feng explosively and repeatedly shot out. Howling wind noises never-endingly sounded out. Rain of golden arrows filled the sky as they all flew over. Every single arrow saw blood and none of them missed.
Under the burst of shooting, very quickly, over half of the hundred black-clothed people died or were injured. Almost no one could dodge Chu Feng's arrow because it was as though the arrows had magic. They wanted to dodge, yet they could not. They wanted to defend, yet they could not.
"Retreat!"
Seeing one body after the other being pierced and laying within a pool of blood all around him, even the leader panicked. He yelled and took the lead to escape.
"Hmph. You think you can get away?"
Chu Feng coldly snorted. He aimed at the black-clothed leader and shot. Wherever the flash of a golden light went, nothing could stop it. Several enormous trees that could touch the sky had holes bore through them. At the end, only when it landed and forcibly exploded the head of the leader did it dissipate.
That was the highest profound meaning of the Bow of Hundred Transformations. There were no wasted arrows and every single one took a life. Unless their strength was above Chu Feng's, no one could escape from the slaughter of the Bow of Hundred Transformations.
With a blink, no one remained alive within the hundred black-clothed people. All of them died by Chu Feng's bow. If they were not punctured through the chest, they exploded. All of them died by one arrow and they died quite efficiently.
"This"
Looking at the bloody scene in front of her, Murong Xinyu tightly frowned. It was not the first time that she saw such a wretched scene, but when that bloody scene was created by a young man who was a few years younger than her, indescribable shock was in her heart.
Not only was it an issue of cultivation, it was also an issue of the mind. If he was an adult, it would be reasonable. But, it was simply too rare for a young man to slaughter so decisively without any mercy. If Chu Feng wasn't protecting her, she really would have suspected whether Chu Feng was a cold-blooded monster or not.
"Manager Zhang, what words do you want to say?"
Chu Feng saw that manager Zhang still hadn't died yet and seemed to have words that he wanted to say. So, he walked over. After all, without that old man, Chu Feng could not sneak into the White Tiger Villa so successfully.
"I don't care what goal you have, but I wish that you don't harm my Miss. Right now, if there are people in the White Tiger Villa that dares to assassinate the Miss so openly and boldly, that means change must have happened in the villa."
"I hope that you can protect her. As long as nothing harms her, my villa's master will certainly repay you." Manager Zhang begged with an extremely weak voice. It could be seen that he really worried about Murong Xinyu.
"Manager Zhang." At that instant, Murong Xinyu also ran over. When she saw he was dying, painful tears flowed down and it was clear that their relationship was quite good.
Chu Feng stood on the side and silently looked at the two people. When manager Zhang closed his eyes, he patted Murong Xinyu's shoulder and said, "He's gone. Manager Zhang is gone."
Murong Xinyu was also not a stubborn person so she stood up, wiped the tears on her face away, looked at Chu Feng, then said, "So, who are you?"
"It doesn't matter who I am. You only need to know that I am a person who can protect you right now." Chu Feng replied tranquilly.
"Protect me? You are a spy who sneaked into my White Tiger Villa with malicious intents. How would know if you protecting me is due to other goals?"
"I have malicious intents? You are a person who does not have any cultivation. What malicious intents would I have towards you? I just saw that you were pitiful so I helped you out. If I want to kill you, I don't even need to move a single finger."
"I do indeed have goals in the White Tiger Villa, but that is certainly not you. It is fine if you believe me or not. You have no other choice. If you don't follow me, you have no way of surviving and returning to the White Tiger Villa."
Chu Feng was too lazy to explain. He strided towards the nearby carriage, cut off the ropes, and directly went onto a treasured horse.
It was exactly how manager Zhang said it was. If the people from the White Tiger Villa dared to assassinate Murong Xinyu, most likely, some change must have happened. What Chu Feng hoped for the most were internal changes. With that, the White Tiger Villa would be in a chaotic state. It would be more convenient for Chu Feng to dive into deeper areas, use his Spirit power and investigate the secrets of the White Tiger Villa.
As for Murong Xinyu, Chu Feng really did only help her from a spur of kindness. That girl had no usefulness. Also, Chu Feng was not afraid of telling her his secret by saying that he was a spy who snuck into the White Tiger Villa. If certain changes really happened to the White Tiger Villa, Murong Xinyu would have no way of even returning to the White Tiger Villa so how would she tell his secret to others?
Thinking to that point, Chu Feng did not hesitate as he fiercely kicked the horse under him and prepared to return to the White Tiger Villa. At that time, a panicked voice also rang out behind.
"Don't leave me behind!"
Turning his head and looking back, he saw Murong Xinyu running towards Chu Feng and she had expressions of fear and anxiousness. It could be seen that she was truly scared that Chu Feng would abandon and not care about her.
"What, you're not afraid that I have ill-intents towards you now?" Chu Feng unpleasantly smiled and said.
"Regardless of what goal you have, it is a fact that you just saved me. As long as you protect me all the way back to the White Tiger Villa, I will certainly not treat you unfairly." Murong Xinyu said quietly. It was obvious that she gave in.
"Come up."
Chu Feng lightly smiled and pulled Murong Xinyu to the back of the horse. Although that girl was a burden, at crucial times she could also be a life-saving badge. He could bring her, or he could leave her. Chu Feng's choice was to protect her once again.


MGA Capitulo 149  Lifeline
Chu Feng brought Murong Xinyu back to the White Tiger Villa. On the road, they met quite a few more assassins. Some covered their faces, some just wore normal martial clothing that even Murong Xinyu recognized.
When they saw each other, they directly attacked and wanted to take Murong Xinyu's life. Luckily, there was Chu Feng as an escort and also because there weren't overwhelming experts, their journey back could be said to be quite smooth without obstructions. At least, no one could stop Chu Feng.
However, that made Murong Xinyu very uneasy and very anxious. She felt that something must have happened to the White Tiger Villa. On the other hand, Chu Feng was more and more hiddenly happy because he hoped that internal conflicts happened in the White Tiger Villa. Only with that could he take the chance and enter.
As Chu Feng and Murong Xinyu arrived at the White Tiger villa, he discovered that a large amount of White Tiger Villa experts were killing each other outside of the villa. Shouts and slaughtering filled the inside of the White Tiger Villa and there were unceasing rumbles.
"Heavens. Why is this happening?"
Mutiny. Someone started a mutiny. Looking at the people from the villa who were like family in the past, yet were currently killing each other, Murong Xinyu's face paled. Her beautiful eyes glittered and they revealed unspeakable emotion.
But it could be seen that she was very nervous and agitated. She did not know what to do. She wanted to stop it all, however, she was powerless. Everything that happened today was unimaginable and unpredictable.
"It seems that you are quite an ignorant girl." Looking at the current Murong Xinyu, Chu Feng smiled.
"What is your meaning?" Muring Xinyu coldly questioned.
Although she was unable to cultivate, she was naturally intelligent. So, many of the affairs in the villa were passed down by her father and dealt by her. Despite of that, right now, she was mocked by a young man who was so much younger than her. That made her extremely displeased.
"Clearly, such a large-scale internal movement was preplanned. Your White Tiger Villa was already formlessly split into two parts."
"As for you, being the big Miss of the White Tiger, being the daughter of the White Tiger Villa's master, you did not detect any of this before and you are even revealing an expression of nonplussedness. Are you saying that you were not ignorant?" Chu Feng sneered and said.
"You" Murong Xinyu originally wanted to refute, but, she could not find any foundation to refute on because Chu Feng was extremely correct. Although she was very smart, she did not suspect too much. She only saw the harmony on the surface of the White Tiger Villa, but she was not aware of the huge concealed dangers hidden behind the surface.
She hated herself. Her father usually closed himself in isolation so many of the things in the White Tiger Villa were done by her and her uncle. However, problems appeared within the villa yet she knew nothing about it. She had no face to meet her father.
"Let me ask you a question. Up until now, do you still not know who organized this mutiny?" Chu Feng asked.
"I" Murong Xinyu was at a loss.
"Sigh. It seems that getting used to a peaceful life really makes people slow." Chu Feng shook his head. He said to remind her, "Think about it. If this isn't the work of an outsider, who has such powerful rallying power within your family? So powerful that so many people are willing to serve him, and also not hesitating over the crime of betrayal for the sake of a mutiny?"
"ThisIt's him?" Murong Xinyu suddenly came to a realization yet she did not dare to believe it.
"Who?" Chu Feng closely questioned.
"I" Murong Xinyu found it difficult to say it.
"Don't tell me that you still want to keep secrets from me at this time? I am the only person who can help you." Chu Feng said.
Looking at Chu Feng who seemed to truly want to help herself, and after thinking about the journey back, in which she would have already been dead if Chu Feng was not there as an escort, Murong Xinyu slowly said,
"My uncle, Murong Yanguan, is the only person other than my father who has such strong rallying powers. But, within the time period that my father is closed in isolation, many of the things in the villa are dealt by me."
"However, I only deal with the internal trifles. The real, important things in the villa are dealt by my uncle. But thinking about it now, in the years that my father is closed in isolation, the real power of the White Tiger Villa was controlled by my uncle."
Thinking to that point, only then did Murong Xinyu know the seriousness of the consequences. Yet, she had no way of accepting that truth because she could not imagine why her uncle would do such things to the villa.
"This cannot be blamed on you. At the end, you don't have much experience. If you had to blame someone, you can only blame your father for over-trusting your uncle."
"Seeing how everything is today, your uncle must have had thought about this thoroughly for a long time. Since he is seizing power today, the first person he wants to kill will certainly be your father. Where is your father secluded at?"
Chu Feng seemed concerned, but in reality he was hiddenly inquiring information. Although many people did not know about the secret of the White Tiger Villa, Chu Feng felt that it was impossible for the master of the White Tiger Villa to not know any clues.
As for where he isolated himself at, the location would absolutely not be simple. Chu Feng wanted to sneak into it and Murong Xinyu was able to help Chu Feng. Although the girl was smart, she did not plan too much and because of that, she could be used very easily.
"Oh no! My uncle has the key to enter the Lifeline, if he" Hearing Chu Feng's words, Murong Xinyu's expression changed greatly, and without speaking anymore, she ran towards another side of the White Tiger Villa.
Seeing that, Chu Feng said nothing as well and closely followed. After a while, Murong Xinyu arrived and brought Chu Feng to a pile of rocks located outside of the White Tiger Villa.
It could be said to be a forest of rocks and it was too messy. It should have been created from a left-behind mountain. Chu Feng searched out with his Spirit power, but he could not feel anything different. Those rocks seemed to be normal mountain rocks and they were not arranged with any rules.
However, seeing Murong Xinyu spinning around while looking left and right, it was evident that she was looking for something and it would certainly not be as simple as it seemed to be on the surface.
Just at that time, after Murong Xinyu found a huge rock, she breathed a sigh of relief. When she took the jade rock necklace that was on her neck and pressed it into an indentation on the rock, the disarrayed rocks changed, and very quickly, a deep tunnel appeared.
After the tunnel opened, Murong Xinyu hurriedly ran into it. Chu Feng also closely followed, and just as he entered, the entrance automatically closed. However, at that instant, in front of Chu Feng's eyes, it was not pitch-black.
At that moment, it could certainly be said to be quite a dazzling sight. There were countless murals on the walls and they were extremely fine. Several glowing rocks hung above their heads and the cave was lit up as though it was day. The most important thing was the old smell that pounced towards him. It told Chu Feng that it had been built for a long time, at least for several hundred years.
"It seems that this Lifeline is the place that I want to find." A shallow smile was raised from the corner of Chu Feng's mouth. That area was too hidden. Even his Spirit power could not feel any trace of difference. If Murong Xinyu did not bring him here, Chu Feng could probably not find it even if he searched for his entire life.


MGA Capitulo 150  Returning to the Summit
Since Murong Xinyu didn't have any cultivation, her walking speed was simply too slow. In order for them to quickly reach deeper into the cave, Chu Feng could only carry the beautiful female on his back and run. But, it had to be said that she felt quite nice.
"Why is this place called as the Lifeline?" As Chu Feng used the Imperial Sky Technique and quickly ran with flying speed, he pretended to be curious and asked.
"I'm not too clear as well. However, it already existed when the White Tiger Villa was first created." Murong Xinyu replied.
"Oh?" Obviously, Chu Feng could hear that Murong Xinyu was saying things half-heartedly as the Lifeline must have some secrets that could not be said to others. Murong Xinyu was a bit cautious against him so she was unwilling to say the full truth.
But even so, Chu Feng still understood that if the Lifeline was created at the same time as the White Tiger Villa, it could be seen that there was an extremely huge secret.
Chu Feng's speed was extremely fast as he rushed forward. Even Ferghana horses could not match his speed. The center of the Lifeline was at the bottom of the White Tiger Villa, so after a short moment, Chu Feng arrived in the core area of the Lifeline.
At that instant, the tunnel was stretched extremely wide open and it was like an underground castle. Chu Feng and Murong Xinyu saw many corpses there and the blood was even radiating faint heat. Clearly, those people died fairly recently.
Also, the further they went forward, the more corpses there were, and the cultivation of the dead bodies became stronger and stronger. They rose from the Origin realm to the peak of the Origin realm. To know that that cultivation could be counted as being at the peak even in the Azure Dragon School.
Continuing on, there was even a Profound realm corpse. Although it was only at the 1st level of the Profound realm, it was still a Profound realm expert. Even Profound realm experts were killed.
"Waa, Profound realm! Quickly, help me absorb his Source energy!" Eggy was still there, but she just kept her silence. However, when she saw the remains of a Profound realm expert, she couldn't help but speak.
Eggy who already entered the Origin realm had no interest in the Source energy of Origin realm cultivators, however, she was still greatly attracted to Profound realm experts.
Chu Feng did not stay idle and he went next to the remains of the Profound realm expert and silently absorbed his Source energy for Eggy.
But compared to Chu Feng, Murong Xinyu could not stay calm. She cried with sorrow all over her face, "It's grandpa 6th Protector. I never would have thought even he got caught in this problem."
"What kind of person is he?" After absorbing the Source energy, Chu Feng asked.
"He is one of the six protectors of my White Tiger Villa and he is the most loyal subordinate of my father. He guarded in this Lifeline and protected my father's safety."
"I did not think that he would have been killed as well. It seems that they've really attacked the Lifeline. My father may be in danger right now." Murong Xinyu got more and more worried.
*rumble rumble* Just at that time, deep within the Lifeline, a thunder-like huge boom resounded out.
Although the distance was very far, that noise still clearly entered Chu Feng and Murong Xinyu's ears. Even the ground under their feet shook. It could be seen what level of attack was needed in order to create such might.
*rumble rumble* After that, the huge sounds constantly sounded out. Chu Feng could endure it, but Murong Xinyu was already shaken by the ground as she swayed left and right, unable to stand still.
But even so, she still said to Chu Feng, "Quickly bring me there! I cannot let them harm my father!"
"Are you an idiot? With this kind of sound and might, it is certainly the clash of Profound realm experts. If you go over there, you will only be cannon fodder." Chu Feng fiercely glared at Murong Xinyu and then paid no attention to her. He took out the World Spirit Compass and wanted to find some instructions.
"That's a World Spirit Compass. You really are a World Spiritist!" Looking at the World Spirit Compass in Chu Feng's hand that was radiating light and all sorts of symbols, Murong Xinyu was startled. Although she never seen a World Spiritist before, she had heard of the methods of World Spiritists.
So, the current her could confirm that Chu Feng was a World Spiritist. It was just that it was too impressive to be a World Spiritist at that age.
Chu Feng ignored her and focused on analyzing the situation in front of him with Eggy. Finally, he got some excellent results. The Lifeline could very possibly be the entrance to an Emperor Tomb, however, the direction of the entrance was the direction in which Profound realm experts were fighting at.
That put Chu Feng in a difficult situation because the White Tiger Villa people certainly knew the secrets of the Lifeline. Right now, they were exchanging blows at the entrance of the Emperor Tomb. So, they were most likely fighting over something. It could be treasures, or it could also be the right to enter the Emperor Tomb.
However, with Chu Feng's current strength, even if he knew that there were treasures ahead, he could not rashly continue forward because after being chased by Shangguan Tian, he deeply understood the distance between him and Profound realm experts.
"It's fine if you don't go. If you don't go, I'll go." Just at that time, Murong Xinyu coldly snorted and while stumbling and tripping, she ran deeper into the Lifeline.
"Are you looking to die?" Seeing that, Chu Feng dashed, arrived in front of Murong Xinyu and grabbed onto her.
"Let go of me." Murong Xinyu tried her best to struggle. When she thought that her own father was possibly facing dangers to his life at that moment, she had no way of staying calm.
"You, calm down. You have absolutely no cultivation so when you arrive there, how can you help him? Not only will you not be able to help your father, you will even distract him and cause him to be severely injured by others." Chu Feng loudly reminded.
"What can I do? Do I just stare as my father is being attacked and not do anything?" Murong Xinyu cried without sound. She felt extremely helpless as she cried and it could be seen that she was really worried about her father.
Just at that time, the deafening booms finally stopped. In response, Chu Feng carried Murong Xinyu on his back again and gravely warned,
"Without my permission, you are not allowed to yell for no reason. If your father gets disturbed, you are the criminal who killed him."
"Mm. I'll listen to you."
Murong Xinyu obediently nodded because at that moment, she was really helpless. On the other hand, that young man could calmly analyze the situation in front of his eyes and he became her backbone. That forced Murong Xinyu to listen to Chu Feng's words.
At that situation, Chu Feng hid his aura and slowed his footsteps. He gradually walked deeper into the Lifeline. He did not dare to use his Spirit power because he did not know if there were World Spiritists in front of him. If there were, he would be discovered and things would not go well.
However, luckily, after walking for several miles, there were no abnormalities. Rather, an extremely clear voice entered Chu Feng's ear from nearby.
"Murong Yanguan, what are you doing? Do you want to destroy 500 years of my Murong family's foundation?" That sound was extremely clear, yet extremely heavy. That person should have been heavily injured.
However, after hearing that voice, Murong Xinyu on Chu Feng's back couldn't help but twitch. Clearly, that person was her father, the master of the White Tiger Villa, Murong Yunluan.
When Murong Yunluan's words came out of his mouth, a smug voice also rang out as well, "My younger brother, you really have mistaken me. I am not destroying the foundation of my White Tiger Villa. I am letting my White Tiger Villa return to the pinnacle!"


MGA Capitulo 151  Mysterious Grey-Cloaked Person
Within the Lifeline, there were tunnels that went everywhere. However, the destination of all the tunnels gathered there. It was the core area of the Lifeline, and also where the Lifeline was located at.
At that place, corpses formed mountains. Blood formed rivers. The stench of blood spread to every single corner, but no matter how much more soul-shocking that scene was, it was not as terrifying as the object in the middle of the hall.
It was a oval rock. 10 meters long, 7 meters wide, 5 meters tall, and blood-red coloured. It had symbols all over it and it endlessly made puffing sounds. If one looked more closely, they could discover that it was throbbing.
How was that even a simple rock? It was just like a huge heart. A heart of a monster, as how could humans have such an enormous heart?
There were dozens of people surrounding that heart and they formed a circle. The positions they were standing on was in a certain pattern and it was like a defense formation.
Their strength was extremely strong as well. The weakest were at the peak of the Origin realm, and 6 of them already entered the Profound realm. That male who had a well-built body had the cultivation of the 6th level of the Profound realm.
However, at that moment, his face was ghastly-white. His left hand was covering his chest as blood slowly flowed out. His aura was extreme unstable. Although he had the cultivation of the 6th level of the Profound realm, it seemed like a portion of his power was sealed and he only had the cultivation of the 5th level of the Profound realm at that instant. That was the master of the White Tiger Villa, Murong Yunluan.
Surrounding Murong Yunluan were several hundred people who were confronting him. Although the personal strength of the group was not as strong as Murong Yunluan's group, their cultivation was not weak, and their total strength could be said to be fairly equal to Murong Yunluan's group.
Within the group of people, the male who was the leader had a pretty similar face as Murong Yunluan, but clearly older. That person was Murong Yunluan's elder brother, Murong Yanguan. He was the 2nd expert of the White Tiger Villa and had the cultivation of the 5th level of the Profound realm.
Other than Murong Yanguan, there was another powerful person who was at the 1st level of the Profound realm within the several hundred people. However, that person's figure was quite short and he wore a grey-coloured cloak.
That grey cloak was extremely bizarre. Not only did it conceal the appearance of that person, there were even many symbols printed on them. The patterns of the symbols were even more profound than Zhuge Liuyun's white cloak. It was quite unfathomable, but with a glance, they could feel that it was not simple.
"My younger brother, trust me. I am thinking for the White Tiger Villa." Murong Yanguan held a black-coloured longsword. There was blood dripping from the sword, and it was evident that the person who wounded Murong Yunluan was his own elder brother.
"Rubbish! This Lifeline is the foundation of the White Tiger Villa. If the Lifeline perishes, the villa will die. You want to destroy this Lifeline today. It means that you want to destroy the White Tiger Villa and become a traitor, yet you dare to say things so righteously?!"
"Cough cough~~~"
Murong Yunluan's voice was extremely furious, and from that, he spat a mouthful of blood out. He then violently coughed and it truly tore his heart and split his lungs. It could be seen that he was not injured lightly.
"Brother, don't be so stubborn. You should know that the current White Tiger Villa exists only in its name. It no longer has the flourishing might back in our ancestor's years. Right now, it cannot even be compared to the Azure Province's first-rate schools. It can only be compared to the trash-like second-rate schools. With the appearance of some random power, they could annihilate the White Tiger Villa."
"What use is there in leaving the White Tiger Villa like that? It would be better to open this Lifeline and enter that dead zone. As long as the dead zone can be entered, we can have everything that our ancestor had that year."
"At that time, us two brothers can grasp a martial skill that slaughters everything. We can have power that break the heavens and our White Tiger Villa can become the overlord of the Nine Provinces." Murong Yanguan said.
"You are speaking rubbish. The ancestor has clearly left words behind. The secret of the dead zone cannot reappear. Or else, the world will be chaos. This Lifeline cannot be touched. If it is broken one day, everything will instantly perish within the circumference of 10 thousand miles. All living matters will become charcoal, and the Nine Provinces will be destroyed in a single day."
Murong Yunluan pointed his fingers upwards. On the ancient cave walls, there were indeed words that stated that. The words themselves were engraved deeply and powerfully, and it was as though they were inscribed with a finger. However, every stroke was several meters long, and over 1 meter deep. The strength that was used was extremely terrifying.
"Look. This is the teachings of our ancestor, and this is also the reason why our ancestor guarded this place. If you dare to touch it, he will certainly reappear, and at that time, even I won't be able to save you." Murong Yunluan warned.
"Murong Yunluan, don't worry. Your ancestor, Murong Xiaoyao, is no longer in the world of living. Or else, he would have showed himself after so much happening in the White Tiger Villa."
"Also, I can open this Lifeline but not destroy it. I can protect your White Tiger Villa, and avoid any disasters happening to the Azure Province." Just at that time, a strange voice that seemed experienced was emitted from within the grey cloak.
"Who are you? It's you that is spreading lies to everyone, and tricking my brother to do such immoral acts?"
Murong Yunluan was furious. He raised his hand, palmed, and the nearby Profound power condensed. The entire Lifeline trembled and it was as if a huge mountain came down from the sky, wanting to crush everything.
That power was simply too strong. Almost all who were at the Origin realm were forced back. Even Profound realm experts had no way of resisting against it.
However, when facing that attack, the grey-cloaked person did not even move. It was as if that person had absolute confidence in being able to hold that strike back.
*boom* Suddenly, a body flashed by. Murong Yanguan was like a ghost as he appeared in front of the grey-cloaked person. He raised his fist into the air and also exploded some shocking power out. He canceled Murong Yunluan's palm attack.
Strong ripples surged in the air and huge booms resonated to every single place. The tension in the entire Lifeline rose to the extreme. If it wasn't for the two Profound realm experts who revolved their own pressure and canceled the ripples, all of the Origin realm experts would have been shook to death by the ripples.
That was the scariness of those at the Profound realm. In the Profound realm, after a level of breakthrough, one would gain overwhelming power. When the two experts who had the strength of the 5th level of the Profound realm fought, there was truly might that would shake the world.
"Brother, can you be so disrespectful to this mister? He is a guest of my White Tiger Villa and he is helping us!" Murong Yanguan bellowed.
"Nonsense. How can an outsider think for my White Tiger Villa? Clearly, he came here for the secrets of the dead zone. This person has malicious intents. How can you believe his words?"
Murong Yunluan quivered from anger because the person who made his brother an enemy, and the person who was the ringleader of the mutiny in the White Tiger Villa, was that grey-cloaked person.
The reason why his strength was sealed to the 5th level of the Profound realm from the 6th level of the Profound realm was because of the black sword in Murong Yanguan's hand. That black sword was also granted by that grey-cloaked person.


MGA Capitulo 152  Both Sides Defeated
"You are correct. I did come for the secrets of the dead zone, but I will not monopolize it. I will share it with you, and like I said, I will not cause any disasters to the Azure Province. But if you don't believe me, there is nothing I can do about that.."
"Murong Yanguan, no need to waste anymore words. Attack." The grey-cloaked person said indifferently.
"Brother, if you don't moveIf you don't move, you cannot blame me for being heartless." Murong Yanguan gnashed his teeth and his gaze glittered. It could be seen that he was unable to detach his feelings.
"You traitor. Don't pretend to be so kind. You even killed the 6th protector, yet you are still acting around like that."
"White Tiger's 5 protectors, the elites of the villa, follow me and kill all these traitors."
Murong Yunluan was enraged. He yelled and the Profound power in his body rose to the sky. At the same time, the 5 Profound realm protectors and dozens of people at the peak of the Origin realm emanated their power out from within their body.
The tyrannical power condensed into the air and formed into dozens of huge rhinoceroses. The rhinoceroses were condensed from Origin power and Profound power, yet it seemed as if they were real, being vivid and realistic.
The most important thing was that their body had a layer of light emitting from them. That light enveloped Murong Yunluan and the others and they gave off indestructible and unstoppable might.
*roar*
Suddenly, the group of rhinoceroses suddenly roared like a tiger as they walked on air and went. They started to madly run towards their surroundings and every step they took, everything around them would shake, as if they could stamp over everything and flatten all.
That was a type of formation, a formation that had both attack and defense. The might of that formation was equivalent to the full power of experts who were at the 6th level of the Profound realm, and the power was extremely terrifying.
"Brother, after this, you will know that I am really thinking about the White Tiger Villa. I am doing the correct thing." Murong Yanguan tightly frowned, then loudly yelled, "Set formation!"
After that was said, with him as the leader, the Origin power of several hundred people rushed out. The Origin power surged and they were like waves in a storm. They rushed forward in mid-air, wave after wave, and attacked the rhinoceroses. At the end, they even became a vicious, evil wolf.
There were too many wolves and they were simply countless as they fought with the rhinoceroses. Although the power of the wolves could not be matched to the rhinoceroses, the amount was simply too terrifying.
The two intertwined and both of them had no way of even going half a step forward. They collided where they stood and the ear-piercing booms resonated endlessly. Strong ripples devastated everything and the ground shook as though there was an earthquake. Tiny cracks even appeared on the specially created cave walls.
The collision force was too strong, and the confrontations were very scary as well. The more frightening thing was that, because of the formations, the Profound and Origin power from both sides were very sufficient and that confrontation lasted for a long time.
However, no matter how strong it was, there would be a time of exhaustion. When those two tyrannical formations collided for several hours, almost everyone in the Origin realm fell. Their Origin power was sucked dry and there wasn't even a single trace left. They were like people who were going to die as they laid on the floor, without even moving in the slightest.
Only Murong Yunluan and the 5 protectors sustained. As for Murong Yanguan, he was in worse position. Within the several hundred people, only him and the grey-cloaked person stood.
The grey-cloaked person was only silently observing everything and did not attack. Murong Yanguan was not weak as well. The black sword in his hand kept on giving out strange power and the power was being imbued into his body, layer by layer. It was that strange power that allowed him to fight 6 people as one without being disadvantaged.
"Traitor. Even if I consume my remaining life, I will kill you two." Suddenly, Murong Yunluan yelled and the Profound power in his body rushed out like the tide, exploded out like a volcano, and his power instantly multiplied.
As for the 5 protectors behind him, they seemed to have also been affected by his will and they surged all the Profound power within their body out and sent it towards the formation. They wanted to eliminate Murong Yanguan and the grey-cloaked person in one strike.
The full power of six Profound realm experts formed a huge rhinoceroses in the air. That might was completely incomparable to before. It even surpassed the might of dozens of rhinoceroses previously.
"My younger brother, don't blame me for being heartless."
Murong Yanguan abruptly clenched and the black-coloured longsword became black-coloured fog. That black-coloured fog were like little snakes as they drilled into his right arm. Strange and strong power condensed out.
"Sky-breaking Punch!"
Suddenly, Murong Yanguan punched out. There was no gas that condensed out, but that might was unstoppable as if it really could break through the sky with one punch.
*boom*
When that punch collided with the huge rhinoceros, instantly, it became a terrifying Profound power vortex because both side struck out with their full power without restraining themselves. So, when the Profound power vortex swept across, no one was able to hold it off.
When the Profound power vortex swept pass, it was like the end of the world. Those who were at the Origin realm spat a mouthful of blood out and many people became forcefully unconscious. That power was not something that they could endure.
After that, when the terrifying Profound power vortex disappeared, people discovered that everyone was still alive and well. Although they were a bit injured, not a single person died by that terrifying Profound power vortex.
Just at that time, people also astonishedly discovered that the grey-cloaked person was still standing there. Purple light condensed within that person's hand but it quickly dissipated.
"You saved us?" Murong Yunluan felt that it was unbelieveable. Clearly, that person had malicious intent. So, why save their lives when that person had came for the secret of the dead zone?
"Like I said, this person is a good person. He did not come to harm us, but to help us." Murong Tanguan explained.
"Nonsense. He is tricking you so that we both kill ourselves. Right now, my White Tiger Villa people has suffered from heavy injuries and death. All because of him. You said he is thinking for us?" Murong Yunluan angrily shouted. He was really going mad because of his idiotic elder brother.
The grey-cloaked person did not pay any attention to the disputes of the two brothers and he only walked towards the Lifeline, one step at a time. After arriving in front of it, he started to create a formation. As it revolved, the heart-like Lifeline shrunk. When it disappeared, a huge black hole emerged out.
That was not a simple black hole. It was condensed and created by gas and it was like a black-coloured vortex. It was slowly swirling, and it was as if it had an engulfing power. People would shiver with just a glance, and it was as though after entering, they would have no way of coming back out. It separated life and death.
However, not only was the grey-cloaked person not afraid of such a horrifying, strange black hole, he was even happy. Although his face could not be seen, one could feel his state of happiness from his body.
He walked towards the black hole. But, when he arrived in front of it, he stopped, lightly turned his head, looked at Murong Yanguan, then said, "Your younger brother is correct. The secret of this dead zone is quite exceptional. Why would I share it with you?"


MGA Capitulo 153  Crystal Coffin
"You tricked me, you"
*poof*
Murong Yanguan's fury attacked his heart and a mouthful of his heart's blood was sprayed out. After that, he powerlessly laid on the ground. Although his body was violently moving up and down, he did not have the power to get himself up. It could be seen that his anger wounded him quite a bit.
While looking at that situation, Murong Yunluan could only slowly close his eyes. Helplessness and sorrow was all over his face. Although this matter was done all by his elder brother, he still had an unavoidable responsibility.
If he had to blame something, he could only blame his overtrust towards his brother. He handed most of the decisions to Murong Yanguan for him to deal with as he secluded himself to cultivate throughout the day, without asking about worldly matters. If it was otherwise, even if Murong Yanguan was being used by someone, it would be impossible for them to have such huge losses.
However, no matter what, the strength of the White Tiger Villa was greatly diminished. The Lifeline was already broken and danger was truly close. He did not believe that the grey-cloaked person could protect the White Tiger Villa, nor did he believe that he would do so.
*rumble rumble*
But just at that time, rumbling sounds came from the strange black hole. That sound was very odd. It was as if it came from far away, but just by hearing that sound, it made people extremely uneasy. It was as though a scary object was going to be born.
"Hahahaha! You think you can get everything from my ancestor? You think you have the power? You think you are qualified?"
"Under this Lifeline is the dead zone. Within the dead zone, there is an extremely terrifying thing locked there. If you open the Lifeline, you will release it out. It will completely destroy the Azure Province and the continent will perish. You will not get anything. You will die just like us after being killed by it."
Murong Yunluan crazily laughed. He was in despair. He firmly believed in the words that his ancestor left behind, and he knew that all of them were going to die at that place. The entire Azure Province, or even the continent was going to face a calamity.
"Hmph."
The grey-cloaked person only coldly snorted and jumped into the strange black hole with a whoosh. The weirdest thing was, soon after the grey-cloaked person entered, the scary rumbling noises slowly settled down until it completely disappeared.
The more important thing was that the strange black hole also gradually shrunk and it seemed like it was going to close.
"The Lifeline is destroyed but the White Tiger Villa has not perished yet. Everyone, quickly enter the black hole! That is the dead zone, and we could very possibly get everything that Murong Xiaoyao had!"
Seeing that, someone suddenly yelled. After that voice rang out, everyone tried their best to climb towards the black hole, but they did not have any strength. They could really be said to be "unable to move an inch forward".
Although the black hole was extremely near, they had no way of getting closer. Many people unceasingly regretted. Some roared, some bawled, some did not even have the strength to do either.
*ta ta ta*
Just at that time, hurried footsteps constantly neared. Following that, a person ran like light and at the end, they stood in the middle of the Lifeline. It was Chu Feng and Murong Xinyu.
"Father." After seeing Murong Yunluan, Murong Xinyu quickly ran over and jumped into her father's embrace.
Chu Feng diligently looked at his surroundings. From the words that he heard just now, Chu Feng was aware that there was an even stronger character there. But clearly, at that moment, that person was gone.
"Chu Feng, quickly enter the black hole. Without a doubt, that is the entrance to the Emperor Tomb." When Chu Feng's gaze was cast towards the black hole, Eggy's pleasant voice rang out and it was unusually excited.
Almost at the same time in which Eggy spoke, Chu Feng ran towards the black hole. At that instant, the black hole was already extremely small. Chu Feng had no way of stepping into it, so he could only clap his hands together, and with a diving posture, he plunged into the black hole head first.
After a short moment, the black hole completely closed and disappeared from the Lifeline. It was as though it never appeared before, and it did not leave any traces behind.
At that instant, many people were extremely disappointed. They felt like they missed a chance to become an expert of their time. After all, the Murong Xiaoyao that year became such a powerful person after getting certain good things after he entered the dead zone.
But also, there were many people that calmed down. They thought when the Lifeline perished, some terrifying creature would be released. From that, the White Tiger Villa would be instantly destroyed and naturally, their lives would not be kept as well. However, such things did not seem to be happening.
"Father." Murong Xinyu settled comfortably next to Murong Yunluan as tears filled her face.
"Xinyu, who was that young man just now? Why have I never seen him before?" Murong Yunluan was still staring at the place where the black hole disappeared and there were some ineffable emotions in his heart.
"He's Chu Feng and he is a World Spiritist. However, he is not a bad person. On the journey, if it wasn't for him who protected me, I had no way of returning back here alive."
Speaking to that point, Murong Xinyu fiercely shot a glance at the nearby Murong Yanguan. He was the biggest criminal in the White Tiger Villa right now.
"World Spiritist huh?"
Murong Yunluan seemed to be contemplating. He firmly believed the words of his ancestor, Murong Xiaoyao. "If the Lifeline perishes, the villa dies." However, at that moment, the Lifeline was broken, yet the villa was completely fine.
He had doubts on whether the grey-cloaked person did something. But he had even more doubts on whether the grey-cloaked person, who was at the 1st level of the Profound realm, had that kind of strength or not.
At the same time, Chu Feng entered a dream-like realm. Everything surrounding him was pitch-black and strong attraction led him quickly forward.
After who knew how long, dazzling light was emitted in front of Chu Feng's eyes. Simultaneously, the surrounding darkness slowly faded away. When his feet stably stood on the ground, his surroundings completely changed.
It was like a palace because it was very luxurious, several times more when compared to the Lifeline above. It was simply the most luxurious place that Chu Feng had ever seen before.
It was like a huge formation because symbols were engraved everywhere. They were all interconnected with glittering lights, and it was as though it was a huge net that enveloped the area.
It was like a tomb, because in the center of all that, there was a round stage. In the middle of the round stage, there was a sparkling, crystal coffin.


MGA Capitulo 154  Heaven Realms Remains
The crystal tomb was transparent. Chu Feng walked onto the stage and he could clearly see that there was an old man who laid inside the tomb.
The old man had snow-like hair, paper-like face, and a dried up body which was as thin as a stick. However, despite of all that, he still gave an oppressing feeling because when that person was alive, he was a cultivator of the Heaven realm.
"A cultivator of the Heaven realm! Haha, this is great. Quickly help me absorb this person's Source energy. As long as it is absorbed, I can enter the Profound realm."
"When needed, I can transfer my power to you. With your methods right now, you can certainly kill that Gong Luyun off. Even the Shangguan family in the Vermilion Bird City may not be able to hold you off."
Eggy's nice voice sounded out and at that instant, she was so excited that she neverendingly jumped randomly in the Spiritual World. She was like a child when she was happy, because the Source energy of a Heaven realm expert was too attracting to her.
"Heaven realm. It's the remains of a Heaven realm expert. Is this the ancestor of the White Tiger Villa, the person who grasped the strongest attacking method, Murong Xiaoyao?"
Compared to Eggy who only wanted to absorb his Source energy, Chu Feng had deep respect while looking at the old man. It was because his appearance was too similar to the Murong Xiaoyao from the legends.
"Who cares about who is he? Quickly open the crystal coffin. Or else, when that World Spiritist returns, you and I will die." Eggy impatiently reminded.
"World Spiritist? The person who came before was a World Spiritist?" Chu Feng was quite shocked. He never would have thought Eggy, who didn't even see that person's appearance, could know what his identity was.
However, after some thinking, it was understandable. Most likely, only World Spiritists were able to decipher the so-called Lifeline to enter this area. Even if that Profound realm World Spiritist was not equal to Zhuge Liuyun, he was certainly still quite an impressive character.
Thinking to that point, Chu Feng did not hesitate anymore. After opening the crystal coffin lid, he first bowed to that powerful person who was at the Heaven realm before starting to absorb his Source energy.
It had to be said that the Source energy was abnormally strong. It was not comparable to those at the Profound realm, and as he absorbed it, Chu Feng was slightly strained. However, in order to completely absorb the Source energy before the World Spiritist returned, Chu Feng could only help Eggy absorb it as fast as he could.
"Haha, this is great! This taste is too wonderful and my cultivation will finally increase again!"
After roughly an hour of absorbing, Chu Feng finally thoroughly took in the Source energy from the remains. Eggy was madly happy because after all that, the one who gained the most from it was none other than her. She already entered the 1st level of the Profound realm.
*hmm* Just at that time, Chu Feng was startled as he found out that the complete remains before started to change. The body under the white clothes was quickly shrinking. Blood and flesh quickly disappeared and it became a pile of dried up bones.
"ThisWhy did this happen?"
Chu Feng was incomparably stunned. He clearly remembered that absorbing Source energy would not affect the remains, yet why did the perfect remains become eerie bones after he absorbed the Source energy?
"Idiot. What's so surprising about this? The reason why his remains could remain complete was because of the special effects of this crystal coffin. You opened the crystal coffin, so naturally, his remains would be affected." Eggy explained.
"I see. Is this the entrance to the Emperor Tomb then?"
"Where's that World Spiritist? Where did he go?" Chu Feng carefully assessed his surroundings and he discovered that there were similarities with the Lifeline. There were many tunnels leading everywhere but no one knew where the led to.
"Wait. This seems more like a sealing formation. A very strong sealing formation."
"If I'm not mistaken, this person should be Murong Xiaoyao. He must have got something from the Emperor Tomb, but for some unknown reasons, he did not want anyone to reopen the Emperor Tomb so he sealed it here."
"However, since we heard things after the Lifeline was deciphered, this sealing formation must have been affected. Looking at the surrounding symbols, they should have been created by that World Spiritist to stabilize this sealing formation."
"As for the so-called Lifeline, it should only be a lie by Murong Xiaoyao. When everything started, he already planned to bury himself here. So, when the White Tiger Villa was established, this place was already created as well."
"Perhaps, to prevent anyone from disturbing his peace after he died, or perhaps there really was something under this sealing formation, he did not want anyone to enter this place again. But no matter what the reason was, he was alive that year and he was not a consciousness."
"He intentionally pretended to disappear in that year, then when people came and intruded, he mercilessly killed them in order to deter others from the future." Eggy analyzed.
"But even so, how did he suddenly become an aged old man from a flourishing young man? If the legends were true, that means that he lived for 300 years. That already exceeded the limits of human life right?" Chu Feng was very confused.
"He must have experienced something in order for that change to happen. Emperor Tombs are not as simple as you think they are. Not only are there Evil Spirits within them, there are many other strong things that guard it."
"If he was able to turn into an aged old man from a flourishing young man, that means he was also able to live several hundred years. In reality, when your cultivation reaches a certain level, it is not impossible to live up to a thousand years."
"However, right now, what you need to do is not to think about why he turned into that, but whether there are any treasures left behind by Murong Xiaoyao."
"You need to do two things. The first thing you need to do is to eliminate that World Spiritist. Only then can you monopolize the treasure here and continue Murong Xiaoyao's legacy."
"Secondly, you need to find the exit to this place. If you don't even know how to get out, everything will be for naught."
Eggy seriously reminded.
Only then did Chu Feng notice that there were no exits. He entered the black hole and directly came to this place, but the black hole was closed behind him.


MGA Capitulo 155  Secret of the Dead Zone
*hmm*
Suddenly, grey-coloured light was emitted from a deep part within a certain tunnel. The grey-coloured light was extremely strange, and it was a type of Spirit Formation power.
"Dammit. This person is a Grey-cloak World Spiritist." After seeing that strange light, Eggy tensed up.
"Grey-cloak World Spiritist?" Chu Feng was quite puzzled, but from Eggy's nervous attitude, he could feel that the World Spiritist was not simple.
"Chu Feng, you cannot be careless this time. This World Spiritist is extremely strong. Even stronger than your Azure Dragon School's Elder Zhuge." Eggy said solemnly.
"What? Even stronger than Elder Zhuge?" Chu Feng was shocked.
"That's right. World Spiritists have rankings as well and they are ranked by the power of their Spirit Formation. They are White-cloak, Grey-cloak, Blue-cloak, Purple-cloak, and Gold-cloak."
"Obviously, your Azure Dragon School's Zhuge Liuyun is a White-cloak World Spiritist. Putting aside the World Spirit White-cloak that he is wearing, the Spirit Formation power that he grasps is within the scope of White-cloaks. If strictly required, you can also be counted as a White-cloak World Spiritist."
"The dazzling light just now was clearly the power of that person's Spirit Formation. If he was only laying down a Spirit Formation, there shouldn't be that kind of light. This means that he was using the power of Spirit Formation to try and open something."
"That person is quite impressive. He understands this place a lot better than you and his goal is very definite. So definite that he could put Murong Xiaoyao's Source energy aside and open whatever he is opening right now."
"If my guesses are correct, that thing must be even more attracting than Murong Xiaoyao's Source energy. So, I have an idea right now." Eggy said.
"What idea?" Chu Feng hurriedly asked.
"His skill in the Spirit Formation technique is above you and he can open the treasures that you cannot. Also, since he's a Grey-cloak World Spiritist, he undoubtedly made a contract with a World Spirit. His strength is absolutely not weak as well, so do not be negligent."
"Right now, hide in the coffin. Wait, and when he goes to the other tunnels, come out of the coffin and set up a trap that can suppress his power."
"After he opens the treasures, he will come and absorb Murong Xiaoyao's Source energy. At that time, you ambush him and take everything he has." Eggy reminded.
"Mm. To guard a tree stump while waiting for rabbits, and the fisherman reaps the rewards huh?" After hearing Eggy's words, Chu Feng totally agreed. It was not the first time that he did things like that, but the effect was very good.
httpshawnpowrie.comchineseshou-zhu-dai-tu
From then on, Chu Feng used Spirit Formation methods to create illusions outside of the crystal coffin. People who were looking from the outside saw the complete, undamaged corpse of Murong Xiaoyao, but in reality, it was fake. Even if Chu Feng entered the coffin, people would still see Murong Xiaoyao's corpse from the outside.
Just as Chu Feng finished setting up some things on the crystal coffin, the grey light from deep within the tunnel completely disappeared. Eggy reminded Chu Feng that the World Spiritist must have finished the opening of that section and he was currently returning. So, Chu Feng quickly hid inside the crystal coffin.
Chu Feng was more or less nervous while laying inside the crystal coffin. After all, Eggy already said that in terms of Spirit Formation techniques, that person was even stronger than Zhuge Liuyun and his real strength was unfathomable.
Although Eggy entered the Profound realm, and with her help, Chu Feng could even fight experts at the 6th level of the Profound realm, without the suppressing trap being laid out, Chu Feng was not confident.
*ta ta ta*
However, when light footsteps walked past then gradually distanced, Chu Feng's tense heart relaxed. The World Spiritist did not use his Spirit power, so that meant he was very confident in himself. Within the tomb, he was sure that he was alone.
After that, Chu Feng started to lay traps around the crystal coffin. The more he laid, the more he was able to feel the changes in the tomb. Although there was nothing strange on the surface, that feeling was as if something extremely strong was going to be revived.
"Damn. This is feeling is very uneasy. That guy isn't deciphering this sealing formation, opening the entrance to the Emperor Tomb and releasing the Evil Spirits out right?"
Chu Feng was not too calm. It was because he was sealed within the tomb. He did not know where the exit was, so if an Evil Spirit was released, he would not know where to run and he would certainly be dead.
"Don't worry. The core of this sealing formation is here. If he wants to open the sealing formation, he would not use symbols to stabilize the formation."
"If my estimations are correct, he is not going to free any organisms. He is most likely opening a sealed martial skill, which is the ‘secret of the dead zone' that he said earlier." Eggy explained.
"Really? That would be great." At that instant, Chu Feng was extremely excited. After all, the martial skill that Murong Xiaoyao grasped back in that year was quite amazing. If he could get it, it would be equivalent to getting a real trump card.
*rumble rumble*
A short while after the World Spiritist entered the last tunnel, the entire tomb started to rumble as if something strong was going to be born. However, it was completely different from the noise that he heard earlier in the Lifeline.
"He's almost done. My guesses were indeed correct. What he is opening is a sealed method, and even if it isn't the secret of the dead zone, it would not be any simple martial skill, or else there wouldn't be such big movements." Eggy excitedly said.
Chu Feng was also similarly excited and he quickened the trap laying speed.
"Waa~~~"
Just at that time, the roar of a tiger came from every single direction. That sound was extremely deafening and it could certainly shake the world. It was the roar of the true king of thousands of beasts. It could shake one's heart, and make people feel fear in their hearts and force them to yield.
"Heavens..This soundYou said that he wasn't releasing Evil Spirits?" Chu Feng had sweat all over his forehead because he could feel the might of that object just from the roar.
"Idiot. You're a World Spiritist but you can't even distinguish between Evil Spirits and souls? Would the aura of an Evil Spirit be so kind?"
"It's not an Evil Spirit. It is a huge opportunity because this isn't a simple martial skill. It's a Secret Skill. You know what that is?" Eggy seemed to be disappointed from his failure to meet expectations, but her voice was abnormally excited.
"Secret Skill? What's that?" Hearing Eggy's words, Chu Feng felt that it was not simple so he closely questioned.
"Secret Skills are methods above martial skills. They cannot be limited to the ranks because their power changes according to the person. However, they have the power to pressure outstanding people and to shake the world."
"Secret Skills are abilities that have life. They cannot be printed on paper and not everyone can grasp them, because people do not learn them. The skills themselves choose their own masters."
"After the death of their master, the Secret Skills would be separated from the body of their master and they would roam around the world to choose its new master."
"In short, Secret Skills are the strongest methods in the world. They can only be met by chance and not gained by begging. They are methods that countless cultivating experts chase after in their lives."
"No wonder. No wonder Murong Xiaoyao back in the day was so strong. I never expected what he got was the legendary Secret Skill."


MGA Capitulo 156  Grabbing With Everything He Can
"Secret Skill? So there are methods like that in the world."
If Eggy was said to be endlessly excited at that moment, Chu Feng would be so excited that he did not know what to do. It was exactly as how Eggy said it was. This time, he really found a huge opportunity.
"Eggy, are you sure that this is a Secret Skill?" Chu Feng asked, because from the bottom of his heart, he hoped that it was a Secret Skill.
"Are you doubting my abilities? Do you think that I've seen nothing, and I would even recognize a Secret Skill wrong? Remember this aura. This is unique to Secret Skills, and only they have this type of aura." Eggy explained.
"But this is such a strong aura! Would such a strong existence be willing to serve me?"
Chu Feng was a bit worried. That roar came from every direction, but it was clearly only caused by one object. The most important thing was the aura. It had unusual deterrence and no one could resist against that.
"You don't understand. This is the impressiveness of Secret Skills. Like I said, the Secret Skill will choose the person and no one can forcefully learn it."
"Only when the person's power exceed far above from the Secret Skill's could they forcefully catch it, engulf it, and refine it for their own use. But to forcefully engulf Secret Skills requires them to be at least in the Martial Lord realm."
"Also, that does not mean Martial Lords could forcibly engulf all Secret Skills. Since they are created by people, there are weak ones and strong ones."
"Perhaps Martial Lords could forcibly engulf the Secret Skills created by Martial Kings. However, even Martial Kings cannot do that for the Secret Skills created by Martial Emperors."
"If I'm not mistaken, the Secret Skill in this tomb was most likely created by a Martial Emperor." Eggy explained.
"What? Martial Emperor? Qingxuantian already entered the Emperor realm and became a Martial Emperor?" Chu Feng was endlessly shocked. His expression changed greatly, and a single word was clearly written on his face astonishment.
After many questionings from Chu Feng, Eggy finally told the realms of martial cultivation to Chu Feng. It turned out in the journey of cultivation, there was not only the 4 realms of Spirit, Origin, Profound, and Heaven. After those 4 realms, there were 4 stronger realms.
The Lord realm. They had the might of a lord coming down from the heavens. Those who were able to enter that realm must have sufficient cultivating talent, and they were also the people who were recognized as absolute geniuses.
The King realm. Being above the Lord realm, they were the real kings and they were entirely worthy of being titled as Martial Kings. Those who entered that realm were not cultivators who had simple aptitude. They must have had gigantic opportunities and endless fortunes in order to step into that realm.
The Emperor realm. A realm that completely surpassed the King realm. Those who were able to enter that realm were not ordinary. If they didn't have a Divine Body, they would have unique blood. In brief, they must have potential that normal people did not have, and grasped abilities that normal people could not grasp.
Also, they needed countless opportunities, or else even if one had higher potential, without the inheritance of a senior, they had no way of entering that realm. It could be said to be the peak realm in the road of martial cultivation. Those who were able to enter that realm and become the Martial Emperor were huge characters. Their name and their stories would be passed down for thousands of years.
As for the Ancestor realm, Eggy did not reveal much about it. She only left a sentence for Chu Feng. There was no end in the road of martial cultivation. All the current realms were opened up by countless people from previous generations, but it was certainly not the last realm in martial cultivation.
The Ancestor realm could be said to be a myth. The number of people who were able to enter that realm were extremely few. However, no one could be sure that the Ancestor realm was the end on the road of martial cultivation, because those who entered the Ancestor realm and became the Martial Ancestor were old monsters that were worshiped like Gods, yet they did not stop martial cultivating and they still continued.
All in all, in the known realms in martial cultivation, Martial Ancestors were truly like legends because even if they existed, normal people would not even have a chance to see them. They were just like Gods that existed within the heavens and the earth.
On the other hand, the realm of Martial Emperors became the real peak in the path of martial cultivation. Even many geniuses or even those who had a Divine Body struggled for their entire lives, but could not enter that realm.
According to legends, when Qingxuantian died, he was only 15 years old and that stunned Chu Feng quite a bit. He became a Martial Emperor at the age of 15. That was a bit too terrifying, but after some more detailed thinking, Chu Feng was suddenly enlightened and he seemed to understand the meaning of the Emperor Tomb.
"What are you being shocked for? The Secret Skill here was undoubtedly created by a Martial Emperor. With this aura, it cannot be a mistake."
"However, that does not mean that it was created by Qingxuantian. Also, legends are only legends. There are huge differences between legends and reality. So, even if this Secret Skill was created by Qingxuantian, that does not mean he entered the Emperor realm at the age of 15 and became a Martial Emperor."
"Perhaps him at that time was an old man who was at the end of his life, so he created the tomb and buried himself within it." Seeming to know Chu Feng's thoughts, Eggy spoke to reminded him.
"Mm." After hearing Eggy's analysis, Chu Feng nodded in agreement. After all, legends are only legends, and something would be different with that and reality.
But he still really admired and respected Qingxuantian. After all, the Emperor realm was not a realm that anyone could enter. Not to mention Martial Emperors, currently, in the continent of the 9 provinces, the Heaven realm was the peak. Martial Emperors were simply myths.
"Waa~~~"
Just at that time, the world shaking roar sounded out again. The entire tomb violently shook as if something that even the heavens and earth feared was going to be born.
"The seal will be opened soon and the Secret Skill will show itself. You cannot sit and do nothing. You absolutely cannot sit and do nothing."
"Chu Feng, quickly lead that World Spiritist here and kill him. If you let the Secret Skill choose him as its master, you will miss this enormous opportunity and regret it for your entire life." Eggy anxiously urged.
At the same time, Chu Feng could feel the aura within his body strengthening. Power that surpassed Origin power filled every corner of his body. The 1st level of the Profound realm. Obviously, Eggy lent her power to Chu Feng.
"Oi! You don't want your Source energy?" At that instant, Chu Feng's tension also rose to the extreme. He didn't know how to lead the World Spiritist over so he just randomly yelled that out.
*whoosh* Just as he finished speaking, a body speedily rushed out from that tunnel. It was the grey-cloaked person. Although his face could not be clearly seen, from his gaze, one could feel shock, fury, and also killing intent.
"A World Spirit Grey-cloak. He really is a Grey-cloak World Spiritist. Chu Feng, take his cloak down or else the power of this trap will not be used to its most effectiveness. His World Spirit Grey-cloak can cancel the power of this trap." Eggy gravely reminded.
*whoosh*
Almost at the same time in which Eggy reminded Chu Feng, the grey-cloaked person spoke nothing and directly attacked. He leaped towards Chu Feng, raised his palm and aimed it at Chu Feng. He was merciless and clearly, he wanted to kill Chu Feng.
However, just as that person stepped onto the stage, Chu Feng activated the trap. The symbols on the stage moved and light shot in all directions. The aura of the grey-cloaked person was instantly suppressed. As for his palm, Chu Feng easily dodged it.
At that instant, the grey-cloaked person panicked a bit. He never would have thought that Chu Feng was a World Spiritist as well. A Spirit Formation trap was even set up there and his cultivation was being suppressed.
Chu Feng took the chance and extended his hand. Following the words of Eggy, he grabbed the grey-cloaked person's World Spirit Grey-cloak. He was as quick as lightning, and before the grey-cloaked person even got a chance to react, Chu Feng's powerful, big hands grabbed onto his chest.
"This"
However, just as Chu Feng's palm touched that area, he felt that something was wrong. His face couldn't help but slightly redden because at that instant, not only did his right hand grab onto the World Spirit Grey-cloak, he even grabbed onto a ball of softness.
"Ah~~~~~~~"
An ear-piercing screech suddenly resounded out. It was no longer the aged and strange voice, but a voice of a female. Hearing the sweetness and the tenderness of the voice, that person should be a young female.


MGA Capitulo 157  Strong Girl
"You're a female?" Chu Feng widened his mouth and he was endlessly shocked. However, his right hand got tighter and tighter. He even squeezed it two times as if trying to confirm if that person was a girl or not.
At the end, Chu Feng's conclusion was Yes. Without a doubt, yes. That feeling. That elasticity. Other than a tiny bit, it was no worse than Su Rou!
"I will kill you." Being grabbed by Chu Feng like that, the grey-cloaked person was incomparably angry.
Although he could not see her face, he could still feel her fury. She revolved her Profound power and her boundless aura surged within body. She was planning to use a strong martial skill to kill Chu Feng with one strike.
*whoosh*
How could Chu Feng give that chance to her? Chu Feng's right palm slightly loosened, then suddenly tightened and he pulled up. The World Spirit Grey-cloak entered his hands and he threw it into his arms.
"Ah!"
When the World Spirit Grey-cloak was pulled off, the girl cried out because without the protection of the World Spirit Grey-cloak, she was bearing the power of the trap in its strongest degree.
"Damn. You're even such a beautiful girl." At the same time, Chu Feng's gaze went lifeless and he was enchanted by the scene in front of him.
Underneath the World Spirit Grey-cloak was not some despicable little old person. It was a girl who was so beautiful that she could not be anymore beautiful. With a sharp jaw and white face, she truly had an oval face.
Not only was her little face delicate, her facial features were pretty as well. Her shiny, big eyes could charm a person to death. She wasn't seductive like Su Rou, nor pure like Su Mei. She was both clear and alluring, as if there was a captivating flower in the middle of a limpid pond.
When the young female was paired with a purple-coloured skirt while revealing her white-snow, beautiful legs under the skirt, she was just like a small enticing woman. She was even the type that did not return your life if you died from her bewitchment.
Her complexion completely surpassed Su Rou and Su Mei. From all the beauties that Chu Feng had seen before, the only person that could be comparable to that girl was Eggy who lived in Chu Feng's Spiritual World.
However, that girl was completely different. Although they were both quite enticing females, if Eggy was a odd, naughty type, that girl was the cold but beautiful type who was detached from everyone else.
"You lewd demon. What are you looking at? Have you not seen beauties before? Now, quickly kill her."
"When that Secret Skill appears, who knows if it will choose you or her!" As Chu Feng stared blankly, Eggy howled in disappointment.
"What? Kill her?"
After hearing those words, Chu Feng's heart tightened. If he was told to kill an extremely heinous person, Chu Feng would not be merciful in any way. However, if he was told to kill a person that had no enmity with him, and who was even such a beautiful young female, he really could not do it.
"What a contemptible little person. You dare to scheme against me? Today, I will break your corpse into ten thousand pieces."
Just at that time, the girl explosively yelled. Her jet-black hair turned into purple and her enchanting eyes became purple as well.
Strands of purple-coloured gas continuously appeared from her body. They seemed like light, like water, yet like fire. They were extremely strange, and they encircled and swirled around the girl, while intertwining together.
At the same time, with the girl as the center, layers of invisible ripples kept on spreading out. One ripple followed the other, and every ripple was stronger than the former. As it suddenly exploded out like that, even Chu Feng had no way of holding it back and he was forcefully thrown off.
*whoosh*
He was caught off guard and Chu Feng fell off the tall stage. With a beautiful backflip, he stably landed on the ground. However, when he cast his gaze towards the stage again, he was unable to remain calm.
The trap that he painstakingly laid for several hours was collapsing from the young female's purple-coloured gas. Countless symbols started to crumble before becoming ashes and disappearing from the world.
"This girl is quite strong. She is clearly only at the 1st level of the Profound realm. How was she able to force me out from the trap?"
Chu Feng felt that it was unbelievable because the aura the girl was emanating was very strange. He never seen it before, but he subconsciously knew that it was not a simple martial skill.
"How is this possible, she has that type of body." Eggy couldn't help but cry out in surprise, and her tone was filled with inconceivability.
"That type of body is what type of body? Eggy, what body does she have?" Chu Feng was also aware that something was wrong because the girl in front of him was hugely pressuring him.
To know, after Eggy lent her power to him, Chu Feng reached the 1st level of the Profound realm. With his abilities, he could easily kill those at the 4th level of the Profound realm. If he used his special power, the golden lightning in his blood, and raised his cultivation to the 2nd level of the Profound realm, experts at the 5th level of the Profound realm would not be difficult for him. Only those at the 6th level of the Profound realm could contend against him.
However, what was going on with the girl in front of him? She had the same cultivation as Chu Feng, but she gave Chu Feng such a strong oppressing feeling. Did that girl also have special abilities that allowed her to have power that was comparable to those at the 6th level of the Profound realm?
"Idiot. Don't you see it? This girl did not use any special martial skills. She used her unique, special ability. That purple gas does not contain any Profound power and it is something that came from her own body. This girl doesn't have any random body, but a Divine Body!"
"What? Divine Body?!!" After hearing those words, Chu Feng was even more shocked and his face instantly turned deathly-white.
Divine Bodies were special bodies bestowed by heaven. They were real geniuses that had special abilities, and when they were born, they were already fated to become quite an existence.
The legendary person ten thousand years ago, the creator of the Emperor Tomb, Qingxuantian, had a Divine Body. The reason why Chu Feng had such strong battle prowess was possibly because he had a Divine Body.
However, suspicion were only suspicions and he did not have any solid proof. But in front of his eyes, in front of his face, his opponent, a young woman who was yelling that she would break him into 10 thousand pieces had a genuine Divine Body.
For the first time, when fighting a person of the same generation, it made Chu Feng feel that he was in danger as if a powerful enemy arrived. HE had to put his entire heart into it. He needed to carefully deal with it, and seriously treat it.
*boom*
A huge boom resonated out and countless symbols disappeared like smoke. The purple-coloured gas filled the entire stage. The girl completely destroyed Chu Feng's trap and she was walking down the stage, one step at a time.
Her purple-coloured hair madly danced in the air and her purple-coloured eyes revealed bloodlust. Her purple-coloured skirt moved without wind and her purple-coloured gas followed where she went.
"Such strong might. This is a real Divine Body!"
Chu Feng's complexion was pale-white. Although he did not retreat, he did not dare to easily go forward, not to mention initiating an attack. Droplets of sweat that were as big as beans rolled down his forehead. He really felt the danger and it was the first time that he was forced to a step like that.
"Waa~"
*rumble rumble*
Just at that time, deafening bellows reverberated everywhere and it was more than several times stronger than before. The ground trembled and there were even cracks that appeared. Sounds of rocks falling could be heard, and the most important part was that the powerful yet ancient oppression feeling pounced towards them.
The legendary Secret Skill appeared.


MGA Capitulo 158  White Tiger Slaughtering Technique
The roar of the tiger went in all directions and it shook the world. The tomb violently trembled as if it would crumble at any time.
Under that pressure, in front of that power, the deterrence that the purple-clothed young female showed before seemed so tiny. It was completely pressed down and it was not even worth mentioning.
"Where did you two little children come from and you dare to disturb my rest?"
That voice seemed like the simultaneous roar of ten thousand beasts, yet it also seemed like the bellow of a powerful person. It was as though it came from all directions, yet it was as though it came from deep within one's spirit. It was thick and powerful, and it was also filled with ancient aura. The age of the aura seemed weird, as if it was a spirit that slept for ten thousand years and just woke up. It gave people a type of pressure that did not belong to this world.
"I pay my respects. I had no meaning to intrude, but I just didn't wish for you to continue being sealed here and your might buried. So, I acted insolently in order for to release you." In response to that, the purple-clothed girl half-knelt on the ground with a poof, clasped her hands together and paid her respects to the air.
"Nonsense. I wished to rest until now. If I did not choose to come out and stretch for a bit, how could a little child like you wake me up?"
That voice turned a bit angry. In an instant, white-coloured gas surged over from every single direction. They started to condense in the air, and with a blink, it formed into a huge White Tiger.
That tiger was extremely big. It was over twenty meters long and one of its paws could crush Chu Feng into a meat patty. Although it was a White Tiger, it was not an actual body. White gas rolled all over its body. It was like fog that swirled in the air as it stared at Chu Feng and the girl.
It did not have any pupils and both of its eyes were two black holes. However, when they swept past Chu Feng, he couldn't help but quiver and felt an oppressing feeling from deep within his soul. Chu Feng had no doubt that if it attacked, he would instantly disappear without any suspense.
"You child, there's really nothing great about you. Not only did you secretly sneak in, you even hiddenly set up a surprise attack and tried to gain the benefits of the fisherman." After sweeping his gaze over to Chu Feng, it coldly said that. It turned out that despite coming out just now, it clearly understood everything that happened in the tomb.
At that instant, Chu Feng did not say anything. He tightly frowned but did not make a sound. It wasn't that he didn't want to speak, but he did not know what to talk about. He felt that in front of the old monster who might have lived for over ten thousand years, any bootlicking words would be useless. No one would be sharper than it, and the bridges that it crossed over were even more than the roads Chu Feng's walked on.
However, when the god-like White Tiger gave Chu Feng a negative opinion, the purple-clothed girl hiddenly rejoiced. Her mouth couldn't help but curve up into a light smug smile. She felt that there would be a lot more hope in getting the legacy of the White Tiger if it gave Chu Feng its disapproval.
"Child, you are not anything good either. The reason why you came to this place is for no other reason but to gain my power."
"You aimed to kill him before, so it can be seen that you are a person who does not care what methods you use to reach your goal. If you are like this at your age, what would happen when you grow up?" But just at that time, the White Tiger shot a glance at the purple-clothed girl then coldly reprimanded.
"Senior, I know I have wronged. I just wanted your legacy too much and your strong power too much. So, I was rash. If you had to blame something, you can only blame that you were too attractive and messed my heart up." The girl pursed her lips, and her face could only be called as "pitiful‘. She looked as grieved as she could.
"Hmph. Flowery words, but speeches of trickery." However, the unexpected thing was, despite knowing that the girl was so nakedly saying such bootlicking words, the White Tiger still revealed a hint of delight. That thing enjoyed people to bootlick him so much.
"Senior, your power is unrivaled and peerless. Your methods are absolute in the world. You really shouldn't be here resting, but instead, you should let us experience your glory. Or else, to us and everyone, it would be a type of regret."
Seeing that bootlicking worked, Chu Feng did not sit there and wait for death. He quickly went up, paid his respects, and licked without covering it up at all.
"Haha! You little boy, you quite know how to speak. However, all of them are truths. It really would be type of regret to everyone if I kept on resting here."
"My glory cannot be comparable by anyone. Those three old things cannot even match me." The White Tiger said proudly. It even used its claws which were full of sharp blades to stroke its dried up beard. It could be seen that it was extremely pleased with itself.
"Three old things? It is that" After hearing the White Tiger's talking to itself, Chu Feng muttered in his heart.
"You should not be wrong. Chu Feng, you are really too lucky. If I'm not mistaken, there should also be three Secret Skills sealed in the three other Emperor Tomb entrances."
"Heavens. There are a total of four Secret Skills. If you can learn them all, your future will simply be unmeasurable. Very little people in the same generation can be matched by you. You are truly lucky, and you have opportunities that normal people cannot get."
Compared to Chu Feng's suspicions, Eggy bounced and skipped randomly in excitement. It was already confirmed that there were four other places that had Secret Skills.
At that instant, Chu Feng was incomparably joyful. If a single Secret Skill could make countless experts insane, four Secret Skills would drive everyone in the world insane.
Chu Feng couldn't help but secretly glance at the purple-clothed girl. He discovered that she was using a gaze of disdain and hatred to glare at himself. She was seemingly cursing Chu Feng with her gaze, and saying that he was shameless.
Chu Feng was secretly pleased by the girl's reactions. He could tell that despite knowing there was a Secret Skill here, she clearly did not know the secret of the Emperor Tombs. She did not know that there were three more entrances in the Azure Province, and possibly also three more Secret Skills sealed within.
"I will do a self-introduction. I am the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique and I was created by a Martial Emperor. It is inconvenient to reveal my master's name, but with his power and might, with a slightly movement of his toes, he could cause this entire land to crumble and this sky to collapse. He is an extremely powerful person in this world." Just at that time, the god-like White Tiger did a self-introduction.
Chu Feng was prepared in his heart when faced with that situation. After all, he already knew from Eggy that the Secret Skill should have been created by a Martial Emperor from the aura. On the other hand, the purple-clothed girl had astonishment all over her face. Clearly, she did not expect that the origin of the Secret Skill was so impressive.


MGA Capitulo 159  Slightly Interesting
"My attacking methods are the hardest and strongest in the world. There is nothing that can block me. Not to mention your Spirit formations, even World Spiritists that led a World Spirit army of several hundred were all killed by me in one strike." The White Tiger narrated proudly.
"A World Spirit army of several hundred? Eggy, what level would that World Spiritist be?" Chu Feng asked in his heart. He really wanted to know how strong a World Spiritist like that would be.
"Fool. World Spirits create contracts with World Spiritists, so when the Spirit power of World Spiritists reaches a certain strength, as long as the World Spiritists are willing to, World Spirits are able to use their own intelligence to enter the Spiritual World and fight for the World Spiritist."
"The amount of World Spirits one has is a way to determine the strength of a World Spiritist. A World Spiritist that controls several hundred World Spirits is a person who stepped into the peak of the King realm. A peak-level Martial King." Eggy explained.
"That strong?" At that instant, Chu Feng was greatly shocked. One strike to kill a peak-level Martial King. That meant two things. Firstly, it meant that the master of the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique was extremely strong, and it could very possibly be the legendary character of the Nine Provinces, Qingxuantian.
Secondly, it also meant that the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique was quite something. After all, World Spiritists were experts in techniques of Spirit Formations, and those were titled as the strongest defense methods in the world. To be able to break it in one strike and to also kill the World Spiritist already said enough about its power.
No wonder Murong Xiaoyao that year was said to have a matchless attacking method in the world. It must have been the work of the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique and Secret Skills really did live up to its name.
"In short, my abilities are invincible in the world. It is exactly how you say it is. I have no problem resting here, but it would be a regret. So, I decided to come out and let people experience my glory once again."
The White Tiger circled around in the air and it blew its own trumpet as it spoke. However, even if it spoke too directly and exaggerated its confidence too much, Chu Feng and the purple-clothed girl did not doubt its words at all because it was certainly a Secret Skill that was like a legend.
"Although the character of you two children aren't anything good, the aptitudes you two have are still fine. Fight against each other. I will pass down my ability to the victor. As for what degree you can use my ability to, that will depend on yourselves."
"But don't worry. Even if you have horrible talent, I would not blame you. I would only blame myself for not doubting my eyes. Even Murong Xiaoyao that year was so mediocre, but I never said that he wouldnt do and blamed him for that. After all, he was the person that I chose." The White Tiger suddenly spoke, and more or less, there was remorse in its tone.
"What? Murong Xiaoyao was mediocre? Murong Xiaoyao that year was mediocre? You never said he wouldnt do? Are you complaining now?" Chu Feng was displeased in his heart. The so-called Secret Skill was such an arrogant, proud, self-centered, and twisted fellow.
However, that being said, it was qualified to say that or else Chu Feng and the purple-clothed girl would not be so respectful to it and fight over to get its appreciation.
But looking at the current situation, the skill of one's mouth was clearly useless. The White Tiger had already spoken and it wanted Chu Feng and the purple-clothed girl to fight. The victor would gain its power.
"What are you looking at? Why aren't you two starting? If you hesitate a bit more, be careful as I might change my thoughts." As it swept its glance over the two people, the White Tiger howled in dissatisfaction.
"Die."
Just as the White Tiger finished speaking, the purple-clothed girl attacked like lightning. The purple-coloured gas flames circulated and her black hair became purple once again. Within her purple pupils was killing intent. She truly wanted Chu Feng dead.
The purple-coloured gas flames pressed their way over. They were like purple-coloured evil, fierce, and wild beasts. Chu Feng did not just take all that. He strode, straightened his back, formed a golden bow in his left hand and a golden arrow in his right.
He pulled the bow until it formed a full moon and the arrows he shot out were like falling meteors. The arrows that filled the air became a golden-coloured storm as they explosively shot towards the purple-coloured gas. However, the unexpected thing was that the smoke-like, misty purple-coloured gas was not weak. Rather, it was like a copper and iron wall.
Despite the might of Chu Feng's Bow of Hundred Transformations being even stronger, after penetrating through the layers of purple-coloured gas, not only did it gradually slow down, at the end, it was stopped, and it shattered and disappeared.
The most important thing was that the attacking might of the purple-coloured gas was unable to be stopped by the Bow of Hundred Transformations. At that instant, the purple-coloured gas brought its enormous power and pounced towards Chu Feng.
It descended from the heavens and it seemed like a waterfall that had unstoppable might, and it also seemed like a current that had an attack that could break through anything. That level of might. That level of power. Only Chu Feng who was going to experience could understand it.
"Hmph."
But Chu Feng was not only for looks. He coldly snorted, and without hurry or panic, he abruptly used the Imperial Sky Technique just as the purple-coloured gas was going to slam down on him and easily dodged it.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
However, what Chu Feng did not think of was almost at the exact same time that he dodged it, the purple-coloured gas also split apart and formed into countless big, purple-coloured gas hands. They clawed at Chu Feng and their speed was many times quicker.
*boom boom boom* The gas hands had extremely strong might. After every boom, a deep pit of death would be left behind on the ground which was made out of special materials.
Dust and rubble flew everywhere. Chu Feng was like an agile monkey as he jumped away from the countless number of big purple-coloured hands. Although the big hands were helpless against his speed, Chu Feng sank into a passive state.
As Chu Feng dodged, he looked towards the purple-clothed girl. He discovered that she was standing where she was and she did not even move half a step. She was using a gaze of contempt to look at himself, as if Chu Feng was fish on a cutting board and was freely being sliced.
"Damn brat. If I don't show you my might, you will really think that I'm a sick cat."
[TN "If a tiger doesn't show its might, others would think that it was a sick cat."]
At that instant, Chu Feng suddenly stopped his escaping steps. With a thought, golden-coloured lightning appeared in his eyes. At the same time, the space around him also rippled. Tiny golden-coloured lightning surged out and they became a human-shaped shield. It formed in front of Chu Feng and his aura instantly entered the 2nd level of the Profound realm from the 1st level.
*boom boom boom boom boom*
Simultaneously, the big purple-coloured hands surrounded and attacked from all directions. They almost completely sealed Chu Feng's path of escape and they started to endlessly explode on Chu Feng's body. The purple-coloured gas blended with the rubble and even the tomb shook and trembled.
However, under that level of attack, the purple-clothed girl did not rejoice and instead, she was worried. Her pair of eyebrows couldn't help but slightly tighten and her shiny big eyes became more serious.
As for the White Tiger in the air, a smile that was unique to beasts streaked past its lips. It said faintly, "This is slightly interesting."


MGA Capitulo 160  The Outcome of the Battle is Already Determined
The purple-coloured gas slowly dissipated and Chu Feng slowly walked out from within.
At that very instant, golden-coloured lightning surged within his eyes. There was a layer of human-shaped protective shield surrounding his body and the strength of his aura was several times stronger than before. The purple-coloured gas was useless against him.
"This special aura... You also have a Divine Body?" Seeing Chu Feng like that, shock filled the eyes of the purple-clothed girl and she felt that it was quite inconceivable.
"Interesting. This is too interesting. I never would have thought that just as I came out, I would meet two people with Divine Bodies. It seems like I won't be disappointed this time."
"Fight. Quickly fight. Let me see which one of yous will gain my ability." In contrast to the astonishment of the purple-clothed girl, the White Tiger was madly happy.
"Little girl, since you're this fierce, you cannot blame me for not holding back on you." Chu Feng used the Bow of Hundred Transformations once again, and this time, its power was completely different from before.
There was a layer of lightning wrapped around the golden-coloured arrow. The power that it contained was several times stronger than before.
*swish*
Chu Feng shot an arrow out. A black line even ripped the air and purple-coloured gas that was like a copper and iron wall before was only currently like tofu. With howling noises, ripples spread and the golden-coloured arrow that had unstoppable might already arrived in front of the purple-clothed girl.
"Hmph."
However, what Chu Feng did not expect was that the purple-clothed girl did not avoid nor dodge the arrow Chu Feng sent over. Her pure white hand shot out like lightning and grabbed the golden-coloured arrow in her hand.
After that, she only lightly clenched and with a poof, the lightning that wrapped around the golden-coloured lightning arrow disappeared within. It was unable to do even a trace of damage.
"Nice method, but I would like to see what you will do to this."
Chu Feng took a step forward and started to wildly pull his bow. The golden-coloured arrows were still as strong as before, but they turned from one, to several. They were truly densely packed, and they "filled the sky and covered the sun" as they forced their way towards the girl.
"I even thought that it was quite something, but after all that, you only raised your cultivation by one level. Your strongest method is even a mere rank 5 martial skill."
The mouth of the girl slowly curled up into a mocking sneer. After that, her purple-coloured eyes unceasingly glittered. A formless aura spread out with her as the middle and it engulfed the entire tomb.
After that aura appeared, Chu Feng felt huge pressure. That pressure was even continuing to increase and it even made the bow in Chu Feng's hand heavier and it lost the sharp might from before.
"This power is so strong. What kind of method did she use?" Chu Feng was endlessly shocked. He astoundingly discovered that in front of that power, his golden-coloured arrows were frozen in mid-air. They were bound by the power and they were not able to be controlled by himself.
However, that was not the end. As the terrifying aura swept ripple by ripple over, gradually, a big purple-coloured bell appeared outside of the girl.
No, it wasn't a big bell. To be precise, it should be a small bell. A purple-coloured bell. There were special patterns all over it, as though it had life, and it was constantly changing. Only because it looked too big did it seem like a big bell as it protected the girl within it.
[TN Think of the "big bells" (大钟) as the enormous religious church bells, and the small bells (铃铛) as the ones you hold. Differentiate it in terms of the outer appearance (one seems more rough, one seems more smooth).]
*ding*
Suddenly, the purple-coloured bell slightly moved and the sound of bells rang out. Instantly, it replaced all sounds and everything became silent. The only thing that could be heard was the special sound from the bell.
At the same time that the bell rang out, the frozen golden-coloured arrows in the air all shattered. Even Chu Feng felt the strong force. A type of pressure that came from every single direction was penetrating his body and pressing down on his dantian.
"Dammit. This power is so strong." Chu Feng gnashed his teeth, revolved the Profound power in his entire body to hold that pressure back. Although he was able to hold the strong power back, at that moment, huge droplets of sweat already appeared on his forehead and he did not have the previous calmness from before.
"This girl can use the power of her Divine Body! This is the power that is unique to her. The power that the heavens gave her. She is already able to use the special ability for her Divine Body." At that instant, Eggy was also unable remain calm. Her tone was filled with panic.
"Haha! Interesting. This is too interesting. You've grasped the hidden power in your body at this age? Only talent like this is qualified to gain my inheritance." The White Tiger was even more excited.
"What, you only have that tiny bit of skill? Do you really have a Divine Body? Or did you use some special methods to imitate a Divine Body?" The girl stepped forward. The purple-coloured bell that surrounded her emitted a ring.
Every time that bell rang out, Chu Feng would feel the attack of the strong power. He had to use all his power to defend against it or he would have been killed by that power.
"Imitating a Divine Body huh?" After hearing the words of the girl, the White Tiger also had its doubts. Although Chu Feng's golden-coloured lightning was very special, it did not necessarily represent the special power that Divine Bodies had.
Because at that moment, Chu Feng's cultivation was at the 2nd level of the Profound realm yet the girl's cultivation was at the 1st level of the Profound realm. Chu Feng used a rank 5 martial skill but the girl only relied on her own power to completely suppress Chu Feng.
That was the might that Divine Bodies had. With their own power, they could suppress strong people in their own generation. With the power bestowed by heaven and a peerless body, they were fated to become a huge character named as an overlord of an area.
*ding*
The bell rang again and again, and the girl got closer and closer. Chu Feng used the Profound power in his entire body to fight against the strange power that was invading his body, but he was slowly not a match for the power. If the girl used any other attack on him, he would undoubtedly be defeated.
"Dammit. This Divine Lightning. Don't turtle up in my dantian. Come up. Lend your power to me!" Chu Feng yelled in his heart because he did not want to be defeated. He could not be defeated. He could not lose the Secret Skill, and he could not die there.
However, no matter how much he yelled, the Divine Lightning in his body had no reaction, as if they could not hear his words.
Chu Feng was extremely helpless when he was in that situation. It was the first time that he was so helpless, and he was forced to that state by a girl who was even younger than himself.
To know that the reason why he was able to hold off against the girl was all because he borrowed Eggy's power. If he relied on his own cultivation, he would have been killed by the girl already.
It was the first time that he realised he was still not invincible in the world. Within the people of the same generation, there were people who had even higher talent than him. There were people who were even stronger than him, and in front of such a person, he was so weak that he could not take a single blow.
"You really only have false bravado. Not to mention that you don't have a Divine Body, even if you do, the ability that you have are too weak. You are helpless in front of me."
The girl kept on sneering and her domineering tone was clearly revealed. She was arrogant to the extreme, but she did indeed have the qualification for that.
At that moment, the White Tiger who circled around in the air raised the corner of its mouth to form a smile of satisfaction. Although it was still silently watching everything, it did not have the excitement before because it felt that the outcome of the battle was already determined.


MGA Capitulo 161  Asura
Chu Feng was suppressed. He was completely and thoroughly suppressed by the purple-clothed girl. Although he was extremely bitter, he could not do anything about it.
"Chu Feng, give your body to me and let me defeat this conceited girl." But just at that time, Eggy's voice rang out again. Her tone seemed to be filled with some sort of determination.
"What?" Before Chu Feng was even able to react to that, he felt an extremely strong power surging from his Spirit world. It was attacking his awareness and it wanted to take over his body.
That power was extremely strong. It could even be said to be terrifying. It was as though it came from the darkness of the abyss and it gave people an icy cold feeling. However, Chu Feng did not panic because he felt a familiar aura from that power. It was Eggy.
After being together for such a long time, Chu Feng completely trusted Eggy. Although she was strange and odd, she would not harm him. So, Chu Feng did not resist against the attack on his awareness and gave the control to his body to Eggy.
*hmm* At that moment, Chu Feng only felt strong power that he had never felt before and it was surging in his body. Black-coloured gas was emitted from Chu Feng's body and coiling upwards around Chu Feng.
In a split instant, the black-coloured gas covered the entire tomb. The ground started to violently shake and the spiritual energy, Origin power, and Profound power hidden in the air all cried out, as if they were afraid.
The black-coloured gas rolled around in the air like a black cloud covering the sun. However, how could black clouds give out such feelings of oppression? It was simply like the release of an evil demon that had been sealed for a long time. It was as if it arrived at a place that it did not belong to. That feeling should not exist in this world.
"Is this the power of that person? Why is so sharply different from before?"
The eyes of the purple-clothed girl flickered and she seemed to be scared. She surprisingly discovered that the nature of Chu Feng's aura changed. If Chu Feng had a dazzling glow before, at that moment, he was darkness that covered the eyes. The most important thing was when Chu Feng exploded the black-coloured gas, her aura was completely pushed down.
"Why is there such a dark power within this boy's body?" At that instant, even the expression of the White Tiger changed greatly. The gaze that it looked Chu Feng with did not dare to have a single trace of disdain anymore.
"Do you think you are invincible in this world just by having a Divine Body? Today, I will let you experience the power that does not belong to your world. Today, I will let you know what Asura is."
The current Chu Feng was already being controlled by Eggy, so the one speaking was not Chu Feng, but Eggy. However, the purple-clothed girl and the White Tiger did not know that. After all, since the body that Eggy borrowed was Chu Feng's, the voice was also Chu Feng's.
"Asura? I never heard of that. I only know that Divine Bodies are the strongest type of bodies in this land. Divine Bodies should be invincible."
The purple-clothed girl was clearly unwilling to accept that. She was even angered by Eggy's words. The purple-coloured bell that enveloped her kept on emitting the strong rings. Wave after wave of ring swept towards Chu Feng. They were several times stronger than before and it could be seen that she was truly angry.
On the other hand, Eggy only stood where she was and did not care about that at all. The black-coloured gas twisted around her body and nothing could break through it. Even the strange but strong ring was blocked and it had no way of even harming a single strand of Chu Feng's hair.
"Hmph." Suddenly, Eggy coldly snorted and the black-coloured gas that was over her heard started to wiggle. After that, countless black-coloured sharp claws descended from above.
That was right. They were claws and not hands because they were sharp and frightening. With a glance, it would even make one's hair and bones terrified. Even if it was a hand, it would certainly not be a person's hand but a demon's.
Behind the sharp, black-coloured claws were long arms. They came down from the heavens, and they were like countless demons who clawed towards the purple-clothed girl with their terrifying sharp claws from another world.
"Hollow display of strength. Don't think that this can scare me."
The eyes of the purple-clothed girl glittered and she shot several palms upwards. When a palm shot out, it would rip through the air. When a palm shot out, the world would tremble a bit. That was no longer a simply rank 5 martial skill, but a rank 6 martial skill.
"Rank 6 martial skill? This girl can use a rank 6 martial skill and she even cultivated it to this degree!"
Chu Feng was quite shocked and even though his body was controlled by Eggy, he could still feel everything that happened in front of his eyes as though he was in control of his body. He could feel the mysteriousness and the tyrannic force of the martial skill the purple-clothed girl was displaying.
It did indeed surpass his Bow of Hundred Transformations and it was, without a doubt, a rank 6 martial skill. The most important thing was that the rank 6 martial skill was being perfectly executed by the girl and she clearly fully understood the meaning within the martial skill.
At that instant, Chu Feng deeply recognized the strength of the purple-clothed girl. He really could not be matched to her. The strength of him and the girl's could be said to be the difference between the heaven and the earth. It was no longer on the same level.
However, no matter how much stronger the purple-clothed girl's martial skill was, it had no way of shaking the black-coloured sharp claws in the air. The claws were like things that did not belong to this world. Nothing could break it, but it could break everything.
*boom* Just at that time, a black-coloured claw descended down and landed where the purple-clothed girl was located at. Instantly, rubble flew everywhere and a deep palm mark appeared. The purple-clothed girl was unable to dodge it and she was forcibly slammed down.
*boom boom boom boom boom* Subsequently, even more black-coloured claws slammed down and they endlessly landed on the body of the purple-clothed girl.
At that instant, the vast tomb rocked as if it would collapse in any moment. Even the formation symbols on the ground became dim without light. A deep hole was continuously spreading and it was being destroyed by Eggy's power.
"Enough! Stop!" Just at that time, the White Tiger abruptly and explosively yelled. It had no choice but to speak since the scene in front of it already exceeded his control. If that continued, the tomb would be completely destroyed and the formation that suppressed the entrance to the Emperor Tomb would not exist.
Only after it spoke did Eggy stop. The black clouds over her head started to dissipate and the black-coloured gas that was around Chu Feng's body also started to fade away. Chu Feng regained control of his own body.
Eggy's power was taken away and Chu Feng's aura went from the 2nd level of the Profound realm to the 1st level of the Origin realm. However, when he scanned his surroundings, he shockingly discovered that the indestructible tomb was completely different from before.
All of the fine layouts were no more and the only thing that was complete was the huge formation pattern that was still moving. However, the light of the formation was not as bright as before.
"Cough cough cough" A set of violent coughs came from the deep hole and the purple-clothed girl slowly climbed out. The purple-coloured bell still enveloped her but it was also a lot dimmer.
Also, fresh-red blood was slowly flowing out from the corner of her mouth. Obviously, she was wounded quite heavily. Of course, if she did not have the protection of the purple-coloured bell, she would have already been patted into a meat paste by Eggy.


MGA Capitulo 162  Inheritance
The purple-clothed girl stared at Chu Feng with an extremely complicated gaze. From that gaze, Chu Feng could see her bitterness. She was extremely bitter since she lost to Chu Feng like that.
However, the purple-clothed girl did not attack Chu Feng anymore, nor did she say any words of complaint. She only calmly said, "I lost."
*hmm*
Just at that time, the White Tiger who was circling around in the air raised its huge, powerful claw and lightly waved in the air. There was a layer of fluctuation in the air and a black hole appeared.
It was extremely similar to the entrance to the tomb. However, the entrance to the tomb was flat on the ground, whereas the current black hole was upright in midair.
"Go, and don't come back here." The White Tiger said to the purple-clothed girl.
After that, it meaningfully looked at Chu Feng and its gaze was filled with satisfaction. Although the power that Eggy displayed earlier was extremely dark and evil, and it could be said to make people very uneasy, that strong power was also what the White Tiger hoped its master would have.
"We will meet again. Next time, I will defeat you. Even if you have the help of the Secret Skill, I will not lose again." The purple-clothed girl swept a glance at Chu Feng and a hint of resolution flashed past her eyes. After that, her beautiful body leaped, entered the black hole, and she completely disappeared.
At that instant, Chu Feng couldn't help but deeply exhale. The purple-clothed girl was too strong. If it wasn't for Eggy, he would have certainly died. He never would have thought that there was such a monster in the Azure Province. So strong that she could fight against the peak of the Azure Province.
After the girl left, the White Tiger closed that black hole and it opened another one. It said to Chu Feng, "Both of you are hard to get geniuses. Besides, she is a girl so leave a path of life for her."
After hearing the White Tiger's words, Chu Feng bitterly smiled in his heart. Naturally, he could hear that the White Tiger was afraid that Chu Feng would kill the purple-clothed girl out of the hatred in his heart, because from what the White Tiger could see, Chu Feng's strength was indeed stronger than the girl's. However, in reality, it was not.
"I promise if we meet again, even if she has ill-intents towards me, I will know when to stop and I won't take her life."
Chu Feng solemnly vowed. He knew that the White Tiger was going to pass down its ability to him so he had to treat it with good words.
"No need. If, in the future, she still has today's matter in her heart and attacks you based on that, you don't need to leave any lingering troubles. After all, you are the person who will get my inheritance."
The White Tiger shook its head, seemingly representing that Chu Feng misunderstood its meaning. After that, it fiercely roared and its fog-like body separated within the world-shaking roar and it started to rush towards Chu Feng's brain.
"Ahh~~~"
At that instant, Chu Feng felt piercing pain from his brain because enormous amounts of information was surging into his mind. There was so much information that none of the martial skills that he had read before was comparable to it.
That most amazing thing was, when the information entered his brain, it was absorbed by his mind and it was digested, enabling him to use that skill. At the same time all that happened, the voice of the White Tiger was ringing in Chu Feng's mind.
"Boy, remember the words that I've said today. I am called the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique. I am the strongest attack within Secret Skills and ordinary martial skills cannot be compared to me."
"Today, I pass my ability down to you. However, that does not mean that my power will be freely controlled by you in the future."
"Although your power will affect my power, if I do not give enough of my approval to you, you will have no way of using my ability."
"So, you need to remember clearly that you must not use my ability for evil. You can kill those who offend you, but you cannot kill the innocent. You can remove the roots, but you cannot slaughter the innocent."
The White Tiger's voice lingered around Chu Feng's ears, and other than giving its warning to Chu Feng, it also told the characteristics of the Secret Skill to Chu Feng.
Of course, the power of the Secret Skill was quite something, however, Chu Feng could not use it whenever he wished. As for what degree he could use it to, not only did it rely on Chu Feng's own cultivation, it also relied on the level of approval by the Secret Skill itself.
Which also meant, even though the Secret Skill was in Chu Feng's body, and as long as Chu Feng did not die, the Secret Skill could forever be used by Chu Feng, the Secret Skill still had life. Although it could not speak anymore, its intelligence was still there and it could still control the amount of power it entrusted to Chu Feng.
The white-coloured fog that surrounded Chu Feng gradually became less and less. The White Tiger's words also dimmed down. However, when the fog dissipated and when the words were gone, the Secret Skill, the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique, already thoroughly melded with Chu Feng and they became one.
"The White Tiger Slaughtering Technique. Let me, Chu Feng, experience your power."
Chu Feng was extremely excited. He raised his hand, extended his finger, and a strand of white-coloured mist flowed out from his fingertip. The white-coloured mist seemed extremely fragile, but in reality, it contained extremely great power.
With a bang, it was like an arrow leaving a bow and it explosively shot out from Chu Feng's fingertip. Its speed was extremely quick and it almost surpassed Chu Feng's line of sight. Its might was like lightning, its speed was as fast as a shooting star, and with unstoppable power, it shot straight into the tomb's wall.
The tomb was created by special materials, and despite being battered up from everything that happened before, it did not collapse. The walls could be said to be complete, but Chu Feng's attack from his finger completely penetrated through the wall. The power was shocking.
"That's so strong! Eggy, did you see that? I got the Secret Skill, the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique! With this, in unexpected circumstances, even those at the 7th level of the Origin realm would be killed by me."
Chu Feng was madly happy. The power of the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique was truly too strong. Its might was almost unstoppable, and unless the opponent's speed was greater than his, almost no one would be able to block the attack of the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique.
"Eggy? Eggy!"
However, just at that time, Chu Feng's expression changed greatly. No matter how much he called out in the connection, he did not receive Eggy's reply. That made Chu Feng a bit nervous.
He quickly sat cross-legged and sent his awareness into the Spiritual World. When he entered the World Spirit Space, his slightly nervous face lost all colour.
He frightenedly discovered that Eggy's current complexion was deathly-white. Even her body seemed illusory and misty. It was like she became a consciousness as she laid in the middle of the World Spirit Space and her aura was extremely weak.
"Eggy, what happened to you?!"
Chu Feng completely panicked. He fell in front of Eggy and wanted to embrace her, but he discovered that his arms passed straight through Eggy's body, as if she was only an illusion.
Seemingly feeling Chu Feng's actions, Eggy who had both her eyes shut gradually opened them. Her slender and long eyebrows lightly trembled, her eyes squinted to form two sweet and beautiful crescent moons, the corner of her mouth rose to a charming curve, and she said with an extremely faint voice,
"Chu Feng, you idiot. I seems that I have to leave for a while, and it seems that I won't be able to cultivate with you"


MGA Capitulo 163  Returning to the Azure Dragon School
"Eggy, what happened to you? What do you mean? Where are you going?" Chu Feng was extremely uneasy and he already lost his mind. Subconsciously, he knew that something was greatly wrong.
"Bastard. You still dare call me Eggy? I told you to call me as Milady Queen." Eggy beautifully smile and it moved one's heartstrings. However, when Chu Feng saw that, at that moment, his heart felt sour and the emotions he was feeling were ineffable.
"Milady Queen, what happened to you? Tell me okay? Why did I do wrong? Are you going to leave me?" Chu Feng's heart was extremely tight and his eyes were even a bit moist.
Despite not knowing Eggy for too long, Eggy had grew along with Chu Feng. Both of them shared one body, and Eggy even accompanied Chu Feng as he experienced everything in his memories. That feeling was indescribable with words.
"Don't worry, I'm just tired. I'll be fine after I sleep for a while. You got the Secret Skill right?" Eggy asked with concern.
"Mm." Chu Feng firmly nodded.
"It's great if you got it so that forcefully taking over your body was not in vain." Eggy's smile got more and more sweet, but her body got more and more transparent. It could be seen that she was already prepared to face that situation.
"Did my body rebound and cause damage to you? Or did you exhaust your cultivation for me? What happened?" Chu Feng finally heard the inklings and he was endlessly regretting in his heart.
"No need to blame yourself. No matter what the reason was, it was voluntary. At the same time that you cultivate diligently, you need to protect yourself. Although I cannot watch as you and Gong Luyun fight, I know that you can win."
"Remember. I am here with you and you are not fighting alone." After speaking those words, Eggy's body became weaker and weaker. At the end, she even became lights with diverse colour.
Those lights had all sorts of colours and they were extremely beautiful. They encircled Chu Feng as they revolved around him, as if not willing to part with him, but they had to do the final farewell.
"Eggy, what can I do to save you? What can I do to save you?!"
Chu Feng kept on yelling but there was no response. Only when the light that surrounded him disappeared did he powerlessly sit on the ground limply as his gaze became lifeless.
His heart ached as Eggy left him like that. He was unable to feel Eggy's aura anymore, and pain that was unspeakable started to spread out from his heart. It was as though his soul was split in half as it went away with her.
"Eggy, I will save you." After a while, Chu Feng slowly came to his senses. The helplessness on his face faded away and replacing it was determination.
Although the current him could not feel Eggy's aura, the Spirit Connection Contract that he made with Eggy was still there. It meant that she was not dead yet, so there was certainly a way to reawaken her.
Even though he did not know what method that was, it did not mean that other World Spiritists did not know. So, Chu Feng needed to return to the Azure Dragon School and ask for Zhuge Liuyun's assistance. All in all, he had to save Eggy without caring about the price.
After deciding that, Chu Feng did not hesitate and he first looked around in the tomb. He wanted to find some treasures that were left behind by Murong Xiaoyao, but he discovered that other than the deciphered symbols and formation patterns left behind by the purple-clothed girl, there was truly nothing there.
As he could do nothing about it, Chu Feng could only look at the World Spirit Grey-cloak that he forcefully took from the purple-clothed girl. He found out that it was not simple at all. It was certainly a valuable thing, and perhaps in the future, he could sell it for a good price so that he could buy some Origin beads for him to cultivate.
He entered the black hole, and after the guidance of the attractive force in the darkness, Chu Feng arrived at a certain location in the White Tiger Mountain Range. He focused and looked, and he could still see the White Tiger Villa which was still in battle. However, at that moment, there were no yelling and killing sounds from before and it seemed like the battle was stabilized.
Chu Feng did not pay attention to that. He found the quick horse from before and started to return to the Azure Dragon School. The White Tiger Mountain Range was sealed and those who with weak cultivation had almost no way of leaving, but after some investigation, Chu Feng still found an exit. After some wandering around, he finally returned to the Azure Dragon School.
However, at the entrance to the Azure Dragon School, he discovered that they were a group of people surrounding there. As he looked more carefully, it turned out that several inner court disciples were beating two people up.
The people who were doing the beating were part of the well-known organization in the inner court of the Azure Dragon School and they were members of the Sword Alliance. The people who were being beaten on the other hand, were two familiar faces. They were the Chu family brothers, Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen.
"I tell all of you to get the hell out of the Azure Dragon School, but none of you listened. You don't want to leave? That's fine, don't leave. I'll beat you up until you leave."
As the Sword Alliance members started beating, they cursed as well. Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen said nothing as they hugged their heads with both of their hands. No matter how much more they were hit or humiliated, they did not beg at all.
"Ahh, the Sword Alliance is too unreasonable. For the entire day, they bullied the Chu family members but the elders didn't care. How will the Chu family continue to survive in the Azure Dragon School?"
"Who can this be blamed on? If it had to blamed on someone, it could only be blamed on that Chu Feng from the Chu family. Who told him to offend the 1 disciple of our Azure Dragon School, senior Gong Luyun, right?"
"That's right. Who doesn't know senior Gong? He's the future head of the Azure Dragon School. If you offend senior Gong, you offend the Azure Dragon School. This Chu Feng could cover the sky with all his nerves." The observing crowd pointed and blamed, and the Sword Alliance members got more violent as they hit.
"God damn. Kneel on the ground and beg or else I'll destroy your cultivation." Suddenly, a single Sword Alliance member pulled out a black iron sword from his back and pointed it at Chu Cheng.
"Ha! If you have the guts, go ahead. Wait until Chu Feng returns. He will not forgive any of you." Chu Cheng fiercely howled. Although there was fear on his face, he was not willing to give in.
"That's right. We've remembered everyone who bullied my Chu family people in these days.When Chu Feng comes back, none of you should even think of escaping." Chu Zhen also started to shout, as if telling everyone the grievances that they received in these days.
"Chu Feng? You really have high hopes for him. He already ran away with his tail between his legs because he offended senior Gong. You're waiting for him to save you two? Dreams of idiots." The Sword Alliance members all sneered.
"Ha! Just you wait. Sooner or later, there will be a day of crying for all of you." Chu Cheng opened his mouth and and spat a piece of phlegm onto the clothes of that Sword Alliance member.
"You've really gotten tired of living! I'll cripple you right now. Let's see what this Chu Feng will do about this." The Sword Alliance member was enraged. He raised his sword and stabbed straight towards Chu Cheng's dantian.
"Ahh~~~"
After that, when a painful cry rang out, all of the observers were greatly stunned.
At that very moment, Chu Cheng was not the one who cried out and on the floor. It was the Sword Alliance member. On his body, there was a big foot there and that big foot was twisting back and forth on his back. One could hear the sounds of bone snapping and it was currently making even more cracking sounds.
When people saw the owner of the big foot, everyone's expression changed and someone even yelled out uncontrollably, "Chu Feng!"


MGA Capitulo 164  A Heart Full of Rage
"Chu Feng? It's him? He dared to return?"
In the past few days, Chu Feng's infamous name already spread out the Azure Dragon School. Even nearby schools heard of his name.
After all, Gong Luyun's strength could be said to be top-level. Even many core disciples in first-rate schools did not dare to offend him. So, when people knew that someone challenged Gong Luyun, there was indeed a huge reaction.
Exactly because of that reason, many nosey people wanted to know what Chu Feng looked like. So, some other nosey people drew Chu Feng's appearance. They even set a price and sold them. Currently, in the Azure Dragon School, almost everyone knew who Chu Feng was and almost everyone knew what he looked like.
But at that instant, everyone was shocked because Chu Feng dared to reappear in the Azure Dragon School. However, the following actions that Chu Feng did completely stupefied them.
Chu Feng grabbed the air and the black iron sword flew straight into his hand. After that, he ferociously stabbed. Fresh blood splattered everywhere as he stabbed into the Sword Alliance member's dantian from his back.
"Ahh~~~"
That member first painfully cried, then like a leather ball that had no air, he laid on the ground and did not move anymore. At that instant, there were only three words in his heart. He was finished.
When the spiritual energy in his dantian started to quickly leak out, no matter how hard he tried to condense it yet was unable to control it, he knew that he was crippled by losing his cultivation. All the cultivation that he painstakingly stored up from the many years all became non-existent.
"You... You"
When they saw that scene, the ones who were the most shocked were none other than the Sword Alliance members. Their face were ashen and their gazes towards Chu Feng was filled with terror.
"Didn't all of you wanted to know how I would take care of you? Right now, I'll let you know how I, Chu Feng, will take care of you."
Chu Feng's expression turned icy cold and the black iron sword in his hand violently trembled as he continuously stabbed at the several members. The cold glare swept past and spiritual energy leaked. The results of many years of meticulous cultivating were all lost today.
"Heavens. Chu Feng crippled so many Sword Alliance members' cultivation. His nerves are too great!"
The surrounding crowd endlessly cried in surprise as they saw that scene. They felt that Chu Feng was too daring because the rules of the school clearly forbid the murdering of people from the same school and also the crippling of cultivation. Chu Feng was going to receive severe punishment because of his actions.
At that instant, even Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen panicked. Although they knew that with Chu Feng's temper, he would indeed take revenge on the people that bullied and humiliated them, but they never would have thought that he would go that far and directly cripple their cultivation.
"Chu Cheng, Chu Zhen. Right now, are the Chu family members still in the Azure Dragon School?" Chu Feng ignored the gazes of the crowd and he only looked at the Cheng Zhen brothers who were climbing up from the ground.
"To avoid unnecessary humiliation, Chu Xue and the others already returned to the Chu family. Originally, Chu Wei was going to leave with Chu Yue, however, Chu Yue was not willing to go no matter what. She said that she was going to stay there and wait for you to return to speak fairness for us."
"So right now, in the Azure Dragon School, other than us two brothers, Chu Yue and Chu Wei are also here."
"However, Chu Wei was heavily wounded in the morning. His hand and his foot was broken. We asked for help from the elders, but they did not care and they denied medical treatment."
"Since we could do nothing about it, we could only go down the mountain to buy some medicine. However, we never expected that they would block us at the entrance." Chu Cheng explained everything that happened in detail.
"What about Elder Su Rou and Elder Ouyang? Why didn't you ask them for help?" Chu Feng felt a bit shocked. Within the inner court, it would still make sense if the others elders didn't care about his Chu family. However, Su Rou should not have sat, stared, and did nothing.
"I've tried, but coincidentally, they had matters to attend to and they are not in the Azure Dragon School." Chu Cheng helplessly shook his head.
"Why would that happen?" Chu Feng slightly frowned and he felt that the issue was not as simple as it seemed. With how Su Rou did things, even if she had things to do and she had to leave the Azure Dragon School, she would still order her subordinates to look after his Chu family. Something was clearly wrong with the current situation.
"Bring me to Chu Wei!" Chu Feng spoke after a moment of deep thinking.
Chu Feng and the two brothers speedily went and very quickly, they arrived at Chu Wei's residence. The formerly perfect palace was already in pieces. Even the main door was smashed, and after entering, it was in an even worse situation.
Chairs and tables were destroyed and there was almost nothing that was undamaged. It simply looked like a broken temple, but it was clearly wrecked by people.
Chu Feng's fists couldn't help but slightly tighten. The fury in his heart started to stir up. He never would have thought that the Sword Alliance people would act so unduly. He also never would have thought that even after doing all that, the elders did not care, and they even though they saw it, they acted as if they didn't.
"All of our residences are like this. However, ours can be said to be quite nice when compared to your former palace. The palace that you lived in before was already burnt down and destroyed by someone." Chu Cheng said on the side.
"In these past few days, only the Sword Alliance members attacked all of you?" Chu Feng asked as he walked up the stairs. He needed to remember everyone who attacked his Chu family.
"Mm. Although everyone gave us a smug look, the people who actually attacked were only Sword Alliance members. The founder of the Sword Alliance, Wu Jiu, is an expert ranked as ninth on the Azure Dragon Leaderboard."
"He has some dealings with Gong Luyun. Although on the surface, it seems like Wu Jiu arranged the Sword Alliance attack on us in actuality, it was still Gong Luyun who played tricks on us." Chu Cheng said.
"How do you know all this?" Chu Feng had his doubts. With Chu Cheng's status, it was quite difficult to know all that information.
"Su Mei told us." Just at that time, Chu Yue's voice came from above.
He raised his head to look, and Chu Yue was standing there. She was still quite beautiful and sweet, but her face was a lot more skinny and there were some bruises on her forehead.
"Chu Yue, they even beat you up?" Chu Feng asked.
Chu Yue did not say anything. She only pulled Chu Feng up. That place was also in a mess. Even the windows were shattered and it did not even look like a place that people lived in.
In the corner of the room, there was an assembled, broken bed there. Chu Wei was laying on it and bandages covered his body. His eyes were closed and as he was fainted, he kept on groaning "ouch".
Chu Feng was depressed in his heart and he didn't say anything. He looked at Chu Yue who was in front of him, and also Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen. Chu Yue wasn't even that bad. On the other hand, Chu Cheng and Chu Zhen had no uninjured areas throughout their entire body. Other than the areas that were wounded just now, one could even see the traces of the former injuries.
Chu Feng could totally imagine what kind of life they experienced in the past few days, and the reason why they remained there and endured the pain was all for Chu Feng.
It was them who guarded the dignity of the Chu family for Chu Feng. At least, it let people know that as they faced such bullying and humiliation, the Chu family would not lower their heads. Even if the Chu family had no strength to resist, they still had some unyielding spirit.
"Chu Yue, bring Chu Wei back to the Chu family. Also, hold this. Let the Chu family move into the Golden-purple City. With Chen Hui's protection, I can be more at ease." Chu Feng gave his Golden-purple Commanding Badge to Chu Yue.
"Chu Feng, what about you? You're not leaving?" Chu Yue tightly stared at Chu Feng as if she was interrogating him.
Chu Feng did not avoid Chu Yue's gaze and he only faintly smiled before saying, "I will let everyone in the Azure Dragon School know that my Chu family are not so good pushovers."


MGA Capitulo 165  Inner Court Massacre
Chu Feng personally sent Chu Yue and the others off. Only when Chu Yue and the others' carriage disappeared from his sight did he turn around to re-enter the Azure Dragon School. Just as he passed the entrance of the Azure Dragon School, a group of elders surrounded him.
They were the people from the Punishment Department. The weakest had the cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm and the one who led had the cultivation of the 2nd level of the Origin realm. When he saw Chu Feng, without any warning, he shouted, "Take him down!"
At first, the elders from the Punishment Department did not even put Chu Feng in their eyes. Only two elders walked over. They did not even move their arms nor raise their hands. They only engulfed Chu Feng with their Origin power and they wanted to use the pressure of the Origin realm to forcefully press Chu Feng down.
Of course, when they pressed their Origin power towards Chu Feng, it was completely useless. Nothing happened to Chu Feng and he was not affected in the slightest.
*hu*
On the other hand and just at that moment, change happened to Chu Feng's body. A layer of Origin power surged out like a hurricane. Instantly, it submerged the elders from the Punishment Department.
"Ahh!"
The strong power was unstoppable. Before the elders from the Punishment Department even reacted to what happened, they were pushed into the air by Chu Feng's strong aura. As they landed, their complexion was pale-white and they were heavily injured.
The observing people were completely terrifying when they saw that scene. The elders in the Punishment Department were all at the Origin realm. Chu Feng used his own power to pressure so many elders, so did that mean he also stepped into the Origin realm?
"Go back and tell Liu Chengen this. If he wants to take care of me, tell him to personally come." Chu Feng paid no attention to the complicated gazes of the crowd. He only indifferently shot a glance at the elders from the Punishment Department before heading towards the direction of the Sword Alliance headquarters.
When he arrived there, Chu Feng directly attacked without any warning. Any Sword Alliance members that appeared within his sight had their dantian stabbed through and their cultivation destroyed.
From what Chu Feng could do right now, he could easily kill those at the 4th level of the Origin realm. If he used the golden-coloured lightning, killing those at the 5th level of the Origin realm was like squashing an ant. Even people at the 6th level of the Origin realm might not be able to beat Chu Feng, not to mention the Spirit realm inner court disciples.
Chu Feng did not cripple them by destroying their hands or feet, but he crippled them by destroying their cultivation and he did all of that with one strike. Although he only pierced their dantians, when several hundred inner court disciples were laying on the ground, that wretched scene was not something that could be taken in by any normal people.
"Chu Feng has returned and he is currently openly slaughtering an inner court alliance! Blood formed rivers in the inner court and even elders cannot control him. This person is too unrestrained and he is really making an enemy out of the Azure Dragon School!"
The news of Chu Feng's actions quickly spread throughout the inner court. They even entered the core zone, and instantly, people from all sorts of places came to the inner court and they wanted to observe that scene.
Naturally, the inner court Punishment Department would not ignore Chu Feng's actions. Liu Chengen personally went out and he led several hundred elders from the Punishment Department and surrounded Chu Feng. They even yelled out mottos for killing Chu Feng. After all, he already had some history with Chu Feng so he could use that chance to kill Chu Feng off. He was planning to avenge his grandson, Liu Mang.
The surrounding crowd thought that Chu Feng was undoubtedly dead. After all, within the inner court, Liu Chengen's name was very well-known. However, when Liu Chengen's troop arrived at the Sword Alliance headquarters, two more troops arrived at the same time as well.
It was the Elder Building that Su Rou was in charge of, and also the Martial Skill Building that Elder Ouyang was in charge of. Elder Ouyang led dozens of people, whereas Su Rou led a thousand or so people. In terms of might, it completely overpowered Liu Chengen.
"Su Rou, what is this? This child broke the school rules and recklessly destroyed the cultivation of the disciples from the same school. My Punishment Department is apprehending him for that crime. As an elder in the Azure Dragon School, you are actually protecting him? Are you even qualified to be an elder of the Azure Dragon School?" Liu Chengen loudly questioned, as if he wanted all the surrounding disciples to know that Su Rou was in the wrong.
"Chu Feng is a core disciple, so even if he did anything wrong, it would not be your turn to punish him because you are not qualified to do so." Su Rou unhurriedly nor quickly said. She only nonchalantly shot Liu Chengen a glance and she did not even put him in her eyes.
"Elder Liu, I know that you have some personal grudges with Chu Feng, but I hope that you handle things accordingly and not bring your personal emotions into this issue."
"Although the things that Chu Feng did today were slightly excessive, they were not without reason. When the Sword Alliance was beating the Chu alliance up, where was your Punishment Department?"Elder Ouyang also spoke. Although his smile was very gentle, his tone was filled with ridicule.
"You" Liu Chengen had no words to refute it. He could not deal with neither Su Rou nor Elder Ouyang. So, he was unable to forcefully attack Chu Feng.
However, he was not worried. After all, he was not the only person who wanted to deal with Chu Feng. When the people from the core zone arrive, even if he didn't attack himself, Chu Feng would not have an easy time.
"Chu Feng, you've really gotten things too big this time. How can you destroy the cultivation of so many disciples from the same school? This issue has already shook the entire Azure Dragon School. Even if my sister wants to protect you, she would be helpless."
Su Mei also arrived. She was standing next to Chu Feng as she looked at the Sword Alliance members who were currently being treated by the elders. Within her beautiful eyes was worry. Of course, she wasn't worried about the safety of the Sword Alliance members, but she was worried about Chu Feng's safety.
"Now you've thought of me? When the Sword Alliance was bullying my Chu family and I wasn't here, where were you and your sister?"
Chu Feng slightly grumbled as he shot Su Mei a glance. He was not worried or fearful because he could already use the Spirit Formation, so as long as Zhuge Liuyun knew about it, he would certainly take him in as his disciple.
Within the Azure Dragon School, with that person's protection, who dared to even touch him? Not to mention destroying the inner court disciples' cultivation, even if he killed them, he would only receive light punishment and no one would dare to take his life.
"Chu Feng, if you thought like that, then you've really blamed me and my sister wrongly." After hearing Chu Feng's words, Su Mei had grievances all over her face. She pouted her mouth and said, "Although it was Wu Jiu who bullied your Chu family, in reality, it was under the incitement of Gong Luyun."
"On the day that the Sword Alliance started to act, my sister was going to come out. However, at that time, Gong Luyun found my sister."
"He wanted to have a bet with my sister. He said, as long as she could defeat him, he would leave your life in the arranged battle in one year. However, if my sister lost, he didn't make things too difficult for her. He only requested that me and my sister to not interfere with the issue between the Sword Alliance and the Chu Alliance."
"If my sister didn't become an elder, she would have been the 1 disciple in the Azure Dragon School. In addition, my Vermilion Bird City was already on bad terms with his Black Tortoise City, so naturally, my sister was not afraid of Gong Luyun. She agreed to the fight and she wanted to give him a lesson."
"However, it was unexpected thatmy sister lost, and she lost very thoroughly."
"Although she was unwilling to, she had to keep her word. So, my sister had no choice but to not care about those things and she had no way of meddling with the issue between the Sword Alliance and the Chu Alliance." Su Mei's face was full of grievance as she spoke the truth in detail.


MGA Capitulo 166  Who is Wu Jiu?
"Gong Luyun defeated your sister?!"
Chu Feng was a bit surprised. He had seen Su Rou's methods before, and although she was only at the 1st level of the Profound realm, she was certainly top-class. After all, she was almost titled as the 1 disciple.
Currently, Gong Luyun was also at the 1st level of the Profound realm. If he was able to defeat Su Rou, that meant that in terms of methods, Gong Luyun was stronger than Su Rou.
"Not only did he defeat my sister. He even defeated Elder Ouyang." Su Mei cast her gaze towards the not-so-distant Elder Ouyang.
"Even Elder Ouyang was defeated?" Chu Feng's tightened eyebrows were even more tightened.
Many people did not know Elder Ouyang's abilities because he concealed them very deeply. However, from Su Mei, he knew that Elder Ouyang already entered the Profound realm a long time ago. Currently, he was rushing towards the 2nd level of the Profound realm. He was truly at the peak of the 1st level of the Profound realm.
Su Rou and Elder Ouyang had quite a close relationship, so she had sparred with Elder Ouyang before. Although they ended up in a tie, in reality, Elder Ouyang restrained himself for Su Rou.
If Gong Luyun was able to continuously defeat both Su Rou and Elder Ouyang, that made Chu Feng suddenly realise that Gong Luyun might not seem as simple as he looked.
"Chu Feng, since the elders from the core zone have not arrived yet, quickly run. Go to my Vermilion Bird City and without a doubt, you will be safe." Su Mei leaned on Chu Feng's body and quietly said that next to his ear.
"Is it your wish, or you sister's?" Chu Feng smiled and asked.
"It is my sister's, and it is also mine. Both of us hope that nothing bad will happen to you." Su Mei's gaze was full of pleading. She was really afraid that Chu Feng would be too stubborn and remained there to die.
"You two really treat me well."
Chu Feng chuckled, extended his hand and lovingly rubbed Su Mei's soft and bright hair before walking out of the group of people.
At that instant, the depression in Chu Feng's heart already disappeared like the clouds because he knew that Su Rou and Su Mei did not abandon his family, but they had their difficulties. At the end, it was still all for him.
"Chu Feng, where are you going?" Seeing that, Su Mei tugged Chu Feng because she found out that the direction he was going towards was off.
"Since this Wu Jiu treated my Chu Family like so, I can't let him go and not do anything right?" Chu Feng faintly smiled.
"What? Are you crazy? You want to go to the core zone and challenge Wu Jiu?" Su Mei was terrified by Chu Feng's words but she could not hold him back. With a blink, Chu Feng already jumped out of the crowd and crazily ran towards the core zone.
"Chu Feng wants to run, catch him!"
"Su Rou, you have intentions of protecting this child. I will report today's matters to the head of the school."
When he saw that, Liu Chengen panicked. If Chu Feng remained in the Azure Dragon School, it would be fine and it would be hard for him to escape death. However, if Chu Feng escaped, even if he wanted to kill Chu Feng, it would be too difficult.
At first, when Su Rou and Elder Ouyang saw that, they hiddenly rejoiced. Not only did they not follow, they even took the chance to bother. They ordered their subordinates to disturb Liu Chengen's subordinates to cover Chu Feng as he escaped.
However, when they discovered what direction Chu Feng was escaping towards, their faces which were full of happiness turned into a forehead with black lines. How was Chu Feng escaping? He was simply throwing himself into a net and going ahead to kill himself.
"This guy. Why doesn't he let people be free of worries?"
Su Ruo's face reddened from anger as she stood where she was and stamped her foot. After thinking for a bit, her alluring figure went forward and she chased after Chu Feng. Elder Ouyang was no exception as he closely followed as well. He wanted to see what Chu Feng was going to do.
Chu Feng was extremely fast, and very quickly, he rushed into the core zone from the inner court. After entering the core zone, he did not stop and he directly arrived in a plaza.
The plaza was circular and its construction was quite unique. In the very middle, there was a huge fighting stage. That fighting stage was red-coloured as if it was dyed by blood and it was extremely eye-grabbing.
There was even a big red-coloured bell in the center of the fighting stage. On the big bell, there was a huge sign hung there. On the sign, there were several big words, "Life and Death Stage for Grudges".
Like an agile monkey, Chu Feng leaped up and arrived in front of the big bell. He struck it a few times and the sound of the bell echoed in the air. It almost resonated throughout the core zone, and very quickly, it attracted the observation of the surrounding core disciple because they could hear that it was the bell for the Life and Death Stage for Grudges.
The Life and Death Stage, like its name, if there were any grudges, life and death would be decided there. Although there were the school rules for the Azure Dragon School, as long as there were two disciples that had grudges that could not resolved and had to resolve them with their lives, they could indeed come to that place. However, before that, they needed to sign the Life and Death Certificate.
Those who dared to strike the big bell on the Life and Death Stage meant that they were going to carry a life and death duel. That scene contained liveliness that people wanted to see the most. At that very moment, almost everyone from the core zone arrived. There were even quite a few elders.
"Look, isn't that Chu Feng? Didn't he start a massacre in the inner court? How does he dare to come here?"
"This boy is too audacious. First, he offended senior Gong. Then, he madly wounded inner court disciples. And now, he is on the Life and Death Stage. What is he going to do now?"
Chu Feng's infamous name already spread throughout the Azure Dragon School and even his drawings were posted everywhere. Anyone could recognize Chu Feng and they were bewildered by his actions. At that instant, everyone had the same thought in their hearts. That boy was looking to die.
When people formed mountains and oceans around the Life and Death Stage, Chu Feng stopped banging the big bell. He straightened his back and loudly yelled at the crowd who surrounded the stage, "Who is Wu Jiu? Come up and die!!"


MGA Capitulo 167  The Arrival of Wu Jiu
"What? He wants to challenge Wu Jiu on the Life and Death Stage?"
"In order to fight on the Life and Death Stage, he has to sign the Life and Death Certificate. Chu Feng really is looking to die."
"He doesn't want to live anymore right? Who is Wu Jiu? He's the founder of the Sword Alliance and the eldest son of the sword family that had been around for generations! He is 9th on the Azure Dragon Leaderboard and he has the cultivation of the 5th level of the Origin realm! Chu Feng dares to challenge him?"
When Chu Feng's words came out, they were like thunder in a clear day and everyone was shocked. So shocked that the floors were filled with jaws and some people even thought that Chu Feng was joking. However, when Chu Feng yelled "Wu Jiu, come up and die" for a few more times, people knew that Chu Feng was serious.
"1st level of the Origin realm? This boy entered the 1st level of the Origin realm already?"
Finally, some experts in the Origin realm who were at the scene felt Chu Feng's cultivation. Although the cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm was not very strong, when that cultivation was placed onto Chu Feng's body, people had no choice but to look at Chu Feng in another perspective and reevaluate that young man.
Not to mention what it meant to enter the 1st level of the Origin realm at that age, the most important thing was when Chu Feng just entered the core zone, he only had the cultivation of the 7th level of the Spirit realm. Before two months of time even passed, he passed two levels of cultivation and jumped over a huge gap to be at the 1st level of the Origin realm. That speed of improvement did not make any sense.
"This Chu Feng is not simple and it turns out that he is quite a genius. If he continued to develop like that, he would certainly become an outstanding person. However, regrettably, he was too arrogant and he set a life or death arranged battle. In one year, no matter how much stronger he gets, he cannot defeat senior Gong." Some people saw Chu Feng's potential and felt pity for him.
"Hmph. Where's the need for a whole year? Today, this child will lose. Wu Jiu and senior Gong have quite a good relationship and Wu Jiu already disliked Chu Feng. And right now, Chu Feng dares to go onto the Life and Death Stage to challenge Wu Jiu. How can Wu Jiu let him go?" However, some people also thought that Chu Feng could not escape today's calamity.
"Who challenges me?" Just at that time, another explosive shout sounded out and a body swept past the ground and at the end, stably landed on the fighting stage.
It was a person with a thin body, average height, unsightly appearance, shrimp-like nose, toad-like eyes, a whole row of coloured teeth, and when he spoke, his stench would spread for thirty meters. If he "ha'ed" at anyone's face, that person would kneel on the ground and keep on throwing up.
However, although his appearance was horrible, he was quite famous in the core zone. He was the founder of the Sword Alliance, 9th ranked in the Azure Dragon Leaderboard, Wu Jiu.
"You are Wu Jiu?" Chu Feng's eyes lit up. For the first time in his life, he discovered that there was such an unusual looking person in the world.
His nostril widened and his big mouth was drawn back. He hit his shriveled stomach and said smugly, "I am Wu Jiu. You are challenging me?"
"I'm not challenging you. I'm here to kill you" Chu Feng coldly smiled and said.
"Fine. I'll grant your wish. Elder, bring the Life and Death Certificate over. Today, I will finish this brat off here." Wu Jiu yelled his throat out and howled down.
If he spoke to an inner court elder like that, it was excusable. However, he was quite daring if he spoke to a core elder like that. Many core disciples inhaled a breath of cool air as they thought that even though Chu Feng was mad, Wu Jiu was even madder.
However, the thing that made people speechless was soon after Wu Jiu spoke, there was unexpectedly a core elder that walked out from the ground and he slowly went onto the fighting stage. He held an ink brush and ink in his left hand, and the Life and Death Certificate in his right as he arrived in front of Wu Jiu.
"Damn. What is Wu Jiu status? How can he call core elders just like that?" Some people were quite astonished. That elder's cultivation was not low and he was at the 7th level of the Origin realm, two levels higher than Wu Jiu. However, he listened to Wu Jiu's words just like that and it made people too shocked.
"You probably don't know about this right? A few days ago, Wu Jiu paid his respects to Elder Zhongli and became his disciple. He is already officially Elder Zhongli's disrect disciple."
"Elder Zhongli? The eccentric Zhongli Yihu?"
"That's right, him."
"Heavens. Wu Jiu became his disciple?"
Everyone was shocked once again. Zhongli Yihu was quite famous in the Azure Dragon School. In terms of personal strength, he would be ranked as third in the Azure Dragon School. Even if any of the Six Protectors fought him alone, they could not defeat him.
However, Zhongli Yihu was just like Zhuge Liuyun. He was also a guest elder so he was only in the Azure Dragon School as a title. He did not care about anything else, not to mention passing his skill down to any disciples. Currently, Wu Jiu being able to become his disciple attracted people's endless admiration.
"The Life and Death Stage for Grudges can indeed determine one's lives, however, there must be grudges. What grudges do the two of you have?" That elder spoke to question.
"He bullied my family. Is that a grudge?" Chu Feng replied.
"This brat destroyed the cultivation of several hundred of my subordinates. Is that not a grudge?" Wu Jiu coldly snorted.
"Sign your names and leave a blood mark." The elder said.
When everything was in place, that elder left the fighting stage. Only Wu Jiu and Chu Feng remained on the stage that seemed to be dyed by blood.
"Brat, I wanted to kill you for such a long time, but I never would have thought that you would deliver yourself right up to my doorstep. You even so openly challenged me. Today, if I don't grant your wish of dying, I would really feel sorry for your idiotic heart." Wu Jiu clenched with one hand and his Origin power surged. A fine longsword was condensed out.
That sword was extremely beautiful. It was simply as beautiful as it could get. However, it was not a real sword and it was only created by Wu Jiu's condensed Origin power. It was a rank 5 martial skill that was not inferior to the Bow of Hundred Transformations.
"Go ahead. Let's see how you will grant my wish." Chu Feng had an indifferent expression and he did not even put Wu Jiu in his eyes.
"I only need one blow against people like you." Wu Jiu coldly yelled and waved the longsword in his hand. He stabbed the air towards the direction of Chu feng.
*boom*
After he stabbed, rumbling came from all directions. Peerless tyrannical sword energy was condensing in the air. As it howled, it flew towards Chu Feng.


MGA Capitulo 168  The Fatal Strike
*swoosh*
The sword energy broke through the air and the surrounding Origin power was displaced. That was not a martial skill, but it was better than a martial skill. It was a strike that Wu Jiu formed with his will, but that might was no weaker than normal martial skills.
"Strong. Wu Jiu is indeed worthy of being the founder of the Sword Alliance. His attainment in sword techniques are really too powerful."
Wu Jiu's attack raised all sorts of cries of surprise in the crowd. Even many core elders couldn't help but nod as they gave high opinions.
But compared to Wu Jiu's quite impressive sword technique, even more people stared at Chu Feng without blinking. They wanted to see how Chu Feng was going to die.
*whoosh*
But obviously, Chu Feng was going to disappoint them. Just as the sword energy was nearing Chu Feng, with the wave of Chu Feng's big sleeve, a layer of Origin power surged out, and layer by layer, it dissolved the sword energy. At the end, it completely dissipated.
"Damn. That isn't true is it? Chu feng dissolved Wu Jiu's attack?"
Perhaps those at the Spirit realm could not understand that scene, however, those at the Origin realm saw everything clearly. Evidently, Chu Feng used his power at 1st level of the Origin realm to easily dissolve Wu Jiu's sword energy which was at the 5th level of the Origin realm.
"This child is quite impressive. He used his cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm to destroy an attack at the 5th level of the Origin realm. That really does not comply with common sense." An elder couldn't help but yell in surprise as Chu Feng's methods were quite terrifying.
"No need to be shocked by such a small thing. Things like defeating the strong as the weak had been done before. According to legends, during the young age of our Azure Dragon School's founder, he defeated those in the Profound realm when he was only in the Origin realm. Now that's the real ‘defeating the strong as the weak'." Another core elder disdainfully said.
"Nonsense. Of course our founder would be strong. After all, he was the 1 expert in the Nine Provinces. However, since Chu Feng can do all this to this degree, does that mean he is also a genius?"
"This... You are quite correct. With his talent, he can be said to be genius. However, I see that Wu Jiu has not used his full strength yet and any conclusions right now are too early." An extra hint of seriousness were in the elders' gazes as they looked at Chu Feng again.
"Your strike was quite weak. Do you have any other techniques?" Chu Feng chuckled and said after dissolving Wu Jiu's attack.
"Hmph. Since it has come to this, I'll let you experience how terrifying I am when I get serious."
Wu Jiu coldy snorted and he lifted the longsword in his hand, then suddenly sliced it upwards. A huge half-moon appeared and flew towards Chu Feng.
"Rank 5 martial skill, Half-Moon Chop!"
"No, it is not a simple Half-Moon Chop. It is a rank 5 martial skill that is displayed with the prerequisite of another rank 5 martial skill. It is a double-layered martial skill."
When the half-moon appeared, some people were greatly shocked and with a glance, they recognized it as an extremely strong martial skill in the Azure Dragon School. That martial skill had to be used by a sword, and if it was successful, the sword energy would be like a half-moon. Dazzling, beautiful, and oppressing.
Not only did Wu Jiu master the Half-Moon Chop, he even used it with the longsword that he condensed out from a rank 5 martial skill. That Half-Moon Chop had extremely frightening power and not an ordinary person could block that attack.
At that instant, everyone cast their gazes towards Chu Feng once again. The Half-Moon Chop was quite exceptional no matter if it was about the speed or the power. It would explode with a thought from the one who used it and there was no way of dodging it.
Chu Feng only brought a light smile on his face while being gazed by countless people. Without any hurry, and only until the Half-Moon Chop neared him, he slowly raised his right arm and directly punched out.
*boom*
Origin power rose everywhere when that punch was thrown out, strong might caused ripples on the stage like a spiral as it forcibly canceled the Half-Moon Chop.
*hmm* Just as the punch dissipated the Half-Moon Chop, Chu Feng clenched one of his hands and a golden-coloured longsword that was dazzling in all directions condensed within his palm.
"Your attack is too weak, so I will let you experience mine."
While holding the longsword in his hand, lightning rose from his feet and almost in an instant, he arrived in front of Wu Jiu. A golden light swept past and it stabbed towards Wu Jiu's heart.
"This guy."
At that moment, Wu Jiu lost all colour on his face from astonishment because currently, at such a distance, he finally felt Chu Feng's strength. The feeling of oppression did not belong to someone at the 1st level of the Origin realm. It was not even any weaker than him.
However, after all, Wu Jiu was the genius within a sword family. Putting aside the fact that he founded the Sword Alliance, just by being able to be accepted by Zhongli Yihu as a disciple already stated his outstandingness.
The longsword in his hand trembled and it undulated like a water snake. It pushed Chu Feng's golden-coloured longsword aside, then after flipping over his hand, he swept it towards Chu Feng's throat.
"Heh, now it's a bit more interesting."
Chu Feng chuckled and his battle desires were stirred up. Not only did he not retreat, using his Spirit power detection, his Imperial Sky Technique methods, and the golden-coloured longsword clenched in his hand, he fought with Wu Jiu.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
The afterimages of the swords flew everywhere and radiance shot in all directions. Every time they clashed, there would be an energy ripple that swept and devastated everything on the fighting stage. However, the two people continued were as if nothing happened to them. They displayed sword techniques that dazzled one's eyes. Attacking occasionally, defending occasionally, and the people who watched it had dried mouths and tongues from all the talking and their moods were boiling.
"Such brilliant sword techniques. No need to talk about Wu Jiu, but I never would have thought that even Chu Feng had such high skill in terms of sword techniques."
"That Chu Feng is really quite impressive. He can use the cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm to fight Wu Jiu, who is at the 5th level of the Origin realm to this degree." People stared as they were dumbfounded and many disciples admired Chu Feng's display.
How was he the trash that people said before? He was simply an unprecedented genius. He used the cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm to battle someone with the cultivation of the 5th level of the Origin realm. He skipped four levels of cultivation. People had to admire that talent.
"This guy is really able to force Wu Jiu to this point. Why did he suddenly become even stronger than before when I see him again? He is even so much stronger! How did he cultivate to have such quick improvements?"
But compared to other people, Su Mei's face was extremely complicated. She suddenly discovered that the distance between her and Chu Feng was huge. Without her knowing, she was already left behind and she could not even touch Chu Feng anymore.
"Hmph. All of you overestimate Chu Feng too much. Do you not see that Wu Jiu is fooling around with that Chu Feng? Don't you see that he hasn't used his full strength yet? When Wu Jiu gets serious, Chu Feng will undoubtedly die."
However, some people also thought that the reason why the two of them could fight to that point was because Wu Jiu did not use everything he had.
Most of those people were the ones who hated Chu Feng and wanted him to die. The more miserable his death was, the better. It was because in their hearts, they were not willing to admit that Chu Feng was a genius.
"That's enough. I've played enough with you and right now, I will let you experience my special skill, the Fatal Strike."
Suddenly, Wu Jiu loudly yelled, and just as the might of the sword rose, he completely disappeared. However, in the instant that he disappeared, strong sword energy condensed around Chu Feng and the entire fighting stage darkened.


MGA Capitulo 169  Madman
"Look! It's Wu Jiu's famous skill, the Fatal Strike!"
"Heavens, this will really be the fatal strike! It's finished. Everything is finished. With the Fatal Strike, Chu Feng will certainly die."
Looking at the dusky fighting stage that had killing intent lingering around it, everyone unceasingly cried in surprise and no one could remain calm because some people already recognized that it was Wu Jiu's strongest killing method.
That martial skill was not a martial skill from the Azure Dragon School, nor was it a martial skill from Wu Jiu's family. It was a martial skill that only Wu Jiu had. It was an extremely powerful martial skill.
There were many rumours about that skill. Some people said that Wu Jiu found it in some historical remains. There were also people who said that Wu Jiu received the inheritance of a certain expert. Some people even suspected the reason why Zhongli Yihu took Wu Jiu as his disciple was because he wanted to get Wu Jiu's Fatal Strike.
The Fatal Strike had extremely terrifying might. Although it was also a rank 5 martial skill, in reality, its might could even be compared to rank 6 martial skills. When used, it would only display a single level of might. During the dusking sky and the darkening ground, a cold glare would sweep past. That would be the time of death.
There was also another type of rumour. When exchanging blows with Wu Jiu, never let him use that skill because if he did, his opponent would undoubtedly fall under his sword. Even if their strength was above Wu Jiu, they would not be able to defend against it.
At that moment, since Wu Jiu used that skill, almost everyone on scene felt that Chu Feng was dead. Even Su Mei and Su Rou tightly frowned and tightly clenched their hands. They deeply broke out in a cold sweat for Chu Feng.
*puchi*
Finally, within the chaotic darkness, a cold shine streaked across with the curve of a half-moon. Fresh blood also sprayed out, and at that instant, the darkened stage returned to its former appearance.
"Heavens, this"
However, when people saw the scene on the stage, the expression of every single one of them changed greatly. They were dumbstruck and so shocked that they couldn't even shut their mouths close. Some people's tongue even started to tremble.
Because at that very moment, Chu Feng still stood on the stage. Not to say any bloody wounds, there was not even a single trace of injury on his body. There was not even any dust on his face. That was calmness. That was tranquility. That was repose. That was unhurriedness. That was called, truly being at ease.
Looking back at Wu Jiu, his knees were on the ground as he knelt there. Two blood streams were quickly flowing from his knees as they intertwined, becoming a beautiful blood painting.
"This"
At that instant, no one could remain calm because what they imagined was Chu Feng's being in all sorts of miserable scenes. However, they never would have expected that the ending was the scene in front of them. Wu Jiu, who was at the 5th level of the Origin realm Wu Jiu, who was ranked 9th in the Azure Dragon Leaderboard Wu Jiu, who used the Fatal Strike, was defeated by Chu Feng's sword and he was utterly defeated.
"You lost." Just at that time, the golden-coloured longsword in Chu Feng's hand landed on Wu Jiu's shoulder and next to his neck.
Seeing that, everyone's expression changed greatly once again. They could see the surging killing intent within Chu Feng's gaze. As they saw the cold smile that hung on the corner of Chu Feng's mouth, he was absolutely not joking. Chu Feng was really going to kill.
However, it could not be forgotten that Wu Jiu's family was a family of swords that had been around for generations. Wu Jiu's bro was Gong Luyun, and Wu Jiu's master was Zhongli Yihu. Chu Feng could not anger any one of those three. If Chu Feng dared to kill Wu Jiu, he was certainly looking to die.
After that, Chu Feng moved. His sword moved. Everyone knew that Wu Jiu was dead. No matter how Chu Feng was going to end, at that very instant, Wu Jiu was fated to be killed by Chu Feng.
"Stop!"
Just at that time, a fierce yell suddenly sounded out. It exploded out like thunder and shook everyone to the point that their ears were ringing. Some weaker people even forcefully lost consciousness.
As they looked over, they couldn't help but stare blankly. An old man was standing outside of the Life and Death Stage, and with fixed eyes, he stared at Chu Feng.
That old man wore a black-coloured robe and he had a black-coloured longsword behind his back. His eyes were very strange and they were as sharp as an eagle's. At that instant, they were even staring coldly at Chu Feng.
"Zhongli Yihu!" Those who had sharp eyes recognized who that person was. It was the well-known guest elder of the Azure Dragon School, Zhongli Yihu.
"Zhongli Yihu is here! Wu Jiu is saved."
Wu Jiu's friends breathed a sigh of relief because they felt that Chu Feng would not possibly kill Wu Jiu in front of that person.To know that Zhongli Yihu was a Profound realm expert. In the entire Azure Dragon School, he was ranked as one of the top characters.
Besides, Zhongli Yihu's character was quite eccentric and he was always quite proud. With his temper, if Chu Feng dared to kill Wu Jiu, he would certainly attack and kill Chu Feng.
"Yes?" Chu Feng stopped his twitching golden-coloured longsword and he indifferently shot a glance at Zhongli Yihu.
"Friend, Wu Jiu is my disciple. Can you give me some face and spare his life?" Zhongli Yihi calmly spoke, but there was not a single strand of intention to plead in his tone. Rather, it was as though he was ordering.
"Hmph." Chu Feng only coldly snorted at Zhongli Yihu's words. After that, he suddenly waved his arm and a golden shine swept past. The head of Wu Jiu fell on the ground.
"This" That scene terrified everyone. Not only did Chu Feng ignore Zhongli Yihu's request, he killed Wu Jiu in front of Zhongli Yihu's face.
He even chopped off Wu Jiu's head. That action was quite insane. So insane that people had difficulty accept that. However, after Chu Feng spoke the following words, only then did people know what a true madman was.
"You tell me to spare him so I spare him? Who do you think you are!" Chu Feng grabbed Wu Jiu's head and disdainfully said that to Zhongli Yihu.


MGA Capitulo 170  Ill Play With You
"You tell me to spare him so I spare him? Who do you think you are!"
Chu Feng's words were quite loud and clear. Not to mention the Life and Death Stage, even those outside of the Life and Death Stage could hear it clearly because he used Origin power when he spoke. That was right. He wanted to let everyone know that he, Chu Feng, did not give any face to that old guy.
"Damn. This Chu Feng is looking to die, he is looking to die!"
Chu Feng stupefied everyone. Even the observers that had no relationship with him broke into a cold sweat by him. At that instant, everyone subconsciously switched their cast towards Zhongli Yihu. If one did not look, they would not know. But if they did look, they would jump up into the air from being frightened.
Zhongli Yihu's face was ashen. His eyes were widened so greatly that they were bigger than a cow's eyes and they were even going to pop out. His cheek was going to burst and those who were near him could even hear the sound of his teeth gnashing.
Everyone knew that the important character was enraged by Chu Feng, and he was even quite enraged. Currently, he would certainly have the heart to kill Chu Feng. It was to the point that he would rip his corpse into ten thousand pieces.
*bang*
Suddenly, Zhongli Yihu leaped into the air, and like a huge mountain, he landed on the fighting stage. The strong force shook the entire stage and even Chu Feng swayed as he was on the stage and he almost fell.
"Someone! Come! I will sign the Life and Death Certificate with this boy." Zhongli Yihu pointed at Chu Feng and howled like a lion king. He was so loud that he could cause someone to go deaf.
"Indeed, Zhongli Yihu will attack. If he wants to kill Chu Feng, who can possibly block him?"
Although they expected that, when Zhongli Yihu really did started to make his move and prepared to attack, they still felt quite shocked.
*whoosh*
Just at that time, another figure leaped onto the fighting stage. It was a beautiful female. She was the 1 beauty as seen by the Azure Dragon School, Su Rou.
"Elder Zhongli, as an elder, there is no need to lower yourself to the young generation." Su Rou spoke.
"Leave! When I speak, who are you to interrupt!"
Zhongli Yihu waved his hand and a strong wind came along with it. The strong force was like a storm that wreaked havoc on the fighting stage. Almost instantly, it engulfed Su Rou and the strong power was going to tear Su Rou's white skirt into pieces.
"This old thing."
Seeing that, Chu Feng tightly clenched both of his fists and he was going to rush into that storm because in his heart, Su Rou was already his and he would not let her clothes be shredded in front of the crowd.
*whoosh*
But before Chu Feng even got the chance to go, an old man leaped into that storm. In the split moment that he entered it, the storm dissipated and Su Rou landed on the stage intactly once again.
"Elder Li." Chu Feng couldn't help but be surprised because the person who helped Su rou was Elder Li who also saved him from Gong Luyun's hands.
Elder Li was an aged old guy and there was barely any hair left on his head. He had a camel back and he looked like a diseased sapling that could be blown away by a gust of wind.
However, Elder Li's cultivation was unfathomably deep. Chu Feng's Spirit power had no way of probing the depth of his strength, but from him easily dissolving Zhongli Yihu's methods, he could feel that Elder Li's cultivation was no weaker than Zhongli Yihu.
After seeing Elder Li, Su Rou also calmed down and obediently stood next to Chu Feng. Although she did not understand Elder Li that much, she had heard from Su Mei that he had unpredictable strength and that he also had good impressions towards Chu Feng.
Especially when Elder Li just came out, she could feel that he was indeed very strong. He should not be any weaker than Zhongli Yihu. If Elder Li protected Chu Feng no matter what the cost was, today, there would really be no one who could touch Chu Feng.
"Cough cough cough"
After saving Su Rou, Elder Li first had a burst of coughing and it truly tore one's heart and split one's lung. He almost coughed out his liver, and after coughing for a good while, he slowly raised his head and advised Zhongli Yihu, "Elder Zhongli, as the older generation, there is no need to interfere with the interactions between the younger generation right?"
"Elder Li, you saw it as well. Not only did this Chu Feng kill my disciple, Wu Jiu, he even cut off his head. As his master, I wish to take revenge. What is wrong with that?"
"Today, I will finish everything with Chu Feng on this Life and Death Stage. If you say that I cannot do that, then I won't say anything. At most, I'll just resign from the position of being a guest elder in this Azure Dragon School and not be part of your Azure Dragon School. However, I must kill this Chu Feng." Zhongli Yihu fiercely said.
When his words came out, even Elder Li slightly frowned and the observers couldn't help but inhale a breath of cool air because everyone could tell that Zhongli Yihu had to kill Chu Feng. There was no one who could save Chu Feng anymore.
"Elder Li, speak bluntly. Can Chu Feng and I decide life and death on this Life and Death Stage?" Zhongli Yihu demanded again.
"This"
Elder Li was in a very difficult position. According to the rules, there were no status restrictions for the Life and Death Stage for Grudges. As long as there were grudges, and as long as both sides agreed, they could sign the Life and Death Certificate and determine life and death.
Without any choice, Elder Li looked at Su Rou and secretly made a signal to her, and Su Rou comprehensively moved next to Chu Feng's ear and said, "Chu Feng, Zhongli Yihu wants to challenge you, so do not accept it or else no one can save you."
"Don't worry, I'm not stupid!" Chu Feng smiled. Naturally, he would not send himself to die because of some words.
"Chu Feng, even if you don't agree to this battle, I will kill you. No one can save you." Seeming to be aware the intentions of Chu Feng and the others, Zhongli Yihu pointed at Chu Feng and bellowed.
At the same time, he cast his own pressure out. It was like an invisible hurricane and it spread everywhere. The strong pressure filled the entire Life and Death Stage. The 4th level of the Profound realm. Zhongli Yihu was a powerful person at the 4th level of the Profound realm.
Luckily, Elder Li stood in front of Su Rou and Chu Feng. No matter how much more stronger the Profound power hurricane was, it could not move Chu Feng or Su Rou. For the first time, Chu Feng and Su Rou deeply felt the strong power that Elder Li had in his fragile body
However, Elder Li only protected Chu Feng and he did not attack. Both Chu Feng and Su Rou could understand why.
After all, Zhongli Yihu was a guest elder for the Azure Dragon School. The so-called guest elder was an important character that the Azure Dragon School invited to stay. Those people could not be offended. Not even Elder Li.
Although Elder Li's cultivation was unfathomably deep, everyone could tell that his position was extremely petty. He was on a completely different level when compared with Zhongli Yihu.
"Elder Li, move, or else don't blame me if I kill you as well." Zhongli Yihu was really furious. He stepped forward and his Profound power hurricane became even stronger.
Although Elder Li did not move, he tightly frowned. It could be seen that he was really in a difficult situation. When he saw Elder Li in such a difficult situation, Chu Feng was a bit moved. He was considering if he should continue to hide behind the old man's back.
When faincg that situation, the people who wanted Chu Feng to die rejoiced from his misfortune. They already experienced Zhongli Yihu's bloodlust and they felt that no one in the Azure Dragon School could save Chu Feng, and that he was certainly dead.
"Quite some tone you have there. Old man Zhongli, since you're so arrogant, why not let me play with you?"
But just as everyone felt that Chu Feng was going to die, another voice exploded in the air. At the same time, pressure that was even stronger than Zhongli Yihu's instantly enveloped that area. It completely suppressed Zhongli Yihu's pressure.


MGA Capitulo 171  The Domineering Master
Just as that voice sounded out and the pressure enveloped everything, a figure stood in front of Chu feng like a ghost and put Chu Feng and Su Rou behind him.
That person had a white-cloak over his shoulders and it also covered his face. It was none other than the World Spiritist that the Azure Dragon School invited with an extremely high price, and also titled as the 2 expert in the Azure Dragon School, Zhuge Liuyun.
"This.. It's Elder Zhuge! What is happening? Why is Elder Zhuge defending Chu Feng? Is there some relationship between the two?"
If it was said that Elder Li's appearance was still somewhat expected, Zhuge Liuyun's was definitely unexpected. His appearance could be said to shock everyone.
To know that within the Azure Dragon School, the person who everyone feared the most was not the head of the Azure Dragon School, nor was it the Six Protectors, nor was it Zhongli Yihu. At that very moment, it was the elder who stood in front of Chu Feng, Zhuge Liuyun.
But compared to the bewilderment of others, Su Rou rejoiced. She had personally seen Zhuge Liuyun accept Chu Feng as his disciple, so she deeply knew that for the sake of Chu Feng, that old man killed Leng Wuzui who followed him for many years. At that instant, since he appeared, no one could touch Chu Feng anymore.
As her emotions were stirring up, Su Rou secretly cast her gaze towards Chu Feng. She found out that Chu Feng was calm and indifferent. Although there was also happiness hung on his face, there was not too many expressions of being surprised, as if everything was within expectations.
As she saw that, Su Rou pursed her lips and hidden said in her heart, "This guy. No wonder he dared to do such audacious things. He already knew that Zhuge Liuyun would help him!"
"Zhuge Liuyun, I just want to solve some personal grudges. Why do you need to make things more difficult for me?" Zhongli Yihu tightly frowned and he couldn't help but lower the tone in his voice. It could be seen that he was afraid of Zhuge Liuyun as well.
"Personal grudges? What personal grudges?" Zhuge Liuyun indifferently asked.
"This child killed my disciple. As his master, I avenge my disciple. Is that a grudge?" Zhongli Yihu replied with a question.
"Mm. That is indeed a grudge but since it is like this, that means I need to interfere with this matter even more." Zhuge Liuyun smiled.
"What do you mean?"
When those words came out, not only was Zhongli Yihu a bit stupefied, almost everyone on scene had their brains filled with fog. They couldn't help but deepen their guesses towards Chu Feng and Zhuge Liuyun's relationship.
"You want to kill Chu Feng to avenge your disciple. As his master, that is completely reasonable."
"However, Chu Feng is my own disciple. As his master, I protect my disciple. That is reasonable as well right?" Zhuge Liuyun spread open his hands and he said that very casually.
His seemingly casual words was like a lightning bolt in a clear sky and a clap of thunder in a calm lake. Instantly, the crowd went into an uproar.
"What? Chu Feng is Zhuge Liuyun's disciple. When did that happen?"
"That isn't true is it? Did I hear wrong? Leng Wuzui followed Zhuge Liuyun for such a long time yet he didn't even formally accept him as his disciple. When did this Chu Feng become his disciple? Which part does he like about Chu Feng?"
"Is it Chu Feng's martial cultivating talent? That means Chu Feng also has Spirit power, and Zhuge Liuyun wants to foster him into a World Spiritist?"
The crowd completely exploded and they were making all sorts of guesses towards that matter. It happened to abruptly and the people on scene were not prepared at all. It truly struck against their small hearts and they could not follow what happened at that moment.
"Zhuge Liuyun, what kind of joke is this? You're saying that this boy is your disciple?" Zhongli Yihu also had shock written all over his face and he even disbelieved it.
If it was said that he was strange, then Zhuge Liuyun was even stranger than him. If he had harsh requirements for accept disciples, then Zhuge Liuyun had even harsher requirements. He even thought that Zhuge Liuyun would not accept a single disciple for his entire life! Why did he suddenly accept a disciple, and it was even Chu Feng?
"What? Was I unclear on that matter?" Zhuge Liuyun smiled, then said, "That's fine. I'll say it again."
"Everyone here, listen up. Chu Feng is my only disciple. If anyone dares to even touch his fingers, that person is making me, Zhuge Liuyun, an enemy. No matter who it is, I will kill with no mistake!"
Zhuge Liuyun's voice was very thick and it had an extremely powerful penetrating power. After piecing through the ocean of people, it echoed like a bell within the Life and Death Stage. Everyone who heard it were stunned.
At that very instant, many people were speechless. However, they got an answer in their hearts. They finally knew why Chu Feng dared to challenge Gong Luyun, why he dared to destroy the inner court disciples' cultivation, and why he dared to kill Wu Jiu. It was because he had a quite impressive master, Zhuge Liuyun.
"Zhongli Yihu, are you still going to attack my disciple?" Zhuge Liuyun said nonchalantly.
"Hmph." Zhongli Yihu's complexion turned purple and his facial features all twisted. They got as ugly as they possibly could, and with a cold snort, he was preparing to walk down the Life and Death Stage because he was not going to attack Zhuge Liuyun for Wu Jiu.
"Halt!" But before letting Zhongli Yihu walk away, a Spirit Formation sealed the entire Life and Death Stage and forcibly locked Zhongli Yihu inside it.
"Zhuge Liuyun, what do you want?" In response, Zhongli Yu slightly panicked. He never would have thought that even after giving that up, the old guy was still unwilling to let him go.
"I'm still asking you a question. Did you not hear it?" Zhuge Liuyun was also displeased and his tone clearly turned cold.
"What do you want me to do?"
Zhongli Yihu was truly terrified. Within the Azure Dragon School, it could be said that he wasn't afraid of the heavens nor the earth, but he was only afraid of a single person, and that was Zhuge Liuyun. No matter it was methods or cultivation, he was inferior to him.
"If you don't understand, I can remind you. Give up any thinking of harming Chu Feng. If Chu Feng meets with any troubles, the first person I will look for will be you. At that time, there will be no one who can protect you." Zhuge Liuyun said that extremely loudly and he did not care about how Zhongli Yihu felt.
Everyone couldn't help but inhale a breath of cool air when they saw that scene. Within the Azure Dragon School, it was likely that only Zhuge Liuyun dared to speak to Zhongli Yihu like that.
"Okay, I promise that I will not touch Chu Feng in the future." The unexpected thing was that when facing Zhuge Liuyun, Zhongli Yihu did not refute and he gave in when he was confronted by the difficult situation in front of the crowd.
How would people know that deep within Zhongli Yihu's heart, he was completely horrified by Zhuge Liuyun? Only those who saw Zhuge Liuyun's ruthless methods could feel that. What was face in front of that horror? It was not even worth a penny.
"Ho That's more like it." Zhuge Liuyun smiled while being proud of himself, and following his laugher, the Spirit Formation that enveloped the Life and Death Stage also disappeared.
Zhongli Yihu had no more face and he didn't remain there anymore. He leaped forward with flying speed and left the Life and Death Stage, then disappeared from everyone's line of sight.
After that, Zhuge Liuyun swept his gaze over the crowd surrounding the stage. At the end, his eyes were locked on the director of the inner court Punishment Department, Liu Chengen.
At that instant, Liu Chengen's face greatly changed and his body couldn't help but quiver. His heart also pounded with bangs and large amounts of cold sweat also started to flow down from his forehead. He never would have thought that Chu Feng would have Zhuge Liuyun behind his back. He was an existence that the entire Azure Dragon School feared.
He was truly terrified, so much that his body was trembling. However, after Zhuge Liuyun spoke, only then did he know that a calamity was facing his way.
"So it's you who wants to punish my disciple?"


MGA Capitulo 172  Clear Rewarding and Clear Punishing
"II"
As he faced Zhuge Liuyun's interrogation, Liu Chengen's jaws trembled and his tongue was in a knot. He could not even say a complete sentence.
*whoosh* Suddenly, Zhuge Liuyun who was on the Life and Death Stage waved his hand. With a bang, Liu Chengen who was several hundred meters away got thrown back.
When he landed on the ground, blood came out from nose and mouth. His face swelled up and there was even a blood-red palm mark that was deeply imprinted there.
"Elder Zhuge have mercy! Elder Zhuge have mercy! I had eyes but did not recognize Mount Tai and I didn't know that Chu Feng was your disciple. If I did know, even if I had the nerves, I wouldn't dare!"
After being slapped through the air, Liu Chengen quickly kneeled on the floor and did not care what the gazes of the crowd was. He endlessly kowtowed with his hands clasped towards Zhuge Liuyun who was on the stage and loudly begged for his life.
As they looked at that scene, no one felt that Liu Chengen lost any face. Rather, they felt that it was completely reasonable. When facing Zhuge Liuyun, who did not dare to follow what he had to say? Even Zhongli Yihu did not dare to refute, not to mention a mere inner court elder.
"Is there anyone else who has any complaints towards Chu Feng?" Zhuge Liuyun swept his icy gaze towards his surroundings. His cold glare shot everywhere and his domineering air was revealed.
At that instant, who would dare to speak? No matter if they had their complaints towards Chu Feng or were displeased towards him, everyone shut their mouth and subconsciously walked one step back. It was as if it represented that they did not dare to have any complaints towards Chu Feng, nor did they dare to have any harmful thoughts towards Zhuge Liuyun's disciple.
As he looked at that, Zhuge Liuyun nodded his head in satisfaction, then walked next to Su Rou and said, "Su Rou, you have done a good deed for my disciple earlier by protecting him. I reward you with this."
Radiance flickered on Zhuge Liuyun's waist and a dark green medicine appeared in his palm. That medicine was too beautiful. It was sparkling, translucent, and light revolved around it. It was as shiny as a treasure, and the most important thing was that the energy that it contained was extremely huge. Even the surrounding air slowly wiggled like it was trembling, because what the medicine contained was Profound power.
"Profound medicine!"
Everyone was greatly shocked. Even the core elders revealed expressions of admiration because it was a Profound medicine. It was even a high-quality Profound medicine and its price was extremely high. It could be said to be both expensive and rare. It was treasure that could not be easily found, and one had to find it with luck. It had endless great effects for people in the Profound realm.
"Thank you Elder Zhuge."
Even Su Rou's eyes lit up when when saw the Profound medicine. On her absolutely beautiful face, she brimmed with the shine of happiness. She carefully held the Profound medicine on her hands.
Profound medicine was simply too expensive, especially high-quality ones. Even with Su Rou's status, she could not use them as she wished. In reality, even many people in the Profound realm could not even afford a single low-quality Profound medicine. From that, one could tell how high the Profound medicine prices were.
"Elder Li, thank you as well." Zhuge Liuyun took out another high-quality Profound medicine and gave it to Elder Li.
Elder Li lightly smiled and the wrinkles on his face were all pressed into a smile. As people looked at him, he looked just like a steamed bun, but he was a happy steamed bun.
Zhuge Liuyun's actions caused many disciples and elders break from greed. High-quality Profound medicine were priceless treasure to them. However, Zhuge Liuyun gave them away so generously.
However, the one who coveted them the most was Chu Feng. They were Profound medicine. Profound medicine! They were even high-quality Profound medicine, and the Profound power that a single one of them contained was not even able to be compared by Origin beads. If he swallowed one, who knew what level of cultivation he would reach?
Seemingly being able to feel the probing of Chu Feng's Spirit power, Zhuge Liuyun fiercely shot Chu Feng a glance. After all, the actions he was doing were for helping Chu feng. He wanted everyone to know that he would not forgive those who wanted to take care of Chu Feng. However, he would certainly reward those who helped Chu Feng.
On the side, he was telling the core disciples and the core elders of the Azure Dragon School, that between Chu Feng and Gong Luyun, they could not choose Chu feng but they better not lean too much towards Gong Luyun because Chu Feng had his master supporting him behind his back.
"Stinking boy, return with me." Zhuge Liuyun grabbed Chu Feng's shoulder, and after the rippling of the surrounding air, the two of them disappeared like demons. Indeed, normal people could not perform methods that World Spiritists could.
After Zhuge Liuyun left, the quiet crowd exploded with a boom like a pot exploding, and all sorts of discussions were initiated like boiling water.
"This is quite serious! Not only is Chu Feng a genius, he even has Zhuge Liuyun as his master. In the future, who would dare to touch him?"
That was certainly heavenly big news. Chu Feng was a genius, as he was able to kill Wu Jiu who was at the 5th level of the Origin realm with his cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm. After killing Wujiu, he invisibly replaced Wu Jiu's position on the Azure Dragon Leaderboard and became the 9th on the Azure Dragon Leaderboard.
However, Chu Feng was only fifteen years old, and on the Azure Dragon Leaderboard, he was undoubtedly the youngest one there. If everyone on the Azure Dragon Leaderboard were geniuses, Chu Feng would be the youngest one with the most potential. After all, even Gong Luyun could not defeat the strong as the weak and be able to kill his opponent who was four levels above him.
Also, not only was Chu Feng a genius, there was a huge shield behind his back. It was a person who even the head of the Azure Dragon School did not dare to offend. The World Spiritist Zhuge Liuyun.
From that day forth, everyone in the Azure Dragon School had to reevaluate Chu Feng. After all, Chu Feng had such strong talent. With the short time of less than two months, he entered the 1st level of the Origin realm from the 7th level of the Spirit realm. Only heaven would know what realm he would reach at the arranged battle in ten months.
With his overwhelming battle strength, perhaps he could really block three strikes from Gong Luyun in the arranged battle in one year and according to the agreement, as long as Chu Feng was able to block three strikes from Gong Luyun, he would win. At that time, Gong Luyun would need to suicide.
Before, people felt that Chu Feng was looking to die when he challenged Gong Luyun and his chance of victory was zero. However, after today, they discovered that there was great suspense for the arranged battle. The one who would win and the one who would lose was unknown.
As everyone in the core zone were discussing about Chu Feng, he was brought to the old palace by Zhuge Liuyun.
"Master, thank you for saving me." Chu Feng paid his respects to Zhuge Liuyun.
"Don't call me master yet. How much did you comprehend in the book that I gave you?"
Zhuge Liuyun's tone suddenly turned cold as if none of the gentleness before happened. That feeling was as though if Chu Feng did not meet his requirements, he would really kill Chu Feng.
However, how would Chu Feng who was already full of confidence be afraid of Zhuge Liuyun's request? With a thought, gas flowed and a Spirit Formation that surrounded himself and Zhuge Liuyun appeared.
After doing that, Chu Feng smiled and said, "Master, look at me. How is your disciple's comprehension?"


MGA Capitulo 173  A Heart-to-Heart Chat Between a Master and a Disciple
"You can use the Spirit Formation so proficiently already?"
At that moment, as he looked at the Spirit Formation that was surrounding him, Zhuge Liuyun was quite stunned. Although the white-coloured cloak covered his face, Chu Feng could still feel his shocked and happy appearance.
"Heh"
Chu Feng chuckled and he didn't really reply, however, he silently acknowledged Zhuge Liuyun's words. After all, at that moment, his skilled Spirit Formation was already being displayed in front of Zhuge Liuyun.
"Chu Feng, can you control any changes to this Spirit Formation?" Suddenly, Zhuge Liuyun spoke again.
"Master, what kind of change do you want?" Chu Feng asked.
"Changes in terms of form." Zhuge Liuyun said.
*hmm hmm*
Just as Zhuge Liuyun finished speaking, the Spirit Formation that surrounded them disappeared and several more Spirit Formations reappeared. This time, the Spirit Formation did not lock the two within and it only appeared on Chu Feng's hand.
At first, the translucent Spirit Formation was only as big as his palm and it spiraled in Chu Feng's hand. However, as Chu Feng continued to control it, it gradually left his hand and slowly largened. Occasionally, it was rectangular occasionally it was circular and occasionally, it was even a five-cornered star. It truly changed as he wished. There were only things that he could not imagine but nothing that he could not do.
"Chu Feng, are you competent in the World Spirit Compass?" Zhuge Liuyun asked again.
Chu Feng nodded and took out the World Spirit Compass. He stated what the things on it were and what the various symbols represented. Under Eggy's guidance, he knew it like the back of his hand.
After that, Zhuge Liuyun asked Chu Feng some other questions and they were knowledge recorded on the book that he gave him. Even if Eggy wasn't there, he could easily answer the questions. His analysis on the meanings within were extremely thorough.
"Good, good, good!"
After the examination, Zhuge Liuyun did not say too much but he said three "goods". However, those three words were enough to expression his current shocked feelings.
"I, Zhuge Liuyun, wanted to find a person who was worthy enough for me to pass my techniques down to him. I searched for half my life, and finally, I found a qualified disciple."
As Zhuge Liuyun looked at Chu Feng who was in front of him, he kept on nodding. Although Chu Feng carried a slight bit of hope before, currently, Chu Feng's performance completely surpassed his expectations.
"Master, let me pay you my respects!" Chu Feng half kneeled on the floor and clasped his hands together. He paid his respects to Zhuge Liuyun as a disciple towards his master.
"You are naturally intelligent, and in the future, you will certainly become an impressive World Spiritist with achievements that will certainly be above me."
"However, sadly, I can only guide you but not teach you. However, if you are willing to, you can still call me ‘master'." Zhuge Liuyun bent his back, went up, and supported Chu Feng up.
"You are my master. My only master." Chu Feng said with an extremely firm tone and within his tone, it was full of respect.
"Haha! Good, I really am not mistaken." Although Zhuge Liuyun said that on the surface, obviously, he liked the last few words that Chu Feng said.
After all, any able person liked to find a talented disciple for passing their skills down. Coincidentally, Zhuge Liuyun was an able person, and Chu Feng was a talented disciple.
After that, Zhuge Liuyun put his hand on the Cosmos Sack which was on his waist, and the symbols moved as it radiated with light. A handful of Origin beads appeared in his palm. With a glance, Chu Feng could tell that there were a hundred Origin beads there.
"Fenger, the date for the battle between you and Gong Luyun is nearing. As your master, I can help you with anything. Take these Origin beads as I believe that they will help you a bit."
"Thank you master."
Chu Feng took the Origin beads into his hands. He already knew that Zhuge Liuyun was quite wealthy, but he never would have thought that he was so generous and gave him so many Origin beads all at once.
Chu Feng was moved in his heart. He was extremely moved. He didn't act like the hundred Origin beads were nothing because of Zhuge Liuyun's wealth. After all, they were still quite expensive objects.
Although the rumoured offerings from the Azure Dragon School to Zhuge Liuyun was a single Profound bead every month, as Chu Feng understood more, he felt that they were only rumours. The reality might very well not be as such.
He knew that the top-quality Profound medicine, the Profound bead, was extremely rare. It could be said to be a priceless treasure because the Profound power that the Profound bead contained was simply too huge. It had the same effect as spiritual beads had to people at the Spirit realm.
As those who were at the 9th level of the Profound realm had no way of making a breakthrough, it would help them pass that impassable barrier. It would help them grasp totally new power as they entered the Heaven realm that allowed them to travel towards the horizon.
From that, it could be seen how precious Profound beads were. Not to mention the second-rate Azure Dragon School, even the first-rate school, the Lingyun School, could not be so rich as to offer a World Spiritist with a single Profound bead every month.
So, Chu Feng felt that the guesses towards Zhuge Liuyun's offerings were only rumours. Not to mention a Profound bead every month, even a high-quality Profound medicine every month was a huge expense. After all, to normal people, high-quality Profound medicine was already an invaluable treasure.
Or else the big Miss of the Vermilion Bird City lord, Surou, wouldn't have been so happy when she saw the high-quality Profound medicine that was given to her by Zhuge Liuyun.
After putting the hundred Origin beads away, Chu Feng was very joyful in his heart. He yearned to know what realm he would enter after he used the costly Origin beads to help his cultivation.
Also, within the gaze that he looked at Zhuge Liuyun with, he could not avoid but have some more respect and gratitude that came from his heart. Although Zhuge Liuyun was quite rich, after all, he still needed to cultivate himself.
Besides, if others were rich, that belonged to them. If they gave anything to you, that was because he had good impressions, and if they didn't, that was reasonable as well because no one owed anyone anything.
However, after knowing Chu Feng for not long, Zhuge Liuyun gave such a huge help to Chu Feng. It could be seen that he had extremely good impressions of him.
"You are slightly stubborn and you need to moderate yourself on that, or else you will pay a big price for that."
"However, you don't need to worry too much. You can fight Gong Luyun at ease. Even if you lose, I will still protect your life." Zhuge Liuyun spoke again.
"Hehe." Chu Feng only chuckled at Zhuge Liuyun's words. He could not say that he was aiming to kill Gong Luyun right?
However, after seeing Chu Feng's skill in the Spirit Formation, Zhuge Liuyun showed his fondness towards Chu Feng without concealing it. The master and the disciple chatted for a long time, and the more they chatted, the more they got into it.
At the end, Zhuge Liuyun even personally cooked a table of good dishes for Chu Feng. Although they were not sumptuous, they looked, smelt, and tasted great. The most important thing was that a World Spiritist, Zhuge Liuyun, personally made the dishes. It was likely that the people in the world who could eat the things that he made were extremely few.


MGA Capitulo 174  Inquiring
As they ate and drank, the master and disciple chatted even more merrily. Zhuge Liuyun who always gave people a feeling of ruthlessness opened up a wall in his heart towards Chu Feng. It could be seen that he truly didn't see Chu Feng as an outsider, but as his own trusted disciple.
Chu Feng found out that when Zhuge Liuyun was young, his family situation wasn't bad. However, because his parents offended a big character from the Lingyun School, they had no choice but to escape for their lives.
But they did not expect that someone would sell them out as they were escaping. When the people from that big school came chasing after them, they did not leave any of his family alive. Only Zhuge Liuyun himself was able to escape. The price of his escape was the heartless killing of his parents.
From then on, Zhuge Liuyun extremely rarely trusted anyone. It could be said that there was a type of coldness towards outsiders deep within his heart, like a wall that separated.
That was quite fine when he was young however, when age caught up, one would always want to find a person to rely on so that they would have someone who could pass their abilities down. Zhuge Liuyun was no exception.
Originally, Leng Wuzui gave him good impressions. However, later on, he discovered that Leng Wuzui was too selfish and he was too extreme when he did things. He had no friends and he only had tools that he used. He was not worthy for Zhuge Liuyun's trust.
However, in terms of talent, within the Green Province, especially within the Azure Dragon School, it was quite challenging to find a young man like Leng Wuzui.
So, Zhuge Liuyun was in difficult situation. He was hesitating whether to pass his legacy down to Leng Wuzui.
But just at that time, Chu Feng walked into Zhuge Liuyun's line of sight. In reality, Zhuge Liuyun already found out about Chu Feng's identity.
He discovered that despite Chu Feng was a bit rash when he did things, his actions did not were not for harming. Rather, in many situations, he stirred up great calamities for the ones close to him.
Perhaps from the eyes of an outsider, Chu Feng's actions were done brainlessly. However, Zhuge Liuyun strangely liked that.
As for the matter about Leng Wuzui, it was truly only a test that Zhuge Liuyun gave him. But sadly, at the end, Leng Wuzui disappointed Zhuge Liuyun.
"Master, after the Spirit Connection Contract between World Spiritists and World Spirits, would a situation like this happen?"
"Because of a certain reason, the World Spirit gets heavily injured and disappears from the World Spirit Space. The World Spiritist can't feel any trace of its aura, but the Spirit Connection Contract still remains." As Zhuge Liuyun was excited, Chu Feng inquired information about Eggy.
"Mm. There can be a situation like that. After the contract between a World Spirit and a World Spiritist, it would be difficult for them to return to the Spiritual World. Unless the contract gets canceled or if the World Spirit has overwhelming methods, for their entire lives, they would need to remain in the World Spiritist's Spiritual World, which also means within the World Spirit Space."
"Sometimes, the situation that you just stated would happen. After all, World Spirits would fight for their World Spiritist, and from the battles, they would usually get injured. However, if the World Spirit Contract isn't destroyed, that means that the World Spirit still lives. They would just be greatly injured and they would need a while to recover." Zhuge Liuyun said.
"A while to recover? How long would that time be?" Chu Feng was crazily happy in his heart. As long as Eggy was fine, he would not be worried.
"That's quite hard to say. If it's quick, then ten or eight years. If it's slow, then up to a hundred years." Zhuge Liuyun said indifferently.
"What? That long?"
After hearing those words, Chu Feng was as though he suffered from a huge blow. "If it's quick, then ten or eight years. If it's slow, then up to a hundred years." Did that mean that he could not see Eggy for at least ten years? Or even possibly for his entire lifetime?"
"Why are you so nervous? You didn't make a contract with a World Spirit already did you?" Zhuge Liuyun asked with a smirk.
"Of course not, I'm just curious" Chu Feng quickly shook his head. Eggy was his secret and he could not let anyone know that yet.
"I also thought that you wouldn't be so preposterous. World Spirits are extremely proud creatures and they are extremely smart as well. Their intelligence are not lower than humans, perhaps even higher."
"To be honest, your master, me, already has a World Spirit like that in my Spiritual World. However, he is still not willing to establish a contract with me even after giving him offerings up until now."
"Although creating a contract with a World Spirit will have great help towards one's control in the Spirit Formation power and also their own cultivation while also being the dream of countless World Spiritists, in reality, it is extremely difficult to gain a World Spirit's approval." Within Zhuge Liuyun's tone was pride, but also disappointment.
He was proud because as a World Spiritist, he successfully communicated with a World Spirit and the World Spirit had interest in creating a contract with him.
However, he was disappointed because despite having interest in creating a contract with him, after all, he still hadn't formed the contract, which also meant that he hadn't gotten the approval of the World Spirit. In addition, he was quite old and he truly did not know whether he could create a contract with that World Spirit in his remaining years.
After hearing Zhuge Liuyun's words, Chu Feng was hiddenly glad. Glad because he had a good family as they sealed two World Spirits within his World Spirit Space. He even made a contract with one of them.
Or else, if he had to search for some by himself, who knew how long it would take him to make a contract with a World Spirit. If he didn't handle things correctly, he would be like Zhuge Liuyun and perhaps even be unable to establish a contract with a World Spirit for his entire life.
However, as he was grateful towards his own family, Chu Feng couldn't help but remember about them. From the clues that he saw currently, his family, or at least his parents, were extremely strong, and the methods that they had defied common sense.
There was no one who was so strong in the past several hundred years on the continent of the Nine Provinces, so he knew that his parents were not from the Nine Provinces.
The world was huge, and the continent of the Nine Provinces was only the corner of an iceberg within that world. Chu Feng did not know what the world was like outside, but he could imagine that it was extremely dangerous. So dangerous that his parents who were so strong had no choice but to entrust him to others.
"Master, if the World Spirit really gets heavily injured, other than letting themself recover on their own, can we World Spiritists do nothing about it?" After more chatting, Chu Feng cleverly changed the topic back to that.
"There is. Of course there is. The reason why World Spirits create a contract with World Spiritists and are willing to abandon their own home in which they lived and also to be imprisoned in such a small Spiritual World, is because the world of the living has great benefits for them."
"The life of a World Spirit is very long. They aren't like us, where our lives do not pass a hundred years no matter how much stronger our cultivation is. World Spirits can at least live for three hundred years. According to rumours, some stronger World Spirits can even live for several thousand years."
"So that is why World Spirits are willing to establish a contract with World Spiritists and to live within the small Spiritual World. When the World Spiritist dies, the contract gets canceled and the World Spirit would be able to return to the world of World Spirits. At that time, everything that they got from the World Spiritist becomes their own footing in the world of World Spirits."


MGA Capitulo 175  Spirit Province
"There are endless and neverending benefits that World Spirits can get from the world of living. For example, other than the basic Source energy which can raise their cultivation, there are also many other things that could strengthen their bodies, or even things like special blood."
"Like you said, after the World Spirit gets injured, disappears from the Spiritual World, and has no way to contact the World Spiritist, what should you do? Actually, there are methods."
"From what I know, there's a special fruit called the Spirit Fruit. The Spirit Fruit has a certain effect for World Spiritists. They can increase the quality of their Spirit Formation and also strengthen the power of their Spirit power. However, it has an even greater effect for World Spirits, and that is to be able to replenish their power."
"Spirit Fruit? Where does that thing exist? Where can you buy it at?" Chu Feng rejoiced, and it was as though the clouds were pushed to the side and the sun could be seen. He finally saw the hope for saving Eggy.
"Do you think such a precious thing like Spirit Fruits can be bought? But from what I know, in the Nine Provinces, there is indeed a place where there are Spirit Fruits." Zhuge Liuyun said.
"Where?" Chu Feng closely asked.
"The Spirit Province!"
"The Spirit Province?"
"That's right. The Spirit Province is one of the nine provinces of the Nine Provinces."
"There's a World Spirit Guild there, and the World Spirit Guild can be said to be the area where the most number of World Spiritists gather within the Nine Provinces. At that area, World Spiritists can gain a lot of good things."
"Within the World Spirit Guild, there's a special fruit planted there, and that would be the Spirit Fruit." Zhuge Liuyun said.
"Spirit Province? Master, what's the distance between there and the Azure Province?" Chu Feng anxiously asked. Although he had some idea about the Azure Province, he did not know a lot about the Nine Provinces.
"The Spirit Province and the Azure Province are neighbours. Although the road isn't too near, if we go back and return, half a month would be enough." Zhuge Liuyun smiled, then asked Chu Feng, "You like this Spirit Fruit quite a bit huh?"
"Of course I like it. Didn't you say that the Spirit Fruit would increase one's Spirit Formation quality and Spirit power as well?" Chu Feng smiled and said.
"Mm. Of course. But on that topic, with your current proficiency in the Spirit Formation technique, it's time to take an exam for a white-cloak." Zhuge Liuyun said.
"White-cloak? The white-cloak you're wearing? What use does it have?" Chu Feng asked even though he knew.
"Haha, you wouldn't know about this! This is a symbol of a World Spiritist's status and strength. If you want to get such recognition, you would need to take an exam to get it with your own strength."
"According to the strength of the World Spiritist, there are three types of World Spiritist levels. White-cloak, Grey-cloak, and Blue-cloak."
"The White-cloak is the easiest to get. From what you can do right now, it shouldn't be too hard for you to get a white-cloak and become a White-cloak World Spiritist."
"When compared to the white-cloak, the grey-cloak is a lot harder. There are essence requirements for the Spirit Formation power, and within the Azure Province, there are no more than two Grey-cloak World Spiritists."
"The first is the World Spiritist in the 1 school, the Lingyun School and the other one is the World Spiritist in the Qilin Prince's Mansion." Zhuge Liuyun said extremely solemnly. As he mentioned those two people, he could not avoid having some respect in his tone.
"What? There are no more than two Grey-cloak World Spiritists and they have such impressive statuses?" Chu Feng was greatly shocked in his heart because the girl he saw in the White Tiger Mountain Range was clearly also a Grey-cloak World Spiritist.
"As for the Blue-cloak World Spiritist, those people are like legends. There is no one like that in the Azure Province, and there aren't even any in the other provinces. Only the Spirit Province has such a legendary World Spiritist." Zhuge Liuyun continued saying.
However, after comparing what Zhuge Liuyun said to what Eggy said, there were two less types. They were the Purple-cloak after the Blue-cloak, and also the Gold-cloak. From that, it could be seen that in terms of experience, Eggy was superior to Zhuge Liuyun.
"Why do so many World Spiritists gather in the Spirit Province? Is there something special about it?" Chu Feng muttered to himself.
"You are correct. The Spirit Province could be said to be the sacred land of World Spiritists. The two strongest World Spiritist powers in the Nine Provinces are located there. The first one is the World Spirit Guild and the strongest World Spiritists in the Nine Provinces are gathered there. All exams for the statuses of World Spiritists need to be done there."
"The other one is the Jie Clan. Although the Jie Clan isn't as big as the World Spirit Guild, every single clan member are born with Spirit power and they are quite an impressive, noble clan."
"According to rumours, they were the masters of the Spirit Province, but because there were too few clan members, the power to govern was slowly given to the World Spirit Guild. However, they are still a power that cannot be underestimated and the two of them share the sacred land of the Spirit Province." Zhuge Liuyun said.
"I see. It seems like the world is really quite huge. There is even such a special clan, and every clan member is born with Spirit power."
Chu Feng hiddenly sighed in admiration. Not one in ten thousand had Spirit power, and in the Azure Province, every person who had Spirit power were viewed as a genius.
But he never would have thought that there was such an impressive clan in his neighbouring province. Every single clan member had Spirit power. What kind of idea was that, and how strong would that clan be?
"Ho.. You are correct. The world is huge and there are countless powerful people in it. There are many clans with special blood, and other than the Jie Clan in the Spirit Province, there is an even stronger clan in the Nine Provinces." Zhuge Liuyun said.
"An even stronger clan? Master, what clan is that?" Chu Feng was extremely curious. The Jie Clan could already make one shocked. What would a clan that was even stronger than that look like?
"It is the current overlord of the Nine Provinces, the Jiang Dynasty. The Jiang Dynasty is a special clan."
"The reason why they called themself as the Jiang Dynasty is because every single person in the Jiang Dynasty has strong power from their blood. They have terrifying battle prowess that normal people do not have. That is also why the Jiang Dynasty can be the overlord of the Nine Provinces for so long and not wither away." Zhuge Liuyun continued explaining.
"The Jiang Dynasty is a special clan! No wonder!" Chu Feng learnt another piece of news that shocked him.
"Looking at the date, the monthly World Spiritist White-cloak exam that the World Spirit Guild holds is quickly approaching. Go back and prepare. I'll bring you to the Spirit Province tomorrow morning." Zhuge Liuyun said.
"Really?"
After hearing those words, Chu Feng not have a single trace of shock. Rather, he was extremely and madly happy because even if Zhuge Liuyun didn't say that, he was also planning to go to the Spirit Province.
The reason why Chu Feng wanted to go to the Spirit Province was not for any White-cloak exam for World Spiritists, because if they were talking about status, he already had a World Spirit Grey-cloak in his Cosmos Sack. That Grey-cloak was certainly more expensive than the White-cloak, and the status that it represented was even more scary.
Naturally, what attracted Chu Feng to the Spirit Province was the Spirit fruit. The strange thing that could wake Eggy up.


MGA Capitulo 176  Advancement in Engagement
"Would that be fake? Quickly go. Although you've grasped the basics of the Spirit Formation, the White-cloak Exam for World Spiritists is not that simple. It will be totally different from the past exams that you've experienced. You better be prepared in your heart so you won't fail it and be set back." Zhuge Liuyun struck some blows and said.
"Hehe, don't worry master. I won't disappoint you and I won't lose any of your face."
Chu Feng happily left. After knowing how Eggy could be saved, his tense heart relaxed.
To avoid any suspicions from Zhuge Liuyun, Chu Feng did not refine the hundred Origin beads. He only slept early, and on that night, he slept very peacefully.
In the morning of the following day, the sky was only slightly lit up. As arranged, Chu Feng went to Zhuge Liuyun's residence. However, in the plaza that was in front of the palace, people formed mountains and oceans. There were many disciples and elders gathered there.
After passing through the crowd, Chu Feng discovered with astonishment that in the center of the plaza, Zhuge Liuyun was standing there, and behind him were two huge White-headed Eagles.
Those eagles were extreme big. As they stood there, they were three meters tall. Their large claws were like sharp blades, and as they looked at the crowd with their sharp eagle eyes, there was not a single trace of fear within them. Rather, there was pride.
"Waa, it's a real White-headed Eagle! It's so beautiful!" As they looked at the two eagles, many females revealed joy and they were so happy that their hands and feet danced.
"I hear that this thing is the best means for transportation. Its price is extremely high and our Azure Dragon School only has two, which both belong to Zhuge Liuyun." Someone stated the origin of the White-headed Eagle.
"Yeah, this thing seems quite strong. It is enjoyable just by looking at it. I wonder how nice it would feel if I rode it and flew around for a while."
"Elder Zhuge very rarely uses the White-headed Eagle and he looked at them as though they were treasure."
"I hear that Elder Wang from the Six Protectors had to journey far one day and he wanted to borrow the White-headed Eagle to use it. However, he was heartlessly refused by Elder Zhuge."
"Not only refused, I hear that Elder Zhuge even lashed out at Elder Wang. He said, ‘Even I am not willing to use it but you want to? Go dream!'."
"Yeah, but today, he is going to use both White-headed Eagles. I wonder what important matter he has, where he is going, and who is he going with?"
Everyone was pointing as they had discussions about the White-headed Eagle. They admired Zhuge Liuyun quite a bit, and they admired the person who would ride on the White-headed Eagle along with Elder Zhuge even more.
Everyone wanted to have a taste of the intense feeling of soaring towards the horizon and looking down from the sky.
"Fenger, it's time to go." Just at that time, Zhuge Liuyun waved at Chu Feng who was within the crowd.
"Master."
Under the gazes of the crowd, Chu Feng went next to Zhuge Liuyun and he involuntarily extended his palm to rub the White-headed Eagle. He was also endlessly excited in his heart.
"So it's Chu Feng. Heavens, is he going to go out with Elder Zhuge?"
"He can actually enjoy such treatments! It seems that Elder Zhuge really likes this Chu Feng."
After seeing Chu Feng, admiration was filled on the crowd's face. They admired Chu Feng as he was able to be liked by Zhuge Liuyun. However, compared to the pure admiration from the males, many females displayed their adoration.
Chu Feng's talent was already shown, and now he became Zhuge Liuyun's disciple. It could be said that his status within the Azure Dragon School was not inferior to Gong Luyun.
In addition, there were rumours that stated Chu Feng was a genius who had Spirit power, and because Zhuge Liuyun saw his huge talent in Spirit power, he accepted him as his disciple. From that, people had even higher opinions on Chu Feng.
So naturally, Chu Feng currently became the husband of choice in the hearts of countless female disciple. Although Chu Feng was still a young man, that could not stop the rippling hearts of love from the female disciples.
"Chu Feng." A familiar sound rang out and Su Mei walked out from the crowd. She arrived in front of Chu Feng and cutely said, "Are you leaving?"
"Mm. I'm following my master to go to the Spirit Province to participate in the White-cloak Exam for World Spiritists." Chu Feng did not hide anything from Su Mei.
"Since you're participating in the World Spiritist exam, congratulations on becoming a World Spiritist." Su Mei beautifully smiled and said.
"Heh, that's still unknown." Chu Feng modestly shook his head, but a confident and determined smile was hung on his face.
"How long are you leaving for?" Su Mei asked again.
"Probably a month." Chu Feng replied.
"That long!" There was some change on Su Mei's face.
"What's wrong?" Chu Feng saw the inklings.
"Nothing, I'm just happy for you." Su Mei sweetly smiled, but she could not hide the worry in her heart. However, she did not speak anymore and she squeezed herself into the crowd.
"Little Mei!" As Chu Feng hesitated, Su Mei disappeared. Chu Feng rushed out of the crowd and looked around, but he could not see Su Mei's figure.
However, another body appeared within Chu Feng's line of sight. It was Su Mei's sister, Su Rou. The most beautiful female in the Azure Dragon School was currently looking at Chu Feng from not too far.
Su Rou was an inner court elder, so unless there were any special matters, she would very rarely come to the core zone. In addition to Su Mei's strange emotions earlier, Chu Feng subconsciously knew that something happened.
"Su Rou, what happened?" Chu Feng brought Su Rou to a more quiet place before asking.
"You know that little Mei has a fiancé right?" Su Rou did not answer, but responded with a question.
"Shangguan Ya from the Shangguan family right? What about him?" Chu Feng asked.
"It seems that you know at least something." Su Rou smiled, but her smile was very strange. After that, she spoke again, "Shangguan Ya and little Mei's marriage has been advanced. It will happen in one month!"
"One month later? It's your father's idea?" Chu Feng's face was a bit ugly.
"No, it wasn't my father's idea. However, he is quite powerless in his issue. This is quite a long matter, but it could be said to be a forced marriage." Su Rou said.
"Forced marriage? Funny joke. The distinguished master of the Vermilion Bird City is being forced by a family within his city?" Obviously, Chu Feng did not believe it.
"Do not underestimate the Shangguan family. They already have the qualifications to fight over the right of control over the Vermilion Bird City, and besides, he found a supporter for his own family. The current situation isn't too good for my Su family." Su Rou said.
"Supporter? What supporter?" Chu Feng asked.
"Don't ask about that. All in all, it isn't something that you can handle. I only ask you one question. Can you bring little Mei and leave?" Su Rou's beautiful eyes tightly stared at Chu Feng.
"I cannot!" Chu Feng firmly replied without any hesitation.
"You" After hearing Chu Feng's words, Su Rou's face of absolute beauty paled a bit from anger.
Chu Feng did not explain anything. He just turned around and walked towards the plaza.
"Chu Feng, I was mistaken about you. Little Mei was even more mistaken!" The cursing voice of Su Rou came from behind.
Chu Feng stopped his steps, turned his head around, and said, "Why do I need to bring little Mei away? To elope? To escape? Why do we need to run away? What did we do wrong? Or what are we afraid of?"
"" Su Rou did not know how to reply as she didn't really understand what Chu Feng meant.
"I, Chu Feng, will not run away from his matter. One month later in the Vermilion Bird Mountain Range. I will see you there."
Chu Feng left those words behind and walked away. He only let Su Rou contemplate over those words, however, she could not understand them.


MGA Capitulo 177  World Spirit Guild
"That Su Mei is quite a nice girl! Her family situation isn't bad and her talent isn't weak as well. No need to say anything about her appearance. So, do you want me to help you propose a marriage?" After returning to the plaza, Zhuge Liuyun smiled and said.
"Master, thank you for your good intentions but I don't want to marry too early." Chu Feng smiled and replied.
"Let's go!" Zhuge Liuyun leaped up and landed onto the White-headed Eagle. Chu Feng also rode on the other White-headed eagle.
Both of the eagles opened their wings at the same time and the huge wings were several meters long. Both of their wings flapped and wind rose.
The fierce wind roared and they were like sharp blades. Even the core disciples and core elders on the plaza found it hard to bear it as they got blown back.
Within the wild wind, two White-headed Eagles rose into the air and went straight up into the sky. They first circled the plaza two times before shooting towards the Spirit Province like arrows.
Everyone paid attention to that grand scene and most of their faces were filled with admiration and yearning. However, in a desolate corner in the core zone, there was also a small face that was raised. Su Mei, who stared at the White-headed Eagle, had worry within her eyes.
The White-headed Eagles' speed was extremely quick and it only took a few days to go over the Azure Province as they arrived within the boundaries of the Spirit Province.
The White-headed Eagle could be counted as a rarity in the Azure Province. Every time it flew past in the air, the people underneath would raise their heads to look and sigh in admiration. However, after arriving at the Spirit Province, Chu Feng discovered that the White-headed Eagle wasn't all that rare.
As they flew in the air, they even saw a few White-headed Eagles sweep past them. Their speed was even quicker than the ones that they were riding on, and clearly, they were of better quality.
That made Chu Feng think that the Azure Province that he lived in perhaps really was declining when compared to the Spirit Province. No wonder his master, Zhuge Liuyun, would say that.
The so-called geniuses in the Azure Province were only mediocre people and there were no more than ten people who could truly be called as geniuses. The so-called geniuses in the Azure Province really wasn't much in the eyes of the other provinces.
In reality, the Azure Province wasn't really all that strong. Within the Nine Provinces, it was deteriorating, and it could not really be compared to the other bigger provinces.
After flying for two more days in the Spirit Province, Chu Feng finally arrived at the so-called World Spirit Guild. As he looked down from above, he could see that the World Spirit Guild was located within the plains.
It was a huge city, and the city was so big that it covered entire mountains, rivers, and even forests. It was simply just like a kingdom and it was so big that it surpassed Chu Feng's imagination.
From that, he could tell how strong the World Spirit Guild was. No wonder it could become the overlord of the Spirit Province.
The most important thing was that the World Spiritists who were seen so preciously within the Azure Province were everywhere. White-cloak World Spiritists like Zhuge Liuyun were certainly not anyone important.
In that area, only Grey-cloak World Spiritists could be seen highly by others because there were as many White-cloaked World Spiritists as there were "white vegetables" since they could be seen anywhere.
[TN Chinese cabbage, aka. "bok choy", is literally translated as "white vegetable" so I left it literal for the joke.]
"Is this the so-called, ‘there's a sky beyond this sky, and there's a person beyond this person'?"
Chu Feng and Zhuge Liuyun did not directly enter the World Spirit Guild because people could not enter the World Spirit Guild as they wished. Even if they were World Spiritists they could not. So, they arrived in a city outside of the World Spirit Guild and it was specialized for receiving World Spiritists like them.
At that place, people like Zhuge Liuyun who were White-cloak World Spiritists were everywhere. However, most of them had their hoods taken off and revealed their faces.
"No need to be shocked. The finest World Spiritists in the Nine Provinces are gathered here, so naturally, there would be quite a few World Spiritists."
"Besides, the Spirit Province is titled as the richest province with the Nine Provinces. When compared to his place, the Azure Province does seem a bit poor and desolate."
Zhuge Liuyun's voice rang out and Chu Feng who turned his head to look couldn't help but be greatly shocked because Zhuge Liuyun took off the hood that he covered his face with. For the first time, Chu Feng saw the face of the old man.
He looked quite different from Chu Feng's imagination. Not only was he not scary, he seemed rather kind. With a glance, people would feel that the old man was quite amiable.
However, probably exactly because of that reason, Zhuge Liuyun did not let anyone see his appearance because he wanted to leave a dangerous impression on others. Only then could he protect himself better. Perhaps that was truly the best way for him to protect himself.
"Heh No one is allowed to hide their face here and everyone must abide with that rule, or else they'll be seen as challenging the might of World Spirit Guild!" Zhuge Liuyun explained and said.
"I like your current appearance better." Chu Feng smiled and said the words from his heart.
"Boy, is my appearance so amusing to be be made fun of?" Zhuge Liuyun shot Chu Feng a glance then brought him to the registration place for the White-cloak Exam.
As they went there, Chu Feng saw many young people who were similar in age as him. Every single one of them had Spirit power, so it could be seen that they were there for the White-cloak Exam.
"The World Spiritist Exam isn't too strict. As long as you can pass the first stage, you can get the World Spirit White-cloak."
"The World Spirit White-cloak is made out of special materials. When you wear it, as long as you don't emanate any aura, no one can detect your cultivation."
"The most important thing is that the World Spirit White-cloak is a symbol of status. In the future, if you wear this white-cloak back to the Azure Province, I think that no one will look down on you again. Many powers would even want to befriend you and rope you in to be a guest."
"But of course, laying a Spirit Formation is physical work, and laying formations of Spirit Formations would be even more physical work. Laying a Spirit Formation that envelops an entire power is a huge project."
"The outsiders only see the glory of us World Spiritists, but they dont even know the hard work we need to do." Zhuge Liuyun reminded Chu Feng after helping Chu Feng get the qualification badge for participating in the exam.
"Master, other than the first stage, is there a second stage?" Chu Feng asked curiously.
"Of course, after passing the first stage, you can get the World Spirit White-cloak. However, even though you can get the World Spirit White-cloak like that, you need to pay the appropriate price to buy it." Zhuge Liuyun replied.
"You need to buy it? How much does it cost?" Chu Feng closely asked.
"A single World Spirit White-cloak costs a thousand Origin beads, and that's given if you pass the first stage. Or else, even if you want to buy one you couldn't." Zhuge Liuyun said.
"That expensive?" Chu Feng was endlessly shocked. To him, a thousand Origin beads was certainly a huge number to him.
"Don't worry, I have already prepared them for you. As long as you can pass the first stage, the World Spirit White-cloak is yours." Zhuge Liuyun dotingly looked at Chu Feng.
At that instant, if Chu Feng said he wasn't touched, those would be lies. However, he still curiously asked, "Master, do you know how much a World Spirit Grey-cloak costs?"


MGA Capitulo 178  Qixing Old Man
"World Spirit Grey-cloak... I haven't been in the Grey-cloak Exam before since it is not something that ordinary World Spiritists can participate in. Besides, having the World Spirit Grey-cloak is an extreme high honor for World Spiritists, so why would it be sold?" Zhuge Liuyun shook his head.
"But what if someone wanted to sell it? For example, if someone had an extra World Spirit Grey-cloak that they wanted to sell, how much would it cost?" Chu Feng was extremely curious because he did have a Grey-cloak in his hands.
"That's quite hard to say. After all, normal people don't have much use for World Spirit Grey-cloaks, and even if someone wanted to buy it, it would need to be a World Spiritist."
"However, according to the difficulty of the Grey-cloak Exam, the price for the World Spirit Grey-cloak would be reasonable even if it was counted with Profound beads as the unit. Roughly one thousand Profound beads." Zhuge Liuyun said.
"One thousand Profound beads!" Chu Feng was incomparably happy. That was certainly a huge number.
If a single Profound bead was equivalent to a thousand Origin beads, one thousand Profound beads was equivalent to a million Origin beads. A million Origin beads!
Even if Chu Feng's Godly Lightning got anymore greedy, that amount would definitely be enough for it to eat for a while. Who knew what Chu Feng's cultivation would reach after consuming the million Origin beads.
"A thousand Profound beads isn't a small number. Even to me, the thousand Origin beads that I prepared for you today is everything I have."
"A thousand Profound beads.. World Spiritists that can pay that amount would not spend it to buy the World Spirit Grey-cloak, and they would just rely on their own strength to get it because they should be able to."
As Chu Feng's imagination went wild as he planned how he would sell that World Spiriti Grey-cloak, Zhuge Liuyun splashed a bucket of cold water onto Chu Feg.
However, after thinking in more detail, a thousand Profound beads was truly a huge number, no matter who it was. If their background wasn't impressive, then they must have outstanding strength in order to be so wealthy.
The more he knew about the price of the World Spirit Grey-cloak, the more Chu Feng felt that the purple-clothed girl was extraordinary. It could be seen how impressive she was in order to be a Grey-cloak World Spiritist at that age.
If she did not appear that day and if Chu Feng only used his tiny bit of Spirit Formation power, he would most likely be unable to release the peerless Secret Skill, the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique.
"So master, does that mean after passing the first stage, there's a second stage?" Chu Feng asked again.
"That's right, there is a second stage. After passing the second stage, not only will the World Spirit White-cloak be free, there will even be a reward."
"However, that stage cannot be passed by normal people. Back in my days, I was unable to pass that stage." Zhuge Liuyun shook his head and said.
"Oh? I'm not mistaken am I? It's Zhuge Liuyun!" Just at that time, a strange voice suddenly rang out.
Looking over, a short old man who wore a white cloak was walking towards Chu Feng and Zhuge Liuyun. As he walked, he was limping. He seemed to be a slightly disabled person.
There was even a young man behind the limping old man. He was older than Chu Feng, being around seventeen years old and arrogance was all over his face. The gaze that he looked at Chu Feng with was full of contempt, as if he himself had a few extra legs than others.
"So it's Qixing. I haven't seen you in a good while." After seeing the limping old man, Zhuge Liuyun's expression was quite ugly.
"Haha, it really is you. Old guy Zhuge, I heard that you became a guest elder at the Azure Dragon School?" Qixin smiled and said with mock.
Zhuge Liuyun smiled as he silently admitted to it. However, he did not expect that Qixing would be even more undue as he loudly said,
"Tsk tsk tsk, no matter how you say it, you are still a World Spiritist. How can you be so low as to be a guest elder at a tiny little second-rate school?"
"Perhaps his ability is insufficient and first-rate schools don't accept him." Just at that time, the young man behind Qixing spoke.
"If you dare speak a single extra word, do you believe that I will cripple you?!" After hearing that, Chu Feng could not remain silent as he pointed at the young man and coldly yelled.
"Oh? Where did this little brat come from? So disrespectful. Old guy Zhuge, he isn't your disciple is he?" Qixing looked at Chu Feng and all sorts of disdain emerged into his eyes.
"Qixing, mind how you speak. Although I was defeated by you in that year, that does not mean that I am afraid of you now." Zhuge Liuyun's face finally sank as well.
"Old guy Zhuge, what attitude is this? Do you want to lose to me once again?" Qixing sneered and said.
"Why not give it a try?" Zhuge Liuyun's aura revolved and the air around him shifted.
"Ahh, but what is there to try between the two of us? Let's make it more interesting and let our disciples give it a go."
However, Qixing's gaze locked onto Chu Feng and a despicable smile that did not match his age hung on the corner of his mouth.
He could already tell that Chu Feng was a cultivator at the 1st level of the Origin realm. With that cultivation, his disciple could completely suppress Chu Feng without any pressure at all.
Zhuge Liuyun did not reply and he only looked at Chu Feng because Qixing's disciple had the cultivation of the 5th level of the Origin realm.
Although he had the same cultivation as Wu Jiu, after all, he was a World Spiritist and a core disciple in a first-rate school. Naturally, he could not be compared to Wu Jiu so Zhuge Liuyun let Chu Feng decide.
"Master, I beg you. Let me teach this ignorant thing a lesson." Chu Feng said.
"That's fine. Fenger, go exchange some blows with him." Zhuge Liuyun nodded in satisfaction. He liked Chu Feng who was not afraid of the heavens nor the earth.
"Exchange blows? Fists and feet do not have eyes, so torn tendons or broken bones cannot be blamed on anyone." Qixing was very confident in his disciple.
"I can already see your disciple being injured severely." Zhuge Liuyun also had plenty of confidence in Chu Feng.
"Hmph. Let's see if your disciple has that ability. Yangzi, go give him a taste of pain." Qixing coldly snorted.
"Yes sir." The young man called Yangzi first walked over to a wide area. He arrogantly formed his hand into a hook, indicating Chu Feng to go over.
*hmm* Just as Chu Feng went over, with a thought from Qixing, he put out a layer of strong Spirit Formation and surrounded Chu Feng and Yangzi within it.
"Qixing, what are you doing?" Seeing that, Zhuge Liuyun angrily bellowed.
"Old guy Zhuge, what are you worried about? This is the property of the World Spirit Guild. I put down the Spirit Formation because I don't want the two children breaking anything here."
Qixing cunningly said that, however he was clearly shooting an eye expression at Yangzi. Yangzi understood it as he smiled, and the gaze towards Chu Feng became more dark and fierce.


MGA Capitulo 179  Chu Feng Displaying His Might
"Master, that cripple is correct, It is better if the World Spirit Guild's property is not damaged."
"So, just in case. Master, you should also put a layer of Spirit Formation down. I'm worried that the cripple laid an incomplete Spirit Formation that would be broken by me."
Chu Feng loudly said that and Qixing's eyebrows slanted inwards as he heard "cripple" here and there and he scowled from anger. However, as he thought about his disciple beating Chu Feng up for him, he suppressed his flames of fury.
"Mm. I'll listen to you!"
Zhuge Liuyun who understood Chu Feng a bit naturally knew what Chu Feng wanted to covey. Without delay, he continuously laid three more layers of Spirit Formation and tightly locked Chu Feng and Yangzi in from under their feet to above their heads. Although it would be hard for them to get themselves out, it was also hard for others to get themselves in.
"Come, doggy. Let me see your flowery fists and fancy kicking!" Chu Feng did a hand gesture towards Yangzi.
[TN Doggy -&gt Gou (dog) + Zi, a joke on Yangzi's name.]
"Damn your doggy!" After being called like that by Chu Feng, Yangzi was enraged. He threw out a fist and Origin power condensed as the fist flew in the air towards Chu Feng.
However, Chu Feng did not even move an inch when facing his attack. He did not even blink as he used the power of Spirit Formation with a thought. A Spirit Formation wall formed a meter in front of him.
*bang*
A boom resonated and ripples exploded, but Chu Feng was not affected in the slightest. The Spirit Formation he laid easily blocked Yangzi's attack.
"Quite a fine method. This boy has a good future."
That area was originally a city so there were a lot of passersby. When they saw that two young people were having a fight, naturally, many people stopped their steps to watch.
After seeing Chu Feng so naturally use the Spirit Formation at his age, many sighs of admiration sounded out.
"Yangzi, do not show mercy and fiercely attack!" As he saw the observers praising Chu Feng, Qixing could not remain silent and he yelled out as he ignored his own situation.
"Damn brat, let's see how you're going to block this."
Yangzi spread his legs apart and went into a horse stance. As he tightly clenched both of his fists, strong Origin power surged around him and it had quite a powerful force. If the Spirit Formation wasn't there to hold it down, it would certainly have raised quite a bit of sand and stones.
Power storage. That power storage was not simple and he was preparing for a strong martial skill. As for how strong it was, it would undoubtedly not be lower than a rank 5 martial skill.
"Haa~~" Suddenly, Yangzi explosively yelled and he attacked. At the same time that he attacked, he even yelled, "Heaven Dog's Meteor Fist!!"
*ahhhhhhhh~~~*
When that fist came out, it shook the world and the howling that was like a group of dogs yelling endlessly shocked everyone. So the mysteriousness of the Heaven Dog's Meteor Fist attacked you with noise pollution that was like the howling of wild dogs.
Although the dog howling sounds that the fist made could already be said to contain extremely strong power of harming and people could not hold that back, the strongest power of harming was still within the essence of the fist.
The meteor-like fists flew towards Chu Feng and the might and power were not to be underestimated. Even a small mountain or a palace would be demolished by the meteor fists.
However, his opponent was Chu Feng. He did not dodge or avoid it. He only relied on the Spirit Formation in front of him to block Yangzi's strong attacks.
*boom boom boom boom boom* When every fist touched the Spirit Formation, they were like fireworks as they exploded beautifully on the Spirit Formation.
However, the endless ripples and the endless fists had no way of even moving that Spirit Formation. Not to mention breaking it, there weren't even any small cracks.
"That isn't simple. The martial skill that the boy is using is at least a rank 5 one and he used a minimum of 90% of its power."
"However, that martial skill has no way of even moving that young man's Spirit Formation. it can be seen how high quality that Spirit Formation is." The observing crowd sighed in admiration once again because Chu Feng's performance was truly eye-grabbing.
"That isn't even anything. The quality of my disciple's Spirit Formation certainly surpasses his. It cannot be said that the boy is strong. It can only be said that his opponent is too weak." However, some people who were not considerative spoke the truth.
As he listened to the surrounding discussions that were completely leaning towards Chu Feng and when some voices even belittled his own disciple, Qixing circled back and forth in anger.
However, he did not lash out because that place wasn't the Azure Province. It was the World Spirit Guild and there were countless experts there. He did not dare to easily offend anyone.
As he could do nothing about him, Qixing could only direct his rage at his own disciple as he roared, "Yangzi you garbage! What are you thinking? Someone at the 5th level of the Origin realm can't beat a person who is at the 1st level of the Origin realm?! Did you take the things that I taught you as fart?!"
"Doggy, your master is raging so isn't it time to use your specialty?" Chu Feng was quite relaxed as he stood behind the Spirit Formation.
"Damn you. I'll rip your mouth off." Yangzi was completely enraged. He simply stopped attacking and didn't use any martial skills anymore. He stepped forward and he wanted to have a close physical battle.
"Go."
*swoosh*
However, just at that time, Chu Feng clenched his left hand and a golden-coloured spear appeared in his hand. He threw it towards Yangzi.
*hmm* The golden-coloured spear contained extremely strong Origin power. As it howled past, even the air exploded and it was as though the spear could pierce anything.
"Hmph. Don't even think of injuring me with a mere rank 5 martial skill!" Seeing that Chu Feng started to attack, Yangzi was not afraid as well and he stood where he was. His arms waved as he set up a Spirit Formation wall and put it in front of himself.
*bang*
The golden spear was thrown and ripples went in all directions as it was stopped by the Spirit Formation. However, looking back at the Spirit formation, it was heavily damaged with cracks everywhere. It looked like a mirror that was smashed by a big rock.
"Ah.. The difference is too big. The quality of that boy's Spirit Formation is too far off from that young man's." Seeing that, the observing people all sighed and shook their heads, hiddingly indicating that Yangzi's Spirit Formation did not pass.
"Heh, take another spear." Chu Feng was quite proud of himself as he raised his hand to throw another.
*bang* Another golden spear exploded as it forcefully shattered the Spirit Formation and it continued towards Yangzi's.
*hmm* Yangzi was greatly shocked and as he backed away in alarm, he laid another Spirit Formation again and he was able to block Chu Feng's attack. However, cracks also appeared on that Spirit Formation.
"Slightly interesting, but can you still block the following?"
Chu Feng held a bow in his left hand and his right hand pulled the string. The sound of the bowstring rang out and noise of the arrows were like rain. With whooshes that tore through the air, the densely packed golden-coloured arrows pressed their way towards Yangzi.
"How is this possible? He is clearly only at the 1st level of the Origin realm. How can he use such a powerful martial skill?"
Yangzi panicked. It wasn't that he didn't want to counterattack, he had no methods to do that. Under that situation, the only thing he could do was to keep on laying Spirit Formations to block Chu Feng's attacks.
However, even if Spirit Formations was infinite, Spirit power wasn't. Under Chu Feng's storm-like attacks, Yangzi was quickly exhausted and he could only barely brace it.
Although he was forcibly holding it back, Chu Feng's attacks got stronger and stronger. As he felt that he was unable to block the strikes soon, Yangzi loudly yelled, "Master save me!!"


MGA Capitulo 180  The Arrival of Geniuses
"This trash!"
Qixing was furious as he saw his disciple who was at the 5th level of the Origin realm being beaten by Chu Feng who was at the 1st level of the Origin realm. However, even if he cursed like that on the surface, he had no hesitation. As his master, he would not just stare as his disciple died.
"Hey, Qixing. This is the fight between the disciples. What are you doing?" However, just as Qixing raised his hand, Zhuge Liuyun's palm grasped his wrist and stopped his attack.
"Old guy Zhuge, get out of my way!"
Qixing waved his arm and wanted to fling Zhuge Liuyun away. However, he could not do anything about Zhuge Liuyun's hand. It was as firm as a boulder and it was just like a pair of iron pliers as it solidly locked his wrist. Qixing had no way of moving it.
"You shameless thing. Move to the side and quietly watch." Zhuge Liuyun coldly snorted and suddenly flung. Qixing landed face first and he fiercely laid on the ground.
"Youyouyou entered the 6th level of the Profound realm!"
Qixing was endlessly shocked because he never would have thought that the "defeated general" that year surpassed him today and became an expert of the 6th level of the Profound realm.
It was hard for Qixing to accept that. As a guest elder in a first-rate school, he got extremely generous offerings. With those offerings, his cultivation also increased rapidly and he was an expert of the 5th level of the Profound realm.
However, he did not expect that Zhuge Liuyun who was a guest elder in a second-rate school would be at the 6th level of the Profound realm. That defied common sense.
"Fenger, you can stop after a bit more. Leave his dog life for him!" Zhuge Liuyun did not pay any attention to Qixing as he yelled at Chu Feng who was within the Spirit Formation.
"Yes sir."
Chu Feng already disintegrated Yangzi's Spirit Formation. Originally, he wanted to kill him but after hearing Zhuge Liuyun's words, he dissolved the golden-coloured arrows that would have killed Yangzi.
"Get up."
Although he spared Yangzi's life, Chu Feng did not plan to let him go just like that. He walked in front of Yangzi, and pulled him up as he was completely exhausted with a pale face.
"WhatWhat are you planning to do?!"
"I am a core disciple of the first-rate school, the Huayang School! If you dare to kill me, my school will not forgive you." Yangzi already lost all the arrogance he had earlier and his eyes were filled with fear.
"Damn you!" Chu Feng didn't even bother to listen to his meaningless words and punched Yangzi's mouth. After the punch landed on his face, the ground was covered with teeth. A mouthful of Yangzi's teeth were broken by Chu Feng.
"Mm." Yangzi covered the mouth that had blood flowing out of it as he looked at the shattered teeth on the ground. He wished to cry, yet there were no tears. Without even teeth, how could he face anyone after he returned to the Huayang School?
"Go over to the side to cry!"
As he looked at Yangzi who almost seemed to cry, Chu Feng raised his leg and kicked Yangzi into a corner, Then, he pointed at him and said, "Pay attention to how you speak in the future. You cannot speak like that to just anyone."
"Haha! Whatever Fenger. It's normal for wild dogs to bite people and it's fine after a beating. No need to lower yourself to his level."
Zhuge Liuyun's mood was great as he saw his own disciple win so quickly. He felt quite comfortable, and after releasing the Spirit Formation, he brought Chu Feng to the examination location.
"Fenger, that was beautifully done. The face that I lost that year has been retrieved by you." They arrived at the examination location, but Zhuge Liuyun did not forget to praise Chu Feng. He was really quite happy.
"Master, your strength far exceeds him. I know that you didn't lower yourself to him because you didn't want to bully a crippled person." Chu Feng chuckled and said.
"You really know how to speak, but on that year, I really did lose."
"I lost, so I lost. I lost in the White-cloak Exam. On that year, if he did not obstruct me, perhaps I could see what the second stage was like." Zhuge Liuyun felt a bit of regret as he mentioned the matter of that year.
"Master, don't worry. I will help you finish your unfinished dream. I will pass the second stage and get the World Spirit White-cloak with my own abilities. I won't let you spend a single penny on me." Chu Feng was full of confidence.
"Good! You have ambition! If you can pass that exam, I'll give the thousand Origin beads for you. Use it when you get a wife in the future." Zhuge Liuyun patted Chu Feng's shoulders. He liked his disciple more and more.
"Heh, thank you master." Chu Feng's smile was very dazzling. He felt quite close to Zhuge Liuyun as he looked at his kind appearance and at the attitude he treated himself.
Since the World Spirit Guild did not allow the entrance of random people, Chu Feng could only enter by himself in order to participate in the White-cloak Exam.
As he held the qualification badge, Chu Feng entered the World Spirit Guild and he stepped into the huge city that was as vast as a kingdom. After layers of inspection, Chu Feng arrived within a grand palace.
It was truly an incomparably grand palace. The pillars in the main hall were so thick that even if ten people formed a circle arround it, they could not surround it. They were several hundred meters high and they were almost going to link to the heavens. That did not even seem like a palace. It was more like a castle. It was too huge.
People from the World Spirit Guild stood everywhere in the palace. Every single one of them were White-cloak World Spiritists and their auras could not be detected. However, they were certainly experts and the World Spirit Guild symbol on their arms seized people's attention.
People formed mountains and oceans in the center of the main hall. There were at least a thousand or so people there and they were all young. The oldest was not over twenty years old. There were geniuses everywhere and their cultivation were not weak either.
To know that the reason why Leng Wuzui was called a genius in the Azure Dragon School was because he had Spirit power, which not one within ten thousand people had.
However, at that instant and at that place, within the main hall, there were over a thousand people who were similar in terms of age with Chu Feng yet also had Spirit power. That scene would really make one sigh in admiration.
But thinking about it in more detail, it could be understood. After all, geniuses from all the provinces in the Nine Provinces were gathered there. Because the Azure Province lacked people with Spirit power did not mean that the other provinces were like that as well.
"Look, it's the geniuses of the World Spirit Guild!" Suddenly, someone yelled out and following that, everyone's gazes were cast over.
Dozens of young males and females were slowly walking over. Every single one of them wore a golden-coloured robe and it was quite dazzling. Also, the World Spirit Guild symbol was on their left arms.
The males were quite pretty and handsome, while the females were sweet and gorgeous. Every single person had a grand atmosphere. The weakest cultivation was only the 5th level of the Origin realm, whereas the strongest was the 7th level of the Origin realm.
From the people's discussions, Chu Feng also learnt where the group of people came from. They were the geniuses of the World Spirit Guild. However, their talent wasn't shown by their cultivation but by their comprehension in the power of Spirit Formation. Accordingly, some people even made a contract with a World Spirit and they were truly worthy of being a World Spiritist genius.


MGA Capitulo 181  Asura Ghost Tower
"These geniuses have not been seen in the past few exams, but I never would have thought that they all appeared in this one. Is today some sort of special day?" As someone yelled out, they did not forget to add in their speculation.
"Yeah, even Gu Bo appeared. He is the number one person in the young generation within the World Spirit Guild. He is only sixteen years old and he is already at the 7th level of the Origin realm. According to rumours, his attainment in the Spirit Formation technique cannot be compared by anyone."
Even more people's gazes were gathered on the young man who led the group of geniuses. That young man was as pretty as a female and there was an amiable smile on his face which was not forced at all.
"Gu Bo, you've finally decided to participate in the White-cloak Exam?" Just at that time, another clear voice suddenly rang out. Looking over, a group of young males and females who wore black clothes also walked into the hall.
The group of young males and females had around a hundred people. They were also the dragons and phoenixes within men and women. Not only was the number of people no less than the geniuses in the World Spirit Guild, their cultivation was not inferior as well.
The young man who led was exactly the same as Gu Bo, being also at the 7th level of the Origin realm. Their ages were also extremely similar, seeming that he was also sixteen years old.
However, when the group of young males and females were compared to the geniuses from the World Spirit Guild, there was a sharp contrast. They did not have a single trace of smile on their faces and they only had faces of proudness.
"It's the geniuses of the Jie Clan! They are also joining the White-cloak Exam? What day is today?"
"Is that person the number one person in the young generation of the Jie Clan, Jie Bufan?"
The appearance of the young males and females raised another huge reaction from the crowd. They were the people from the ancient genius clan, the Jie Clan.
"Jie Bufan. A hundred years ago, the seniors of my World Spirit Guild had a Spirit Formation contest in the Twisted Forest with your Jie Clan, but ended up with a tie."
"Today, the young generation from both your side and mine are gathering here again. This is truly fate." Gu Bo smiled and said.
"Less of this. On that year, if that mysterious person did not come in to meddle, my Jie Clan would have beaten your World Spirit Guild."
"It is not fate that we meet here today. It is the contest between the two young generations. You and I both know that in our hearts, so there is no need to act." Jie Bufan coldly snorted and said.
"You Jie guy, what are you being crazy for? Today, the Asura Ghost Tower will press you down and none of you will even be able to go onto the fourth floor." A young man in the World Spirit Guild yelled displeasedly.
"The fourth floor? Are you going there?" Jie Bufan sneered and said.
"I" That young man's expression changed and he was slightly speechless.
"The trash should shut up. Mentioning the fourth floor with me... It would be luck if you could even go onto the third floor." Jie Bufan had disdain all over his face.
"True, I can't go onto the fourth floor, but Gu Bo certainly can. He will press you to death on the fourth floor." The young man rebuked.
"Gu Bo? I do believe that Gu Bo can, but regrettably, my target is the fifth floor. Gu Bo, do you dare to come?" Jie Bufan asked.
"I'll see you on the fifth floor." Gu Bo lightly smiled and spoke no more. He led the geniuses from the World Spirit Guild into a luxurious room. It was a resting place, however, not just anyone could enter that area.
As they saw the geniuses walking over, the people from the World Spirit Guild nodded and bent over towards Gu Bo and the others. It could be seen that not only were their talent not bad, their statuses were quite something as well. Or else, how would the experts be so polite to them?
"Let's go." Jie Bufan also took out a special badge and walked towards another luxurious resting room in the hall. As they faced that group, the people from the World Spirit Guild did not dare to be disrespectful as well.
"So today is the great battle that happened between the World Spirit Guild and the Jie Clan a hundred years ago? No wonder. No wonder so many geniuses have gathered here today."
"It seems that there will be good things to see today. But sadly, it would very hard for us to arrive to that Asura Ghost Tower." After the group of geniuses walked away, the crowd started their discussions once again.
"Big bro, what is the Twisted Forest? And what about the Asura Ghost Tower? How about the several floors that they talked about?" Chu Feng curiously asked.
"You don't even know this? This is the first time that you've been in the Spirit Province right?" That young man looked at Chu Feng strangely.
"Yeah, I came from the Azure Province." Chu Feng smiled at the harmless person.
"Azure ProvinceThat's still quite close, but after all, those who aren't from the Spirit Province cannot be blamed for not knowing this."
"I'll tell you about it. There are three stages to this White-cloak Exam. The first is the Spirit Formation control, and the examination is about the controlling ability over one's Spirit Formation. To pass the first stage, you only need to be able to use the Spirit Formation technique and it isn't hard to pass that."
"The harder one is the second stage, the Twisted Forest. The Twisted Forest is a huge formation by itself. There aren't any mechanisms within it, however, the fog is extremely dense there and the examination is about the World Spiritist's observation power."
"As long as you can pass the Twisted Forest, the World Spirit White-cloak will be free and there will even be a reward. Everyone who pass that stage can get a single Spirit Fruit seed."
"Spirit Fruit seed?"
"That's right, it is the seed of a Spirit Fruit. This Spirit Fruit seed is quite a good thing, It can make one's Spirit Formation power even purer and their Spirit power even stronger."
"However, after all, it is only a seed and the power it contains is limited. So, if they are willing to, they can enter the third stage, and that's the Asura Ghost Tower!"
"The Asura Ghost Tower contains Spirit Pressure. The Spirit Pressure can quickly speed up the growth of the Spirit Fruit seed."
"From what I've heard, the second floor will make the Spirit Fruit Seed sprout the third floor will make it grow branches and leaves the fourth floor will make it blossom the fifth floor will make it bear fruit and the sixth floor will ripen the Spirit Fruit."
"However, the Spirit Pressure is detrimental to the human body so it has to be held off with Spirit power. There are extremely high Spirit power requirements. Not how much they have, but their quality. One's willpower."
"The Spirit Pressure can be said to be a test about a World Spiritist's talent. Up until now, there hasn't been anyone who could reach the sixth floor and those who stepped onto the fifth floor are already true geniuses." That person explained to Chu Feng.
"This is really great."
Chu Feng rejoiced in his heart. He never would have thought that the reward for the second stage in the exam was the Spirit Fruit seed he wanted. As long as he went onto the Asura Ghost Tower, he could let the seed grow.
He only needed to step onto the sixth floor in order for the seed to grow and bear ripe fruit. Which also meant that Chu Feng could save Eggy. How could he not be happy?
However, the name "Asura Ghost Tower" caused Chu Feng to raise a thought. He clearly remembered when Eggy displayed her special power, she mentioned the word "Asura".


MGA Capitulo 182  Pinnacle Geniuses
"The Asura Ghost Tower! What a strange name!" Chu Feng acted as if he didn't understand as he talked to himself.
"This Asura Ghost Tower is not a simple thing. According to rumours, it has over ten thousand years of history. It has treasures contained within it, and the reason why the World Spirit Guild was built here was because they wanted to monopolize the Asura Ghost Tower."
"For this Asura Ghost Tower, there were plenty of conflicts between the World Spirit Guild and the Jie Clan."
"The most recent one was a hundred years ago when geniuses that were unseen for a thousand years appeared in both the World Spirit Guild and the Jie Clan."
"Under the guidance of the two geniuses, the people from the World Spirit Guild and the Jie Clan had an unprecedented flourishing time period. The Spirit Province at that time was named as the strongest within the Nine Provinces."
"One day, the genius from the Jie Clan led everyone from the Jie Clan to the World Spirit Guild and they swore to retake the Asura Ghost Tower."
"Neither side backed down and a great battle was going to happen. At that time, if a battle happened, it would undoubtedly cause the entire Spirit Province to collapse because the World Spirit Guild and the Jie Clan were too strong."
"However, to avoid unnecessary deaths and injuries, the genius from the World Spirit Guild suggested to have a duel in Spirit Formation techniques against the Jie Clan's genius. The victor could take over the Asura Ghost Tower."
"The location of the duel was the Twisted Forest. From what I've heard, the Spirit Formation technique that the two people used that day were used to the extreme. Their battle truly caused the sky to dusk and the ground to darken, and the sun nor moon shone." As he mentioned the past events that happened that year, his hand danced as he gestured all over the place, as if he personally saw everything that happened.
"At the end, who won?" Chu Feng was intrigued on which genius won and which genius lost.
"Sigh.. Both of them lost!" That person shook his head as he sighed while his face had nothing but pity.
"Both of them lost? Both were injured and lost, or was it a tie?" Chu Feng closely asked.
"They were defeated by someone." That person said.
"Defeated by someone? Weren't the two people the strongest geniuses at that time? How could they be defeated by someone?" Chu Feng also felt quite shocked.
From what the young man said, the two geniuses were very impressive existences. How could they have been defeated? How strong would the person who defeated them be?
"They were indeed defeated, but they were defeated by a World Spiritist that did not belong to the Spirit Province. The age of that World Spiritist was even younger than the geniuses from the World Spirit Guild and the Jie Clan. A genius amongst geniuses." The young man narrated.
"That strong? Who was that person called? Did anyone know where that person came from?" Chu Feng was instantly curious as to who that person was. That person was truly strong if he was able to defeat two pinnacle geniuses by himself.
"No one knew what he was called nor did anyone know where he came from. They only knew that his cultivation was impressive, and his Spirit Formation technique could be said to be perfect."
"However, he had a special characteristic, and it was that he had a pair of sharp ears. His pupils were red, and he had a mouthful of sharp teeth."
"Because his appearance was special, some people even suspected that he was a Monstrous Beast. However, it is a taboo for Monstrous Beasts to cultivate in Spirit Formation techniques. So, even more people felt that his appearance was just a bit strange."
"It is impossible for such a strong person to be so nameless. If he was still alive, his name should have shaken the world. How is it possible that no one knows what he is called?" Chu Feng was very confused.
"You are correct. In that year when he defeated both the peak geniuses of the World Spirit Guild and the Jie Clan, he got the rights over the Asura Ghost Tower. He already shook the Nine Provinces and even the Jiang Dynasty wanted to rope him in with them and start friendly relationships."
"But sadly, soon after he defeated the two geniuses, he completely disappeared and he never appeared again. So naturally, no one would know his name and he was extremely mysterious."
"As for the two geniuses, since they were defeated, they were dispirited and they both secluded themselves. They still haven't come out today, but with the talent that the two of them had that year, I'm sure that they must be even more impressive today."
"Exactly because of the existences of those two people, very few people dare to invade the Spirit Province because they felt that if the two people came out, within the Nine Provinces, the Spirit Province could certainly still be ranked as first."
"What are those two geniuses called?"
"The one from the Jie Clan is called Jie Shi."
"The one from the World Spirit Guild is called Gu Tian Chen."
"However, even if the two people are still alive right now, they would be old man who were at the end of their life. I wonder if the glory of the two people could still be seen."
"AhhWhat a shame. The two geniuses that couldn't be met in a thousand years were dispirited just like that." As a person from the Spirit Province, that young man clearly felt that the two geniuses being disheartened was quite a pity.
"It is indeed a shame, but I feel more pity towards the mysterious person who defeated the two people. After all, with his strength, he should not be unknown." Chu Feng said.
After waiting a good four hours, the so-called World Spiritist White-cloak Exam finally started. There were innumerable doors in the vast palace. Under the arrangement of the World Spirit Guild, Chu Feng and two others formed a group and entered a room.
After entering the room, a square palace appeared. There was another door on the other side of the palace. In front of the door was a person, and it was a middle-aged man with a grey-coloured cloak. Obviously, he was a Grey-cloak World Spiritist.
There were three human-shaped statues in the middle of the palace. They were made with black iron and there was a simple Spirit Formation laid on it. They were a lot more hard than normal black iron.
"Shatter a statue. The amount of strikes will be in the single-digits. The faster it is shattered, the higher the points." The middle-aged man flatly said.
"I'll go first. I only need ten strikes to take care of this thing." The young man to Chu Feng's left walked over.
[TN In terms of Chinese character, ten is "十", whereas eleven is "十一", so ten strikes are still "single-digits".]
That person was quite healthy and he was two meters tall. His arm muscles were even thicker than Chu Feng's thigh and from his appearance, he looked like an big adult man.
He arrived in front of the statue. First, he warmed his body up a bit and clear sounds of knuckles cracking were emitted. After that, he fiercely used strength and emanated his aura which was at the 3rd level of the Origin realm. Then, he continuously threw the fists out that were as big as sandbags.
*clang clang clang clang*
The fists landed on the statue and they made noises of steel colliding with one another. There were even sparks. After the tenth fist landed, a crack really did appear on the statue and the crack quickly spread. At the end, the statue split into two and it landed on the floor.
At that instant, the well-built young man spun around and smiled proudly at Chu Feng and the young female who was to Chu Feng's right.
Actually, he was mainly smiling to that young female. Although she wasn't any great beauty, she was still quite pretty. The two round things that were worthy of being proud of in front of her chest clearly suited the well-built young man's taste.
The well-built young man showed two rows of bright white teeth towards the young female. He even did some impressive actions with his strong muscles, but they did not do anything as the young female did not even look at him. However, he was not disappointed and he continued to do those attracting actions.
"A bare pass."
However, when such an evaluation came from behind, the face of the well-built young man instantly went stiff and the corner of his mouth twitched.


MGA Capitulo 183  Twisted Forest
"Hmph. Trash."
The young female who did not speak for a long time shot a glance at the well-built young man as she passed him. She arrived in front of the black iron statue, then suddenly raised her leg and started to attack. The cultivation of the 4th level of the Origin realm was displayed without restraint.
*swoosh swoosh*
The young female's kicking techniques were quite impressive. They were quick, afterimages were created, and they had strong power. Wind was lifted up and it was not a simple kicking technique. It was a martial skill. A very strong kicking technique martial skill that would not be weaker than rank 4.
*boom* After the fifth kick, a boom rang out and the black iron statue broke into pieces from the young female and the chunks fell to the floor.
"Did you see that? I only need five strikes myself." The young female smugly shot a glance at the well-built young man.
The face of the young man was currently very ugly. No matter if it was cultivation or methods, she was indeed stronger than him. He could not say anything back even after he was mocked. Who told him to mess around in front of her before right?
"Mm, not bad. Pass." The World Spirit Guild member nodded his head in satisfaction.
At that instant, of the four people at scene, three of them subconsciously cast their gaze towards Chu Feng. Expectation was filled in the gaze of the well-built young man.
After the young female finished, he felt that he had no more face. However, he knew that he could get back some face from Chu Feng because he could feel that Chu Feng's cultivation was a mere 1st level of the Origin realm.
The test in front of them had no relation to Spirit Formation techniques and it was only a simple cultivation test. So, the well-built young man felt that with Chu Feng there, he would not lose the most face and he would not be at the bottom.
Under the gazes of the three people, Chu Feng stuck his chest out and raised his head. Without hurrying, he walked in front of the black iron statue. He first opened his five fingers then tightly closed them and after raising his hand, he punched the black iron statue.
Chu Feng's punch was exceptionally quick. It was truly just like lightning. With a boom, the incomparably hard black iron statue was completely shattered by Chu Feng's punch. It did not break into pieces. It truly shattered.
"One strike! He only used one strike!"
As they looked at the shattered statue fragments on the floor, all three people who were there were greatly astounded. The young female slightly opened her little mouth in astonishment and her eyes tightly stared at Chu Feng with indescribable shock.
As for the World Spirit Guild elder, his gaze glittered as well and only after a good while did he calm down and slightly nodded. He smiled and said with satisfaction, "Not bad. A hard to find good seedling."
"How is this possible? This guy is clearly only at the 1st level of the Origin realm. He did not use any martial skill yet he so easily shattered the black iron statue into pieces as if it was nothing?"
However, the one with the most wonderful expression was the well-built young man. No matter what, he would not have thought that Chu Feng who seemed as weak as dregs was strong to that degree.
Even a person at the 5th level of the Origin realm could not necessarily do that. However, Chu Feng who was only at the 1st level of the Origin realm could. What did that mean? Those who had a bit of intelligence could think of the impressiveness within.
After the martial power test, the Spirit Formation technique test followed. The most important parts were the control over the Spirit Formation, the hardness of the Spirit Formation, and the sensitivity of the Spirit power.
At first, what the well-built young man's attitude towards Chu Feng was that he felt that Chu Feng had strong martial power to the point of abnormality was because he suspected Chu Feng spent most of his time on cultivation. It was possible that he was weaker in terms of Spirit Formation technique when compared to him and the young female.
However, when Chu Feng displayed his methods with the Spirit Formation techniques, no matter if it was the young man or the young female, or even the World Spiritist from the World Spirit Guild, all of them were dumbstruck and they were completely overwhelmed by Chu Feng's strength.
At the end, the three of them successfully passed the tests and they passed the first stage of the White-cloak Exam. They could take a new badge to leave that place to buy a World Spirit White-cloak.
However, after the exam finished, the World Spiritist from the World Spirit Guild left Chu Feng's name behind. He also gave Chu Feng an evaluation of "a hard to see genius".
"Chu Feng bro, your strength truly isn't fake and I would really kowtow in admiration."
"Brother Chu Feng, with your strength, you are going to challenge the second stage right? How aboutwe go together?"
After passing the first stage, the three people walked out the palace. No matter if it was the well-built young man or the alluring young female, both of them started to set up a relationship between them and Chu Feng. The alluring young female even wanted to go together with Chu Feng.
After all, the second stage was the Twisted Forest. Not only did it have high requirements for World Spiritists in all sorts of areas, there was also a certain requirement in terms of martial power because inside the Twisted Forest, the most dangerous things were not mechanisms nor formations. It was people. So, no matter how you saw it, it would be easier for them to pass the stage if they went with Chu Feng.
"Let's go together then." Chu Feng lightly smiled and nodded his head.
"That's great. This second stage is not enough to scare us if we go along with you!" The well-built young man happily laughed.
"Who said that you're coming?" However, the young female fiercely glared at the young man. In tests like those, every single person would care about themselves more and they would not carry burdens without reason. Within the eyes of the young female, the well-built young man was a burden.
"I" The well-built young man wanted to say something but he stuffed it back down and disappointment emerged onto his face.
"Meeting is fate, so the three of us can go together." But just at that time, Chu Feng indifferently spoke.
"Chu Feng bro, you are truly a good person. Don't worry, I will certainly not drag you two behind." After hearing Chu Feng's words, the well-built young man rejoiced and gratitude was all over his face. As he felt gratitude, he did not forget to pat his chest to guarantee.
After Chu Feng spoke, even though the young female was not too willing to, she did not say anything more. After all, even she wanted to rely on Chu Feng's strength to pass the Twisted Forest. Since the person who she was relying on spoke, what right did she have to refuse?
Just like that, after the three of them walked out of the palace, none of them got the badge that represented the passing of the first stage and went go to purchase a World Spirit White-cloak. They only continued deeper in and entered the Twisted Forest.


MGA Capitulo 184  Meeting Yanzi Again
The Twisted Forest was a huge formation and it was laid by the World Spirit Guild when the guild was created. After endless improvements by World Spirit Guild's experts, the Twisted Forest's formation could not be deciphered by normal cultivators.
Even World Spiritists could get lost after entering it. If no one led the way, they would have no way of leaving that place and they would starve to death.
Although the Twisted Forest had "forest" in its name, in reality, there were not only trees within it. There were also stone sculptures and iron pillars, but no matter what they were, they had a Spirit Formation laid on it. Without the cultivation of the Profound realm, one should not even think of destroying any grass or wood there. Even experts of the Profound realm had to have a certain level of cultivation and ability.
Chu Feng and the two others walked within the forest. With Chu Feng's Spirit power and the observation power of the World Spirit Compass, the formation could not obstruct the steps of Chu Feng and the others.
However, before long after they entered, Chu Feng saw a familiar face. It was the Qixing's disciple who also came from the Azure Province and had his teeth shattered by Chu Feng, Yangzi.
Also, there were four extra people next to Yangzi. The four of them wore the clothing of a first-rate school and their cultivation was not weak either. Three of them were at the 4th level of the Origin realm, and another person was the same as Yangzi, also being at the 5th level of the Origin realm. From their clothing, Chu Feng could tell that they were core disciples of the Lingyun School.
"ChuChu Feng!" After seeing Chu Feng, Yangzi was incomparably stunned. He who did not have teeth first strangely yelled then fear filled his face. It could be seen that Chu Feng left quite a huge shadow on him.
"Chu Feng? Yangzi, this is the brat who had horrible behavior and beat you up like this?" After hearing Yangzi's words, the four others cast their gaze towards Chu Feng and disdainfully looked at him.
It was clear that they had heard of the matter between Chu Feng and Yangzi. However, they showed doubt towards Chu Feng's cultivation. After all, Yangzi was a person at the 5th level of the Origin realm, and Chu Feng was only at the 1st level of the Origin realm.
"Liu Biao, let's quickly go." Yangzi turned around and wanted to leave. He even went and pulled the disciple from the Lingyun School.
"Sigh... Yangzi, what are you doing? Are you really afraid of his brat?" However, Liu Biao flung Yangzi's hand away and interestingly looked at Chu Feng.
"Yangzi, no need to be afraid. We will take revenge for you." The other three people already spread apart and laid a strong Spirit Formation to block Chu Feng and the others' escape.
"Chu Feng, this isn't good! They are extremely powerful!" While facing that situation, the alluring young female's face tensed up. The opponents did not conceal their auras and they had quite impressive control over the Spirit Formation, so she lost all confidence.
As for the well-built young man, he had fear and regret all over his face. Naturally, fear because he was scared by Liu Biao, Yangzi, and the others' might. Regret because he regretted being greedy for conveniences. He wanted to rely on Chu Feng's methods to pass the Twisted Forest, but he never would have thought that Chu Feng had such huge enemies. They even coincidentally passed that place and dragged him into the mess.
The Twisted Forest was sealed, and things like enemies meeting as they killed each other were not rare. Pretty much no one would investigate that and it was also the most dangerous part of the Twisted Forest.
"Chu Feng, seeing that you are also from the Azure Province, I'll give you a chance. Beg for forgiveness and shatter your own front teeth, then I'll spare your life."
Liu Biao stood from nearby and he was like a king looking down on the petty commoners. Although he said that he would give Chu Feng a chance on the surface, icy cold killing intent was revealed within his gaze.
"That's fine. Today, we will work together and finish off this brat." Seeing that Liu Biao and the others were so determined, Yangzi did not escape anymore and he also revealed dense killing intent.
"Doggy, you are quite popular and you actually have a few bad friends. However, from what I see, they won't be able to help you. Instead, they have harmed you."
Chu Feng lightly smiled then suddenly waved his big sleeve. An formless hurricane with him as the center spread out and it instantly shattered the Spirit Formation that the three people laid.
"This" At that instant, everyone on scene was stunned. However, they were even more stunned as after the Spirit Formation was shattered, another strong Spirit Formation was formed and Yangzi and the others were all sealed within.
The strength of that Spirit Formation was clearly multiple times stronger than the one before, and the reason why they were so shocked was because the Spirit Formation was laid by Chu Feng. He did not even move his hand and he controlled the Spirit Formation purely with his Spirit power.
"You want me to shatter my own front teeth? Do you even have the ability to do so?"
With a thought, Chu Feng spread his cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm out without restraint. However, that strong pressure caused every single person in the Spirit Formation to tremble. Even Liu Biao who had a threatening aura before could not remain calm anymore.
"Illusions.. Do you really think I would be tricked by your illusions?"
Liu Biao did not believe that Chu Feng was truly that strong. He raised his palm and his Origin power surged. The well-built young man and the alluring female tightly frowned when facing that might and they quickly hid behind Chu Feng because that attack was not something that they could hold back.
However, the strong attack that was seen by the young man and the young female's eyes was not even worth mentioning in front of Chu Feng. Without even moving, Chu Feng used the pressure of his 1st level of the Origin realm to dissolve Liu Biao's attack.
"A bunch of garbage. You want to help others with only this kind of strength?"
"Kneel!" Chu Feng coldly snorted and strengthened the pressure. The formless aura surged within the Spirit Formation and the air even howled strangely from the mad and violent power. Chu Feng finally displayed his true strength.
Under such strong pressure, Liu Biao and the others did not have the atmosphere that they had earlier. With a poof, they knelt on the ground and they could not defend against the pressure. On the other hand, Yangzi was still standing and from that, it meant that Liu Biao and the others' cultivation was far from Yangzi's.
"Chu Feng, you"
While facing that scene, the well-built young man and the alluring young female had wonder all over their faces. Although they did not feel Chu Feng's pressure from his aura, they could still tell that Chu Feng relied on his personal pressure to forcefully cause three experts at the 4th level of the Origin realm and one person at the 5th level of the Origin realm to kneel on the ground.
"Shatter your own front teeth and I'll spare your life!" Chu Feng coldly spoke.
"Don't even think about that!" One of them angrily howled.
"You want to die?" Chu Feng lightly smiled, then flung one of his fingers. A ray of lightning shot out from that finger, and like a sharp sword, it pierced that person's chest.
"Ahh~~" That person painfully cried out before powerlessly laying on the floor. He did not breathe anymore.
"Chu Feng, you dare to kill us?! You are dead. Our school will not forgive you. Not only you, even your own school will be exterminated." Seeing that Chu Feng really murdered, the two other people were fearful and afraid.
*bzz* Just after they spoke, two rays of lightning flashed past and the two people fell on the floor.
After using the lightning methods to finish off the three of them, Chu Feng cast his icy gaze towards Liu Biao and Yangzi.
"Chu Feng, spare me! Spare me!! I will not dare to be disrespectful to your master anymore!" Yangzi was so terrified that tears covered his face and he took the initiative to beg at Chu Feng.
"Chu Feng, I'll shatter my front teeth! I'll shatter them right now, so please don't kill me!" Liu Biao was quite blunt and he raised his hand, then punched his mouth three times. Red blood flowed out after he did that. That was not wretchedness. That was simply sad.
However, Chu Feng's had no expression on his face as he looked at what the two did, and he coldly said, "Too late!"


MGA Capitulo 185  Stepping on the Heavens Ladder
"Chu Feng, I'll kill you!"
Seeing that Chu Feng was going to kill him, Yangzi did not pettily beg anymore and he rose to attack Chu Feng. Liu Biao also did the same thing.
Both of them used rank 5 martial skills and they channeled all their Origin power into them. It was a wager on their life and the power could not be compared to the attacks before.
On one side, a huge tiger was condensed from Origin power. Its fur pulsed and it was vivid as though it was alive. Its roar was enough to shake the mountains and rivers, and its claws could shatter mountain peaks. It attacked Chu Feng with the might of being a king of ten thousand beasts.
On the other side, sharp swords were formed by Origin power and they did not look illusionary. They looked quite real and there were over a thousand Origin power flying swords. Truly, thousand swords were released at the same time with unstoppable might.
"Strong!"
At that instant, the faces of both the well-built young man and the alluring young female were tight and fear was in their eyes. The attack in front of their eyes was easily enough to kill the two of them without leaving any residue.
So, they could only stand behind Chu Feng. They had to stand behind the young man who was younger than both of them. The alluring young female even tightly grabbed onto Chu Feng's clothes because Chu Feng was the only person who she could rely on at that moment.
"Ho... It is still too weak."
Chu Feng's long robe was moving back and forth from the wind created by the strong might. His hair also demonically fluttered while flying up and down.
However, he was still standing where he was without dodging nor avoiding it. A faint smile was even hung on his face as he silently waited for the attack.
*hmm*
As the attacks were going to engulf them, Chu Feng's eyes suddenly flashed and a shiny and translucent Spirit Formation which was like a mirror appeared in front of him.
*boom*
The fierce tiger and the thousands of swords collided onto the Spirit Formation which was like a thin piece of ice at the same time. Instantly, violent ripples were created and the force even shook the ground under Chu Feng's feet.
But at the end, they were still unable to penetrate Chu Feng's line of defense. After the two person's attacks disappeared, the Spirit Formation in front of Chu Feng was undamaged. There were not even any cracks.
"Are you even a person? With your cultivation, how can you grasp such methods?" Liu biao was panicking and he was terrified. He had never seen such a scary opponent before. He could not treat him as a person, but as a monster.
"It's not that I, Chu Feng, am impressive, but none of you have seen a truly strong person."
Chu Feng bitterly smiled because he suddenly remembered the purple-clothed girl. In the eyes of many, he was already a monster. However, when compared to that purple-clothed girl, he was as ordinary as he could get. That was the distance between both humans.
"Bastard."
Seeing that the attacks against Chu Feng were useless, Yangzi started to attack the Spirit Formation that locked them within. However, he was still useless and that made him as angry as a storm, but he could not do anything about it.
"It's time to finish it."
Finally, Chu Feng's face turned cold and as he barely raised his hand, lightning surged out from it and following that, it became two huge lightning dragons. They opened their bloody mouth and after a deafening roar, they flew towards Yangzi and Liu Biao.
The Third Thunder Style. It was no longer Chu Feng's strongest method, but displaying it at that moment still brought incomparably terrifying might. It was similar to how a Heaven realm expert could still display terrifying might with a rank 1 martial skill.
"Chu Feng, I will not forgive you even if I become a ghost!"
Those were the words that Yangzi last said because when the lightning dragon consumed his body, he did not even make any noise. He was forcefully burnt up and there was not even a corpse remaining.
After killing Yangzi and Liu Biao, Chu Feng used the Third Thunder Style to destroy the other three corpses. He truly did not leave any traces behind.
"I hope that you two can keep this matter a secret." After finishing all that off, Chu Feng smiled and said to the young man and the young female.
"Don't worry, we will absolutely not reveal half a word about this."
The young female and the young man promised with everything they had. Although Chu Feng smiled quite kindly at them, after seeing what he could do, from deep within their hearts, they already felt fear towards Chu Feng.
After all, that matter was related to them. If they spread it out, there would be a hundred troubles but zero benefits. So, naturally, they would keep it a secret.
"Quite ruthless methods! Killing and removing the traces huh?" But just at that time, a voice from nearby suddenly rang out.
"Who?" Chu Feng slightly frowned from the sudden change. He spread out his Spirit power but he could not feel a single trace of aura nearby.
"Haha, afraid? Don't worry, we've already gotten used of these things and we won't talk about it." That voice rang out again. Behind a tall stone sculpture, two figures walked out.
They were two young man. Their appearances were not ordinary and the special black clothing that they were wearing was the clothing of the Jie Clan.
"Jie Clan!"
At that instant, not only Chu Feng, even the well-built young man and the alluring female felt quite shocked because the name of the Jie Clan was too famous. It represented the pinnacle of World Spiritists and they were the idols for many World Spiritists.
"What intentions do you two have by secretly hiding there?"
Chu Feng's gaze was like a torch as he stared at the two people. Although they were close and in front of their eyes, Chu Feng was still unable to feel their auras. They were simply like the air and Chu Feng knew that the two people were not simple.
"We just coincidentally passed by. Since we saw quite an entertaining battle, we stopped to take a look." The young man who was slightly taller faintly smiled and said.
"Entertaining battle? They were just a bunch of trash from the Azure Province. Dogs biting dogs." The other slightly shorter young man had an expression of contempt.
"Trash from the Azure Province? You two?" After hearing the words of the slightly shorter young man, Chu Feng's face was clearly displeased. At the end, he was still from the Azure Province so naturally he did not like people mocking his Azure Province.
"Us? We are the ladders to heaven that you can never be compared to. You can only look up to us." The slightly shorter young man had smug written on his face as he disdainfully looked at Chu Feng as well as the well-built young man and the alluring beauty behind Chu Feng.
At that moment, not to mention Chu Feng, even the well-built young man the alluring young female were greatly displeased. However, they did not dare to show that because they were people from the Jie Clan. They really did have the qualifications to be arrogant.
*whoosh* Suddenly, Chu Feng attacked. Without any warning, he attacked the slightly shorter young man with his lightning methods.
"Hmph."
The slightly shorter young man was not simple so he quickly discovered Chu Feng's actions. With a cold snort, he emanated his aura of the 5th level of the Origin realm. Not only did he not dodge or avoid it, he raised his palm and slapped towards Chu Feng.
However, he still underestimated Chu Feng. With the flickering of lightning under Chu Feng's feet, instantly, he disappeared. When he reappeared, he was already behind the slightly shorter young man.
"Careful."
In response, the slightly taller young man yelled out but it was too late. Chu Feng kicked the waist of the slightly shorter young man, and since he was caught off guard, the slightly shorter young man directly fell face first onto the ground.
"Damn you.. mm."
The slightly shorter young man was incomparably furious as he opened his mouth and he was going to curse, however before he even finished speaking, Chu Feng's feet already descended from the heavens and landed on top of his brain, ferociously forcing his face into the earth.
"To me, Chu Feng, the ladder to heaven is not for looking. It's for stepping!"


MGA Capitulo 186  Releasing the Tiger Back to Its Mountain
With lightning methods, Chu Feng struck the Jie Clan member and stepped on him with his foot. That action was quite daring.
That stupefied the well-built young man and the alluring young female. Their expressions were as wonderful as they could get, however most of it was fear. After all, they were tied up with Chu Feng, and since Chu Feng offended the Jie Clan, even they had to be pulled down with him.
"Bro, can you spare him?" The slightly taller Jie Clan member did not attack but respectfully pleaded at Chu Feng.
As for the reason why he didn't attack was simple. After seeing Chu Feng's strength and his methods, he was undoubtedly looking to die if he attacked Chu Feng.
"If I spare him, would he spare me?" Chu Feng coldly smiled and said.
"Bro. I, Jie Chuan, vow to the heavens that I will not do anything about today's matter. If I my younger brother, Jie Heng, dares to find you for trouble, you don't need to do anything. I'll discipline him myself."
The slightly taller young man raised his hand and guaranteed. He also emanated his aura. He was an expert of the 6th level of the Origin realm.
Chu Feng slightly frowned. He was in a bit of a difficult situation. At first, he was planning to kill the two people and also steal the things that they had because if they were able to escape from Chu Feng's Spirit power detection, they would certainly have treasures on their bodies.
However, he saw sincerity in Jie Chuan's eyes, and the reason why Jie Chuan was emanated his aura was not for displaying his might towards Chu Feng, it was to show sincerity. It allowed Chu Feng to know his foundation.
"Bro, my younger brother had spoke rudely before, so please take this as compensation."
Jie Chuan took his own Cosmos Sack off and also Jie Heng's Cosmos Sack off of his waist. After taking two World Spirit Compasses out, he gave the two Cosmos Sacks over to Chu Feng.
Chu Feng accepted the Cosmos Sacks and after investigation, he discovered that there were dozens of Origin beads inside. There were even some medical things for healing. To normal people, the things within were already quite expensive, but they weren't too much to Chu Feng. However, while Jie Chuan was doing that, Chu Feng truly could not get angry because Chu Feng was a person who liked to be persuaded but not forced.
Chu Feng took the things out from the two Cosmos Sacks and stuffed them into his own. After that, he returned the two empty Cosmos Sacks back to Jie Chuan before pulling Jie Heng up from the ground and saying, "You have a good elder brother."
"I'll kill you!" After being freed from his restrictions, he wanted to attack as if he was insane.
*bang*
However, before even Chu Feng moved, Jie Chuan landed a loud and clear slap on Jie Heng's face and angrily reprimanded, "Have you not lost enough face? Get over to the side!"
Just as he finished speaking, Jie Chuan kicked Jie Heng and caused him to fly a dozen or so meters away. Although Jie Heng was extremely angry, he did not dare to not obey Jie Chuan. After climbing back up, he did not say anything but fiercely glared at Chu Feng before leaving.
"Chu Feng, thank you for giving me face. Although this cannot be said to be ‘no discord, no concord', if we meet again by chance in the future, I will invite you to a cup of beer." Jie Chuan lightly smiled as he clasped his hands towards Chu Feng before catching up to Jie Heng.
"Chu Feng bro, you've stirred up a disaster!" After the two people disappeared from their line of sight, the well-built man had a face full of terror.
"You really shouldn't have let them go! You simply released the tiger back to its mountain." The alluring young female was even more direct.
"If you two are afraid, you can choose to return. I can point a road for you to go back." Chu Feng smiled and said.
"We"
The two of them sank into silence. Although Chu Feng angered a huge enemy and they were very afraid, the attraction to pass the second stage was even greater. After all, as long as they passed the second stage, they could save the money that would have been used to buy the World Spirit White-cloak. That was a thousand Origin beads! No matter who it was, that was not a small number.
"If you're not afraid, continue. I will protect your safety while passing through this Twisted Forest." After saying those words, Chu Feng continued forward and the two people behind also followed him.
Chu Feng did understand the logic of releasing a tiger back to its mountain. Especially after experiencing the Jie Clan's methods to conceal their aura, Chu Feng walked quite carefully after that.
From then on, they really did meet a few Jie Clan members, however after assessing Chu Feng and the others with a proud attitude, they quickly left as if afraid that Chu Feng would follow them.
After several hours of walking, and finally, when the sun set in the west, they walked out of the Twisted Forest. They received a World Spirit White-cloak and also a Spirit Fruit Seed.
"Can this thing really save Eggy?"
Looking at the completely green Spirit Fruit seed which was as big as an almond in his palm, Chu Feng felt a bit of suspicion. Although that thing had some strange fluctuations, it was very weak and Chu Feng really had his doubts.
However, as he looked at the nearby exit in which he could see the Asura Ghost Tower after walking out of there, and also thinking of the changes that could be done to the seed within the Asura Ghost Tower, Chu Feng firmly walked out.
When Chu Feng and the two others walked out of the Twisted Forest, at the same time, their gazes were attracted by an ancient tower from nearby. That tower was not tall and it only had six floors, but it had quite a bit of attraction power.
The outer appearance of the ancient tower was very special and it was like a sharp teeth pulled out from the ground. It was completely black, but under the shine of the setting sun, it emitted strange red lights as if the black-coloured essence had a blood-red outer coat. It was quite strange.
Although, more or less, the ancient tower was a bit scary, the feeling that it gave people was that it was very beautiful. That was where its attraction power laid. It was the legendary Asura Ghost Tower.
However, at that very instant, the Asura Ghost Tower was closed. Everyone who wanted to attempt the third stage had to wait in a plaza outside of the tower. They were going to all enter at the same time when the tower opened.
"The Asura Ghost Tower. I would really like to enter and have a look." The well-built young man's face was filled with yearning.
"You? Don't think about it. After entering it, the pressure from the first floor would be enough to kill you." Without even caring about his feelings, the young female struck blows at him.
The young man did not retort the young female's words because what she said was true. Ordinary World Spiritists could not enter the Asura Ghost Tower. That was also why he did not plan to enter it.
"Brother Chu Feng, I wish you the best of luck to go onto the third floor. I heard that the third floor can make the Spirit Fruit seed grow branches and leaves. At that time, the Spirit Fruit seed would cost quite a bit." The alluring young female gave her own Spirit Fruit seed to Chu Feng.
"Chu Feng bro, I know you can do it. I'll wait for you outside, and after you succeed, come here and find me. I'll invite you to a big meal!"
The well-built young man also gave his own Spirit Fruit seed to Chu Feng and gave Chu Feng an address as well. It was the place he was resting in, outside of the World Spirit Guild.
Although the World Spirit seed was fairly worthy, with Chu Feng's help, they already got the World Spirit White-cloak for free and saved themselves a thousand Origin beads. So, they could not stop being grateful towards Chu Feng and naturally, they would not care about the Spirit Fruit seed.
After the well-built young man and the alluring young female left, Chu Feng also entered the plaza. All the people who prepared to enter the Asura Ghost Tower were waiting there. When the sky became dark, that was when the Asura Ghost Tower would open and they would enter it then.
At the same time that Chu Feng stepped into the plaza, a pair of eyes that had killing intent silently locked onto Chu Feng.


MGA Capitulo 187  The Third Stage
Chu Feng could feel that strange gaze so he looked in the direction of that icy cold gaze. Indeed, the Jie Clan member "Jie Heng" who was stepped by him earlier was currently fiercely staring at him from a distance.
Next to Jie Heng were dozens of Jie Clan members and Chu Feng could feel the pressure. The Jie Clan members were extremely strong, especially the young man called Jie Bufan. He was an expert of the 7th level of the Origin realm.
But luckily, Jie Chuan was always next to Jie Heng, and since he saw that Jie Heng's gaze was abnormal, he pulled Jie Heng and cast a sharp gaze at him. As he was being threatened by Jie Chuan, Jie Heng did not say anything and cast his gaze away.
That scene made Chu Feng relax. It could be seen that Jie Chuan still kept his promise and at least they didn't tell their clan about Chu Feng stepping on Jie Heng. Or else, with Jie Clan's arrogant nature, they would have already found Chu Feng for trouble.
Other than the Jie Clan members, there were dozens of people gathered on the other side as well. Those were the World Spirit Guild's geniuses. The opposing might of the two powers was very apparent and it could be seen that within the Asura Ghost Tower, there would certainly be some conflicts.
Other than the World Spirit Guild and the Jie Clan, there were also dozens of scattered people who were like Chu Feng. Which meant that although there were quite a few people that participated in the White-cloak Exam, at the end, there were not even three hundred people who dared to challenge the Asura Ghost Tower.
"Look, it's the elders from the World Spirit Guild."
Suddenly, someone yelled out and everyone in the entire plaza looked at one side. A large group of people appeared and they were all experts of the World Spirit Guild. Every single person had World Spirit Grey-cloaks, and three old people who had white hairs and beards were escorted by those experts.
Those old people did not wear World Spirit Cloaks that represented their status. They only wore simple cloth clothing. Although they had white hairs and beards, they had a florid complexion. One could feel their drawn-out aura, yet could not determine their depth. They were the real cultivation experts, and they were all at the peak of the Profound realm.
"ThatIsn't that the Jie Clan? They're here as well?"
Just at that time, on the other side of the plaza, another group of people who wore black clothing appeared. There were also innumerable experts and there were also three old people who led. Their cultivation was unfathomably deep but their gazes were abnormally prideful. It was the Jie Clan.
"The Jie Clan arrived as well! The World Spirit Guild is allowing the Jie Clan to enter their own territory?"
"You don't understand. Today is a special day. Since the geniuses of the Jie Clan are here, to prevent them from being bullied by others, naturally, the elders need to arrive as well."
"Besides, since the World Spirit Guild has stopped fighting for such a long time and they are an alliance, of course the Jie Clan can come here."
Chu Feng could still hear the quiet discussions of the people and he gained another level of understanding. Although the World Spirit Guild and the Jie Clan had a relationship of an enemy, and that was something that everyone knew, on the surface, they were an alliance.
Or perhaps the relationship of the two powers were not as unfriendly as people thought, or perhaps the two of them really were like fire and water. As for who truly knew, only the higher ups knew so Chu Feng didn't even bother to think about it.
After the two group of people appeared, they did not walk into the plaza but into a palace that was opposite to the Asura Ghost Tower. From there, they could see the entire Asura Ghost Tower and it should be a resting place for them.
At the same time, the powerful people from the World Spirit Guild started to explain the rules and the things to notice after entering the Asura Ghost Tower. Generally, if one could not resist the Spirit Pressure within, quickly leave the Asura Ghost Tower and do not forcefully endure or they would lose their lives.
Also, everyone was given a protective talisman. If one could not continue or had no way of getting out of the Asura Ghost Tower by themself, they could break the talismen and the World Spirit Guild would send people to save them. Of course, those who broke the talismen were the same as those who failed the exam. They would even lose their qualification to purchase the World Spirit White-cloak.
After the rules, the redden clouds from the sunset were no more and both the heaven and the earth were replaced with darkness. The Asura Ghost Tower was even stranger within the night because it was no longer completely dark. Within the black-coloured tower, from inside to outside, it emitted a faint, blood-red light, as if it was created by fresh blood. It was strange yet beautiful.
*rumble rumble rumble*
Under the envelopment of the darkness, the demon-like doors to the Asura Ghost Tower finally slowly opened. After the doors opened, the thing that appeared in front of them was not the insides of the Asura Ghost Tower. It was a blood-red Spirit Formation entrance. That was the real entrance to the Asura Ghost Tower.
"Go~~~"
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
Suddenly, someone shouted out and following that, the geniuses from the World Spirit Guild and the geniuses from the Jie Clan all rushed in at the same time. They were extremely quick and they displayed cultivation that was not mediocre.
Especially the peak genius of the World Spirit Guild, Gu Bo, and also the representative genius of the Jie Clan, Jie Bufan. Those two people were young geniuses who had the cultivation of the 7th level of the Origin realm. Within an instant, both of them entered the Asura Ghost Tower and they displayed methods that surpassed others.
After those two people rushed in, only then did the other people dared to go near the Asura Ghost Tower. Chu Feng did not hurry as well. He held the three Spirit Fruit seeds in his hand and he also followed the current of people as he entered the Asura Ghost Tower.
After stepping into the blood-red coloured Spirit Formation entrance, Chu Feng first experienced darkness, then when light appeared in front of his eyes, strong pressure engulfed him from all directions.
Spirit Pressure. Spirit Pressure was currently corroding Chu Feng's body. However, when Chu Feng spread out his Spirit power, it effectively held the Spirit Pressure back. Chu Feng also clearly felt that under the disturbance of the Spirit Pressure, change happened to the Spirit Fruit seeds within Chu Feng's hand.
"Ahh~~~~"
But before Chu Feng even got the chance to look at what happened to that Spirit Fruit seed, a miserable cry rang out from his surroundings. Someone was unable to hold the pressure of the Spirit Pressure and seven of his facial orifices had blood flowing out of them as he painfully rolled back and forth on the ground.
Suddenly, that person grabbed in front of him. It turned out that his protective talisman dropped nearby. However, at that instant, he already lost the ability to pick up that talismen.
At that very moment, a large number of people were surging in. But looking at that scene, many people only looked with cold eyes. Some people didn't even look at him as they sat cross-legged and started to feed the Spirit Fruit seed in their hands with the Spirit Pressure.
"Humans are truly cold." Chu Feng shook his head and arrived in front of that person. He picked up the talismen that belonged to him, but he didn't return to him. He carried that person onto his back.
At that instant, many people were confused. Even the person on Chu Feng's back cried in whispers as if protesting why he didn't break the protective talisman for him to save his life.
However, after Chu Feng carried him on his back, arrived at the Spirit Formation entrance, and stuffed the talismen into his Cosmos Sack, he suddenly understood. Chu Feng was not saving him, but helping him.
He was truly helping. He did not help him by breaking the protective talisman because breaking that would cause him to fail his exam. Chu Feng wanted him to escape the danger but also succeed in his exam.
Chu Feng pushed that person out. At that instant, Chu Feng could see that person's gaze of gratitude and he could also feel the strange gazes of the surrounding people. After all, it was a very physically exhausting thing to carry someone on his back while walking in the Asura Ghost Tower that was filled with Spirit Pressure. Most people would not have done that.
"Oh? You are quite full of compassion huh?" But just at that time, a dark, strange aura yet somewhat familiar voice rang out behind Chu Feng.


MGA Capitulo 188  Clan vs Guild
He turned his head to look, and only then did Chu Feng notice that the insides of the Asura Ghost Tower was quite grand and very big. There were three people standing on the stairs that led to the second floor.
The person in the middle was none other than Jie Heng. The two people standing next to Jie Heng were both Jie Clan members and they were currently giving off the aura of the 6th level of the Origin realm.
Chu Feng swept his glance around and he discovered that despite a lot of people sitting on the first floor of the Asura Ghost Tower, other than Jie Heng and the two others, there were no other Jie Clan members. It could be seen that Jie Heng was intentionally waiting for him.
"Your brother let you stay behind?" Chu Feng was quite displeased in his heart. After all, Jie Chuan was not next to Jie Heng and that made Chu Feng feel that it was intentional by Jie Chuan.
"What? You want to threaten me with my brother? I'll tell you that you won't have a chance because you won't go onto the second floor." Jie Heng sneered as he glared at Chu Feng with killing intent revealed in his gaze. It could be seen that he hated Chu Feng straight to the bones.
"Jie Heng, were you really beaten by this brat?" After one of the Jie Clan members looked at Chu Feng, they were quite suspicious.
"Don't underestimate him. He does have some methods and he cannot be treated as a normal person at the 1st level of the Origin realm." Jie Heng reminded.
"No matter how much more impressive he is, he is only at the 1st level of the Origin realm. Jie Gang, you and I attack together to finish off his brat. Quickly go and don't waste too much time here." That Jie Clan member looked at the other Jie Clan member who had the cultivation of the 6th level of the Origin realm.
"Mm." That person nodded and cast his ferocious gaze at Chu Feng. The two of them were going to attack Chu Feng.
"Oh? The Jie Clan are bullying people as a group again?" But just at that time, another voice suddenly rang out. Looking over, they saw five figures standing in the corner of the Asura Ghost Tower.
There were three males and two females. The five of them had quite strong auras and they were all at the 6th level of the Origin realm. They were currently smiling while looking at Jie Heng and the others. From their clothes, they were the geniuses of the World Spirit Guild.
"Maqiang, why aren't you quickly going up? What are you doing here?" Seeing that, the Jie Clan member called Jie Gang questioned.
"I knew that your Jie Clan would bully others. As someone from the World Spirit Guild, naturally, we would have the duty to maintain a fair examination environment." The male called Maqiang smiled and said. As he spoke, he did not forget to shoot Chu Feng a glance and kindly nodded at him.
"Maqiang, are you really going to meddle in so many affairs?" The Jie Clan members' faces were very ugly.
"So what if I am?" Maqiang indifferently smiled and said.
"Hmph. Just you see." The Jie Clan member coldly snorted then walked up. After all, they did not have confidence to face five experts who were at the 6th level of the Origin realm. After Jie Heng bitterly looked at Chu Feng, he could only follow as well.
"Bro, thanks." Chu Feng walked in front of Maqiang and the others and politely clasped his hands towards them. After all, they were complete strangers yet they were willing to help him. Chu Feng was quite moved from that.
"You're too polite. I am Maqiang. I wonder how I should call you as?" That Maqiang was quite courteous and the four other people next to him also amiably nodded at Chu Feng.
"I am Chu Feng." Chu Feng smiled and replied. He had quite good impressions towards the people from the World Spirit Guild because from the start, the geniuses of the World Spirit Guild did not have any airs of arrogance. They treated everyone with kindness.
They sharply contrasted the geniuses from the Jie Clan. Especially at that instant, after Maqiang helped him out a bit, Chu Feng's good impression towards the people from the World Spirit Guild multiplied by several times.
"So it's Chu Feng bro. Your Spirit power is quite impressive! On the first floor, you don't have a red face and you're not gasping so it seems that you won't be satisfied here. You are prepared to go onto the second floor right?" Maqiang smiled and asked.
"Mm." Chu Feng smiled and nodded.
"Since it's like this, come together with us." Maqiang smiled and led as he walked toward the second floor.
"Sorry for the trouble." Naturally, Chu Feng understood what Maqiang intended. He was worried that Jie Heng and the others would make things difficult for Chu Feng again so he wanted to protect Chu Feng as he went up the second floor.
Chu Feng followed Maqiang and he turned around to step on the stairs that led to the second floor. At the end of the stairs, similarly, there was also a Spirit Formation entrance. Behind that was the true second floor.
In the instant that he entered the Spirit Formation entrance, Chu Feng felt that the Spirit Pressure instantly strengthened by several times. However, to Chu Feng, it did not hurt nor did it itch and it was completely within his endurable range. Looking back at Maqiang and the others, more or less, they were a bit pressured but they could endure it.
After entering the second floor and after a few turns, only then did they enter the main hall. However, when Chu Feng swept his gaze towards his surroundings, his line of sight couldn't help but be attracted to a group of people because the group of people were exactly the same as Jie Heng as they blocked the road towards the third floor.
There were twenty-five Jie Clan members. Twenty of them were at the 5th level of the Origin realm while five of them were at the 6th level of the Origin realm. The two people who wanted to help Jie Heng to take care of Chu Feng were within them. As for the person who led, it was Jie Chuan.
After Jie Heng saw Chu Feng, a cold smile couldn't help but be raised on the corner of his mouth. However, Jie Chuan tightly frowned as he shot an eye-expression towards Chu Feng, as if he was telling Chu Feng to get away from Maqiang.
Chu Feng could understand Jie Chuan's meaning because he knew that the group of Jie Clan members were not waiting for him. They wanted to take care of Maqiang and the others from the World Spirit Guild.
Because at that very instant, in front of the Jie Clan members, young males and females laid on the ground and they were all people from the World Spirit Guild.
"You things that ought to die! You dare to act so wildly in my World Spirit Guild's territory?!" After seeing that, flames of fury burned within Maqiang and the others' heart as they loudly roared.
"Hehe, what are you talking about? Clearly, their own Spirit power were too weak and they had no way of resisting the Spirit Pressure in here. How is it related to us?" The Jie Clan members sneered.
"Hmph. We'll see if you can resist the Spirit Pressure here." Maqiang didn't bother speaking useless words and he attacked at the same time along with the four comrades next to him. They displayed all sorts of strong martial skills and attacked the Jie Clan members.
"Looking to die? I'll grant that wish!" The Jie Clan did not back down and they also fought aggressively with Maqiang and the others.
Maqiang and the others' cultivation were not weak and they were all at the 6th level of the Origin realm. However, perhaps because they were affected by the Spirit Pressure, they were not able to use their full strength. In addition, the Jie Clan had the numbers advantage so clearly, they were disadvantaged as they quickly entered a bad situation.
"Maqiang, if you beg for forgiveness on the ground, we can consider letting you enter the third floor." Someone said that within the Jie Clan.
"You want us to kneel down and beg for forgiveness? Go dream!" Maqiang coldy snorted and said.
"Then you cannot blame us for being heartless. Today, you will stop on this second floor." The Jie Clan member howled.
"Aah!" Just as he finished speaking, suddenly, a painful cry rang out and everyone saw a figure flew over. At the end, he fiercely collided onto the wall. After vomiting blood, he directly lost consciousness.


MGA Capitulo 189  Madly Oppressive
Many people did not expect the sudden scene. Although the Jie Clan members wanted to force the people from the World Spirit Guild to remain on that floor, they never thought about heavily injuring them. After all, it was the territory of the World Spirit Guild.
But when they saw the heavily injured person, their faces changed greatly because that wasn't a person from the World Spirit Guild. It was a Jie Clan member.
"What is this?!"
That scene made the Jie Clan members endlessly shocked. Even Maqiang and the others from the World Spirit Guild were dumbfounded and they couldn't understand what happened instantly.
"You are correct. Today, no one can save any of you!" Just at that time, a faint laughing sound suddenly rang out.
Looking over, they were greatly shocked once again. Chu Feng already walked into their battle circle and he was even rubbing his hands while being eager for battle.
"Chu Feng bro, you attacked just now?"
Maqiang stared at Chu Feng with astonishment because the Jiesh Clan member who fell on the ground, was heavily injured, and lost consciousness was at the 5th level of the Origin realm. However, everyone could feel that Chu Feng was at the 1st level of the Origin realm.
"Maqiang bro, I have some past history with the Jie Clan so how about letting me take care of them?" Chu Feng smiled.
"YouYou want to take care of all of them by yourself?" Another young female from the World Spirit Guild opened her mouth with shock.
"They are just a group of mediocre people. I, Chu Feng, am sufficient against them. You can just rest on the side." Chu Feng smiled and waved his hand towards Maqiang.
"Quite some words you have there." After hearing Chu Feng's words, a Jie Clan member was furious and as he spoke, he was going to attack Chu Feng.
But before he even attacked, a big hand stopped him. It was Jie Chuan. Although Jie Chuan could be said to be abnormally fierce when he attacked Maqiang and the others, at that instant, when he looked at Chu Feng, he only had smiles on his face and he was very friendly.
"Chu Feng bro, these are personal grudges between my Jie Clan and the World Spirit Guild. I wonder if you can not interfere in this matter?" Jie Chuan smiled and said to Chu Feng.
"I can ignore your grudges, but I need to clear our grudges right?" While Chu Feng spoke, he shot a glance at Jie Heng and also at the two people who helped Jie Heng.
"Our grudges?" Jie Chuan was clearly confused, but he quickly responded as he loudly bellowed at Jie Heng, Jie Gang, and the other Jie Clan member, "You bastards! Did you do something to Chu Feng bro?!"
"I" Jie Heng lowered his head and did not speak. It could be seen that he was afraid of Jie Chuan. In reality, when Jie Chuan spoke, the other Jie Clan members did not dare to offend him as well. It could be seen that Jie Chuan had quite a position within the Jie Clan.
"Whatever, no need to act such a way. Even if you don't have any enmity towards me, that does not mean that they don't. The pillars have already been set and they cannot be broken by you." Chu Feng could see that Jie Chuan really did not want him as an enemy, but the other Jie Clan members did not think that way as well.
"Sigh~" After hearing Chu Feng's words, Jie Chuan helplessly sighed, then said, "Chu Feng bro, I, Jie Chuan, really don't want to attack you, but I have a mission. I must restrain these people from the World Spirit Guild down on this second floor. It seems that I can only offend you."
After speaking, Jie Chuan prepared to attack. The pressure of the 6th level of the Origin realm was released and layers of Origin power howled in the surrounding air. Jie Chuan was a bit stronger than Maqiang and he was not to be underestimated.
"Attack!" When Jie Chuan attacked, at the same time, Jie Heng, Jie Gang, and the other Jie Clan members attacked as well. All of them displayed their strong martial skills, surrounded, and attacked Chu Feng.
Several strong martial skills roared and tore the air. The might of the Origin power filled the entire hall. From that attack, the might itself was enough to cause a person to die.
"A great time to come."
However, Chu Feng was not afraid in the slightest when he faced the attacks of the crowd. Under the pressure of the Spirit Pressure, clearly, Jie Chuan and the others were affected and they had no way of using their true strength.
As for Chu Feng, he was not really affected that much and he could use his true power. Within the Jie Clan, even if there were five people at the 6th level of the Origin realm and twenty people in the 5th level of the Origin realm, Chu Feng was not scared at all.
*whoosh whoosh* Chu Feng used the Imperial Sky Technique and like a ghost, he disappeared from where he stood. When he reappeared, he was already within the Jie Clan crowd.
Chu Feng was extremely quick and many people could not react in time. With a huge step, he arrived in front of Jie Heng. He extended his right hand and grabbed Jie Heng's lapel, then punched his face several times with huge bangs.
"Ahh~~~"
After several punches, Jie Heng had blood all over his face. His nose was crooked, his front teeth were shattered, and his entire face was deformed. Tears and watery blood mixed together as he howled in anguish.
"You are looking to die!" Seeing that the people from the same clan being beaten up so wretchedly, the Jie Clan started to have killing intents. Their attacks became unusually fierce. It was as though they wanted to take Chu Feng's life.
"Want to kill me? None of you are worthy enough!" Chu Feng waved his hand and threw a Jie Heng away. He ferociously collided into the wall and with a huge boom, cracking sounds could be heard along with Jie Heng's painful howling. Obviously, several bones on his body were snapped into several pieces.
After throwing Jie Heng away, Chu Feng used the Imperial Sky Technique once again and easily dodged the Jie Clan members' fatal attacks. This time, he rushed towards an expert of the 6th level of the Origin realm. It was Jie Gang. The person who wanted to take care of Chu Feng before on the first floor.
"Brat, don't be too arrogant!" After seeing Chu Feng's methods, Jie Gang did not have the confidence he had earlier and he did not meet force with force. He quickly condensed a Spirit Formation and enveloped him within it to block Chu Feng's attack.
*bang* But when Chu Feng's big hands came grabbing, the Spirit Formation had no way of holding it off. In front of Chu Feng's palm, it was like glass as it shattered into pieces.
After shattering the Spirit Formation, Chu Feng grabbed Jie Gang's lapel. Originally, Jie Gang wanted to fight against it, but it was useless as Chu Feng's pressure already surrounded him.
At the end, he could only let Chu Feng throw him up high, and fiercely fall onto the floor. As he heard the cracking noises coming from his back, he felt the pain of his vertebra breaking.
*ta* After Jie Gang fiercely fell onto the floor, Chu Feng raised his foot and stamped on his chest. He shattered his chest bones, then swept his gaze towards his surroundings and said, "A bunch of trash! Come as you wish!"
"You bastard! I'll skin you alive!" Another expert of the 6th level of the Origin realm rushed over and displayed a rank 5 martial skill.
After that martial skill was used, Origin power condensed and formed into two pale-white hurricanes. They contained terrifying might, and with rumbling roaring, they swirled towards Chu Feng.
This time, Chu Feng did not dodge or avoid it. He raise his hand and forcibly took that person's rank 5 skill head-on. After that, he leaped and arrived next to that person. He pressed him down to the ground, then ruthlessly stepped on him several times to the point that his flesh and blood flew everywhere. Painful cries never ended and it was even more miserable than Jie Gang and Jie Heng.


MGA Capitulo 190  Laying Down the Pillars of Enmity
"Heavens! Where did this boy come from? How is he so strong?"
At first, the people from the World Spirit Guild wanted to help, but when they saw the scene in front of them, they were dumbstruck.
Because anyone who had eyes could see the powerfulness of Chu Feng. Even though they had a lot of people, and even though their cultivation was not weak, the strength between Chu Feng and them was too great.
Chu Feng was completely playing around with them within his palm. It could be said that the strength needed to take care of them was even less than blowing dust away. The superhuman battle power surpassed their imaginations, yet was currently happening in reality.
"Quite impressive. Not only does he have exceeding battle power, his spirit power is not ordinary as well. Jie Chuan and the other Jie Clan members are all restricted by this Spirit Pressure and they have no way of displaying their full strength."
"However, Chu Feng bro is different. It seems that he isn't affected by the Spirit Pressure at all and he can use his full strength. That strong Spirit power can be compared to Gu Bo and looking at how he is, I think that it would not be an issue for him to enter the fourth floor." Maqiang said.
"What? Enter the fourth floor? Able to be compared to Gu Bo? Is this guy really that strong?" After hearing Maqiang's words, the people from the World Spirit Guild were incomparably shocked.
"Ahh!" Just at that time, Chu Feng waved his arm and his Origin power formed into a violent hurricane as it directly turned several Jie Clan members over on the floor and they lost consciousness as well.
"Not only that, with his methods, he can even go onto the fifth floor!"
"This person is too strong. If he is already like this at this age, I wonder what realm he would reach after a few years. Luckily, we've set up a good relationship with him or else he would very possibly be a great enemy in the future."
Maqiang seriously said to the people next to him because he had a thought in his heart. It was that he had to have a good relationship with Chu Feng because he felt that Chu Feng's talent was even greater than their own genius, Gu Bo. He was a rare genius and he had to be roped into their World Spirit Guild and be used by them.
"Ahh~~~" At the same time, Chu Feng weakened his attacks. After several of the Jie Clan members who were at the 6th level of the Origin realm were ruthlessly beaten up, the Jie Clan members at the 5th level of the Origin realm were like fishes on a chopping board as they were freely slaughtered by Chu Feng.
The Jie Clan members who even wanted to do anything to Chu Feng before finally realized the seriousness of that matter. How was Chu Feng even a soft persimmon that could be squeezed by anyone? He was simply a insane, twisted person. Not only did he have the ability to fight against those people, his attacks were abnormally ruthless and they were almost killed by him.
They really kicked an iron board that time. It wasn't a normal iron board but it was an extremely hard iron board. Not afraid of the heavens nor the earth. Doing things while disregarding the consequences, but an iron board that had a certain strength.
Under that situation, the Jie Clan members already had no more killing intent from before. Replacing it was endless fear. Some people wanted to escape to the third floor to request for reinforcements, but Chu Feng did not even give that chance to him. The huge Spirit Formation enveloped them and every single person became the birds within a cage because no one could even damage the Spirit Formation that Chu Feng laid.
At that instant, on the second floor of the Asura Ghost Tower, Chu Feng was the main slaughterer and no one could defend against him.
"Die! You dare to treat us like this?! You better not leave this place or else if you do, my Jie Clan's elders will take your life! Not only you, even.. Ahh!!"
A Jie Clan member who was being stepped by Chu Feng was fiercely threatening him. However, before he even finished speaking, Chu Feng completely shut his mouth up.
In front of their eyes, of the twenty-five Jie Clan members, twenty-four of them already lost consciousness. The ones with light injuries tore a few tendons and broke a few bones, while the ones with heavy injuries had blood all over their body and they were seriously injured.
"Chu Feng bro, you've really stirred up a disaster this time. The seniors of my Jie Clan will not forgive you."
Jie Chuan did not attack Chu Feng again. In the instant that Chu Feng dodged his attack, he already knew that they could not beat Chu Feng. From start to finish, he stood on the side and watched as Chu Feng madly flattened his clan members.
"With how your Jie Clan does things, they will certainly not forgive Chu Feng bro, but within the Spirit Province, my World Spirit Guild will protect him." Just at that time, Maqiang and the others walked over.
"Are you able to protect him?" Jie Chuan asked.
"You can try and see." Maqiang was full of confidence.
"That's good." Jie Chuan nodded then looked at Chu Feng and said, "Chu Feng bro, no matter how you and my Jie Clan be, I, Jie Chuan, do not want to have any enmity between us. I hope that this hatred can be dissolved one day and that we can become friends."
"Go ahead!" Jie Chuan closed his eyes. He just gave up on resisting and let Chu Feng handle him however he wished to.
"If you want to, you can come up as well." However, Chu Feng did not attack Jie Chuan because he could tell that Jie Chuan was different from the other Jie Clan members. Although the Jie Chuan would not be kind to the people from the World Spirit Guild, he did not have any evil intentions.
After Chu Feng walked away, some Jie Clan members wanted to attack Jie Chuan. After all, Jie Chuan did hit some of them to make them lose consciousness. However, the people who wanted to attack were forcefully blocked by Maqiang.
With a faint smile, Maqiang walked next to Jie Chuan, knelt down, and quietly said next to his ear, "Jie Chuan, your eyes are quite special and you see that Chu Feng bro is a genius."
"But sadly, with your Jie Clan's attitude, they are fated to have difficulties with relationships with other clans. You have created a huge enemy, whereas we formed a friendship with a genius. This is also why my World Spirit Guild is able to become stronger and stronger, while your Jie Clan declines at the very moment."
After saying that, Maqiang caught up to Chu Feng. The four other people stayed behind and brought the injured people out.
Jie Chuan did not walk towards the third floor and like the people from the World Spirit Guild, he also brought the injured people outside.
When those injured people were brought out of the Asura Ghost Tower, there was a huge uproar. The higher ups of the World Spirit Guild and the Jie Clan almost attacked each other from fury.
Since Jie Chuan and the other people from the World Spirit Guild did not say anything about Chu Feng heavily injuring the Jie Clan, the Jie Clan members thought that the ruthless attacks were done by the people from the World Spirit Guild.
However, since the World Spirit Guild also had injured people, both sides did not do anything about it. In addition, since it was the World Spirit Guild's land, the Jishi Clan were not too persistent and at the end, they calmed down.
After bringing all the injured clan members out from the Asura Ghost Tower, Jie Chuan did not enter the tower again. He only stood behind the clan's elder as he stared at the Asura Ghost Tower.


MGA Capitulo 191  Formless Formation
Under the curtains of the night, the Asura Ghost Tower was extremely beautiful and it was quite special as well. When a life entered the tower, it would give out a bit of blue-coloured light. The first floor had the most number of blue-coloured light. Currently, there were some that appeared on the second floor as well and it was still increasing.
There were even more on the third floor when compared with the second floor because the geniuses from the World Spirit Guild and the geniuses from the Jie Clan were gathered on the third floor. Of course, other than those geniuses, almost no one else was able to step onto the third floor.
However, Jie Chuan knew, in his heart, that another person could step onto that floor and that person could very possibly change something. The scale of his Jie Clan and the World Spirit Guild's battle would be tipped by Chu Feng.
Getting from the first floor to the second floor already required one to walk on those stairs. However, to get from the second floor to the third floor required one to pass through many little obstructions. That wasted a bit of Chu Feng and Maqiang's time.
But at the end, the two of them still successfully arrived at the entrance to the third floor. However, after passing through the Spirit Formation, Maqiang's face changed greatly and his aura instantly became extremely feeble as he fell to the floor.
Seeing that, Chu Feng quickly supported him up and nervously asked, "What happened? You can't hold the Spirit Pressure back here?"
Chu Feng felt quite shocked. Although the Spirit Pressure on the third floor strengthened quite a bit, he could still endure it. Accordingly, with Maqiang's Spirit power, even if there's pressure he would not be forced to that state.
"Quick, quickly take me out. I can't take pressure here." Maqiang very painfully said those words. Chu Feng did not waste any time and he quickly supported him as they returned to the passages.
"Maqiang bro, are you better now?"
At that instant, although Maqiang still had a pale-white complexion, the strong pressuring feeling was no longer there so he could freely move. He was currently roughly gasping in huge breaths.
"Chu Feng bro, the Spirit Pressure on the third floor is a bit off. Something must have happened and the Jie Clan most likely used some special method."
"Chu Feng bro, take it as me begging you. Go to the third floor and take a look. If the Jie Clan wants to harm my World Spirit Guild, please save their lives and help them out." Suddenly, Maqiang grabbed Chu Feng's hand and with a face of nervousness, he pleaded.
"Maqiang bro, don't worry. If something really did happen, I, Chu Feng, will do everything I can to protect your World Spirit Guild." As he saw Maqiang's nervous expression, Chu Feng was also aware that something was wrong as he turned around and rushed towards the third floor.
It was not that Chu Feng was willing to be a good person, but at that moment, he already thoroughly offended the Jie Clan so he had to gain a friendly relationship with the World Spirit Guild. The better impression he left for the World Spirit Guild, the better protection he would get from the World Spirit Guild. If all went well, it would also greatly help his future development.
Chu Feng returned to the third floor once again and after a few turns, he finally arrived at the main hall and the shocking scene also appeared in front of his eyes.
Within the spacious hall, there were two groups of people. The first were the geniuses of the Jishi Clan and they were standing where there were. Although their faces were a bit ugly, it was still endurable and they didn't receive too significant effects, not to mention how Maqiang looked like.
Who they faced were the people from the World Spirit Guild. However, in front of his eyes, almost everyone from the World Spirit Guild were laying on the floor with painful expressions as if they were enduring huge pressure. Their situation was exactly like Maqiang's.
"Jie Bufan, you are despicable! You dare to use the Formless Formation on this third floor to press us down!"
The peak-level genius of the World Spirit Guild, Gu Bo, was the only person who was able to remain standing. However, rains of sweat were flowing down his face and it could be seen that even though he could endure that pressure, it was extremely exhausting.
"Gu Bo, don't say it like that. What is despicable? These are called methods. It can only be said that your World Spirit Guild seized this Asura Ghost Tower for so long yet did not understand it enough."
"My Jie Clan is able to activate the Formless Formation here is because of our seniors' explorations. If you had to blame anyone, you can only blame your people from the World Spirit Guild for being too useless." Jie Bufan sneered and said while his tone was filled with mock.
"Hmph. Do you really think that only your Jie Clan understands this Asura Ghost Tower? I'll let you experience an incomprehensible formation." Gu Bo's expression changed greatly as he layered his palms and hit out a special hand seal. A wave of strange ripple was sent out as him as the middle and it blended with the Asura Ghost Tower.
*rumble rumble* At that instant, rumbling noises came from the third floor of the Asura Ghost Tower. The floor couldn't help but lightly tremble as a bursts of strong power was being released.
"Quick! Stop him!" Seeing that, Jie Bufan knew that something was going wrong and as he spoke, he was going to attack.
"Haa!"
But it was too late. Gu Bo suddenly raised both of his hands and the strong power instantly engulfed the third floor. The faces of the Jie Clan members who were at ease earlier hugely changed, and like the people from the World Spirit Guild, they powerlessly laid on the ground.
Even Jie Bufan immediately felt the strong pressure. He quickly sat cross-legged on the ground and did special hand seals. After that, he fiercely glared at Gu Bo and said, "You bastard! What did you activate?!"
Seeing that the Jie Clan did not threaten himself anymore, Gu Bo also quickly sat cross-legged and did hand seals as well to better resist against the pressure. Then, he said,
"I know that all of you have a certain type of treasure on your bodies and that treasure can let you ignore the pressure after you activate the Formless Formation on the third floor."
"However, you didn't know that after so many years of exploration, we already discovered an even stronger Formless Formation in the Asura Ghost Tower."
"There is no treasure that can hold that Formless Formation back. Unless one's personal strength is powerful enough, they should not even think of resisting against the pressure from this formation. Originally, I didn't want to activate this formation because it has no benefits to neither you nor me."
"However, I never would have thought that you would be so despicable, and in order to decrease our examination results, you did such things. Right now, I have no way of closing this formation after activating it. All of us are stopped at the third floor and everything was forced by you." Gu Bo extremely furiously said.
"It seems that I underestimated you, but no matter. At most, we go no further than the third floor." Jie Bufan said.
"Who said that you would go no further than the third floor?" But just at that time, Chu Feng's indifferent voice suddenly rang out.
"Who?" As they faced that sudden change, Jie Bufan and the other Jie Clan members in addition to Gu Bo and the other geniuses from the World Spirit Guild were stunned.
They cast their gaze towards the entrance and they discovered that Chu Feng was slowly walking towards them. His effortlessly walking appearance and his attitude of being at ease was as though he could not feel any a single trace of the pressure from the Formess Formation, not to mention the Spirit Pressure from the third floor.


MGA Capitulo 192  Ill Send You Off
"Who are you?" After seeing Chu Feng, everyone was greatly shocked.
The Spirit Pressure on the third floor was extremely strong, and after activating the double Formless Formations, those at the 5th level of the Origin realm and the 6th level of the Origin realm were pressured to lay on the floor and it was hard for them to get up.
Even Gu Bo and Jie Bufan, the two peak-level geniuses were greatly affected and they could not continue forward towards the tunnel to the fourth floor. They could only wait there. However, Chu Feng was not affected at all and it shocked people too much.
However, at the same time that they were shocked, everyone prepared themselves as if a great enemy was approaching. After all, at that moment, most of them could not even protect themselves and they were forcibly enduring at that place. At that instant, when a person like Chu Feng appeared, it was threatening them greatly.
"I am a friend of yours. I am entrusted by Maqiang to come and help you." Seeming to feel the fear of the crowd, Chu Feng kindly smiled at Gu Bo and the others.
Those who had Spirit power would not have weak observation power. Especially when every single person on scene had extremely strong Spirit power, from Chu Feng's tone, they could feel that he did not seem to be lying and he seemed to be there to help them.
At that instant, the people from the World Spirit Guild were as if a huge burden was released and they couldn't help but breathe a sigh of relief, and when Chu Feng said the following words, They instantly rejoiced.
Chu Feng looked at Jie Bufan and the other Jie Clan members and said, "As for you, all of you are my enemies and I'm afraid that I cannot let you pass this exam."
"Rubbish! Who do you think you are!"
A Jie Clan member who was at the 6th level of the Origin realm tried to climb up while using all his power. He had thoughts of attacking Chu Feng.
"Ahh!"
Him, who could not even protect himself, was kicked by Chu Feng's raised foot. He flew for several meters, collided with a wall, and lost consciousness.
"Bastard! Who are you! You dare to attack my Jie Clan?!"
Seeing that, Jie Bufan's face uselessly changed greatly but he did not attack. From Chu Feng's first kick, he could tell that Chu Feng's strength did not allow for any underestimations. At least, the current him might not be able to beat Chu Feng.
"I am the person who will finish this exam for you." Chu Feng lightly smiled but didn't attack anyone else. He only stole the protective talisman from one of the people, then extended his hand towards the other Jie Clan members.
At that instant, the Jie Clan members did not even have the strength to tie up a chicken and they were helpless against Chu Feng's plundering. At the end, they could only stare as they let Chu Feng take all the protective talisman from their bodies.
"What are you planning to do?" Jie Bufan panicked. He had a bad premonition while looking at the large bundle of protective talisman within Chu Feng's hand.
"Nothing much, just sending you off." Chu Feng chuckled then suddenly clenched his hand. The dozens of protective talisman were pinched into pieces, and at the same time, a strange wave was also sent out.
"You bastard!!" At that instant, Jie Bufan was enraged. He could not remain calm anymore. He stood up, emanated his aura of the 7th level of the Origin realm and pressed it towards Chu Feng.
"Mm, there's still you!" Chu Feng did not even put the pressure within his eyes and he only opened both of his hands and grabbed towards Jie Bufan's Cosmos Sack.
Chu Feng was not planning on taking his treasures, but only his protective talisman. As long as the protective talisman was broken, it meant that they gave up on the exam. Failing in the exam was the biggest humiliation to their Jie Clan.
However, Jie Bufan did have some methods. Seeing that the pressure did not work, he immediately sent several attacks out. Every strike was stronger than the past strike, and every strike was fiercer than the past strike. It could be seen that the top-level genius of the Jie Clan did have some outstanding methods.
However, no matter how much fiercer Jie Bufan's attacks were, they were not enough to scare Chu Feng. He did not even need to use any martial skills. With the raise of his hand and foot, he could easily dissolve the attacks as if they were nothing.
"This guy can really not be bound by the Formless Formation and the Spirit Pressure of the third floor? What kind of person is he?"
Gu Bo was silently looking at everything and his expression was extremely complicated. He discovered the unordinary area of Chu Feng. He could not even match that and he was left behind in the dust with no hope of catching up.
So, he was extremely shocked. Shocked as to how could there be such an impressive person in the world, and he was also very curious. Curious as where that person came from.
"Enough, it's time for you to kneel down."
Suddenly, Chu Feng lost his patience and he used the Imperial Sky Technique. Within an instant, he arrived behind Jie Bufan. He extended his palm and grabbed towards Jie Bufan's Cosmos Sack located on his waist.
*hmm*
However, before Chu Feng even touched Jie Bufan, he discovered that a strong Spirit Formation stopped his hand. That Spirit Formation was extremely strong and it enveloped Jie Bufan's body and it wrapped around him.
"A bit interesting."
For the first time, Chu Feng met a Spirit Formation that was able to block his attacks. However, he was not afraid and he clenched one of his hands. A golden-coloured dagger appeared within his hand as he stabbed down at Jie Bufan.
*boom* The dagger and the Spirit Formation collided and instantly, a huge boom resonated out. Although Chu Feng was not able to break through the Spirit Formation, the strong force threw Jie Bufan dozens of meters away.
"You bastard! Come up if you dare. I will certainly cripple you." Jie Bufan stabilized himself and he grinded his teeth in anger as he rushed towards the passage to the fourth floor.
"Bro, don't follow him. The Spirit Formation that covers his body is released by a special treasure and it is quite impressive."
"On the fourth floor, without the pressure of the Formless Formation, the treasure's Spirit Formation would be even stronger. Jie Bufan's cultivation could also be freely used and at that place, you may not be able to defeat him." Gu Bo saw through Jie Bufan's intentions and hurriedly advised Chu Feng.
"Thank you for your good intentions, but I must go to the fourth floor." Chu Feng faintly smiled and quickly chased after Jie Bufan.
"Hang in there. The guild will quickly send people to save you." Gu Bo swept his gaze over the geniuses from the World Spirit Guild that were laying on the floor. He gnashed his teeth, and he also leaped forward and rushed towards the tunnel to the fourth floor.
Not long after the three of them left, a dozen or so Grey-cloak World Spiritists rushed in. All of them were people from the World Spirit Guild. After entering, all of them tightly frowned and they had some slight difficulties with the Formless Formations.
"Quick! Quickly go to the fourth floor! There's a bastard brat that broke our protective talisman. Apprehend him!"
"That right! He broke the exam rules and he must be severely punished!" At that instant, the Jie Clan members started to loudly yelled to shout their injustices.
"Something like that never happened. They just had no way of enduring the pressure from this Formless Formation so they broke their own protective talisman." However, the geniuses from the World Spirit Guild quickly spoke to refute.
"Nonsense!!" In response, the Jie Clan members were so angry that they could spit out blood.
He looked at the geniuses from their own family, then looked at the Jie Clan members. A Grey-cloak World Spiritist that seemed to be the leader pointed at the Jie Clan members and said, "Bring these people who forfeited down!"


MGA Capitulo 193  Battling Jie Bufan
Red light surged and lingered on the Asura Ghost Tower. However, the faint blue lights that were on the first, second, and third floor were more eye-grabbing because that represented the number of people who participated in the exam.
However, the exam already happened for a period of time, but up until that moment, there was no blue light on the four floor. It meant that there was no one who entered the fourth floor. That caused the three elders from the World Spirit Guild and the three elders from the Jie Clan to frown tightly.
"What happened in the tower?"
Those were the guesses of the two groups of people. As they guessed, the couldn't help but stare at each other with gazes of great bitterness and deep hatred, as if saying if your young generation dared to do anything to my young generation, I would certainly not forgive you.
"Look, someone went onto the fourth floor!" Suddenly, someone yelled out loud.
Although his yell did not seem to be important, everyone's expression changed greatly and they quickly locked their gazes onto the fourth floor. After seeing the moving blue light on the fourth floor, the elders from the two powers couldn't help but exhale deeply in relaxation.
Although the Spirit Pressure in the Asura Ghost Tower was very strong, as their young generation, if they couldn't even go onto the fourth stage, they would indeed become the laughingstock of people. At that moment, someone finally stepped onto the fourth stage so naturally, they felt relieved.
However, at the same time they were relieved, they were also curious. At that very instant, there was only one person on the fourth stage. Was it Gu Bo from the World Spirit Guild, or Jie Bufan from the Jie Clan? That was the biggest question.
"Look, another person went on!" Suddenly, another person loudly yelled again.
Indeed, another blue light appeared on the fourth stage. At that instant, no matter if it was the people from the Jie Clan or the people from the World Spirit Guild, they all rejoiced. Slight happiness even surged onto the faces of the six elders who had unfathomably deep strength.
Within the people in that exam, there were only two people who could step onto the fourth floor. One was Gu Bo, the other one was Jie Bufan. At that moment, since there were two blue lights that appeared, naturally, everyone would think of those two people.
It meant that no matter if it was the young generation from the World Spirit Guild or the young generation from the Jie Clan, both of them stepped onto the fourth stage. At least they didn't lose any face and they were not inferior to one another. That was why both sides were very at ease.
"Heavens! Another person went up!" But just at that time, another person shouted in surprise.
Indeed, on the fourth floor, another faint, blue light appeared there. At that instant, everyone from the Jie Clan and the World Spirit Guild lit up their eyes.
"Another person went up? Who would that be?"
Whether it was the three elders from the Jie Clan or the three elders from the World Spirit Guild, they were guessing who that third person was. After all, within their impressions, there was only Jie Bufan and Gu Bo who could step onto the fourth stage within the young generations who entered the exam. They truly could not think of the third person.
"Damn brat, you really did dare to come up."
At the same time, on the fourth floor of the Asura Ghost Tower, Jie Bufan was facing both Chu Feng and Gu Bo. At that instant, it was as though he was a completely new person and the atmosphere he gave off was entirely different from when he was on the third floor.
The aura of the 7th level of the Origin realm was truly being displayed. Origin power was lingering around him and it was endlessly surging. Even the air whined.
"I think you've gotten the situation wrong. It's not that I'm coming up, it's that you escaped up. What? Not escaping anymore? You can't go onto the fifth floor right?" Chu Feng sneered and said.
"You eloquent brat, you'll have it coming soon."
"Gu Bo, this is a personal grudge between me and this person. Can you not interfere?" Jie Bufan did not directly attack and he cast his gaze towards Gu Bo. Although his cultivation was no longer restricted after arriving on the fourth floor, Gu Bo was the same as well.
"Jie Bufan, Chu Feng bro is a friend of my World Spirit Guild. If you want to take care of him, that means you have to take care of me."
"This isn't a personal grudge. It is a grudge between my World Spirit Guild and your Jie Clan. Do you think it's possible for me to only watch with my hands folded away?" Gu Bo lightly smiled and said.
"You" Jie Bufan was extremely furious. He still had some certainty if he only needed to take care of Chu Feng himself. However, if he also needed to take care of Gu Bo in addition to Chu Feng, he really did not have any confidence.
"Gu Bo bro, you don't need to help out. I would quite like to see what kind of methods this genius of the Jie Clan has."
However, Chu Feng waved his hand at Gu Bo, indicating him to not help out. After that, he clenched one of his palm and a golden-coloured pike appeared in his hand. He leaped toward and dashed towards Jie Bufan.
"A bit of nerves." Seeing that Chu Feng was directly attacking him, Jie Bufan did not avoid nor dodge it. With a flash from the Cosmos Sack on his waist, a blue-coloured longsword appeared within his hand.
That sword was extremely beautiful as if it was made by cold ice. Tiny bits of radiance were given off from the sparkling and translucent sword yet it emitted a feeling of it being unable to be broken. Faint gas lingered around the edge of the sword. Before even nearing, one could feel the bone-piercing coldness. It was a special weapon created by Cold Iron, a Cold Iron sword that was above blades made out of Blackened-gold.
*whoosh whoosh*
That sword was quite a treasure and Jie Bufan's sword techniques were impressive as well. He used a rank 5 martial skill and the edge of the sword disappeared but reappeared randomly. When the Cold Iron sword was within his hands, its strength was truly displayed as it endlessly attacked Chu Feng fiercely.
*swoosh swoosh*
However, Chu Feng did not just take those attacks. The cold glare first arrived, then he sent out the pike like a dragon. At that very instant, the golden-coloured pike was a golden-coloured dragon. Its attacks were fierce and as it swept, it was like the wind. It was even stronger than Jie Bufan's attacks.
*clang clang clang clang*
The two fought together and no one defended. What they used were the most fierce attacks, and under those attacks, Chu Feng clearly gained the advantage. There were quite a few times that he stabbed the golden-coloured pike towards Jie Bufan's body.
However, it was useless. Jie Bufan had the strong Spirit Formation to protect his body and that Spirit Formation was created by a special type of treasure. It was extremely exceptional so even if Chu Feng could hit Jie Bufan, he could not harm him.
From that, Jie Bufan gained a greater superiority as he did not need to be afraid of Chu Feng's attacks but he could still attack Chu Feng as though he was playing around with his life. He would not be injured, but as long as he could hit Chu Feng, Chu Feng would lose to him.
"Damn brat, you dare to break the rules of this exam and force my Jie Clan out. Even if you leave this tower, you will have trouble in escaping death, so I, Jie Bufan, will sent you on a journey right now."
Jie Bufan's attacks got more and fiercer and the Cold Iron sword in his hand became more and more tricky. In addition, he used a mysterious bodily martial skill so he was not inferior to Chu Feng in terms of speed. In an instant, from being disadvantaged, he gained the advantage.


MGA Capitulo 194  White Tiger Slaughtering Technique
"This guy is really quite strong. The martial skills and treasures that he has are too mysterious. If it wasn't for this Spirit Pressure on the fourth floor that greatly restricted his strength, I'm afraid that I would not be able to beat him with my cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm."
Chu Feng was aware of Jie Bufan's strength. From his estimations, Jie Bufan's current strength was not his real strength. Under the pressure of the Spirit Pressure, at most, he was using the strength of the 6th level of the Origin realm. As for Chu Feng, he was strangely not affected and he could use his full strength
So, Chu Feng felt that if the two of them left that area and normally fought, even if he used the power of the golden-coloured lightning and raised his cultivation to the 2nd level of the Origin realm, he still might not be able to beat Jie Bufan.
After all, he had a lot of treasures on him. At that moment, he only took out the Cold Iron sword and he still did not know where the treasure that was creating the Spirit Formation was located at. Other than those, Chu Feng really did not know what other treasures Jie Bufan had.
For a moment, Chu Feng had all sorts of admiration towards Jie Bufan. Although he also had some methods himself, those were all fought for with his life. He did not even have a single special treasure.
So, more or less, Chu Feng admired the people who were born into a wealthy family. After all, to them, their family's foundation was thick and they had uncountable resources. As long as they had unordinary talent and gained the good impressions of the elders in their clan, it was the simplest thing to do to gain treasures and resources.
*whoosh* Suddenly, a blue light flashed past Chu Feng's left arm. As he was caught off guard, he got struck.
"Dammit." Feeling the fiery feeling from his left arm, Chu Feng knew that he was injured. Although it was not very serious and it was only some injury on the surface, he was still injured.
"Hmph. This is just the beginning. Very quickly, you will fall under my sword." After succeeding with in one strike, Jie Bufan got even more stronger and he insanely attacked Chu Feng once again.
"Do you truly believe you can defeat me?"
After being struck by a sword, Chu Feng was also enraged. He revolved his Origin power under his feet and a white-coloured light appeared. After that light appeared, Chu Feng instantly disappeared. When he reappeared, he was already behind Jie Bufan.
"This guy is fast!"
"What kind of martial skill is that? It is so mysterious!"
At that instant, no matter if it was Jie Bufan who was fighting with Chu Feng or Gu Bo who was looking at the battle on the side, both of their eyes lit up and their expression changed greatly.
They could tell that Chu Feng displayed quite a mysterious martial skill. It was completely different from the lightning that was under his feet earlier. This time, the light that appeared under his feet was clearly quicker and even several times so.
If it was said that the lightning that raised Chu Feng up was already a uncommon, mysterious bodily martial skill then at that instant, what Chu Feng displayed was an extremely rare bodily martial skill. If it was said that Chu Feng used a rank 5 bodily martial skill before, then at that moment, what Chu Feng was using was a rank 6 martial skill and it was a very strong one.
"Chu Feng can use a rank 6 martial skill? Where did he come from?"
Gu Bo was endlessly shocked in his heart. Not everyone could cultivate a rank 6 martial skill even within his World Spirit Guild as the cultivation difficulty was extremely high. However, at that instant, what Chu Feng was using was clearly a rank 6 martial skill, and that proved two points.
Firstly. To be able to have a rank 6 martial skill to cultivate meant that Chu Feng had a very deep background or else he would not have been able to cultivate such an excellent martial skill.
Secondly. Chu Feng having the chance to cultivate a rank 6 martial skill was one thing, but actually being able to use a rank 6 martial skill was another. It was unable to be done by just anyone and that displayed Chu Feng's exceptionality even more.
Those two points made Gu Bo and Jie Bufan quite astonished. In addition to seeing that Chu Feng was not affected by the Formless Formation nor by the Spirit Pressure, and also not being defeated as he fought someone at the 7th level of the Origin realm while being at the 1st level of the Origin realm, that meant a single truth. Chu Feng was a genius. A true genius. A genius that had even higher talent than the both of them.
Everything that Chu Feng displayed shocked the hearts of the two people. However, if they knew that what Chu Feng was displaying was not a rank 6 bodily martial skill, but a rank 7 bodily martial skill, who knew how they would react.
"I do not believe that I cannot break your protective Spirit Formation." After dodging Jie Bufan's attack, a golden-coloured longbow condensed within Chu Feng's hands as he used the highest obscure meanings behind the Bow of Hundred Transformations.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh* Chu Feng's right hand was lightning as it endlessly pulled. Countless golden-coloured arrows were like a storm as they densely flew towards Jie Bufan's Spirit Formation.
*clang clang clang clang* Jie Bufan waved the Cold Iron sword in his hand to block the rainy arrows that filled the sky. However, it was in vain as he could not block them all. Luckily, he had the protective Spirit Formation or else he would have already become a sieve.
"It's useless. My protective Spirit Formation is the clan foundation treasure of my Jie Clan. The Elite Armament that my elder brother lent me."
"With it protecting me, not to mention you, even those at the Profound realm should not even think of harming a single strand of my hair." Jie Bufan smugly said.
"The clan foundation treasure? The Elite Armament, the Armor of Thorns?" After hearing Jie Bufan's words, Gu Bo was greatly shocked because he knew what kind of character Jie Bufan's elder brother was.
If Jie Bufan was a person within the young generation of the Jie Clan, then Jie Bufan's elder brother would be the number one genius within the young generation. He was the most outstanding genius within the Jie Clan and the representative of the Jie Clan's young generation.
He entered the Profound realm at the age of seventeen, and he was twenty-three years old this year. He already entered the peak of the Profound realm and he was able to be matched with the old generation. Even the peak of the World Spirit Guild had some fear towards Jie Bufan's elder brother.
Exactly because Jie Bufan's elder brother had excellent talent, he was already hiddenly selected to be the future clan head of the Jie Clan. So, he gained the clan foundation treasure of the Jie Clan. A Elite Armament, the Armor of Thorns.
It was unexpected that Jie Bufan's elder brother would lend the Elite Armament to Jie Bufan. With that, even those at the Profound realm had no way of harming Jie Bufan, not to mention Chu Feng.
"Chu Feng bro, don't mess around with him anymore. The Armor of Thorns is a Elite Armament and it is not something that you can break." Gu Bo quickly advised Chu Feng as he was aware that something was wrong.
"Hmph. Can't be broken? Let's see if it can truly not be broken!"
After hearing Gu Bo say those words, Chu Feng became even more unyielding. He put away his Bow of Hundred Transformations, and with a thought, the atmosphere of his entire person became completely different.
*waa* Suddenly, a roar of a tiger rang out in the air. A wave of pressure descended from the heavens and the strong force shook the entire fourth floor
"This..What is this pressure?"
As he felt the difference, Gu Bo's face greatly changed because he could feel that the pressure came from Chu Feng's body. However, he only felt that pressure before on people at the Profound realm. Chu Feng was only at the 1st level of the Origin realm, so how could he be emitting that?


MGA Capitulo 195  Elite Armaments
*roar* Just at that time, Chu Feng suddenly extended his finger. Following that, an indescribably powerful aura came out from Chu Feng's finger.
At that instant, a roar rang out as if the most fierce monster in the world started its more terrifying attack. That aura broke through the air and it even whined and split. A black-coloured line followed it, like the stripes on a tiger.
"False bravado." Jie Bufan waved the Cold Iron sword in his hand and chopped at the aura that pounced towards him. He wanted to use his unbreakably hard Cold Iron sword to block Chu Feng's attack.
*clang* However, when the aura and the Cold Iron sword collided, sparks flew everywhere then a ear-piercing noise resounded. Jie Bufan's unbreakably hard Cold Iron sword was split into two.
The more terrifying thing was after the aura split the Cold Iron sword, it did not stop and it fiercely slammed against Jie Bufan's protective Spirit Formation.
*bang* A huge boom sounded out and Jie Bufan flew over and ferociously crashed into the wall of the Asura Ghost Tower. The strong force shook the entire fourth floor. Even people outside of the tower could clearly see the slight trembling of the Asura Ghost Tower
"Lord elders!" At that instant, no matter if it were the people from the Jie Clan or from the World Spirit Guild, they couldn't help but cast their gaze towards the six elders.
That tremble did not happen before, but everyone could subconsciously associate that something must have happened in the Asura Ghost Tower. They only needed to recall that their own geniuses were within the tower in order to want to immediately rush in and investigate what happened. Currently, they were only waiting for the orders of the six elders.
Of course, even the subordinates were aware that something was wrong, so how could the six elders that represented the Jie Clan and the World Spirit Guild not be aware of something like that?
However, looking at the changing blue lights on the fourth floor, they could tell that two people were fighting and one person was watching. The tremble just now was very possibly created by the battle of the two people. However, what kind of attack could make the Asura Ghost Tower shake?
After thinking for a while, the representative elders for both sides looked at each other but they did not send the order to rush into the Asura Ghost Tower. They just waved their hands to indicate the people to calm down.
At the same time, on the fourth floor of the Asura Ghost Tower, Gu Bo was still standing there but he was already dumbstruck at that moment. His face was full of astonishment as he stared at Jie Bufan who sat in the corner of the wall and he was deeply shocked by the scene that happened just now.
At that very instant, Jie Bufan's protective Spirit Formation was still there and it became a blood-red colour. There were even layers of steam as if it transformed and they could even see the patterns. It looked like armor, and a Spirit Formation armor protected Jie Bufan.
However, even with the protective Spirit Formation and the Elite Armament blocking Chu Feng's White Tiger Slaughtering Technique, at that instant, Jie Bufan was not all that well.
His face was pale-white and his aura was a bit weak. Blood was slowly flowing out from the corner of his mouth and his gaze was filled with great surprise and terror. He blankly stared at Chu Feng and said, "Who are you?"
"I am the person who will end your exam." Chu Feng lightly smiled and slowly walked towards Jie Bufan.
Although his White Tiger Slaughtering Technique could not destroy the Elite Armament on Jie Bufan's body, it could still injure him so as long as Chu Feng continued to attack, he could still take away Jie Bufan's life.
"What are you planning to do? If you dare to do anything to me, my Jie Clan will not forgive you. My elder brother will not forgive you."
Jie Bufan was a bit terrified. The young man in front of him was truly too scary. He displayed all sorts of methods that he had never seen before. Especially the previous attack. Even the most valuable treasure of the Jie Clan, the Elite Armament, Armor of Thorns, could not protect him.
The pain from his body told him that he did not want to endure another terrifying attack like before. He was really afraid that the Armor of Thorns would not protect him and he would die there just like that.
"Even if I don't do anything to you, will your Jie Clan let me go?" Chu Feng still continued forward.
"Chu Feng bro, spare him." Just at that time, Gu Bo spoke. From the expressions in his eyes, he hiddenly indicated not to attack Jie Bufan anymore.
Naturally, Chu Feng understood in his heart so he did not continue his attacks. He only pointed at Jie Bufan and said, "Obediently stay on the fourth floor. If you dare to come onto the fifth floor, I will not let you go back down."
After speaking those words, Chu Feng walked towards the fifth floor. Gu Bo also followed him, and as for Jie Bufan, he did not refute. After experiencing Chu Feng insanity, he already knew that Chu Feng was a madman. Within the Asura Ghost Tower, he had to be careful of that madman.
Chu Feng's Spirit power was very strong and his body was very special. Although he could feel the strength of the Spirit Pressure in the Asura Ghost Tower, he was not affected by it and he walked normally.
As for Gu Bo, he was not simple as well. Although the Spirit Pressure on the fourth floor could restrain him, it was still within his endurable range so the fifth floor was also his target.
As they passed through many passages towards the fifth floor, there were many small obstructions. They were even more difficult than the passages to the fourth floor, However, Chu Feng and Gu Bo could dispel them.
"Chu Feng bro, what method did you just use? It was actually able to force the Elite Armament back to its original shape." Gu Bo curiously asked. He was unable to forget the might that Chu Feng displayed earlier. It was simply a slaughtering method that had unstoppable might.
"I also don't know what it is and I just learnt it by chance." Chu Feng lightly smiled. Although he had quite a good impression on Gu Bo, they were still not that familiar so naturally, Chu Feng would not talk about the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique. Secret Skills were something that could attract fire on one's body.
"That's right. You said that Jie Bufan had a Elite Armament on his body. What are Elite Armaments?" Chu Feng asked.
"Chu Feng bro, you don't know what Elite Armaments are?" After hearing Chu Feng's question, Gu Bo was a bit surprised.
Chu Feng shook his head while smiling because he really did not know what Elite Armaments were. However, just by looking at Gu Bo's expression, he knew that they were quite impressive things.
"Elite Armaments are extremely precious treasures and they can be described with the world priceless because they contain extremely powerful formations within them and they can display extremely strong power."
"It is a type of power that cannot even be compared by martial skills. If someone at the peak of the Profound realm could fully use the power of the Elite Armament, even Heaven realm experts would have to avoid the blade." Gu Bo explained.


MGA Capitulo 196  Arriving at the Peak
"Elite Armaments. There is actually such a thing in the world."
Chu Feng admired it a bit because even his White Tiger Slaughtering Technique had no way of breaking the Armor of Thorns on Jie Bufan's body. It could be seen how exceptional his Elite Armament was.
"Elite Armaments are extremely precious. The Jie Clan only has one and it is their clan foundation treasure."
"Jie Bufan doesn't have sufficient cultivation so he could only use the Elite Armament to protect himself. However, if it landed into his elder brothers hands, the Armor of Thorns would not only be a simple protective tool. It would be an extremely powerful killing weapon."
"Jie Bufan's elder brother is quite impressive, and he is the future clan head for the Jie Clan. His cultivation is already at the peak of the Profound realm, and he is hoping to rush into the Heaven realm in the next few years. Even my World Spirit Guild's elders fear him quite a bit."
"Also, since Jie Bufran's elder brother is willing to lend the clan foundation treasure to Jie Bufan, it could be seen that he really loves Jie Bufan so it is best to not harm him." Gu Bo continued reminding.
"Thank you for your reminder." Chu Feng finally knew why Gu Bo would look at him with that eye expression just now. It was because Jie Bufan's background was quite scary.
"But don't worry. This time, the reason why you attacked was for my World Spirit Guild so we will do everything we can to protect you." Gu Bo solemn vowed and promised.
"Heh" Chu Feng lightly smiled and did not reply. They continued forward. The passage to the fifth floor was different than the other passages. Before even arriving, they could feel that the Spirit Pressure was increasing in strength.
After the two of them passed the Spirit Formation entrance to the fifth floor and truly entered the fifth floor, Gu Bo's face instantly changed greatly and even breathing became difficult.
"Gu Bo bro, are you okay?" Seeing that, Chu Feng quickly supported Gu Bo.
"Chu Feng bro, you are too impressive. You can remain so relaxed even on the fifth floor." Gu Bo first exhaled deeply, then looked at Chu Feng who still had the same face as usual. He couldn't help but shake his head and sigh, then said, "Chu Feng bro, my talent is limited and the fifth floor is my limit. I cannot continue with you onwards."
"Gu Bo bro, take care!" Chu Feng did not waste any words, and after supporting Gu Bo down, he continued to walk towards the sixth floor.
"Chu Feng bro, in reality, there are uncountable amount of people who can enter the fifth floor in my World Spirit Guild. However, not a single person within a hundred years stepped onto the sixth floor."
"After all, no one knows how strong the Spirit Pressure is at the sixth floor. However, the obstacles towards the sixth floor gets more and more difficult after each one. Many seniors have paid huge prices before, and some even lost their lives."
"Your Spirit power is extremely strong, but you still need to be careful. I hope that you can succeed and become the first person to enter the sixth floor in a hundred years." Gu Bo had expectations all over his face because Chu Feng was the person who had the most hope to enter the sixth floor.
"Gu Bo bro, don't worry. I, Chu Feng, will do my best, but I won't force it." Chu Feng smiled then walked towards the direction of the sixth floor.
"Two people entered the fifth floor at the same time! It must be Gu Bo and Jie Bufan. It must be those two." At the same time, outside of the Asura Ghost Tower, cheers were everywhere.
No matter if it were the people from the Jie Clan or the people from the World Spirit Guild, both of them were very happy because the two faint blue lights told them that two people stepped onto the fifth floor. So, they could guess that those two people would certainly be their geniuses, Gu Bo and Jie Bufan.
"Look, a person disappeared! Where did he go? He didn't return to the fourth floor because he couldn't endure the Spirit Pressure from the fifth floor right?"
"Impossible. The direction he is going isn't the direction towards the fourth floor. That's.. the sixth floor! Someone is going to challenge the sixth floor!"
"Heavens, there finally someone who will challenge the sixth floor? Challenge the sixth floor that no one has ascended to in a hundred years?"
"Who is that? Is it Jie Bufan or Gu bo?"
At that instant, yells of surprised sounded from the crowd and the people from both sides could not remain calm. Even the six elders had their gazes tightly locked on the sixth floor.
But very quickly, the yells quieted down and at the end, the entire plaza was silent. The longer the blue light disappeared for, the stronger the person who was challenging the sixth floor was. He did not shrink back and he was continuing the climb.
At that instant, everyone stopped breathing and it was so tranquil that people could hear heartbeats and their tense breathing. Everyone's gaze stared without blinking at the sixth floor.
They looked forward to it. They looked forward to someone being able to step onto the sixth floor because a hundred years ago, after the two pinnacle geniuses of the Jie Clan and the World Spirit Guild entered the sixth floor, no one else was able to successfully go onto the sixth floor.
The sixth floor because a legend. It became an unbreakable legend. No matter if it was the Jie Clan or the World Spirit Guild, both of them hoped that someone could break that legend.
"Look! It's a blue light! Blue light appeared on the sixth floor! He succeeded! He successfully stepped onto the sixth floor!" Suddenly, someone surprisingly yelled out and they were so excited that their hands and feet were dancing.
"Heavens! He actually succeeded! Someone successfully arrived at the top!!"
"Who is that person? Is it Gu Bo from my World Spirit Guild or Jie Bufan from the Jie Clan?"
After that, cheers rang out everywhere and the entire plaza were boiled. Everyone was so happy that they didn't know what to do. Some people from the World Spirit Guild and some Jie Clan members were even hugging each other.
Even the six elders above the palace were so excited that their bodies trembled. Unspeakable joy emerged onto their faces.
"A hundred years. After a hundred years, someone finally arrived there."
The elders from the World Spirit Guild said with a quivering voice because that represented that another the birth of another peak-level genius. To be able to step onto the sixth floor meant that they were a peak-level genius. Even if they weren't in terms of cultivation, they would certainly have good attainments of Spirit Formation techniques.
"Elder Li, Who do you think stepped onto the sixth floor? Gu Bo from your World Spirit Guild, or Jie Bufan from my Jie Clan?"
"HoNo matter who it is, it still means that a rare genius has appeared. An outstanding World Spiritist will very possibly be born today. This is a great thing for the Spirit Province." The Elder Li from the World Spirit Guild smiled and replied.
"Indeed, it is a good thing for the Spirit Province, however, it isn't anything good for your World Spirit Guild." That elder smiled.
"What do you mean?" After hearing those words, the three elders from the World Spirit Guild were all extremely displeased.
"Because the one who ascended to the peak will not be Gu Bo of your World Spirit Guild. It will certainly be Jie Bufan from my Jie Clan." That elder had confidence written all over his face.
"Hmph, truly arrogant and conceited. Jie Bufan's aptitude is indeed not bad, but my guild's Gu Bo is no worse than him. On what basis do you make such a conclusion?" Elder Li coldly snorted and he was extremely dissatisfied.
"On what basis? On the basis that Jie Bufan is wearing my clan's foundation treasure, the Armor of Thorns." That elder coldly smiled and said.
"What? Jie Bufan is wearing the Armor of Thorns?" At that very instant, the elders from the World Spirit Guild were all shocked. Following that, disappointment emerged onto their faces.
The Armor of Thorns was a Elite Armament and it was passed down by the ancestors of the Jie Clan. Indeed, that Elite Armaments did have endless abilities, and perhaps it could really reduce the degree of Spirit Pressure on Jie Bufan for him to enter the sixth floor. His World Spirit Guild did not have a Elite Armament like that.
However, as the two great powers were debating who the person on the sixth floor was, Chu Feng already sat cross-legged and smiled while looking at the three Spirit Fruit seeds that were currently changing.
The Spirit Fruit seeds needed to be fed with Spirit Pressure. Although it would have some change on every floor, it needed a certain amount of time. At that instant, the three seeds in Chu Feng's hand was growing extremely quickly. It already grew branches and leaves, and flowers blossomed. The reason why it grew so quickly was because Chu Feng was located at the top of the Asura Ghost Tower, the sixth floor.


MGA Capitulo 197  The Seventh Floor
"Indeed, the Spirit Pressure here can quicken the grown and nourishment of the Spirit Fruit seeds. It looks like there is hope to save Eggy." Chu Feng sat cross-legged on the sixth floor while looking at the Spirit Fruit seeds that were currently changing in his palm. He was unusually joyful in his heart.
Because at that instant, the Spirit Fruit seeds already had huge differences from when it started. Chu Feng could feel the strong power contained within it and it was still increasing.
After seeing the hope, Chu Feng also had a goal. However, it still required quite a bit of time for the three Spirit Fruit seeds to grow a ripened Spirit Fruit.
Within the Asura Ghost Tower, although the amount of floors one climbed was used to determine one's Spirit power strength and their talent as well, however, the length that one stayed in the Asura Ghost Tower was also another way of method to determine it.
On the evening of the exam, many people could not tolerate with it anymore. The Spirit Fruit seeds from the hands of those who ran out from the first floor did not have any changes.
After the first day, almost everyone from the first floor and the second floor left. Most of the Spirit Fruit seeds that the people had in their hands sprouted. Some even had branches and leaves. The prices of those Spirit Fruit seeds were raised by quite a bit. Of course, most of them proved their strength.
On the second day, the people from the third floor all came down as well. When the people from the World Spirit Guild came down, they were immediately called to the palace.
Because no matter if it were the Jie Clan members or the World Spirit Guild elders, they wanted to know the identity of the third person who stepped onto the fourth floor was.
"You're saying that the third person who went onto the fourth floor wasn't from my World Spirit Guild nor someone from the Jie Clan? It was an outsider?" Elder Li from the World Spirit Guild was very shocked after getting that answer.
"Do you know where that child came from and what his name is?" Elder Li continued asking.
"He is called Chu Feng. Although we don't know where he came from, he took quite a bit of care of our World Spirit Guild."
"On the third floor, the Jie Clan activated a Formless Formation and they wanted to suppress us and prevent us from continuing upwards. If Chu Feng didn't help us, I'm afraid that it would be very difficult for us to come out there alive." A young female fiercely replied, and as she spoke, she even ferociously glared at the three Jie Clan elders.
"Nonsense! Right now, the heavily injured people are my Jie Clan members, yet you still dare to falsely accuse them?" But before even Elder Li could speak, the elder from the Jie Clan was furious.
"What really happened will naturally be investigated by my World Spirit Guild after the exam is over. However, I am more concerned how long the three people in the tower can stay for, and whether anyone can get a ripe Spirit Fruit." As Elder Li spoke, he cast his gaze towards the Asura Ghost Tower.
"Hmph." The Jie Clan elders did not speak after a cold snort. After all, what they were concerned about was also how long the three of them could preserve in the tower, and the identities of those who were on the fourth floor, the fifth floor, and the top.
On the third day, the blue light on the fourth floor started to move. After a while, the entrance to the Asura Ghost Tower that was undisturbed for a full day finally started to ripple.
At that instant, everyone's gaze were gathered there. They felt that the person who stayed on the fourth floor for three days could very possibly be that Chu Feng.
Although he was not part of the World Spirit Guild nor part of the Jie Clan, they still wanted to know Chu Feng's appearance. After all, those who were able to step onto the fourth floor could be added into the ranks of geniuses.
*hmm* However, when a person walked out after the Spirit Formation rippled, everyone couldn't help but be astounded. Especially the three Jie Clan elders. They were dumbstruck and shock filled their faces.
Because at that very instant, the person who walked out of the Asura Ghost Tower was not Chu Feng, nor was it Gu Bo. It was the person who the Jie Clan confidently thought stepped onto the top, Jie Bufan.
"How did this happen? It's my clan's young master Jie Bufan! He has the Armor of Thorns so how can he only climb up to the fourth floor?" The faces of the Jie Clan members were like ash and some could not accept that fact.
Jie Bufan's face was extremely ugly as well. Without speaking much, he quickly walked away because he couldn't tell others that he was threatened by Chu Feng to only remain on the fourth floor. After all, if he said that, not only would he lose his own face, he would lose the face of the Jie Clan.
"Elders, it seems like your clan foundation treasure isn't all that useful! Haha" The elders from the World Spirit Guild were in an extremely good mood.
"You" The Jie Clan elders face turned ashen from anger. Originally, they wanted to refute, but at the end, they did not say anything. After all, earlier, they did indeed speak too confidently. They were getting slapped on the face but they could not avoid it.
However, in the afternoon on the third day, the blue dot on the fifth floor moved and disappeared. At the end, after walking out of the Asura Ghost Tower, the faces from the World Spirit Guild were complicated and even the Jie Clan were endlessly shocked.
Because Gu Bo's appearance told everyone the answer. The person at the peak was neither from the Jie Clan nor from the World Spirit Guild. It was a young man called Chu Feng.
"He really succeeded!"
As Gu Bo stood under the tower and looked up, he saw the blue light on the sixth floor. His heart were like overturning rivers and oceans. Although he had already seen Chu Feng's extraordinariness, when Chu Feng really actually successfully reached the peak, he still had unspeakable excitement.
"Gu Bo." Suddenly, a voice rang out from behind and after looking back, Gu Bo couldn't help but be shocked. It was the peak expert of the World Spirit Guild, Elder Li.
"Elder Li, why have you come down?" Gu Bo asked with astonishment.
"Ho.. You've seen that Chu Feng?" Elder Li smiled and asked.
"He is indeed outstanding. He was able to not be affected by the Spirit Pressure when he was on the fifth floor. However, I never would have thought that he was truly able to reach the top." Gu Bo replied.
"Mm. He is indeed outstanding and most likely, he is another quite impressive person!" Elder Li nodded, then meaningfully looked at the sixth floor.
"Elder Li, it's just that Chu Feng has some past history with the Jie Clan"
"No need to speak. No matter what, my World Spirit Guild will protect this Chu Feng. This character must be roped into my World Spirit Guild." Elder Li waved his hand then walked towards the palace. Finally, a relieved smile also surged onto Gu Bo's face.
At the same time, Chu Feng who was on the sixth floor already stood up. As he looked at the three dark-green Spirit Fruits in his palm, indescribable excitement was in his heart. He could feel the strong energy that the three Spirit Fruits contained. If the Spirit Fruit really did work, then it would certainly save Eggy.
"This feeling." But suddenly, Chu Feng's expression changed greatly. He detected something and felt a trace of abnormality.
He hurriedly stood up, took out the World Spirit Compass, and imbued it with Spirit power. After that, all of the World Spirit Compass's pointers pointed up.
After Chu Feng used his Spirit power to observe in detail, his eyes couldn't help but light up as he shockingly said, "Is there a seventh floor?"


MGA Capitulo 198  Eggy Awakens
Chu Feng rejoiced because he could feel that there was a Spirit Formation entrance above, and as long as he could decipher it correctly, perhaps he could open the mysterious Spirit Formation entrance.
"Strange. This is already the highest level so why is there a Spirit Formation entrance? So the Asura Ghost Tower originally had seven floors, or is this a Spirit Formation passage that leads to other places?"
As he rejoiced though, he also sank into deep contemplation. He felt that the Spirit Formation entrance that currently appeared above him was not simple because he was already at that place for three days yet he did not feel that Spirit Formation entrance before.
So, it could be said that the Spirit Formation entrance let itself be felt by Chu Feng and it was not felt by Chu Feng through his personal abilities. So, he had no choice but to suspect whether the Spirit Formation entrance was a trap or not.
"That's right, Eggy! Eggy mentioned the word Asura before, so as long as she awakes, perhaps she will know the secret of this Asura Ghost Tower!"
Thinking to that point, Chu Feng was in a predicament again. Although he knew that the Spirit Fruit could save Eggy, He did not know how to specifically use it.
"Whatever, since there's three Spirit Fruits, I'll see if it works after eating one."
Chu Feng did not hesitate as he picked one of the Spirit Fruits up and after a few chews, he swallowed them. It had to be said that the taste of the Spirit Fruit was quite nice. It was delicious and quenching. It even made Chu Feng think that it was the most delicious fruit that he had ever eaten.
However, he did not know the reason why he felt that the Spirit Fruit was so delicious was not because the Spirit Fruit was truly delicious, but because he hadn't eaten a single grain of rice or drank a single drop of water in quite a long time.
However, a short while after the Spirit Fruit entered his stomach, Chu Feng felt two waves of power. One power wave entered his brain. It combined with his Spirit power and instantly, it strengthened his Spirit power by several times.
The other wave of power also surged into his brain. However, it did not meld with his Spirit power. It bore into his Spiritual World.
"It's Eggy! It's Eggy's aura! This girl really did not die."
Chu Feng got more and more excited because he felt Eggy's aura, and she was currently absorbing the energy contained in the Spirit Fruit. Under that situation, Eggy's aura became stronger and stronger as well. Gradually, Chu Feng could even feel that Eggy's physical body was recondensing in his own World Spirit Space.
"This is great! This Spirit Fruit really is useful." In response, Chu Feng quickly took another Spirit Fruit and swallowed it after a few bites.
After the Spirit Fruit entered his stomach, with a thought, Chu Feng cast his own awareness into the Spiritual World and he wanted to look at the result.
"Beautiful."
At that instant, Chu Feng could clearly see within his vast Spiritual World, a large group of dark-green gases were floating in the air.
That gas was very beautiful. It was like the bright sunlight during sunset, yet it emitted faint dark-green coloured brilliance and it was currently gathering towards the World Spirit Space.
Under that situation, the green-coloured light became less and less and very quickly, they were all engulfed and the Spiritual World returned to its former tranquility.
"What are you thinking? You're not going to come in?" Just as Chu Feng was at a loss, a voice that was as ear-pleasing as silver bells suddenly rang out in the World Spirit Space.
"Eggy! It's Eggy!"
Chu Feng was so excited that his body was trembling a bit. A dazzling smile was filled on his young and tender face. After he stepped into the World Spirit Space, his happy expression was intense to the extreme.
In the middle of the World Spirit Space, Eggy was standing there. It was still the black-coloured skirt weaved by black-coloured feathers. Revealing her snow-white shoulders on top, and her pen-like straight, long, beautiful legs.
Her demonic figure did not change at and she was even more captivating that before. On her sweet face was a pair of pretty eyes, and at that that instant, they curved to form two beautiful crescent moons. She was currently staring at Chu Feng while smiling.
"You are quite impressive eh? You actually got Spirit Fruits. Who told you that these things can awaken me?" Eggy giggled and asked.
However, Chu Feng did not even speak. While taking large strides and with arrow-like steps, he arrived in front of Eggy. His arms were open and he put the alluring girl into his embrace before saying, "Next time, don't go crazy! Do you know how much I was worried about you?"
While being tightly hugged by Chu Feng, on Eggy's white-snow face, a hint of scarlet emerged onto her face. That girl was a bit embarrassed.
However, she did not push Chu Feng away because with her cultivation, if she wanted to dodge, she could have easily dodged Chu Feng's bearhug.
"It's enough and you need to watch out how many small advantages you take from me. Or else, be careful as I might break you!" Eggy chuckled and said.
At that instant, Chu Feng was aware that he was slightly excessive. As he wished to continue and with unwillingness on his face, he let go of the beautiful creature in front of him, smiled, and said, "Eggy, have you heard of the Asura Ghost Tower?"
"Asura Ghost Tower? You've heard of the Asura Ghost Tower?" After hearing those three words, Eggy's expression changed greatly as well.
"I haven't only heard of it. Right now, we are in this Asura Ghost Tower!" Chu Feng replied.
"Really? Quickly go out and let me see!" After hearing those words, Eggy was instantly happy and she was so excited that she jumped up and down.
Chu Feng did not delay and with a thought, he cast his awareness back within the Asura Ghost Tower. He swept his gaze around him and let Eggy see his current environment.
"Haha, this is great! It is really the Asura Ghost Tower! Chu Feng, where is this place? Is it still within the Nine Provinces?" From Eggy's tone, he could hear that she was getting more and more excited.
"This is the Spirit Province from the continent of the Nine Provinces. Eggy, what's so special about this Asura Ghost Tower?" Chu Feng was also excited because he could feel that Eggy most likely knew what the Asura Ghost Tower was.
"I never would have thought that the Nine Provinces had the Asura Ghost Tower. It seems that this is not a simple place. At least, in order to leave something like this behind, there must have been an extremely powerful World Spiritist here once."
"Chu Feng, you want to know what this Asura Ghost Tower is used for? This tower is a sealing formation."
"However, what it is sealing is not some terrifying monster. It is sealing extremely precious treasures!" Eggy explained.
"Precious treasures? Where?" Chu Feng excitedly asked.
"Which floor is this?"
"The sixth floor!"
"That isn't right. It would be impossible for the Asura Ghost Tower to only have six floors. An Asura Ghost Tower has to have at least seven floors. Look up. There should be a Spirit Formation entrance there."
"That's right, there is indeed a Spirit Formation entrance above us. So that means that there really is a seventh floor in this Asura Ghost Tower?"
"Of course, if I'm not mistaken, the precious treasure that is sealed within this Asura Ghost Tower is above!"


MGA Capitulo 199  Mysterious Person
"Precious treasure. What kind of precious treasure is it? Can there be Elite Armaments?"
Chu Feng endlessly rejoiced. That Asura Ghost Tower was very unordinary and the precious treasures that was sealed within it would certainly not be simple. So, Chu Feng greatly looked forward to the seventh floor.
"Elite Armaments? You also know things like those? It seems that you have had quite a few harvests within the days that I wasn't here." Eggy smiled, then said,
"I have no way of being sure what is sealed in it, but treasure is certain sealed in this Asura Ghost Tower. Elite Armaments aren't impossible either."
"But no matter what, we'll know after we go in. Listen to my orders, lay the opening formation, and enter the seventh floor to take a look!"
"On it!"
Under Eggy's instructions, Chu Feng started to lay the opening formation. The opening formation, like its name, was used to open all sorts of sealing or hidden formations.
"This Spirit Formation is quite impressive. Luckily it's you, or else even Blue-cloak World Spiritists have no way of opening this Spirit Formation. I'm afraid that they would not even be able to detect it." Eggy proudly said as she instructed Chu Feng.
"Eggy, can we successfully open it then?" After hearing that even Blue-cloak World Spiritists could not even open it, instantly, Chu Feng lost all confidence.
"Of course you can. Dont forget that this is the Asura Ghost Tower. All the power here comes from the Asura Spirit World."
"You made a contract with me, so you count as half an Asura Spirit World person. Whether it be the Spirit Pressure or the formations here, they will not pressure you." Eggy explained.
"Asura Spirit World?" Other than being shocked, Chu Feng was also confused.
"You idiot. Do you really think that there is only one world for us spirits? In actuality, there are seven spiritual worlds, called the Seven Spiritual Worlds."
"Within the Seven Spiritual Worlds, many different types of World Spirits that grasp different abilities live there. Bluntly speaking, my Asura Spirit World is the strongest within the Seven Spiritual Worlds."
"Because the Asura World Spirits are naturally prideful and would not create contracts with humans and work for them because of disdain, the number of World Spiritists that are able to create a contract with the Asura World Spirits can be said to be few within few, and rare within rare."
"However, the World Spiritists that can establish a contract with the Asura World Spirits will certainly be a lot more outstanding that the World Spiritists of the same level. Not for any other reason, but purely because the power that they grasp is the Asura power, and their World Spirit is the Asura World Spirit." Eggy said extremely proudly.
"If you say it like that, am I not very lucky?" Chu Feng chuckled and said.
"Hmph. You think so? You should know how many powerful World Spiritists feel honored to be able to establish a contract with Asura World Spirits, and feel proud to be able to establish a contract with Asura World Spirits."
"But even so, Asura World Spirit contractors are extremely rare. If you let the World Spiritists who cultivated for many years know that a little child actually make a contract with me, they would really tear you apart from envy." Eggy pursed her little mouth and said.
"So that means it is a very dangerous thing to make a contract with you and I still need to keep this a secret." Chu Feng sighed.
"Of course. I still remember the World Spiritists who wanted to make a contract with me. Not a single one of them weren't famous characters, yet they were all refused by me."
"If they knew that I established a contract with a little boy like you, they would certainly be furious and unwilling, and they would instantly come over to kill you."
"However, don't worry. As long as you can quickly recover my original strength, there will be no one who can harm you." Eggy patted her chest and guaranteed.
"Actually, I wanted to say that since it is so hard to establish a contract with your Asura World Spirits, the creator of this Asura Ghost Tower must not be a simple person." Chu Feng looked at his surroundings and had that thought.
"He would certainly not be simple, but how can he even be compared to your family? They were able to seal two Asura World Spirits in your little baby body and even I cannot escape it." As she spoke, Eggy had complaint all over her face, but from that, one could tell that Chu Feng's family was extraordinarily strong.
*hmm* As the two were chatting, a pillar of light suddenly appeared from the opening formation. It rushed towards the top of the Asura Ghost Tower. A Spirit Formation entrance appeared there.
"Haha, success! Chu Feng, quickly enter and let me see what's in there!" Eggy excitedly spoke and Chu Feng already moved as he leaped into the Spirit Formation.
"What is happening? How can the top of the Asura Ghost Tower give out such dazzling light?"
At the same time, the crowd outside the Asura Ghost Tower boiled because everyone could see that the top of the Asura Ghost Tower emitted a dazzling, red-coloured light and it lit up the area around it as if it was day.
"This scene happened a hundred years ago as well!" Elder Li from the World Spirit Guild was endlessly shocked.
He heard a senior say before, that a hundred years ago, a short while after the night in which the two pinnacle geniuses of the World Spirit Guild and the Jie Clan were defeated, change happened to the Asura Ghost Tower. The change was extremely similar to the scene in front of his eyes. It could be said to be exactly the same.
"Look! The blue light at the sixth stage disappeared! Did something happen in the Asura Ghost Tower?" Suddenly, someone yelled out.
At that very instant, everyone was incomparably curious yet they were powerless because everyone who were sitting there could not enter the sixth floor. They could only wait. Wait until Chu Feng came out before asking about the truth.
As everything outside was in chaos, Chu Feng successfully entered the seventh floor. That place was completely different from the sixth floor from before. The walls everywhere were translucent Spirit Formations, and on top of the Spirit Formations were strange symbols. The feeling that every single Spirit Formation gave Chu Feng was that they were indestructible and he could not move them no matter what.
The Spirit Formation became a road that led Chu Feng forward. But very quickly, Chu Feng arrived at the end. The end was still a Spirit Formation, but obviously, that Spirit formation was stronger. The shape was strange as well and it was like a cage.
"Ahh~~~~" Suddenly, an ear-piercing screech rang out. That voice was too strange and it frightened Chu Feng a few steps back.
At the same time, Chu Feng could see a figure arriving in front of the Spirit Formation like lightning. After seeing Chu Feng, he was so excited that his hands and feet danced as he jumped around. He even loudly said, "This is great! This is great! After one hundred years, finally, there's a person who came to this place!"
As he looked at the person in front of him, Chu Feng had shock all over his face because that person looked quite special. Sharp ears, like some animals. A pair of blood-red eyes and a mouthful of sharp teeth. More or less, it was a bit scary.
Although,from his figure, he looked like a human, his face seemed like a monster. However, the reason why Chu Feng was shocked wasn't because he was scared by his appearance.
That face. Wasn't he the mysterious person who defeated the two pinnacle geniuses from the World Spirit Guild and the Jie Clan a hundred years ago?


MGA Capitulo 200  Gazes of Adoration
"Haha, boy, what's your name?" Just at that time, the mysterious person had joy all over while pointing at Chu Feng and questioning.
"Chu Feng, this is a Monstrous Beast with unmeasurably deep cultivation and it also grasps extremely strong Spirit Formation techniques. It is very possible that it is a Purple-cloak World Spiritist so do not be careless." But before even letting Chu Feng reply, Eggy's voice rang out in his brain and she gravely reminded.
"Is it really a Monstrous Beast? Can they even become World Spiritists?" Chu Feng was quite shocked.
"Monstrous Beasts and humans are the same. True, normal Monstrous Beasts are not equipped with Spirit power, however, some Monstrous Beasts have special blood or perhaps they ate special food, causing the creation of Spirit power. So, they can become World Spiritists as well."
"Right now, the one who is locked in the Spirit Formation is certainly a Monstrous Beast, one with special blood. It is an extremely intelligent one or else it would not be able to cultivate its Spirit Formation technique to this stage."
"Look. Within the Spirit Formation, there are many deciphering symbols. Those are very profound symbols and they can only be condensed out by Purple-cloak World Spiritists. Very likely, it was here to take the precious treasure and because of that, it was locked here. He used quite powerful methods and wanted to leave this place, but it was unsuccessful."
"So, you must be careful. The precious treasures here are not taken so easily. If you can't do it, then just leave this place for now." Eggy continued to remind.
"Oi! Boy, why aren't you speaking? You wouldn't have been scared witless by me right? Hehe" The sharp-teethed Monstrous Beast chuckled at Chu Feng.
Chu Feng ignored it. He only carefully looked around in a circle, then turned around and left.
Although there was a huge, powerful character in front of him, although he knew that there were precious treasures there, Chu Feng was clear that most of that was unrelated to him.
Since such a powerful character was locked there, Chu Feng knew that he was not qualified to come and take the things there.
"Oi! Boy, don't go! Don't go! Say and chat with me!"
As it saw that Chu Feng wanted to leave, the Monstrous Beast clearly panicked. However, Chu Feng still ignored it and continue walking away because Eggy kept on reminding Chu Feng to not pay attention to it. It would certainly think of a way to get Chu Feng to help it escape that place. However, if it came out, no one knew whether it would harm Chu Feng or not.
"Boy, do you want to become a Blue-cloak World Spiritist within two years? I can help you!" Suddenly, those words came from behind.
*ta* After hearing those words, Chu Feng stopped his steps because being a Blue-cloak World Spiritist was too attracting to Chu Feng. So, he asked, "Make me a Blue-cloak World Spiritist within two years? Are you sure you can do that?"
"Boy, you must not know who I am. Whatever, it would be useless to say too much to you. All in all, I know a method that can make a person's Spirit power rapidly strengthen to link to the blue-coloured Spirit Formation power in a short amount of time to become a Blue-cloak World Spiritist. Also, you are very lucky because right now, I am prepared to pass this method down to you." The Monstrous Beast solemnly vowed.
"You are not a relative nor a friend to me, so why are you going to pass this method down to me? Also, on what basis should I trust you on?" Chu Feng was extremely careful because he knew that an extremely exceptional existence was locked within the Spirit Formation.
"I do not lie to people. Don't worry, I won't harm you. I just don't want my method to be lost and not passed down in the world."
"Of course, if you can become a Blue-cloak World Spiritist, I hope that you can help me from the outside and open up this Spirit Formation that locked me in and help me regain my freedom." Seeing such a cautious Chu Feng, the Monstrous Beast did not turn any corners and it bluntly stated its situation and goal.
"Fine. Tell me your method!" After some thinking, Chu Feng spoke and asked.
"Boy, you wouldn't abandon and not care about me after I tell you the method right?" The Monstrous Beast narrowed its eyes and revealed a hint of astuteness.
"Do you have any other choice?" Chu Feng faintly smiled. Although he knew that the person in front of him was the super huge character that defeated the two pinnacle geniuses a hundred years ago, at that instant, he was not afraid.
Chu Feng did not display any sort of respect because he had the absolute power to do so. He had to control that power well to pressure his opponent in terms of the general mood in order to gain benefits from his opponent.
"Haha, good boy. Quite the nerves you have there since you dare to speak to me like that. However, I like that about you."
"With this method, you use a special tool to refine your Spirit power. As for the position of the tool, I can tell you, but I hope that after you succeed, you come back to help me. After I get out, I will give you even greater benefits."
After speaking, the Monstrous Beast waved its big arm and purple-coloured Spirit Formation power surged out. A Spirit Formation map condensed by symbols appeared in front of it. Chu Feng did not delay and he quickly remembered the map in his brain.
"Senior, if what you said was true, I will certainly come back to help you. At that time, you don't need to give me any benefits. Just take it as my gratitude towards you!" After clearly remembering the map in his brain, Chu Feng put down the arrogant attitude, bent his body towards the Monstrous Beast and paid his respects.
"Since you are able to enter this place, it means that you have some ability. I will wait here for you." The Monstrous Beast seemed to believe Chu Feng.
"Senior, actually, I'm quite curious. What kind of treasure is hidden here?" After thinking for a while, Chu Feng spoke and asked.
"HoThe treasure is certainly a good treasure, but I haven't seen it yet. So boy, it's best if you don't keep thinking about it. Look at me. You know that the treasure isn't easy to get."
"If I wasn't a smart person and if I didn't prepare food enough for two hundred years, I'm afraid that I would have already starved to death here." The Monstrous Beast smiled and said.
After hearing those words, Chu Feng felt quite shocked. He was shocked at the impressiveness of the Asura Ghost Tower, and he also admired the Monstrous Beast's abilities. It prepared food that was enough for two hundred years. It could be seen that it predicted that today would happen and prepared for it.
After that, Chu Feng did not ask too much more as he turned around and walked down the Asura Ghost Tower. However, when he walked out of the Asura Ghost Tower, he was stupefied by the scene in front of him.
Chu Feng had imagined a lot of different scenes that would happen after he walked out of the Asura Ghost Tower. He imagined that people would look at him but ignore him he also imagined that the Jie Clan members would pulled their swords and draw their bows at him and he also imagined that the World Spirit Guild would extend an olive branch at him as well.
However, he did not expect that after he walked out of the Asura Ghost Tower, there would be an entire plaza full of people standing there. No matter if it was the people from the World Spirit Guild, or the Jie Clan members, all of them cast a single type of gaze towards him. The gazes of adoration!


MGA Capitulo 201  Protected
"He's that Chu Feng?"
"How is he so young? He really went onto the sixth floor?"
Endless cries of surprise rang out from the crowd because Chu Feng broke a legend and became the first person to step onto the peak of the Asura Ghost Tower in a hundred years. He became the idol of many people.
Although the current Chu Feng was still very weak, with his talent, he was fated to become an extremely significant character. At that moment, everyone who were there witnessed the birth of a huge character. Because of that, they felt honored and proud.
Especially Chu Feng's young and tender appearance let people know that he was very young. So, they felt even more shocked because that proved his impressiveness even more. From the bottom of their hearts, they felt that Chu Feng's future achievements were unlimited.
*hu~*
Suddenly, within the vast ocean of humans, a road appeared. Powerful people from the Jie Clan, being led by three elders, aggressively walked towards Chu Feng.
Behind the three elders were Jie Heng, Jie Gang and the others. They were the people that were madly beaten up by Chu Feng. Although their auras recovered quite a bit, the wounds that Chu Feng left could still be seen on their bodies.
"Jie Heng, Jie Gang, was it him that attacked you in the Asura Ghost Tower?" An elder from the Jie Clan pointed and Chu Feng and asked.
"Elder, he is Chu Feng who spoke nonsense and didn't put the Jie Clan within his eyes!" Jie Heng replied and his fierce gaze swept over Chu Feng's body.
"Apprehend him!"
The elder from the Jie Clan coldly yelled. In the instant after he spoke, several powerful people behind him rushed towards Chu Feng. They were all experts of the Profound realm. When the pressure gathered in a single area and pressed forward, it was like an invisible huge mountain and even Chu Feng tightly frowned.
"Chu Feng, I'll lend you my power!" Seeing that the situation was not great, Eggy wanted to lend her power to Chu Feng and let Chu Feng break through the surrounding attack.
"No need!" However, Chu Feng chose to decline. Not only did he not avoid or dodge it, he even stood where he was while waiting for the attacks of the Jie Clan to arrive.
At first, Eggy felt surprised about Chu Feng's actions, but she, who shared everything with Chu Feng quickly understood his intentions.
"Ahh!" Suddenly, a golden-coloured gale came sweeping by and the several Profound realm Jie Clan members flipped over as they were blown, like scarecrows, and they were thrown away by the wind.
At the same time, three aged figures appeared in front of Chu Feng without any noise. The one who led was Elder Li of the World Spirit Guild.
"The one called Li, move. This is a private grudge between my Jie Clan and this child. Do not interfere!" Seeing that, the expressions of the elders from the Jie Clan changed greatly as they pointed at Elder Li and yelled extremely displeasedly.
"Nonsense! This place is my World Spirit Guild's, and it isn't your Jie Clan turn to act so atrociously!" Elder Li's face also turned cold as he waved his big sleeve. Coming from outside of the plaza, several thousand people rushed in and completely surrounded the Jie Clan.
"The one called Li. You have quite the nerves! For an outsider, you arm yourself against my Jie Clan. This violates the treaty of the alliance and it destroys the peaceful relationship between my Jie Clan and your World Spirit Guild. Are you able to carry this responsibility?" The Jie Clan elder interrogated.
"Hmph. Don't think I don't know about your Jie Clan's fine deeds in the Asura Ghost Tower. Even if does violate the treaty, your Jie Clan erred first."
"Today, I will place my words right here. Chu Feng is protected by my World Spirit Guild. If anyone of you dares to attack Chu Feng, do not blame me for not restraining myself!" Elder Li's gaze were like flames and his tone was extremely forceful.
"Fine, the one called Li. Let's see if you can carry this responsibility."
In response, even though the Jie Clan were extremely angered, they did not say anything and they only led their army, turned around, and left. After all, that was the territory of the World Spirit Guild and they were indeed in the wrong for that exam.
"Don't worry. Even if your Jie Clan doesn't look for me, my World Spirit Guild will look for you for fairness." Elder Li also didn't let him go so easily.
After the Jie Clan left, the curtains of the White-cloak Exam also fell. However, Chu Feng who was the focus of this exam did not leave as he was invited by the World Spirit Guild into a very luxurious palace. A grand feast was already prepared for treating Chu Feng, and the person who received Chu Feng was his peer, Gu Bo.
"Brother Gu Bo, this" Chu Feng felt a bit overwhelmed as he looked at the sumptuous feast. Not only did the World Spirit Guild help him hold back the troubles from the Jie Clan, currently, they were even treating him like that, so he was quite overwhelmed.
"Brother Chu Feng, no need restrain yourself. You are worthy enough to be treated like this by my World Spirit Guild!" Gu Bo smiled at Chu Feng.
After hearing that, Chu Feng understood the intentions of the World Spirit Guild. Obviously, they saw his own potential and they wanted to pull Chu Feng into the World Spirit Guild. To Chu Feng, that was a good thing so he did not push it away.
However, at that moment, the exam already finished and everyone who participated in the exam already left the World Spirit Guild. Zhuge Liuyun was still waiting outside, and since Chu Feng was afraid that his master would be worried, he said, "Brother Gu Bo, my master is still outside of the World Spirit Guild, I want"
"Chu Feng bro, don't worry. People have already been sent to invite your master and the both of you will reunite soon." Gu Bo smiled then pulled Chu Feng to take a seat.
At the same time, outside of the World Spirit Guild, within a city that was specially made for providing rest for outsiders, Zhuge Liuyun was standing at the city gate while anxiously waiting.
"Have you heard of a young man called Chu Feng in this exam? He stepped onto the sixth floor of the Asura Ghost Tower and got a ripe Spirit Fruit."
"I've heard of it. I even know that Chu Feng is only fifteen years old this year but already has the cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm. His battle prowess is even more frightening. According to rumours, even those at the 5th level of the Origin realm cannot defeat him."
"That's right. The young generation of the Jie Clan were all swept away, and even that Jie Bufan was defeated by Chu Feng's hands."
"Several of them? He even defeated the Jie Clan members? He's a bit too bold right? With how the Jie Clan think, they would certainly not forgive him."
"You don't understand. Talent like Chu Feng's hasn't appeared for a hundred years and he is already destined in becoming a genius. The World Spirit Guild has already let out word that they would protect Chu Feng. Right now, he is invited to the World Spirit Guild as a guest and the Jie Clan would not dare to touch him."
As Zhuge Liuyun was waiting for the arrival of Chu Feng, several White-cloak World Spiritists next to him were chatting to one another. One mouth after the other were talking about Chu Feng and the heart of Zhuge Liuyun who listened jumped. So, he went up and politely asked, "Old brothers, did the Chu Feng that you were talking about come from the Azure Province?"


MGA Capitulo 202  Returning to the Azure Province
"Azure Province? Although I don't know where that Chu Feng came from, such a powerful genius shouldn't have come from the Azure Province right?"
"Yeah, how can a genius like Chu Feng appear from a place like the Azure Province?" They first looked at Zhuge Liuyun, then all of them shook their heads.
"Then... That Chu Feng has a blue-coloured long robe, white face, thick eyebrows, big eyes, tall and straight nose, and also a young and tender appearance."
"He is also skilled in a strange martial skill. He is able to control his Origin power to condense various types of gold-coloured weapons out as he wishes, and he uses them quite impressively."
"Especially after condensing a golden-coloured longbow, the arrows that are shot do not miss and even those at the 5th level of the Origin realm can't resist against it?" Zhuge Liuyun continued asking.
"This..I'm not too clear about what he wore and his appearance, but he did seem to grasp a rank 5 martial skill that can condense various weapons out. That's right, I heard that he is good with an outstanding bodily martial skill. Lightning rises from under his feet and he becomes strangely quick." One of them answered.
After hearing those words, Zhuge Liuyun rejoiced and after hitting his fist to his palm, he said, "It is certainly him!"
"Mm? Old brother, from your tone, you seem to know that Chu Feng?" Seeing that, several of them suspiciously asked.
As he looked at the several expressions, Zhuge Liuyun raised his head high, stuck his chest out, then said while patting his chest, "To be completely honest, that Chu Feng is my disciple."
"Hahahaha" What Zhuge Liuyun's words were exchanged for were the laughter of the others, as if they heard the most funniest joke in the world.
Seeing that, Zhuge Liuyun's face was a bit ugly, however, he did not know how to explain it. Although he was a fearful character in the Azure Dragon School, at this place, he really wasn't much.
Not to mention the others, but even the people who he chatted with at that instant were all experts of the Profound realm. He could not find any feelings of superiority because very few people who were roughly in the same generation as him were weaker than him.
"Look, it's the people from the World Spirit Guild!" But just at that time, suddenly, someone pointed nearby and yelled in surprise.
After looking over, indeed, there was a group formed by a hundred people from the World Spirit Guild and they were currently walking over. At that instant, even Zhuge Liuyun revealed an expression of reverence.
As World Spiritists, which one did not want to join the World Spirit Guild and become a member of that huge group? However, the requirements for the World Spirit Guild were extremely strict and one could not join with only a certain level of cultivation. They required the World Spiritist's talent and they needed to sign a special contract.
That contract was equivalent to a contract that sold themself. Not only that, it also sold their offsprings, and every single generation were required to serve the World Spirit Guild. It was a huge restriction.
So, that contract gave many a chance to become a member of the World Spirit Guild, but it also made those who enjoyed freedom to stop and only look.
What Zhuge Liuyun did not expect was that the group of people from the World Spirit Guild stopped in front of him. The middle-aged man who led looked at the portrait in his hands, then politely said to Zhuge Liuyun, "If I may ask, are you Mr. Zhuge Liuyun?"
"That's me!" Zhuge Liuyun cautiously replied. This tone was very kind as well because he did not dare to have a single trace of disrespect towards the World Spirit Guild. Even if their cultivation was inferior to him, he still did not dare.
"Congratulations Mr. Zhuge. Your disciple, Chu Feng, got first place in the White-cloak Exam. On the orders of the elders, I invite you to be a guest at the World Spirit Guild." After confirming Zhuge Liuyun's identity, his attitude became even more respectful.
"YouyouyouYou really are...!!" After hearing those words, before even letting Zhuge Liuyun respond, the several people next to him were like exploding pots. Their faces were stunned because they knew that this time, they really "had eyes but did not recognize Mount Tai".
As for Zhuge Liuyun, his heart was filled with joy and he was so excited that he didn't know what to do. He never would have thought that the World Spirit Guild would invite him in such a grand way. It was quite an honorable thing.
Of course, the thing that he was even more happy about was that the World Spirit Guild gave him an answer. It was that his disciple, Chu Feng, was truly first in the White-cloak Exam. To him, that was an extremely glorious thing.
After that, Zhuge Liuyun went into the World Spirit Guild and Elder Li even personally welcomed Chu Feng and Zhuge Liuyun. He even invited Chu Feng and Zhuge Liuyun to be a member of the World Spirit Guild.
The most important thing was that they got a status badge. It was a very special kind as it was similar to the status of being a guest elder. Their freedoms were not restricted yet they could enjoy all the benefits of being from the World Spirit Guild, possibly even getting better treatment.
That made Chu Feng and Zhuge Liuyun extremely glad. Especially Zhuge Liuyun because that was equal to completing an uncompletable wish as he was able to become a member of the World Spirit Guild.
After being a member of the World Spirit Guild, Zhuge Liuyun received an invitation and he decided to stay in the World Spirit Guild for a few more days. As for Chu Feng, since he had matters to attend to, he needed to quickly return to the Azure Province.
Before leaving, Chu Feng gave the ripe Spirit Fruit that he nourished in the Asura Ghost Tower to Zhuge Liuyun. That attracted the admiration of Elder Li because a ripe Spirit Fruit was extremely precious and it helped one's Spirit power greatly.
As for Zhuge Liuyun, he was even more touched. He knew that he took in the right disciple and the many years of waiting were not wasted because he accepted an impressive disciple.
So, on that day, Chu Feng left the World Spirit Guild and headed towards the Azure Province because after some calculations of the date, the time to Su Mei's marriage already neared.


MGA Capitulo 203  Arriving at the Void School
Within the clear and bright skies, above the endless white clouds, a huge White-headed Eagle streaked past the air.
That White-headed Eagle was extremely beautiful and its speed was strangely quick. It was a White-headed Eagle of the highest quality and it was one of the presents that the World Spirit Guild gave Chu Feng.
Chu Feng sat cross-legged on the White-headed Eagle as he closed his eyes to rest. He did not steer the eagle because it understood human nature and it understood the paths in the Spirit Province and the Azure Province. There was no need to steer it. With a few words, it would automatically arrive to the destination.
"Gone?" After flying out of the Spirit Province and into the Azure Province, Chu Feng slowly opened his eyes and swept his gaze behind.
"Gone. The Jie Clan aren't idiots and they know that the World Spirit Guild would hiddenly see you off. Naturally, they would not dare to attack." Eggy's pleasant voice rang out and it was extremely moving. But sadly, that sweet voice could only be heard by Chu Feng himself.
"I would really have to thank the World Spirit Guild." A grateful smile appeared on the corner of Chu Feng's mouth.
After he left the World Spirit Guild, the Jie Clan had people hiddenly following Chu Feng. However, the World Spirit Guild also sent out experts to hiddenly protect him. Both of them were in the darkness, but they detected one another.
So, after leaving the Spirit Province, the Jie Clan and the World Spirit Guild did not follow him anymore. As for how Chu Feng detected it, they were from the huge benefits that Chu Feng gained after the White-cloak Exam.
In order to rope Chu Feng closer to them, not only did the World Spirit Guild gift quite a costly White-headed Eagle to Chu Feng, they even gave him some Origin beads and some things that were beneficial for Spirit power.
Chu Feng relied on those Origin beads to successfully enter the 2nd level of the Origin realm. However, that was not the most important thing. The most important thing was from the power of the Spirit Fruit and in addition to the gifts from the World Spirit Guild, he raised his Spirit power to an extremely powerful level and he stepped onto an entirely new stage.
The current Chu Feng could already use the power of the Grey-cloak Spirit Formation. His Spirit power was extremely strong and the Spirit Formations he laid were incomparably strong. To be more strict, Chu Feng was already a Grey-cloak World Spiritist. However, because he had some things he needed to do, Chu Feng did not go for the Grey-cloak Exam.
But in reality, Chu Feng didn't really even need to enter the exam because he already had a World Spirit Grey-cloak on him.
Due to the quick speed of the White-headed Eagle, it greatly reduced the traveling time. So, after returning to the Azure Province, Chu Feng did not directly go towards the Vermilion Bird Mountain Range but to the Void Mountain Range outside of the Vermilion Bird Mountain Range.
"Little White, wait for me here." On a cliff in the mountain range, Chu Feng stroked the huge White-headed Eagle a few times before heading towards the middle of the mountain range. As for "Little White", it was the name that he gave the White-headed Eagle.
Chu Feng's target was a second-rate school in the Void Mountain Range. That school was called the Void School. Although its strength wasn't as strong as the Azure Dragon School and it was only mediocre within second-rate schools, after all, it was still a second-rate school.
As for why Chu Feng went to that place, he just wanted to use some people. So, not only did he borrow Eggy's power, he also put the grey-coloured cloak on to increase his negotiation power.
Within the main hall of the Void School, the head of the Void School was currently chatting with two manager elders. The leader was a middle-aged big man. Although he was not even fifty years old, his head was already filled with white hair and he had the cultivation of the 3rd level of the Profound realm.
Although the two manager elders weren't as strong as the head of the Void School in terms of cultivation, they were still experts of the Profound realm. However, suddenly, the tightly closed big door was abruptly opened as an elder rushed in.
"Lord head, there's, there's an esteemed guest here!" That elder was full of sweat. His face was pale-white and he said with a quivering voice.
"Esteemed guest? Who?" Seeing that, the head of the Void School and the two elders knew that something was wrong as they quickly stood up and questioned while their heads were full of fog.
"It's me!" An aged voice rang out and Chu Feng already entered the main hall without even making any noise. After that, he waved his big sleeve and the door was blown by a gust of wind and it was closed.
At the same time, a layer of grey-coloured Spirit Formation surrounded the main hall and condensed. It locked everyone who was there within it.
"Grey-cloak World Spiritist!!" After looking at the grey-cloak on Chu Feng's body and the methods that he displayed, the Void School head and the two manager elders yelled out in surprise at the same time.
It was because the status of Grey-cloak World Spiritists were too noble. After all, within the entire Azure Province, there were only two Grey-cloak World Spiritists. One was in the number one school, the Lingyun School, and the other one was in the Qilin Prince's Mansion. The statuses of both of them were extremely high and they were extremely well-known, huge characters.
In front of them, since a Grey-cloak World Spiritist like that appeared, immediately, it made people think of the two characters. So naturally, everyone who was there would be incomparably shocked and their nervous hearts were banging and jumping all over the place.
"Senior, I wonder what your esteemed name is, and what matters do you have to honor your presence in my Void School?" The head of the Void School respectfully asked after organizing his emotions.
"I have no name nor surname, but you can call me as Mr. Grey-cloak. I do have a request by coming here today." Chu Feng walked over to the throne of the Void School's head and sat there, as if he was the master of that area.
"Mr. Grey-cloak?" The head of the Void School was shocked once again because he never heard of that name before. It could be seen that the person in front of him was neither the person in the Lingyun School nor the one from the Qilin Prince's Mansion.
However, he could not be sure that the person in front of his eyes was not one of the two huge characters. But no matter what, a Grey-cloak World Spiritist was not someone who his Void School could offend.
So, the head of the Void School lightly smiled and said, "I wonder what request Mr. Grey-cloak has? As long as my Void School can do it, I will not shrink away from it."
"Three days later, I want you to lead the elites of the Void School and go towards the Vermilion Bird City to help me marry a lady."
"Lady? Who?"
"The little daughter of the Vermilion Bird City's lord, Su Mei!"
"Su Mei? Isn'tisn't that the person who the son of the Shangguan family, Shangguan Ya, will marry in three days?" After hearing those words, the few people who were there were incomparably astonished and difficult expressions appeared on their faces.
The Shangguan family was not to be underestimated. In terms of strength, they were even stronger than his Void School. Telling them to help him marry the future wife of Shangguan Ya of the Shangguan family was undoubtedly telling them to become the enemy of the Shangguan family and it would cause a calamity for the Void School.
However, their Void School could also not offend a Grey-cloak World Spiritist. After all, even a first-rate school had to respectfully treat a huge character like that, not to mention a mere second-rate school.
"Don't worry. I won't let you go ahead with your real identities since that is equal to making a huge enemy. You can disguise yourselves as not the Void School, but as the subordinates of me, Mr. Grey-cloak."
"Also, I won't make you do all this for nothing. As long as you are willing to go ahead and propose this marriage, no matter if it succeeds or doesn't, I will lay a huge Spirit Formation Array in the core zone of your Void School as compensation." Chu Feng indifferently said.
After speaking those words, the head of the Void School and the two manager elders all lit up their eyes and insane happiness appeared on their faces. A Spirit Formation personally laid by a Grey-cloak World Spiritist. That degree of attraction was too great because after all, that was something that many first-rate schools did not even have.


MGA Capitulo 204  Day of Great Joy
Three days later, within the Vermilion Bird City. Everyone was extremely happy and all the noble clans, high ranking officials, and famous people outside returned to the Vermilion Bird City.
Today was a day of great joy as the future master of the Shangguan family, Shangguan Ya, was going to marry Su Mei, who was the young daughter of the lord of the Vermilion Bird City, Su Hen.
However, as firecrackers boomed outside and gongs and drums rang to the heavens, within a room in the city lord's residence, the atmosphere was clearly abnormally gloomy.
Today, Su Mei wore a red-coloured long dress. That dress was extremely beautiful, and Su Mei's sweet and beautiful face was emphasized to the extreme. Her beauty could truly devastate counties and cities.
However, even though the female servant who was next to her put makeup on, dressed, and combed her, even though laughter reached the skies outside, there was not a single trace of happiness on Su Mei's face. In contrary, two streams of tears were flowing down her sweet face.
That made the servant panic as she kept on wiping away the tears for Su Mei. She wanted to fix the makeup, but it was useless as the tears surged more and more, until the makeup on her face was thoroughly ruined.
*bang*
"Move!"
Suddenly, a boom came from the entrance and the sturdy big door was shattered into pieces. Two of the guards for the city lord's residence fell into the room and lost consciousness.
"Ahh~~~" That change caused the female servants to screech. However, when two figures walked in, the servants were dumbfounded where they stood.
A male and a female walked in. The female wore a white dress and she was extremely pretty. She had a bewitching figure, charming face and she could simply hook onto one's soul. It would cause other females to be lost within the beauty, and she was Su Mei's elder sister, Su Rou.
A tall, big, and a well-built male stood next to Su Rou. The male had thick eyebrows, big eyes, and dark skin. He was none other than the elder brother of Su Rou and Su Mei, Su Hen's oldest son, Su Long.
Su Long was 25 years old this year and he already established himself quite well. He had the cultivation of the 2nd level of the Profound realm and as the eldest son of the Su family, he was usually outside, helping the Su family set up relationships so he rarely returned to the Vermilion Bird City.
However, when Su Long got news that his own little sister was going to be married to Shangguan Ya, and it was even a forced marriage, he hurried back.
"Brother, sister, why are you two here?" When she saw the two people, Su Mei panicked a bit as she quickly wiped the tears on her face away.
"Little sister, follow me. Let's go." Su Long looked at Su Mei who had tears all over her face, and without saying anymore, he grabbed onto Su Mei's little hand and walked out. Su Rou followed him without saying anything.
"Brother, sister, what are you doing? Let me go." Su Mei's tried her best to struggle but she could not do anything. In front of her elder brother, her cultivation of the Spirit realm was absolutely nothing.
"Idiot sister. You don't even like that Shangguan Ya, so how can you marry him? As your elder brother, I will not just stare as you jump towards living hell!" As Su Long spoke, he already dragged Su Mei out of the palace. However, when he arrived at the entrance, he couldn't help but be taken aback and he stopped his steps forward.
Dozens of people showed in front of him. All of them were the peak experts of the Vermilion Bird City, and the one who led was the city lord of the Vermilion Bird City, the father of the three siblings, Su Hen.
"What are you doing?" Su Hen's sword-like brows slanted inwards as he coldly interrogated.
"Father, I will bring little Mei away. I will not let her marry that Shangguan Ya bastard!" Su Long loudly said.
*bam*
Immediately after he finished speaking, a clear and loud slap landed on Su Long's face. The strong power forcibly slapped the well-built male who was at the 2nd level of the Profound realm down to the ground. A blood-red palm mark appeared on his face. The person who did that was his father, Su Hen.
"Get out of here." Su Hen pointed at Su Long and loudly reprimanded.
"Father. Are you truly only going to watch as little Mei marries a person she doesn't like?" Just at that time, Su Rou came out. She walked next to Su Mei, and said while pointing at her face,
"Look! Look well. Look at the tears on your daughter's face. Can you not see her unwillingness? Can you not see her bitterness?"
"You, as a father, truly want to personally cut off your daughter's happiness, and let her wash her face with tears in the future?"
Su Rou's tone was extremely sharp and everyone who was there felt the sorrow. Even Su Hen's eyes glittered and he could not say anything at that moment. After a good while, he waved his hand towards the crowd behind him.
Those people were Su Hen's trusted aides and all of them instantly understood Su Hen's meaning. They tactfully left, and after they left, only four people remained there, Su Hen, Su Long, Su Rou, and Su Mei.
"Ah" Su Hen first sighed, then completely changed his furious attitude from before and gently said, "Longer, little Rou, little Mei. I truly have no say on this matter."
"The Shangguan family gained high approval from the Qilin Prince's Mansion and they have the qualifications to fight over the ruling right of the Vermilion Bird City. Shangguan Yue also had a breakthrough and he entered the 6th level of the Profound realm recently. His cultivation already surpassed me and he is now the strongest person in the Vermilion Bird City."
"If he wants to fight over the ruling right of the Vermilion Bird City, the position of the city lord can only belong to him and no one else. Even the city lord's mansion will need to be given to him. The results of so many hard years would be for naught."
"However, Shangguan Yue said to me that he has become aged and he doesn't care about the Vermilion Bird City's ruling right. Currently, he only wants his two grandsons to get settled."
"So, as long as little Mei marries Shangguan Ya and they quickly finish the marriage, his Shangguan family will never fight over the ruling right of the Vermilion Bird City."
"Father, how can you be so foolish? Shangguan Yue is an old cunning fox. How can you believe his words?" Su Rou refuted.
"Yeah, father. He is clearly threatening you to give little Mei over to Shangguan Ya. However, when little Mei marries over, perhaps he will instantly regret it and fight over the Vermilion Bird City's ruling right." Su Long also went up and said.
"What do any of you understand? Even if Shangguan Yue regrets it, as long as little Mei is married over, the Shangguan family will not make things too difficult for my Su family. As long as my Su family has a certain foundation, there will be a date of revolution. Sooner or later, I will enter the 6th level of the Profound realm. At that time, I can retake everything." Su Hen's face became serious.
"Father, are you saying that the so-called foundation of the Su family is even more important than little Mei's happiness? In order to protect the family's foundation, you are willing to give little Mei up as a bargaining chip? You are personally digging a grave for your own daughter's happiness!" Even Su Rou's eyes became moist.
"That's right. To me, the Su family's foundation is more important." Su Hen replied.
"Since it has come to this, there is no need to speak anymore. Today, I will bring little Mei away." Su Rou grabbed onto Su Mei, leaped, displayed a profound bodily technique, and escaped afar.
"Father, for little Mei's joy, I must offend!"
At the same time, Su Long also displayed a strong martial skill and attacked his own father. He wanted to stall some time for Su Rou and Su Mei to cover their escape.


MGA Capitulo 205  Escorting the Bride
"I know that you siblings have deep affection for one another, but the final situation must be always emphasized. Sooner or later, you will understand my painstaking efforts!"
To Su Hen, the methods of the two of them were insect-like insignificant skills. Without even moving, he released the pressure of the 5th level of the Profound realm and completely dissolved Su Long's attack.
After that, the strong pressure instantly engulfed everyone in that area. The strong pressure bound Su Rou down, and not to mention continuing to escape, it was even hard for her to walk a single step as she powerlessly fell to the ground.
"Father, let my brother and sister go! I promise you, I'll marry Shangguan Ya! I'll marry him!" Su Mei begged as she looked at Su Long and Su Rou who had painful faces.
"Sigh... Little Mei, I am sorry." Su Hen also had a painful expression, and it could be seen that his heart was not well either.
However, he did not immediately let Su Long and Su Rou go. He used special methods to temporarily seal Su Long's and Su Rou's strength. They couldn't even speak.
Quickly after that matter, the Shangguan family's bride escort arrived in front of the city lord's residence. Shangguan Ya rode a tall and big horse while wearing bridegroom clothes. His smile could not be hidden because he could finally marry the person who he yearned for even within his dreams.
[TN The bride escort is something similar to this (but in a much, much larger scale), and a "sedan chair" is the box-like thing that they are carrying.]
Within the escorting group, Shangguan Ya's elder brother, the person who forced Chu Feng to jump into the Dragon River after he chased Chu Feng to an impasse, Shangguan Tian, was also there.
The most important thing was that the current Shangguan Tian was also wearing a set of bridegroom clothes. He had a prideful look all over his face and his pleased smile was not a single bit inferior to Shangguan Ya's.
"What is happening? Why are there two bridegrooms? Are the brothers both going to marry Su Mei?" While facing that strange scene, everyone started their discussions and all of them felt puzzled.
"Shangguan Tian. Shangguan Ya. What is the meaning of this?" Su Hen led the experts from the city lord's residence out. He was also quite displeased while facing the Shangguan family's actions.
"Milord, what other reason can us two brothers come here for? Naturally, it is to marry your daughters." Shangguan Ya chuckled, but as he spoke, he did not even come down the horse. He said those words to Su Hen with an attitude of looking down at him.
[TN People who are in a higher position (such as a general) stay on the horses while the lower position people (such as a soldier) stay on the ground.]
"Milord, without concealing any truths, I, Shangguan Tian, have already fallen for your daughter, Su Rou."
"Coincidentally, today is a date of great happiness as my younger brother, Shangguan Ya, is going to marry your youngest daughter, Su Mei. So, why not have a double marriage by also marrying Su Rou off to my Shangguan family as well? I, Shangguan Tian, will certainly treat her well." Shangguan Tian also spoke, but he also did not go down the horse to speak.
"Rubbish! Shangguan Ya is marrying my family's lady because it was pre-arranged. How about you? You did not even come up to propose yet you directly come here to marry? You are simply marrying by force!" One of the old man from the city lord's residence pointed at Shangguan Tian and angrily rebuked.
"Insolent! I'm talking to the city lord and you have no part in this." Shangguan Tian was furious while facing the rebuke of the old man. He raised the whip in his hand and thrashed over.
"Hmph. Someone merely at the 1st level of the Profound realm should not even dare to act so wildly in front of me!" The old man was not afraid in the slightest when facing the whip that had Profound power and was like a dragon. He raised his hand and grabbed, then the whip was tightly grasped within his hand. It turned out that the old man was a person at the 2nd level of the Profound realm.
"You disrespectful little brat, get down here!" The old man was enraged and he wanted to pull Shangguan Tian down from the horse.
*bam* But before he even got to attack, a powerful big hand grabbed his wrist. Strong power instantly restricted the old man's aura and sealed his actions that he was going to do.
"Milord!" The old man looked to the side and he couldn't help but stare blankly because the person who stopped him was his own master, Su Hen.
Su Hen first shook his head towards the old man, indicating that he should not act rashly, then he took a deep breath and spoke to his subordinates behind him,
"Go. Bring the second lady and the third lady out. Today, my Su family will have a double marriage with the Shangguan family!"
[TN Second lady is Su Rou as she was born second (eldest brother is Su Long), and third is Su Mei as she was born third.]
"Huu!" When Su Hen said those words, instantly, the crowd went into an uproar and everyone was endlessly shocked.
If the marriage between Shangguan Ya and Su Mei was completely expected and was normal, then the marriage between Shangguan Tian and Su Rou was reasonless trouble. It was something that even normal families would not allow, let alone the city lord's family, the ruler of the Vermilion Bird City!
However, at that moment, not only did Su Hen not act wildly, he even agreed. That made people quite speechless. The formerly tyrannical and mighty city lord chose to lower his head to the two young men. That made people feel that it was inconceivable and not understandable even after thinking about it a hundred times.
"What is happening? The city lord accepted such impolite demands from the Shangguan family?" Some people who did not know the entire truth questioned.
"You probably don't know. I heard that the master of the Shangguan family, Shangguan Yue, is at the 6th level of the Profound realm, but the city lord is only at the 5th level of the Profound realm. Although the Su family is still the ruler of the Vermilion Bird City, in reality, their strength is inferior to the Shangguan family."
"I also believe that the marriage advancement for Shangguan Ya and Su Mei is because of Shangguan Yue." Someone secretly leaked the information out.
"Is that true?" After hearing that, everyone's expressions changed greatly and they were unceasingly stunned. It meant that the true ruler of the Vermilion Bird City was not the Su family, but the Shangguan family. That was huge news to the people in the Vermilion Bird City.
Although people still felt that the matter was unimaginable, when Su Rou and Su Mei, the daughters of the city lord, wore gorgeous bride gowns and walked out of the residence, everyone knew that the current situation in the Vermilion Bird City truly did change.
"This is bad! City lord, this is bad!"
But just at that time, a panicked cry came from nearby. That panicked cry instantly shattered the happy atmosphere and everyone cast their gazes over.
They saw a guard from the city lord's residence madly running over to the residence. However, there were wounds everywhere on his body and blood was all over the place.
"What's going on? What happened?" In response, Su Hen and the others quickly went over.
"City lord, there's..there's..there's..an enemy invading!" After that person spoke, he lost consciousness.
"What? Enemy invading?" After hearing those words, Su Hen was thoroughly confused and he couldn't help but cast his gaze over to Shangguan Ya and Shangguan Tian. However, he discovered that they did not know what was happening as well.
That confused Su Hen. In reality, to his Su family, the biggest enemy was the Shangguan family. But currently, if the Shangguan family was not attacking, which person dared to invade his Vermilion Bird City?
*thud thud thud*
*clang clang clang*
*thud clang, thud clang, thud clang thud*
Just at that time, from the direction that the guard escaped from, the noise of gongs and drums rang out. Everyone couldn't help but inhale a breath of cool air and at the same time that they were completely baffled, ineffable fear filled their hearts because the beats of the gongs and drums were clearly from a bride's escort.


MGA Capitulo 206  Grey-Cloak World Spiritist
As the gongs and drums for the happy event sounded out, a group of people majestically appeared. Some beat gongs, some hit drums, some blew trumpets, some raised signs, and on those signs, two big words were clearly written on it. "Bride's Escort"!
The clothing of the group of people also seemed to induce joy. From the surface, they did appear like a group of people for a bride's escort, but that was also the area that made people confused. They could not think where the escort came from and who was going to marry who.
The most important thing was that even though the people dressed up in quite a happy manner, there was still a strange part. A mask was on the faces of every single person and their appearances could not be seen.
"Halt. Who are you?" The guards from the city lord's residence rushed out and blocked them outside of the residence as they cautiously stared at them.
"On the orders of Mr. Grey-cloak, we are here to escort the daughter of the city lord, lady Su Mei." The person who was at the front yelled his throat out.
"What? Escort Su Mei? Isn't Su Mei Shangguan Ya's fiancée? Why are they here to escort Su Mei?"
"Also, who is Mr. Grey-cloak? On the day that the Shangguan family is coming to welcome the bride, this Mr. Grey-cloak comes here to escort the future wife of Shangguan Ya. He is simply slapping Shangguan family's face in front of everyone here!"
Endless cries of surprise rang out from the crowd and everyone was stunned by the sentence from that person. Even the people from the city lord's residence were baffled and their heads were full of fog. However, they were sure of one thing. It was that the group of people were obviously there to cause chaos. However, they did not know whether it was towards the Shangguan family or towards the city lord's residence.
"Damn! You dare to come up to my Shangguan family and stir up trouble? You have really gotten sick of living. People! Apprehend this group of people."
Shangguan Tian was furious. Before even letting the city lord's residence respond to it, he ordered his subordinates to rush towards the group of people. However, he only ordered them to apprehend them but not to kill them.
As for why? Naturally, since today was a day of great joy, blood could not be seen or else that was bad luck.
"Ahh~~"
However, before even letting the Shangguan family's group go near, the one who led waved his big sleeve and strong Origin power descended from the sky. It formed into invisible blades and they killed dozens of Shangguan family members who were rushing over.
The killing method was extremely cruel as well. Not only did they behead the Shangguan family, the blades even chopped off their hands and feet. The death was quite wretched and blood splattered everywhere.
"This"
That scene stunned everyone and they were extremely stupefied. The surrounding people couldn't help but back away and cold sweat appeared on their foreheads.
Just now, all of them could feel that within the group of people, there was an expert of the Profound realm and it was an expert who was in the 3rd level of the Profound realm.
Also, from their heartless methods, they could confirm that the group of people did not come with good intentions.
"Those who dare to meddle with Mr. Grey-cloak's affairs will be killed without discussion!" The person who just attacked indifferently said.
At the same time, several hundred people behind him all put down the items in their hands and emanated their strong aura. There were three experts in the Profound realm, and other than the three people, the remaining several hundred people were all at the peak of the Origin realm.
"Heavens, where did they come from? They have such strength!"
The strong aura was like an invisible hurricane as it spiraled everywhere. Everyone who was there could feel the pressure. The Shangguan family and the people from the city lord's residence were fine, however, the faces of the observing officials and nobles were quite ugly.
It was because the opponent had extremely strong strength. It was simply equivalent to the elites of a second-rate school, so no wonder they dared to go against the Shangguan family. They did have quite some strength.
"Killing without discussion? Let's see what kind of person this Mr. Grey-cloak is."
Suddenly, an aged voice rang out and following that, a gust of wind swept past. A single-eyed old man appeared in front of Shangguan Tian and Shangguan Ya.
"It's Shangguan Yue, the master of the Shangguan family! According to rumours, he already entered the 6th level of the Profound realm and became the strongest person in the Vermilion Bird City. I wonder if that is true or false."
After that old man appeared, many people who were on scene couldn't help but yell in surprise. Even Shangguan Tian and Shangguan Ya quickly leaped down from their high horses, went in front of the single-eyed old man, and respectfully paid their respects, "Grandfather!"
"You two retreat. I myself will be sufficient to kill this group of rats." Shangguan Yue waved his hand, then his sword-like brows slanted inwards. Glare shot out from his single eye and the atmosphere around him became completely different.
Without any wind, his robe madly fluttered and the strong pressure was like a tide as it surged out from his body. It became a formless huge wave that rose to the sky as it slammed against the group of people one wave after the other.
"Heavens! He is really at the 6th level of the Profound realm! He actually entered the 6th level of the Profound realm!"
That strong aura caused the faces of everyone who were there to change. Especially the people from the city lord's residence. They were hugely shocked and their faces became extremely unsightly. It meant that Shangguan Yue's cultivation surpassed their family's Su Hen, and their city lord's residence truly lost to the Shangguan family.
In reality, while facing the strong pressure, even the head of the Void School panicked. He never would have thought that Shangguan Yue entered the 6th level of the Profound realm.
The Profound realm. Every single level was like a chasm and normal people could not cross over it. So, when he, who was only at the 3rd level of the Profound realm, faced the pressure of the 6th level of the Profound realm, it was like facing a unstoppable huge wave. No place to escape, no way to resist, and only death awaited them.
At that instant, everyone from the Void School couldn't avoid having a bit of regret and they started to back away. Even though they would gain great benefits if they succeeded, they did not want to lose their lives because of that.
"Hmph. Indeed, a group of rats!"
As he looked at the cowardly group of people, Shangguan Yue stuck his chest out and raised his head and coldly snorted. Although he was displeased on the surface, he was crazily happy in his heart. No matter who that group of people were, they gave him a chance to display his strength and to establish his might.
He knew, from that day forth, the people in the Vermilion Bird City would not fear Su Hen the most anymore. They would fear him, Shangguan Yue, the most. The right to rule the Vermilion Bird City was fated to land within the hands of his Shangguan family.
"Puny skills!"
However, just as everyone thought that the group of people were going to die without a doubt, within the sedan chair, an aged voice suddenly sounded out.
At the same time that the voice rang out, everyone could clearly see in front of the group of people, grey-coloured gas appeared. That gas was quickly condensing and within a blink, it formed into a screen.


MGA Capitulo 207  Exterminate Your Shangguan Family
*boom~~~~*
The pressure of the 6th level of the Profound realm came crashing down as the earth trembled. Many people found it hard to endure the ear-piercing boom, but when the ripples dissipated and the pressure faded away, everyone shocking found out that the group of people were not harmed in the slightest.
The reason why they were not harmed in the slightest was because of the huge screen in front of them. The screen was grey-coloured yet as transparent as crystals.
"That'sa Spirit Formation. It's a Spirit Formation!" Suddenly, someone with sharp eyes recognized the origin of the screen.
"What a strong Spirit Formation as it's able to hold the might of the 6th level of the Profound realm away. How strong would the World Spiritist who laid that Spirit Formation be?" As they looked at the unbreakable Spirit Formation, everyone endlessly cried out their guesses.
"A mere Shangguan family dares to attack my people? You must have gotten tired of life!"
Just at that time, the curtains of the sedan chair was suddenly lifted and a body slowly walked out. When people saw the clothing of that person, they were instantly stupefied and the faces of some people were even pale-white from fear.
The grey-coloured cloak was full of symbols. As it was being shone by the sunlight, it even faintly glittered. Perhaps commoners could not recognize such a special clothing, but those who were there knew what that represented.
"Grey-cloak World Spiritist!!"
Finally, someone impulsively yelled out. After he spoke, it was like a bomb and it caused everyone in that area to no longer remain calm. Almost everyone there couldn't help but inhale a breath of cool air and both respect and fear emerged onto their faces.
Grey-cloak World Spiritist. What did that represent? It represented the huge characters who had the highest positions in the Azure Province because there was only two people like that in the Azure Province. Those two people were from the two strongest powers in the Azure Province.
In front of them, such a Grey-cloak World Spiritist appeared. That made people's imagination roam free as they first thought that it was one of the two huge characters.
But after some more careful thinking, they felt that something was off. After all, those two people were extremely well-known, and if any one of them fancied one of the two daughters, they would absolutely not come there with a fake name. They would clearly state their famous name for greater deterrence power.
However, if the person in front of them wasn't one of the two huge characters from the Azure Province, it meant that a third Grey-cloak World Spiritist appeared in the Azure Province. That was certainly shocking news.
"Mister, I wonder who you are? Do we have any misunderstandings between us?"
After seeing Chu Feng who wore the World Spirit Grey-cloak walk out, even Shangguan Yuea who had tough might before instantly shrunk down slightly. Even a first-rate school needed to provide offerings to a Grey-cloak World Spiritist, so he was truly not someone who his Shangguan family could offend.
"There aren't any misunderstandings. Firstly, I came here today to marry the daughter of the city lord, Su Mei. Secondly, since I'm here, I might as well exterminate your Shangguan family."
Chu Feng nonchalantly smiled, and after saying those words with an aged voice, he waved his big sleeve and said, "Attack!!"
"Kill!!!"
Immediately after Chu Feng spoke, the elites of the Void School, under the lead of the head of the school, rushed towards the direction of the Shangguan family residences. On the road, any Shangguan family members were killed without discussion.
As they saw that, the powerful people from the Shangguan family knew that something was off and they quickly tried to chase after the group of people. At that very instant, all the able people from the Shangguan family were sent to the city lord's residence, so only the old, weak, sick, crippled, and those without strength to even tie up a chicken were within the Shangguan family residences. If the group of people slaughtered their way into the residences, the Shangguan family was certainly going to be exterminated.
"No rush. Today, everyone from the Shangguan family will die!" Chu Feng stamped where he stood, and as he spoke those words, a huge Spirit Formation appeared and sealed the direction that the Void School headed towards. It stopped all the Shangguan family members who wanted to chase.
At the same time, Chu Feng raised his hand and palmed towards the Shangguan family crowd. With a huge boom, almost half of the near thousand Shangguan family elites were injured or killed. There were even two people at the Profound realm within that group of people.
"This person is extremely strong!"
Su Hen tightly frowned as he saw that. Although the Grey-cloak World Spiritist only displayed the cultivation of the 1st level of the Profound realm, just from that palm, he could feel if he fought with him, he would not be able to defeat the Grey-cloak World Spiritist.
*boom boom boom* From then on, Chu Feng threw out several palms and he didn't even use martial skills. He only used his Profound power, but every single palm could exhibit frightening power. It killed countless Shangguan family members.
"Youtruly go too far. I don't care who you are. Today, I will not forgive you."
As he saw the people from his own family being slaughtered like that, Shangguan Yue was incomparably furious. He revolved the Profound power of the 6th level of the Profound realm and pounced towards Chu Feng.
Shangguan Yue was truly furious. At that instant, he did not have a single trace of fear. He only thought about killing Chu Feng because he knew that if Chu Feng was killed, his Shangguan family still had a strand of hope to survive. However, if he could not find a way to kill Chu Feng, his Shangguan family would perish.
So, under those circumstances, Shangguan Yue's attacks were abnormally fierce. Every single punch or kick would have Profound power along with them, and every single strike and style could create devastating attacks. The martial skills that he grasped were also extremely strong.
Chu Feng did not want to expose his identity so he could not use martial skills. He could only use Profound power and Spirit Formation techniques against Shangguan Yue.
But luckily, Chu Feng's Spirit Formation techniques already entered the Grey-cloak realm. No matter how much fiercer Shangguan Yue's attacks were, he had no way of harming Chu Feng. Rather, they were all stopped by Chu Feng.
"Impressive. Too impressive. Is this the power of World Spiritists? Grey-cloak World Spiritists. As expected from huge characters that can shake the entire Azure Province. This battle power is too terrifying."
"You're right. Clearly, the aura that he is displaying is only the 1st level of the Profound realm. Without even using martial skills and by only relying on the power of Spirit Formations, he can play around Shangguan Yue who is at the 6th level of Profound within his palms. This cannot be said to not be strong."
As they looked at the battle between the two, anyone who could see could tell who was strong and who was weak. They were shocked by Chu Feng's strength. Of course, they did not know that he was the young genius Chu Feng who shook the entire Vermilion Bird City with his name before. In their eyes, he was a true huge character. A Grey-cloak World Spiritist who had been cultivating for many years.
"Old thing. The cultivation of the 6th level of the Profound realm is truly wasted on you."
At the same time that Chu Feng was blocking Shangguan Yue's strikes, he would occasionally attack the other Shangguan family members. Every time he attacked, he would prevail. With a blink, almost a thousand Shangguan family elites died under Chu Feng's hands.
At the same time, from the direction of the Shangguan family, miserable cries rang out endlessly. The Shangguan family were currently being slaughtered. No matter if it was a male, female, old, or young chicken, dog, duck, or goose anything that breathed would be killed. Even little mice that accidentally passed by the Shangguan family residences were grabbed by the Void School and strangled to death.
It wasn't that the Void School were cruel and merciless. It was because they received the death order. Chu Feng's order was to not leave a single life alive within the Shangguan family residences.


MGA Capitulo 208  Who Are You?
"Su Hen, what the hell are you looking at? Why aren't you helping me to take care of this guy?" He looked at his own family being killed one by one, and fall one by one, yet he could not do anything about it.
Shangguan Yue was going a bit mad, and since he was helpless against it, he could only cast his pleading gaze towards Su Hen and the others from the city lord's residence.
Why would Su Hen help? Not to mention that he really wanted the Shangguan family to be exterminated, even if he and the Shangguan family were allies, he would still not help out in that situation because he did not want to offend a Grey-cloak World Spiritist.
"Su Hen, I'm begging you. Help my Shangguan family and don't let my Shangguan family be cut off here." Seeing that Su Hen was not moved, Shangguan Yue could only lower his attitude and speak with a pleading tone. However, it was in vain as Su Hen was still not moved.
"Su Hen, I will make you regret this for your entire life." Finally, Shangguan Yue gave up on begging. After an explosive yell, he used an extremely strong attack towards Chu Feng.
Strong Profound power formed into a huge wave that reached the skies and the surging splashes were dozens of feet tall. They layered onto each other and pressed down. The power that it contained was enough to flatten a forest and it could be seen that Shangguan Yue attacked for real.
"Old thing, you've finally gotten serious huh." As he saw that, Chu Feng did not dare to underestimate it. He quickly spun his Spirit power around and he kept on laying grey-coloured Spirit Formations in front of him to block Shangguan Yue's attack that contained his full power.
*whoosh* However, when the huge wave collided with the Spirit formation, Shangguan Yue flashed, arrived next to Shangguan Tian and Shangguan Ya, waved his big sleeve, and two layers of Profound power surged out.
The powerful Profound power split into two. The first rolled Shangguan Tian and Shangguan Ya up, but the other rolled Su Rou and Su Mei up. Like a firm cage, it locked them within it.
"Crap. He wants to escape!" Chu Feng suddenly understood what he had planned. It turned out that Shangguan Yue did not want to throw everything he had on Chu Feng, but he wanted to escape.
*whoosh*
As predicted, with special methods, after binding Shangguan Tian and Shangguan Ya and also Su Rou and Su Mei, the tip of Shangguan Yue's foot suddenly tapped and a gust of gale started to spread.
After the gale disappeared, Shangguan Yue also disappeared. At the same time, Shangguan Ya, Shangguan Tian, and also Su Rou and Su Mei disappeared.
"Dammit!"
As he saw that, Su Hen's face changed greatly because Shangguan Yue did not escape by himself. Not only did he take away his two grandsons, he even captured Su Hen's two daughters.
Thinking back that he only stood on the side as he watched and ignored the life and death of the Shangguan family, Shangguan Yue must have hated him down to the bones. At that moment, both of his daughters landed into his hands, so how they would end was unimaginable.
As he thought to that point, Su Hen completely panicked. He spread his aura of the 5th level of the Profound realm out and wanted to chase after Shangguan Yue. However, before he even got the chance to move, a powerful palm landed on his shoulder and suppressed his aura.
"You" Turning his head to look Su Hen instantly took in a breath of cool air because the person who stopped him was none other than the mysterious Grey-cloak World Spiritist.
"Stay right here. I will settle the debts with you later." After speaking those words, Chu Feng leaped forward and disappeared.
After Chu Feng left, Su Hen's face was pale-white from fear because he could hear, from Chu Feng's words, that the huge character seemed to be displeased with him. However, he could not understand when he offended such a huge character like him. But no matter what, he knew that most likely, he had attracted some troubles.
Especially after he swept his gaze behind him and saw the corpses of the Shangguan family's elites who laid within pools blood, the fear in his heart rose to the extreme. He truly experienced what cruel and merciless was called. That person was too scary.
At the same time, within the Vermilion Bird Mountain Range, Shangguan Yue was currently running in the forest. His speed was strangely quick, and even though he was using his Profound power to bind four people over his head, it did not affect his speed at all.
"Shangguan Yue, put us down. My sister can't take this anymore."
Within the Profound power cage, Su Rou was currently tightly hugging Su Mei. Perhaps it was because the road was too jolty, or maybe because Shangguan Yue's pressure before was too fierce, Su Mei's current complexion was ghastly-white and her lips were dry. She had already lost consciousness.
"Shut up! If you speak anymore rubbish, I'll kill both of you right now!"
Shangguan Yue was burning up in the flames of fury. He did not even have enough time to escape for his life, so how could he care about Su Rou and Su Mei's life? The reason why he grabbed the two of them as well was because he wanted to have a bargaining chip that could possibly protect his life.
*hmm* But suddenly, a strong Spirit Formation was laid in front of them, and at the same time, several Spirit Formations also appeared everywhere and they were currently surrounding Shangguan Yue.
"How is this possible? He caught up so quickly?"
Seeing that, Shangguan Yue was aware that the situation was not good and he quickly extended his hands towards Su Rou and Su Mei who were bound by him and he wanted to use the two girls for coercion.
*whoosh* However, when a ray of light flashed past, the Profound power that restricted the two was broken. Not only did Su Rou and Su Mei disappear, even his two grandsons, Shangguan Tian and Shangguan Ya escaped from his controlling range.
"Grandfather, save me!"
Suddenly, a miserable voice rang out. After looking over, Shangguan Yue couldn't help but be greatly shocked. Both of his grandsons laid nearby, and behind them stood a single person. It was the Grey-cloak World Spiritist.
"No need to beg for help. In this place, no one can save you. All of you will die." Chu Feng calmly smiled, then suddenly raised his foot. With a bang, Shangguan Ya's head became watery blood under his foot. Like a watermelon, his head was stepped and shattered in pieces by Chu Feng.
"You bastard! I will kill you!" Seeing that his own grandson die just like that, Shangguan Yue instantly grasped onto insanity. As he madly howled, he started attacking fiercely at Chu Feng.
"Hmph."
However, Chu Feng only coldly snorted while facing Shangguan Yue's attacks. He pointed at him, and flicked his finger. A faint white-coloured gas streaked through the air. Not only did it pierce through Shangguan Yue's martial skill, it also pierced through Shangguan Yue's body. With a single strike, it made the powerful person who was at the 6th level of the profound realm throw up blood and forced him to powerlessly lay on the ground.
"How is this possiblehow is this possible"
Shangguan Yue's face was like ash. Originally, he felt that he might have had a few chances for victory if he used everything he had, but when the white-coloured gas went through his body, only then did he realise how great the difference between him and his opponent was. From the start, he was fated to lose.
"You're next." After defeating Shangguan Yue with the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique, Chu Feng did not directly attack Shangguan Yue anymore. He cast his gaze towards Shangguan Tian.
He cast his gaze towards the male who once forced him to a point where there were no roads up to the sky nor any doors down to the earth. However, there was quite a dramatic change when the situation today was compared to the situation which happened that day.
"Who are you? My Shangguan family has no grievances nor hatred towards you. Why do you need to completely wipe out my Shangguan family?!" Shangguan Tian loudly howled. He was bitter. Bitter that he would die just like that. So, he really wanted to know who exterminated his entire Shangguan family.
In reality, not only Shangguan Tian, even Su Rou who was nearby tightly stared at Chu Feng because she was also curious what kind of person the Grey-cloak World Spiritist who exterminated the Shangguan family was.
"Heh..." After hearing those words, a mocking laugh came from the grey-cloak. However, when the laughter rang out, no matter if it was Shangguan Tian or Su Rou, both of their expressions changed greatly.
Because that laughter was no longer the voice of an aged, old man. Rather, it was the voice of a young man. The most important thing was that the voice was quite familiar.


MGA Capitulo 209  Beast
"This voice, can it be"
Su Rou instantly reacted to that because she could not get any more familiar with that voice. However, after thinking for a bit more, she felt that it wasn't possible. Even if that person had more talent, it would not be possible for him to have so much growth in such a short period of time.
As for Shangguan Yue and Shangguan Tian, they were stupefied as well. Although they could not confirm who the person in the grey-cloak was, from his laughter just now, they could tell that it was a voice of a young man. Yet, how could such a powerful person be only a young man?
"Today, I will let you understand your deaths."
Under their gazes of intertwined shock and curiosity, Chu Feng extended both his hands and gradually took the hood off his head. His handsome countenance appeared in front of the three people.
"Chu Feng, it really is you!" At that instant, Su Rou couldn't help but yell out in surprise and her pair of beautiful eyes kept on glittering.
She never would have thought that the person who defeated Shangguan Yue and could use Grey-cloak Spirit Formations was truly Chu Feng. The truth came too abruptly and she felt that it was a bit difficult to believe.
"How is this possible? YouDidn't you already"
However, compared to Su Rou's difficulty in believing, Shangguan Tian's face was already filled with fear because he clearly remembered that Chu Feng was forced into the Dragon River by him so he should have already been dead. How was it possible that he appeared here? He even became so strong in such a short amount of time.
As he looked at Shangguan Tian's and Shangguan Yue's shocked expressions, Chu Feng only indifferently smiled, and said to Shangguan Tian, "Do you remember the words that I told you that day on the Suicide Cliff?"
"I told you that you should pray that I would die just like that."
"Or else, I would undoubtedly come back to find you. On that day, it wouldn't be the end of you, Shangguan Tian. It would be the end of your Shangguan family."
After hearing Chu Feng's words, Shangguan Tian's face was already like ash. He finally knew why he had a bad premonition in the instant that Chu Feng jumped from the cliff.
"Friend, do we have any misunderstandings between us?" Shangguan Yue feebly said when he saw that Chu Feng was going to attack Shangguan Tian.
"Misunderstandings? Originally, I had no grievances nor hatred towards your Shangguan family. However, you had to kill me no matter what. Everything today were debts that your Shangguan family owed me. However, I, Chu Feng, just collected them with higher interest."
After speaking, Chu Feng raised his hand and palmed. Shangguan Tian became a pool of blood, and quickly after, Chu Feng flicked towards Shangguan Yue. The White Tiger Slaughtering Technique which had peerless attacking power tore through the air and howled before taking away Shangguan Yue's life.
After killing the people from the Shangguan family, Chu Feng quickly went over to Su Rou. When he looked at Su Mei who had a ghastly-white face and weak aura, a hint of worry emerged onto his calm face.
However, after using his Spirit power to examine her, Chu Feng breathed a sigh of relief. Although Su Mei was injured, it was not serious. She would quickly heal after ten days of rest.
But even so, Chu Feng still carried Su Mei away from Su Rou's embrace. He took out some healing medicine and caringly fed them to Su Mei by helping her refine them.
"Shouldnt you give me an explanation?" Finally, Su Rou who remained silent for a long while spoke.
Chu Feng raised his head, and he discovered that the grand beauty who had a fox-like face was tightly staring at himself with her pair of enchanting eyes. There even seemed to be a bit of grievance on her face.
"I have a World Spirit in my body and I established a contract with her already. She can lend her power to me, and my real cultivation right now is the 2nd level of the Origin realm. As for the cultivation that I displayed earlier which was at the 1st level of the Profound realm, it was the power that the World Spirit lent to me." Chu Feng did not hide anything. After all, Su Rou was his first woman and he trusted her quite a bit.
"The explanation that I wanted wasn't that." Su Rou's beautiful eyes glittered but no one knew what she was thinking.
"Not that? Oh, I know." Chu Feng was first taken slightly aback, but then after some thinking, he smiled and said, "They were from the Void School. I promised them that I would lay a Spirit Formation for them so they were willing to risk their lives for me."
"Also not that!" Su Rou's face seemed to be more and more wronged, and one could even see flickering tears within her beautiful eyes. Her clean-white teeth kept on lightly biting her alluring lips.
"Then, what is it?" Chu Feng was completely puzzled.
"Chu Feng, you bastard!" Suddenly, Su Rou's jade-like hands waved and a clear slap ferociously landed on Chu Feng's face.
"I" After being slapped, Chu Feng was still bewildered.
"I knew that you were this kind of person. The words you said were all lies. On that day, you clearly said that you would marry both me and little Mei, but now why did you only propose a marriage to little Mei and leave me on the side?" Su Rou stood up, and as she pointed at Chu Feng, she complained about her grievances. Her charming face was already full of tears.
At that instantly, only then did Chu Feng suddenly understand. After half a day, the attracting beauty was jealous. Jealous of her own sister, Su Mei.
"Eggy, lend your power to me again." Chu Feng yelled in his heart.
"What for?" Eggy was currently looking at the liveliness and she was confused about Chu Feng's plans.
"Quickly!" Chu Feng was quite anxious.
In response, Eggy could only lend her power to Chu Feng. After all, Chu Feng was her master and besides, she also wanted to know what Chu Feng wanted the borrowed power for. However, when Chu Feng did the following actions, Eggy was completely speechless.
"Mm.." Suddenly, Chu Feng stood up and put his arms around Su Rou's waist and embraced the grand beauty. Without saying anything else, he kissed Su Rou's alluring lips. At the same time, another hand was restlessly touching Su Rou's attractive body.
"Mm. Bastard, let go of me!" At first, Su Rou even tried her best to struggle, but how would she even be able to do anything against Chu Feng? Gradually, she thoroughly surrendered from Chu Feng's gentle attacks.
Right beside Su Mei, Chu Feng pushed Su Rou to the ground. The two of them took off their clothes and two naked bodies interweaved with one another. Although at the first time, it was forced this time, in reality, Su Rou was willing.
From Su Rou's completely red face, one could see the light of her happiness. This time, she was willing in her heart, and she gave her own body to Chu Feng.
But even so, Eggy still gave Chu Feng an evaluation, "Beast!"


MGA Capitulo 210  Advice
On that day, within a certain forest in the Vermilion Bird Mountain Range, a strange scene happened.
Two voices of a male and a female rose up and down and they endlessly rang out. Occasionally sharp, occasionally deep. Sometimes like the simultaneous cry of a hundred birds, sometimes like the roar of a fierce tiger towards the skies.
That lasted for a good half day. Luckily, no one passed that place or else their souls would be scattered away from fear and they would no longer be able to take care of themselves, and from then on become a disabled person who had hemiplegia.
Within the forest, Shangguan Yue's, Shangguan Tian's, and Shangguan Ya's corpses were no longer there. As for where they went, naturally, they were dealt with by Chu Feng. Of course, their Source energy was absorbed by Eggy.
Chu Feng's upper body was naked and he laid on the grass. Within his embrace was Su Rou, a charming big beauty. At that instant, on Su Rou's white, soft, and smooth body, there was even a red-coloured bride's clothes.
When the light wind brushed past, the red dress would occasionally get lifted up and barely, one could see her straight and long, snow-white beautiful legs and her round, smooth, yet firm twin peaks were extremely attracting.
However, the most attracting thing was still Su Rou's lovable appearance. Perhaps only within the embrace of those who she loved could such a strong lady be so sweet.
As for to what degree? She was simply like a small child as she obediently leaned into Chu Feng's embrace. She even used her fine and long fingers to draw circles on Chu Feng's chest.
"Okay, it's time to get up. Or else, when little Mei wakes up and see us like this, I would really not know how to explain it." After a good while, Su Rou gently pushed Chu Feng away. However, a single word was written on her charming face. Unwillingness.
"Then let's do it together!" Chu Feng showed all his teeth as he smiled and said.
"No. Little Mei is still young and you cannot touch her!" Seeing that, Su Rou fiercely pinched Chu Feng arm.
"Haha, just joking." Chu Feng chuckled then got up to wear his clothes. As he wore them, he said, "For now, don't tell anyone about me being a Grey-cloak World Spiritist. Not even to little Mei."
"Mm." Su Rou helped Chu Feng tie up his clothes and sweetly nodded her head.
"Also, I will marry you two sister, but it will not be too soon. From how I, Chu Feng, do things, it is fated that I will make a lot of enemies. So, while I still feel that I'm not strong enough"
"I understand." Su Rou first lightly covered Chu Feng's mouth, then like a little bird relying on a person, she went into Chu Feng's embrace and took her charming face and tightly stuck it to Chu Feng chest and said, "No matter how long you will take, I will wait for you. I will wait for you to marry us sisters."
After hearing those words, Chu Feng also smiled in happiness. He opened his arms and tightly hugged the beauty and enjoyed the short period of hidden love.
When Chu Feng and Su Rou, the two lovers, were inseparable in the Vermilion Bird Mountain Range, everyone in the Vermilion Bird City were anxious.
The Shangguan family's corpses were everywhere outside of the city lord's residence. Blood dyed the land red, and especially when the sun was setting in the west, as the blood was shone by the sunlight, they seemed even more red and it was truly frightening after one saw it. With a single glance, they would be scared out of their minds. A cowardly nobleman passed that place and he even directly lost consciousness from that.
However, that was not even anything when it was compared to the Shangguan family's residence. At that place, blood truly formed rivers. On that day, 13 241 Shangguan family members were all killed and not a single lifeform remained.
No one knew who the person who did that was, but they knew that he was a Grey-cloak World Spiritist. He even had a well-known name, Mr. Grey-cloak.
Within the main hall of the city lord's residence, Su Hen was sitting on the seat for the leader. Su Long and the other elders from the city lord's residence all gathered at that place.
Uneasiness filled their faces, but they did not know what to do. Not only were they worried for Su Rou and Su Mei, they were even more worried about Mr. Grey-cloak.
After all, Mr. Grey-cloak told Su Hen in front of the crowd that he had debts to settle with him. So, Su Hen was very worried. Especially after the Shangguan family was washed by blood, he was truly worried what Mr. Grey-cloak would do to the Su family.
"Milord, milord!" Suddenly, in complete fear and panic, a guard walked in.
"What happened?" When they saw that, everyone in the hall stood up solemnly as though they were meeting a huge enemy. Droplets of sweat that were as big as beans couldn't help but slide down their foreheads.
"Th..th..They're back!" After speaking those words, the guard pointed outside the main hall.
After looking over to that direction, everyone couldn't help but rejoice. they saw Su Rou who was wearing the bride's clothes slowly walking towards the main hall while she was carrying Su Mei who lost consciousness.
"Sister, you two are fine? This is great!" Seeing that, Su Long was greatly happy and he quickly went over and took Su Mei from Su Rou's hands. Then, he lovingly examined her as he was afraid that she was injured.
"Rouer, then..then what about Mr. Grey-cloak? How about Shangguan Yue? What happened to him?" Su Hen also walked over, but he was not truly worried about his own daughters. He only cautiously swept his gaze outside.
"This is for you from Mr. Grey-cloak" Su Rou did not respond. She only gave a folded paper slip to her father.
"I'm tired, so I'm going to rest." After giving the paper slip over to Su Hen, Su Rou first shot a glance of resentment at Su Hen before walking towards her own room.
Su Hen did not say much when he faced that scene. After all, today, he was in the wrong. In order to protect the Su family's foundation, he almost cut off his two daughters' happiness.
Although tainting the Vermilion Bird City with blood by Mr. Grey-cloak coming over and exterminating the Shangguan family was very bad luck, in reality, he did not feel that it was a bad thing. At least Mr. Grey-cloak helped him finish off a huge enemy.
After knowing that Su Rou and Su Mei were safe and well, everyone in the city lord's residence boiled with discussion. Although, on the surface, the Vermilion Bird City faced a bloody disaster, his city lord's residence was completely unharmed. So to them, it was really something worthy of celebration.
Even if the Qilin Prince's Mansion investigated because the Shangguan family had connections with the Qilin Prince's Mansion, it would not involve the Su family. Besides, an insignificant Shangguan family was not worth it for the Qilin Prince's Mansion to cause enmity with a Grey-cloak World Spiritist.
When Su Hen returned to his own palace when it was deep into the night and when everyone was silent, he stood near the window and looked at the bright moon outside. His heart was extremely uneasy. Up until now, he did not have the courage to open up the paper slip within his hand. He did not dare to look what was written on it.
However, escaping was never a way and Su Hen deeply understood that reasoning. So, he gradually closed his eyes. First, he breathed deeply for a while, then he opened his eyes and also opened the paper slip.
When he saw the content in the paper slip, his face changed multiple times. Occasionally green, occasionally purple, occasionally happy, occasionally anxious. After a long while, he inhaled a breath of cool air and happiness and sorrow emerged onto his face.
Although there were only a few simple words on the paper slip, it revealed many meanings.
"If you dare to marry Su Rou or Su Mei off to anyone else, your Su family will be the next to be exterminated!!"


MGA Capitulo 211  Two Big Things
The news of the Shangguan family being slaughtered within the Vermilion Bird City quickly spread throughout the Azure Province.
Even the ruler of the Azure Province, the Qilin Prince's Mansion, and the number one school in the Azure Province, the Lingyun School, sent powerful people over to the Vermilion Bird City and they wanted to investigate everything.
The reason why they had such big movements was not because of the life or death of the Shangguan family which was so eye-grabbing. In actuality, the Grey-cloak World Spiritist who exterminated the Shangguan family became the topic of focus for people.
Grey-cloak World Spiritists. In the current Azure Province, there were only two known. So, the value of Grey-cloak World Spiritists in the Azure Province was extremely high. All sorts of powers wanted to pull a Grey-cloak World Spiritist into their own power. Even if they could not pull them in, they would want to at least be on good terms with them and start up some relationship.
But sadly, after that day, Mr. Grey-cloak completely disappeared. No one knew where he was, but something that could not be denied was that the matter was certainly one of the two big things that shook the Azure Province.
The other big thing was that within the thousands of schools in the Azure Province, something happened to one school that could rank as one of the top three in the Azure Province.
That school was called the Plum Flower School. It had an extremely good relationship with the two huge overlords of the Azure Province, the Lingyun School and the Qilin Prince's Mansion. Its foundation was extremely strong as well. The weakest core disciples of the Plum flower School were at the Origin realm but many already already entered the Profound realm. There were innumerable experts within the elders, and it could be said that powerful people were like wood in forests.
The head of the Plum Flower School, Plum Flower Zhenren, was a person who lived for 99 years, had the cultivation of the 9th level of the Profound realm, grasped several rank 6 martial skills as well as special methods. He was truly at the peak of the Profound realm and he only needed a step to walk into the Heaven realm. He was one of the most famous big characters in the entire Azure Province.
[TN Zhenren is a title.]
However, such a powerful school like that was massacred a few days ago. Within the Plum Flower School, not a single life remained from the several million disciples. Even the buildings that had towered for several hundred years all became ashes.
The huge Plum Flower School became an ocean of flames, and those flames were fierce. Even the lord of the Qilin Prince's Mansion, and also the head of the Lingyun School could not step into it.
Such terrifying ocean of flames made people associate it with the ocean of flames that appeared within the desert a few months ago. It was said that several months ago, within the desert, the tomb of the Imperial Sky Sage, who was the number one expert who went wherever he wished to within the Azure Province a hundred years ago, appeared.
When that news got spread out, the Qilin Prince's Mansion and the Lingyun School, and also various great powers of the Azure Province sent strong people out to investigate it, but they were obstructed by the ocean of flames and they had no way of going near.
At that time, some people who did not believe in the evil wanted to forcibly charge into the ocean of flames, but before even getting close, they were burnt into ashes. Up until now, the ocean of flames were still burning. Even the rainstorm two months ago could not extinguish the flames. In contrary, it was as though the rain was adding fuel to the flames. It was extremely strange.
Some people said that they saw a male who looked like a beggar walk out of the ocean of flames as he spoke gibberish, yet he was not burnt at all.
People felt that news like that was made up. Even the strongest characters in the Azure Province could not step into the ocean of flames, so how could someone walk out and not be harmed at all?
So, that information was taken as a joke and no one cared about it. But the weirdest thing was on the day that the Plum Flower School was annihilated, there were people who also saw a beggar walk out the Plum Flower School.
After the Plum Flower School got destroyed, some people saw the beggar who was outside of the Plum Flower School. That beggar was not injured at all but he was just a bit insane.
Some people were curious and they felt that perhaps the beggar knew some truths. So, they went up and asked him about the Plum Flower School. However, just after they opened their mouths, the beggar disappeared and could not be seen. People did not even see how he left.
When people got hold of that news, instantly, there were huge reactions and everyone felt that the ocean of flames in the desert was related to the ocean of flames in the Plum Flower School, and it was very possible that it was done by the mysterious beggar.
Immediately, powers from everywhere searched everywhere. They wanted to find that beggar because he would not actually be a beggar, but an expert who had extremely strong strength. He would be at least of the Heaven realm, and some people even suspected that he was a Martial Lord.
Martial Lord. If that news arrived at the Jiang Dynasty, even they would be shaken. They were powerful people that didn't even exist in the Jiang Dynasty. Such a character would flip the entire continent of the Nine Provinces upside down.
However, only powers with strong strength such as the Lingyun School and the Qilin Prince's Mansion could participate on those matters. Others could only look at the liveliness, so even though the two big things shocked people, powers such as second-rate schools did not change at all.
In fact, the second-rate school, the Void School, remained normal and usual. The disciples that should be cultivating were cultivating, and the elders that should be lecturing were lecturing. Only the core zone was completely silent.
Several days ago, the head of the school personally ordered all core disciples to leave the core zone and also the core zone to be locked up for building repairs.
As for why it needed to be locked up, naturally, it was Mr. Grey-cloak's promise. He was going to set up a Spirit Formation Array in the core zone. Just in case, if there were enemies who invaded in the future, they could protect the most important foundations.
After several days of laying, Chu Feng finally finished the Spirit Formation Array. Even though he lacked the cultivation and had insufficient Spirit Power, which caused the Spirit Formation Array to have flaws, there were absolutely no problems for it to block the attacks from a person at the 3rd level of the Profound realm.
Within the head of the school's eyes, that Spirit Formation Array was simply perfect. So, as he was touched, he even gave Chu Feng a huge gift. Twenty high-quality Profound medicine.
That was certainly a huge gift. After all, the Void School was only mediocre within second-rate schools and its strength was far from the Azure Dragon School's strength. Besides, twenty high-quality Profound medicine were still extremely precious for the Azure Dragon School.
So from that, it could be seen that the Void School truly, greatly bled. Even if they didn't completely empty their storages, it would be pretty close.
"School head, this present is too valuable. After all, since you helped me, you also suffered from quite a few losses. It is completely reasonable for me to set up a Spirit Formation Array for your Void School." As he looked at the twenty high-quality Profound medicine, although Chu Feng's heart was moved, he did not immediately accept it.
"Ahh, Mr. Grey-cloak, they aren't compensation for the Spirit Formation Array. They are just some tokens of respect from my Void School. I know that my Void School, which is a petty little second-rate school, isn't qualified for you to remain here to be a guest elder in my Void School."
"However, my Void School still hopes to befriend you. If possible, I hope that we can become friends." The head of the void School was quite honest and he spoke his true thoughts.
"That's fine. Since it is like this, I will take the offer!" Chu Feng smiled and put the twenty high-quality Profound medicine into his Cosmos Sack.
How precious were high-quality Profound medicine? Even the World Spirit Guild did not give out such a precious gift when they were trying to rope Chu Feng in. Of course, it could not be denied that the top-quality White-headed Eagle that the World Spirit Guild gifted to Chu Feng was also extremely precious. In terms of price, it would most likely not be any lower than the twenty high-quality Profound medicine.
However, how big was the World Spirit Guild? A single top-quality White-headed Eagle was truly only a hair from nine oxen and not even worth mentioning. However, to the Void School, twenty high-quality Profound medicine was possibly their accumulations of several years.
So at that instant, Chu Feng was extremely happy and he had great impressions towards the Void School. He hiddenly decided, when he flourished in the future, he must also help the Void School out.


MGA Capitulo 212  Blade of the Void Dragons Cry
After laying the Spirit Formation Array, Chu Feng wanted to leave the Void School, but he could not as the head of the school had to invite Chu Feng to a departing meal.
As it was hard to refuse great hospitality, Chu Feng could only stay there for another day. On the night of that day, the head of the school set up a feast for Chu Feng in the most sacred place in the Void School. On the top of the Void Tower.
"School head, the shape of this Void Tower is quite strange. I wonder who created this?"
As Chu Feng drank wine and ate food, he looked around. He discovered that the location of the Void Tower was quite nice. As they sat on the top, they could see the entire Void School. It was especially beautiful when it was night.
Also, the construction style of the Void Tower was quite special. The main body looked like sword hilt, but the important part was that it was golden-coloured. Under the illumination of the moonlight, it flashed with light, yet the golden colour was not a single whole. There were pieces, like the scales of a dragon. Golden-coloured dragon scales. It was quite beautiful.
Looking from afar, it seemed like a golden-coloured blade that stabbed into the mountain and became one with the Void School. It joined together with the mountain and it joined extremely naturally. It could even be said to be flawless. It did not even look like a construction but something created from nature.
With the World Spiritist's special gaze, Chu Feng could see that the Void Tower was not simple. Especially as he was on the top of the Void Tower and looking around, he felt that it was even more likely that the Void Tower had some secrets hidden within it. So, he wanted to investigate a bit.
"Oh..This Void Tower was personally built by my Void School's founder, Void Zhenren. Actually, the entire Void School was his old man's work." The head of the Void School said.
"AhhOn the topic of my school's founder, he was quite the character of his generation, but... ahh" As the founder was mentioned, a manager elder couldn't help but sigh.
"Yeah, a thousand years ago, my school's founder was a character who went freely around the continent. The trivial Azure Province could not contain him, and at that time, my Void School was also quite famous in the Nine Provinces. It was abnormally prosperous, and the Lingyun School today cannot even be compared to it."
"But sadly, he was quite unlucky. My founder met the founder of the Azure Dragon School. and because enmity was formed between the two of them, they fought at the summit of the Imperial Court. At the end, he was defeated by the Azure Dragon Founder's hands."
"From then on, my founder could not rise again from that fall. At the end, he passed away with grudges in the Void Mountain Range. Up until now, people only remember the founder of the Azure Dragon School a thousand years ago, the peerless Azure Dragon Founder who went where he wished in the continent."
"In that era, he was also a character whose name spread across the continent. However, no one today remembers my Void School's founder or else my Void School would not be in such a desolate area." Another manager elder kept on sighing.
"It is useless to harbor grudges. In every time period, people only remember the strongest person. It could only be said that our founder was born in the wrong time and met a monster-like opponent like the Azure Dragon Founder."
"Besides, the desolation of my Void School cannot be blamed on the founder. He once said that the unique martial skill he created remained in the Void Tower and it awaited for a fated disciple to take it."
"It's only due to the fact that we're useless and unable to comprehend the unique skill that the founder left behind. Otherwise, how could the Void School be so lonely?"
"What schools stressed weren't how powerful their founders were. It stressed whether the following generations could surpass their seniors or not, and whether or not they could cause the school to flourish."
"If that wasn't the case, the Azure Dragon School wouldn't have declined to this stage, and the Lingyun School wouldn't have became the number one school in the Azure Province." The head of the Void School helplessly shook his head.
"Unique martial skill?" After hearing those three words, Chu Feng's eyes lit up and he quickly after, he asked, "I wonder what unique martial skill was left behind by the founder?"
"This" In response, the two manager elders were first taken slightly aback, then they seemed to be in a difficult situation.
On the other hand, the head of the Void School indifferently smiled and said, "My school's founder was an expert of the Heaven realm back then. Although his fame was not as big as the Azure Dragon Founder's fame, he was still a character who ranked in the top 10 in the entire continent of the Nine Provinces."
"When he was quite aged, he had a moment of enlightenment in the truths of martial cultivation. He created a unique martial skill, the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry."
"The Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry was a rank 7 martial skill, but it was said that if it was mastered, it could be comparable to rank 8 martial skills. Its might would be enough to frighten the skies and shake the ground. Even in the current continent of the Nine Province, it is still a transcendent skill."
As he mentioned the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry, the head of the Void School was quite proud. His spit flew everywhere, light and colours overflowed from his face, and if you were a person, you could tell that he was extremely excited and happy. However, his high spirits were suddenly all gone when he spoke the last sentence.
"But sadly, the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry has only been used by my founder's hands. Although there were records about the power of it, no one actually saw what it looked like." Helplessness was all over the face of the Void School's head.
"Ahh, perhaps it is only a legend. After all, who can record the things that happened a thousand years ago so clearly?" One of the manager elders bitterly laughed.
"Impossible. The Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry certainly exists. The past events by the founder are real as well!" Another elder suddenly stood up and he was a bit emotional.
"Insolence! In front of the mister, what propriety is this?!" The head of the Void School was angered as he felt that the atmosphere was a bit off.
"Ah, let us not mention the past. Today, if we're not drunk, we do not leave!" Seeing that, Chu Feng raised his wine cup and he wanted to smooth out the mood. As for the three others, naturally, they didn't dare to not give face and with a single gulp, they finished off a big bowl of wine.
In that night, the four people who were there drank quite a bit. Especially the head of the Void School and also the two manager elders. They were truly drunk. However, Chu Feng was not.
When it was deep into the night and when people were silent, Chu Feng secretly returned to the Void Tower. To the Void School, the Void Tower was a sacred land so normally, not only did no one live there, elders and disciples were not permitted to enter.
Therefore, no one would know that Chu Feng came to that place. At that instant, the doors of the Void Tower were locked tight and there were even mechanisms and formations. But to Chu Feng who was a Grey-cloak World Spiritist, it was extremely simple. With a small and clever Spirit Formation, it easily opened the locks without damaging them in any way.
After successfully entering the Void Tower, Chu Feng took the World Spirit Compass out and imbued his Spirit power into it. He started to search diligently. As for what he was searching? Naturally, it was the unique martial skill that Void Zhenren left behind, the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry!
[TN Forgot to mention this before, but the name should technically be "Azure Dragon Daoren" or "Azure Dragon Taoist", but since "DaorenTaoist" doesn't really fit that well, I changed it to "Founder" instead since everyone knows who that is.]


MGA Capitulo 213  Void Zhenren
The Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry was in the Void Tower.
However, starting from a thousand years ago and after the founder of the Void School, Void Zhenren, passed away with grudges, no one else in the Void School could grasp that martial skill anymore. In reality, no one even saw what the martial skill looked like.
With World Spiritist methods, Chu Feng went up and down the Void Tower, and searched back and forth many times. However, he could not find any traces of the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry. That made Chu Feng anxious.
Because, with the eyes of a World Spiritist, he could tell that the Void Tower was very special and he knew that there must be something hidden within the tower, and after hearing the school head's words, Chu Feng felt that most likely, the thing that was hidden was the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry. However, in front of his eyes, Chu Feng could not find it even if it depended on his life, so naturally, it made him anxious.
After all, the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry was not a simple martial skill. It was created by a Heaven realm expert and it was a rank 7 martial skill that did not exist within the Azure Province. Also, it was not a simple rank 7 martial skill. It was a rank 7 martial skill that was infinitely near a rank 8 martial skill.
Of course, since Chu Feng knew that such a martial skill existed, he would want to get it within his hands because as long as he grasped that martial skill, undoubtedly, it would be one of the trump cards that could protect his life in the future.
Thinking to that point, Chu Feng searched in detail once again. But it was useless as after the whole night, he had no harvests. Not to mention the cultivation method of the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry, he could not even find a single strand of hair.
"Will I, Chu Feng, really have to miss such a good opportunity with the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry?" Chu Feng stood on top of the Void Tower, and as he looked at the faint light that came from the east, his heart was full of regret.
In that entire night, Chu Feng truly used everything he had and used every single method he could. So, the situation was already set. No matter how much more time Chu Feng spent to search, it would be for nothing.
Saying it with Eggy's words, Chu Feng's ability was not enough and his Spirit power was not sufficient, so he had no way of observing everything the Void Tower hid.
However, when Chu Feng's Spirit power grew to the point in which he could see through the Void Tower, how great of a use would a rank 7 martial skill have to Chu Feng?
"You are not a disciple from the Void School." Suddenly, an aged voice came from behind Chu Feng.
"Who?" After hearing that voice, Chu Feng was shocked. He first leaped forward, and only after dozens of meters did he turn around and sweep his gaze forward.
Although the gaze did not seem to be important, Chu Feng was instantly frightened because an aged old man who had white hair stood in front of him.
That old man was short and he had wrinkles all over his face. His appearance did not seem out of the ordinary, but his body emitted a special type of aura. It was an aura that belonged to those who cultivated to a certain realm.
The most important thing was that the old man's body was translucent. It meant that he was not a complete life form but a consciousness. A consciousness that was able to avoid Chu Feng's Spirit power.
"Chu Feng, careful. This is a consciousness from a Heaven realm expert. Although after being worn down for many years and it is extremely weak, it should not be underestimated." Eggy nervously reminded.
"Senior, I wonder you are?" Chu Feng respectfully asked. Such a strong consciousness would not appear for no cause or reason at all, so immediately, Chu Feng associated him with a person. It was the founder of the Void School, Void Zhenren.
Although it was quite inconceivable for a Heaven realm consciousness to live for a thousand years, the only person Chu Feng could think of was that person.
"I never would have thought that after such a long time, a decently talented person finally came, yet was not part of my school. Ahh, whatever. Perhaps this is the will of the heavens." The old man did not answer Chu Feng question. He only helplessly sighed, then said to Chu Feng,
"Boy, I'll pass the cultivation method for the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry verbally down to you. As for how much you can remember and whether you succeed in cultivating it will all depend on your talent and luck."
After that, the old man started to narrate the cultivation method to Chu Feng, and Chu Feng quickly listened to it seriously and diligently remembered everything with his heart, in his heart. The old man did not speak over a hundred phrases in total, but every single phrase was very fine and detailed. To completely understand it required extremely high comprehension power.
When the old man finished speaking, Chu Feng was incomparably joyful in his heart because he knew what the old man passed him down was undoubtedly the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry.
"Senior, thank you for passing your unique skill down to me!" After firmly memorizing the cultivation method in his heart, Chu Feng paid his respects to the old man.
"No need to thank me. I just don't want my unique skill to be lost. Also, if you don't have anything else, leave. Don't disturb my peace again." After speaking, the old man waved his sleeve and he disappeared without leaving any traces.
"Eggy, do you think the old man was Void Zhenren?" Chu Feng asked as he walked out of the Void Tower.
"It's extremely likely that it is him." Eggy replied.
"But didn't you say that the period of existence for consciousness was limited, and Heaven realm consciousnesses could not live past a thousand years?" Chu Feng asked in confusion.
"That is indeed true, but there are always exceptions for everything. Although consciousnesses still grasp a certain amount of power, after all, they are virtual bodies. Perhaps through special treasures or methods, they can extend their period of life."
"This Void Tower is quite special, and maybe because of that, it let Void Zhenren's consciousness exist for a longer period of time."
"However, I feel like the reason why Void Zhenren wants his own consciousness to exist is not only because he doesn't want his unique skill to be lost. It is more because he's thinking for himself." Eggy said.
"Thinking for himself? What do you mean by that?" Chu Feng got more and more curious.
"When you knew about Void Zhenren, your first thought was to get his unique skill, the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry."
"However, my first thought was to absorb the Source energy from his corpse. But just now, I dispelled that thought." Eggy giggled and relied.
"You mean?" Chu Feng suddenly understood.
"That's right. This Void Zhenren should be guarding his own corpse because he doesn't want his Source energy to be taken away by World Spiritists after he died. So, with special methods, he let his own consciousness survive."
"But looking at how he is, I'm guessing that he can't go on for much longer. Within two years, he will certainly completely disappear. At that time, it would not be late for us to take away his Source energy." Eggy evilly smiled and said.
"You little girl." Chu Feng could only show helplessness after hearing Eggy's thoughts.
Since he thought that the head of the Void School would certainly personally send him off as he left, after leaving the Void Tower, Chu Feng did not directly leave but return to his own resting palace.
"Why is he here? Was it discovered that I snuck into the Void Tower?"
However, before even nearing the palace, Chu Feng couldn't help but be taken aback because with his Spirit power observations, the head of the Void School was currently standing at the entrance to his palace and he seemed rather anxious.


MGA Capitulo 214  News of Death
"Eh? School head, why have you risen so early today?"
Although suspicions were raised in Chu Feng's heart, he still walked over relaxedly because he was not afraid of the head of the Void School. Perhaps it sounded quite bad, but with Chu Feng's current strength, other than the old monster hidden inside the Void Tower, no one could stop him in the Void School.
"Mister, it's great that you're back. I received a letter just now and it was mentioned that it should be given to you."
"I was worried that your news was exposed so I immediately came here to find you." The head of the Void School nervously gave the letter to Chu Feng.
After seeing the letter, Chu Feng's heart also tightened because the letter was very special. Only those who had quite good relationships with the head of the Void School would have letters that were valued by the Void School. Those letters also immediately get sent into the head of the school's hands.
As for that letter, it was actually given to Chu Feng by the head of the Void School, and given to Su Rou by Chu Feng because he was worried that after he left, Su Rou and the others would be met with any troubles.
So, Chu Feng told Su Rou where he was, and also told her if she met with any problems, send the letter to the Void School. Nothing else was permitted to be written in the letter. The only thing required was "To Mr. Grey-cloak" and it would be fine.
After Chu Feng opened the letter, there were indeed those words in it, and it was Su Rou's handwriting.
"It's nothing, just a friend." Chu Feng smiled at the head of the Void School and explained. After that, he took his leave and he did not need the school head to send him off. He quickly left the Void School and went to the place that was pre-appointed with Su Rou.
It was a small tavern, and because the location was rather good, there were many guests that came in and out. The beauty Su Rou sat inside it, so naturally, she became the focal point of people.
In fact, next to the table that Su Rou was sitting on were several people who did not have eyes. At that moment, white foam came out from their mouths and they were heavily injured. Of course, they received violent attacks from the result of some teasing. But even so, it was still unable to stop those males from admiring Su Rou's prettiness. That was the attraction power of beauties!
"I have something to speak with this lady. Everyone, please help out and give us two a clear space!"
Suddenly, a voice exploded like thunder. Even the wine bowls on the tables trembled everywhere.
That change caused everyone in the tavern to panic. How did they even dare to say half a word of no? Every single person rolled and climbed out because they could tell that Chu Feng was a martial cultivating expert. A person like that was not someone whom they could offend.
"What happened?" When everyone left, Chu Feng carefully looked at Su Rou. He discovered that Su Rou's face was extremely ugly, so something big must have happened.
"Chu Feng. You must remain calm." Su Rou went in front of Chu Feng and her pair of beautiful eyes were full of worry.
"What happened?" Chu Feng felt uneasiness. He was aware that the matter was very possibly related to him.
"The Golden-purple City has been massacred. Other than the young generations who went out to cultivate, everyone else in your Chu family has been killed!" Su Rou said those words with great difficulty.
*ta ta ta* When those words were said, Chu Feng stepped three steps back. Instantly, his face turned deathly-white and his breathing quickened.
"Chu Feng, are you okay?" Seeing that, Su Rou quickly went up to support Chu Feng and she was even more worried.
At that moment, Chu Feng's body quivered a bit. Only after a good while did he calm down. He asked with a deep voice, "How about my father? My elder brother? Chu Yue and the others, are they fine?"
"Your elder brother is still in the Lingyun School cultivating. Chu Yue and the others are in the Azure Dragon School so all of them are fine. But your father" Su Rou did not finish her words.
However, Chu Feng already understood her meaning. He closed both of his eyes, and in that instant, two streams of tears already slid down his face from his eyes. His body which he just calmed down trembled once again and it became even more intense.
"I will return to the Golden-purple City." Chu Feng walked out of the tavern and he whistled at the sky. After a cry rang out, a huge White-headed Eagle slid down from the sky like an arrow.
*whoosh* Before even letting the White-headed Eagle land, Chu Feng leaped up and jumped onto the White-headed Eagle.
"I will come as well!" Su Rou also lept up and hugged Chu Feng's waist.
After another long cry from the White-headed Eagle, it rose into the sky. Under the stunned gazes of everyone, they disappeared into the distant horizon..
The Golden-purple City, the second-rate city was massacred. After getting that news, the lords of the nearby cities immediately rushed there. Even the city lord of the Vermilion Bird City personally went towards the Golden-purple City.
In the instant that the city lords entered the Golden-purple City, their faces couldn't help but greatly change because at that very moment, the Golden-purple City could only be describe with several words. The most fitting were A sight too appalling to look at.
When Chu Feng massacred the Shangguan family, he only massacred their family. But the Golden-purple City being massacred was the entire city. Within the Golden-purple City, no matter if they were high ranking officials, noble clans, or even commoners, not a single person lived.
Although the blood already dried out, the Gods could still see the dark-redness. Blood splattered everywhere, and after entering the city, a strong stench could be smelt. It was the smell of blood.
"Who could have possibly done this kind of thing?" A tall city lord who just arrived was enraged after he saw that scene.
"They came for the Chu family." Just at that time, a slightly fat male walked out of the city. He was also a city lord from a neighbouring city.
"Chu family?" The tall and big city lord expressed confusion.
"It's the family of Chu Feng." The slightly fat city lord replied.
"Chu Feng? That young man? How did you know that they came for the Chu family?" The tall and big city lord closely questioned.
"You will know after entering." The slightly fat city lord pointed towards the city.
In response, the tall and big city lord quickly went down the horse and walked into the city. The guards behind him closely followed, but after they entered the city, they stood where they were and shock filled their faces.
In the Golden-purple City's plaza, a tall and big frame was erected there. Under the frame were corpses that were all over the place without order. Several heads were hung on top of the frame. They were all people from the Chu family.
In the plaza, there were even several huge words written with blood. "A debt of blood must be paid with blood. Chu Feng touched my brother, so I annihilate his entire family!"


MGA Capitulo 215  Devastating Sorrow
"It's a White-headed Eagle!"
As they looked at the huge White-headed Eagle in the sky, not a single person who were there didn't tighten their hearts. What was a White-headed Eagle? Naturally, all of them knew. It was an extremely precious thing.
Even the Vermilion Bird City did not have a White-headed Eagle, so what kind of person would they be if they were able to ride such an object? Was it possible that the people who massacred the Golden-purple City came back? When they thought of that, they felt frightened and alarmed.
But after the White-headed Eagle landed onto the ground, not only did their uneasiness disappear, they even rejoiced because the two people who sat on the White-headed Eagle were not big enemies. It was the second lady of the Vermilion Bird City, Su Rou, and also the young genius who shook the Vermilion Bird City, Chu Feng.
"It's the second lady! This is great, the second lady is here. We now have a backbone."
After seeing Su Rou, several city lords quickly went over to welcome her. Their cultivation were at the peak of the Origin realm, so if the people who massacred the city came back, they would truly have no way of fighting against it.
However, Su Rou was an elder of the Azure Dragon School and she was a genuinely powerful person in the Profound realm. So, since Su Rou appeared, naturally, they felt a bit more safe.
"Chu Feng, you must be strong!"At the same time they welcomed Su Rou, the several city lords did not forget to console Chu Feng. They were deeply afraid that a young man like him would be unable to endure the strike that was coming up.
Chu Feng nodded towards their good intentions and he forced a light smile out before pushing the crowd away and walking towards the plaza.
When he was in the air, he already saw the huge words written in blood. He knew that the calamity was initiated by him.
He walked into the plaza and he looked at the heads hung on the tall frame. The oldest were aged old people, the youngest were little children. When he looked at every single familiar face, Chu Feng's heart truly felt as if a knife was stirring it around because the death of those people were caused by him.
Suddenly, Chu Feng's body violently shook and his heart was as though a knife pierced through it. The tears that he forcibly held up within his eyes instantly erupted out uncontrollably.
He saw a familiar face. It was the person who raised him for 15 years, his father, Chu Yuan. Next to him was the former family master of the Chu family, Chu Yuanba, as well as Chu Yue's father, Chu Renyi.
Those who treated him well in the past, or those who treated him not well in the past were all dead in front of his eyes. They died because of him.
"SorrySorryI killed all of youI killed all of you"
Suddenly, Chu Feng knelt on the ground and he ferociously banged his head down. Strong power caused the black rock to form a deep indentation. As the rock fragments flew, they interweaved with his tears.
"Chu Feng, don't do this. It has already happened and you can't change anything by doing this." Seeing that, Su Rou quickly went up to pull Chu Feng up, but she could not even move him.
Later on, she did not obstruct him anymore. She knew how much pain Chu Feng must be feeling as his own family were all killed because of himself. That feeling was enough to cause a person to collapse. That self-blame caused enough pain for him to wish to die.
Just like that, Chu Feng knelt for three days and three nights. On the fourth day, the Vermilion Bird City's army arrived. Su Hen hurried over, and Su Mei also followed.
When they saw that scene, and saw Chu Feng like that, every single person's heart ached yet they did not know how to comfort him. When it was noon on the fourth day, the Chu family's young generation who cultivated in the Azure Dragon School also hurried over.
"Father~~~~~"
"Mother~~~~~"
"Ahh~~~~~"
When Chu Wei, Chu Cheng, Chu Zhen, Chu Yue, Chu Xue and the others entered the Golden-purple City and saw their own parents' heads being hung up, all of them lost control.
All of them leaped over and wailed with devastating grief. Chu Xue even passed out on scene, being unable to accept that fact.
"Chu Feng you bastard! If you didn't stir up troubles everywhere, how would my Chu family end up like this?! Give my parents back to me!!"
Some people even lost their minds when they saw the wretched deaths of their family. They ran over to Chu Feng, beat, kicked, clawed, and bit him. As he faced their violent attacks, Chu Feng did not dodge or avoid them. He knelt perfectly straight where he was. He was willing to receive the strikes and curses without making any sound.
"Enough. This matter wasn't Chu Feng's fault. If you have the ability, go find the people who killed your parents and collect your debts from them. What are you even doing here by hitting Chu Feng like this?"
At that moment, the most rational person was Chu Wei. As the eldest in the young generation of the Chu family, he forcefully endured the pain of losing his family and stood up.
He pulled the people who were being unreasonable to the side and even consoled Chu Feng, "Chu Feng, don't need to blame yourself too much. You must remain strong, because the only person who can avenge my Chu family is you."
However, Chu Feng did not reply as though he didn't hear what Chu Wei said. He only continued to kneel where he was and his expression made one's heart ache.
Only then did people discover that Chu Feng did not even blink once for such a long period of time. Both of his eyes were full of self-blame as he looked at the Chu family members who were dead.
"Chu Feng, are you okay? Don't scare us." Seeing that, Chu Yue also went over.
At that instant, what flowed out of Chu Feng's eyes were not longer tears. It was blood. Tears of blood. When one reached the point where they could die from the sorrow and when their tears were all drained, the only thing that could flow out were tears of blood.
"Chu Feng, what are you doing? Don't trample on yourself. You won't help them by doing this. You will only harm yourself." Su Rou ran over and worry was everywhere on her face.
"Chu Feng, what are you doing? Don't be like this.." Su Mei also ran over, but she wasn't as calm as Su Rou and tears filled her face.
However, no matter who went up to urge him, they could not move Chu Feng. It was as if he was possessed by a demon and he kept on kneeling there. He allowed the tears of blood from his eyes to flow down his face and to dye his clothes wet.
At that very instant, not to mention those who were always worried about Chu Feng, even the people from the Chu family's young generation, who hated Chu Feng because their family died, had indescribable sorrow and started to go up to urge Chu Feng.
But it was useless. No matter who spoke, it was useless. Only when the sky became dark did Chu Feng's eyes slowly close shut, and with a poof, he fell onto the ground. Finally, because the pain of his sorrow surpassed his limit, he lost consciousness.
He remained in a coma for two days and two nights. When his consciousness returned and when he opened both of his eyes, he found out that he was laying on a bed.
It was a temporary military tent. There wasn't too much space in the tent, but Chu Feng could see a figure hurrying back and forth. It was Su Rou. Su Rou, the lady of the city lord, was currently cooking up some medicine. Without much thinking, Chu Feng knew that it was for him.
"Mm." Chu Feng originally wanted to get up, but he suddenly discovered that something was pressing on his chest. Only then did he notice that Su Mei laid in front of his chest and was currently sleeping. She slept very soundly, and it could be seen that she was extremely tired and exhausted. There were even traces of tears on her face.
At that instant, Chu Feng's heart couldn't avoid hurting a bit. He knew that the little beauty must not have been well for the past few days and she must have been deeply worried about him.
"You knelt for three days and three nights, so she stood along with you for three days and three nights. Even when you passed out, she was still always by your side." Su Rou walked over.


MGA Capitulo 216  Arena of Carnage
"How long did I sleep for?"
"Two days."
"What about Chu Yue and the others?"
"For the sake of their safety, they are being sent back to the Azure Dragon School with escorts. Your family has also been buried."
"They must really hate me now. If I considered the consequences of my actions, they wouldn't have died because of me."
"Don't blame yourself anymore because there's no use in that. This cannot be blamed on you. It can only be blamed on the people who attacked so despicably."
"They could not kill you, so they killed your family. This is a plot. They intentionally want you to blame yourself and to feel guilt. Do not get tricked by them and don't be destroyed by their schemes." Su Rou tightly grabbed onto Chu Feng and she was extremely afraid that Chu Feng could not undo the knot in his heart.
"Don't worry. I, Chu Feng, am not that weak. Right now, I just want to know who did this." Bone-piercing coldness emerged into Chu Feng's eyes.
"Actually, in his massacre, there is a survivor. The city lord of the Golden-purple City did not die. With special methods, he faked his death and survived. He also saw the people who massacred this city." Su Rou slowly said.
"Who? Who was it?" Chu Feng was a bit agitated.
"Don't get too stirred up for now and don't wake little Mei up. Come out and I'll tell you then." Su Rou worriedly looked at Su Mei who was laying on Chu Feng's chest while still sleeping sweetly and walked out the tent.
So, Chu Feng carefully carried Su Mei onto the bed, and after covering her with the blanket, he walked out of the tent.
This time, before Chu Feng spoke to ask, Su Rou took the lead and spoke, "It was the Five Tiger Village. It is a fortified mountain village, and there are five leaders. All of them are experts in the Profound realm."
"This fortified mountain village is a bandits nest. All of them do things that cannot be exposed to gain large amounts of reward from it."
"The Five Tiger Village is a headquarters by itself. It is located in a special area, being on the border of my Vermilion Bird City as well as the Black Tortoise City. So, my father have never taken care of them. After all, they were a power that was not weak. If he needed to remove them, it would not be simple and if it wasn't dealt with well, he would even get retaliated on."
"However, this time, my father is determined to remove the Five Tiger Village. He has already assembled the army from my Vermilion Bird City and he is currently heading towards the Five Tiger Village."
"Do you know where the Five Tiger Village is located at?" Chu Feng asked.
"Mm." Su Rou nodded her head.
"Bring me there!"
After speaking, Chu Feng summoned Little White over. The two of them rode the White-headed Eagle, with the fastest possible speed, they rushed towards the Five Tiger Village.
The Five Tiger Village was a bandit's nest. The people in it raped and pillaged, and there was no evils that they did not do. The people in the fortified mountain village called each others as brothers.
The Five Tigers were the leaders. There weren't many people there, only near a thousand. The strongest were at the Profound realm, and the weakest were at the Origin realm. Their strength was quite strong and underestimation was not permitted.
A few days ago, the Five Tiger Village received a huge business and currently, they were celebrating after a great success. Some drank beer and ate meat, while others abused the females they plundered. No matter how much more miserable the females painfully yelled out, not a single person expressed sympathy. Even when they were abused to death, no one would feel any pity.
Because those people were a group of bastards. They did all sorts of heartless things and they did not have a single bit of humanity within them.
Suddenly, a White-headed Eagle came down from the sky and it caused the noisy laughter to quiet down. Everyone's gazes were attracted by the two people on the White-headed Eagle. Especially when they saw the female who wore white clothes, the group of beasts even started drooling.
They had played around with innumerable females, but they had never seen such a beautiful girl. As they looked, they simply could not stop. Their beast-like nature was stirred up. Some people who did not grow eyes were even eager and they wanted to rush over to strip the long skirt off the white-clothed beauty.
"I wonder what you two came here for?" Suddenly, a clear and loud voice rang out and five figures walked out from the crowd.
Every single person was tall and big. Dragons and phoenixes were drawn on their bodies. There were silver rings hanging on their ears and noses, and there were even several alluring females with incomplete clothing on their bodies next to them. They were touching and nibbling on the Five Tigers' bare muscles and doing lowly actions. They did not even care about the gazes of others and they acted quite wildly.
At the same time that the five people appeared, everyone else in the Five Tiger Village calmed down because those five people were the leaders of the Five Tiger Village, the Five Tigers.
"Who let you to do the case in the Golden-purple City?" The cold glare from Chu Feng's gaze shot everywhere and he was trying his best to control his bloodlust.
"Kill them!" After hearing Chu Feng's words, the leader of the Five Tigers knew that something was wrong. He did not waste any words and he directly ordered them to kill Chu Feng and Su Rou.
"Haa!"
At the same time that the leader of the Five Tigers spoke, Chu Feng already started attacking. He raised his hand and palmed. Instantly, several people were shook into pieces and became pools of blood as they sprayed over the people who were behind them.
Following that, Chu Feng palmed again and several more people became pools of blood as they died wretchedly by Chu Feng.
At the same time, Su Rou also attacked. Similarly, her attacks were abnormally fierce and every strike drew blood. Every time she attacked, several people would die and there was no mercy.
"Damn it, these two are in the Profound realm!" Seeing that things weren't going well, the Five Tigers did not fold their hands away and watch on the side, and they started to attack Chu Feng and Su Rou.
The five of them had the cultivation of the 1st level of the Profound realm and the martial skills they were skilled in were very vicious. However, in front of Chu Feng who borrowed Eggy's power, they were simply like five pieces of trash.
Chu Feng did not even use martial skills. With a casual punch, his Profound power overflowed and it was extremely tyrannical. It easily dissolved the combined attacks from the five people, and at the same time, the five of them also flew back.
"Ahh!"
When they slammed back down onto the ground, bones all over their bodies cracked and countless bones were snapped. Even half of their internal organs were damaged. All of them spit out blood and they were heavily injured, without any more power to stand back up.
"Quick, quickly run!"
After seeing their five leaders get destroyed from one punch by someone, the Five Tiger Village members who were full of confidence previously were instantly terrified so much that their souls flew away. How would they dare to continue attacking Chu Feng and Su Rou? They turned around and ran out the mountain village.
"Today, all of you will die."
However, with the wave of Chu Feng's big sleeve, a huge Spirit Formation descended from the skies and enveloped the entire mountain village. No matter how the members attacked the Spirit Formation, they could not move it in the slightest.
The Spirit Formation was laid when Chu Feng entered the mountain village. It was a strong Spirit Formation and its goal was to prevent them from escaping because today, Chu Feng was absolutely not leaving a single person alive.
From then on, the Five Tiger Village that was enveloped by the Spirit Formation was as if it was an arena of carnage. The people who normally did nothing but evil fell one after the other, and every single death was more miserable than the previous.
When blood converged into rivers and corpses stacked into mountains, after the massacre in the Five Tiger Village, only five people remained, Those five people were the five leaders of the Five Tiger Village.
"I'll ask again. Who prompted all of you to do it?" Chu Feng swept his icy gaze at the five people who laid on the ground with deathly-white faces.
"What are you talking about? We dont even understand." One of them howled very innocently.
"You dont understand? Sure, dont understand." Chu Feng stuck his hand out and pressed it onto his head. Following that, the lightning that encircled his hand drilled from the head into his entire body.
"Ahh~~~~~~" At that moment, that person painfully howled out.


MGA Capitulo 217  Whos the Mastermind
The merciless Third Thunder Style created countless little lightning snakes. They were tearing his skin inch by inch, and burning his flesh bit by bit. They were destroying his bones, wrecking his organs, and insanely devastating every single part of his body. That feeling of pain was indescribable. Only those who personally experienced it could understand.
"Ahh~~~~"
The wretched wail which was like a pig being slaughtered kept on sounding out. Birds flew and beasts escaped in all directions. That was intentional by Chu Feng. As he remained awake, he would feel the torture from his body and Chu Feng wanted him to taste all kinds of pain before cutting off his life.
As he was being destroyed by the lightning, the powerful person at the 1st level of the Profound realm finally became charcoal-like after all the burning. There was not a single inch of undamaged place on his body. That period of time was certainly something that he never wanted to experience because it was the hardest event to bear in his entire life. But luckily, the current him already breathed no more.
After killing that person, not only did the flames of anger in Chu Feng's heart not diminish, it even increased because even though he knew that those people were the culprits behind his Chu family's massacre, they were not the mastermind. So, he extended his palm which was full of lightning towards another person.
"It was Gong Luyun! Gong Luyun from the Black Tortoise City! He hired us to massacre the Golden-purple City!" This time, before letting Chu Feng do the deed, that person confessed.
"This hero, please spare us! This is the reward that Gong Luyun gave us and we'll give all of it to you." The leader of the Five Tigers took his own Cosmos Sack off and shot a glance at the three others who still survived.
"Hero, please spare the lives of us three! This is everything we've accumulated and please accept them." Seeing that, the three others also forcibly sat back up, and with a petty attitude, they gave their Cosmos Sacks to Chu Feng.
"You killed my family, yet you want me to spare your lives? A debt in blood must be paid with blood. Those words were written by you right? Do you not understand the principles behind that?" Chu Feng coldly smiled and his smile was extremely terrifying.
"You..You're that Chu Feng?" After hearing Chu Feng's words, the remaining Four Tigers' expression changed greatly. The colours of their faces instantly turned deathly-white and they powerlessly laid down. They knew that a disaster truly arrived.
Chu Feng did not reply. He clenched one of his hands and a golden-coloured longsword was condensed out. With the streak of a golden light, eight arms fell onto the ground.
"Ahh~~~~" As they saw that their own arms were cut off by someone, the Four Tigers painfully cried out. However, that was not the end. It was only the beginning.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
Chu Feng held the golden-coloured longsword and madly stabbed the Four Tigers. He sliced open their skins, cut off their tendons and veins, and Chu Feng was endlessly pricking their most sensitive nerves yet keeping them awake. He let pain that was hard to unendurable engulf their bodies one wave after the other and let them be filled by the most cruel tortures in the world.
"Ahh~~~ You bastard! Kill us if you dare!!"
Within a blink, the infamous Four Tigers had their blood and flesh muddled together by Chu Feng. It made them want to die instead of live from the pain, and they wanted Chu Feng to kill them.
"Want to die? How can it be so easy? I want all of you to wish to live but cannot, and wish to die but cannot!" How could Chu Feng, who was burning with flames of anger, so easily let them go? Not only did he not stop, he even became fiercer.
"Chu Feng, that's enough. Look at the time. My Vermilion Bird City's army will arrive quickly so we have to leave this place soon as well." As she looked at the Four Tigers who completely became bloody humans, even Su Rou's heart could not bear it.
"Even if they die, they will not die with a complete corpse." Chu Feng coldy snorted and the golden sword in his hand slashed randomly. As the golden glare shot in all directions, the corpses of the Four Tigers started to fly everywhere. Even their Source energies were absorbed by Chu Feng for Eggy. They truly died with incomplete corpses.
"Gong Luyun. I never would have thought that you would be so ruthless. You dare to secretly kill my family? Originally, I even thought of letting you live for a bit more. But now, it seems that not only do you need to die, your Gong family needs to die as well."
After thoroughly finishing the Four Tigers off, Chu Feng looked around to confirm that he did not leave anyone living. Then, he dissolved his Spirit Formation and rode Little White away without caring about his surroundings.
After knowing who the mastermind was who directed the attack on his family, it was not possible for Chu Feng to wait another instant. He wanted to quickly kill that Gong Luyun as an offering for his Chu family members as well as the souls of the several hundred thousand people from the Golden-purple City. So, what Chu Feng needed to do was to search for the whereabouts of Gong Luyun.
On the second day that Chu Feng and Su Rou left, the army from the Vermilion Bird City finally arrived outside of the Five Tiger Village.
Since they knew that people in there were criminals who ran for their lives, they did a strict arrangement and formed an impenetrable circle that surrounded the village as they went closer and closer to the Five Tiger Village.
However, as they neared the Five Tiger Village, the Vermilion Bird City's army were more and more uneasy. Why was the Five Tiger Village that should have been noisy so silent? It was simply not normal for it to be so quiet.
At first, they even suspected that it was possibly a trap. However, later on, they discovered that it wasn't a trap because they smelled something. The smell of blood.
"Milord, what should we do?" The smell of blood always made people fearful because it was a signal that represented danger. So, at that instant, the powerful people from the Vermilion Bird City were also slightly afraid and everyone cast their gazes towards the city lord, Su Hen.
At that moment, Su Hen's deep thoughts were unstable. Such a strong stench of blood meant that a lot of people died. At least, it meant that a huge battle happened within the Five Tiger Village so even he did not know what kind of dangers were in it.
But after thinking for a while, he still ordered, "Kill!"
"Kill~~~~~~~~"
After Su Hen spoke, everyone loudly yelled and the word "kill" resonated in the mountain forests. Even the ground rumbled.
The army of the Vermilion Bird City, under the lead of Su Hen and various other powerful people, rushed into the Five Tiger Village with a burst of courage. However, after rushing into the Five Tiger Village, all of them were dumbfounded and they were completely stupefied by the scene in front of them.


MGA Capitulo 218  Dangerous Person
The scene in front of their eyes could only be summarized with one word. Cruel!
Even more cruel than the Golden-purple City because every single people's death there was that horrifying. It made people unable to look straight at it.
If it was said that corpses filled the ground in the Golden-purple City, then at that instant, in the Five Tiger Village, it was hell. There was not a single complete corpse. Only incomplete skeletons remained other than pools of blood.
Even the people from the Vermilion Bird City who experienced the battlefields found it hard to bear that scene. Even Su Hen's face changed quickly. As for the guards of the Vermilion Bird City, some trembled, some threw up while kneeling on the ground, and some even directly lost consciousness out of fear. Even after losing consciousness, white foam came out of their mouths and their bodies were violently twitching. It could be seen that they were extremely terrified.
"Did they get silenced? What kind of person could be so cruel?!"
"It seems like Chu Feng has met with big trouble so it seems that little Rou and Little Mei must be kept at a distance from him."
Su Hen tightly frowned. He did not know that it was done by Chu Feng and he even thought that it was all done by the mastermind who directed the Five Tiger Village in order to silence them.
As he looked at that wretched scene, he could imagine what kind of dangerous person that mastermind must be, yet Chu Feng angered such a person. Naturally, he did not want to be affected as well.
Within the Black Tortoise City, security was tight and all the guards in the city were dispatched. Many experts in the Black Tortoise City who closed themselves behind doors for cultivation also came out. The reason why all that was happening was because within the territory of the Black Tortoise City, an extremely dangerous person appeared.
No one knew what that person's real appearance was because those who saw that person's appearance were killed, and the people who were killed were all people from the Gong family.
What status did people from the Gong family have? They were the rulers of the Black Tortoise City! The people who were killed were even high-ranking characters who had quite some status in the Gong family. Clearly, someone was provoking the Gong family and becoming a huge enemy.
The experts from the Gong family were endlessly being killed and the dignity of the Gong family was being challenging in their own territory. Naturally, the Gong family could not possibly tolerate that so this time, the Gong family truly dispatched a large group of people and they vowed to apprehend the culprit.
"Ahh!"
"Dammit! Who are you to dare to repeatedly attack my Gong family?"
Within the unmarked graves outside of the Black Tortoise City, a middle-aged male who wore sumptuous clothing laid on the ground. Blood filled his mouth and fear filled his face. Surrounding him laid almost a hundred Black Tortoise City guards. However, those people did not breathe anymore.
He was a Gong family member and he had the cultivation of the 3rd level of the Profound realm. He was sent by the Gong family to search for the culprit who hiddenly killed the other Gong family members.
On that day, finally, he met that culprit. However, he never would have thought that he would be so strong. So strong that even him, who was at the 3rd level of the Profound realm, was completely powerless in front of him.
"Tell me where Gong Luyun is!" Chu Feng wore a flax robe, and in those days, he was lingering near the Black Tortoise City and slaughtering one Gong family expert after the other. His goal was not revenge. His goal was to find the whereabouts of Gong Luyun.
Sooner or later, he was going to exterminate the Gong family. However, he was not impatient. At that moment, the person he wanted to kill the most was Gong Luyun, the person who hiddenly killed the people from his Chu family. If he did not kill Gong Lyun, it would be extremely hard for him to dispel the hatred in his heart.
"So you came for Gong Luyun. Kill me. Even if I die, I will not tell you where Luyun went." That person from the Gong family was quite unyielding.
Chu Feng was already prepared for that reaction because it was not the first time that he met such an answer. It could be seen that everyone who Chu Feng killed before refused to answer that question.
It had to be said that the Gong family was quite courageous and unyielding and it was something that was quite rare. However, when people like them became enemies, it was a very troubling thing, and after a few days of observations, Chu Feng discovered a problem.
No wonder the Gong family was quite valued by the Qilin Prince's Mansion. The foundation of the Gong family really was the stronger one within first-rate cities. It could be said that the Black Tortoise City surpassed the Vermilion Bird City quite a bit.
So strong that the current Chu Feng could only linger around the outskirts of the city and it was very hard for him to enter the city itself. Chu Feng felt that inside the city, there were characters that even he could not suppress.
"If you want to die, I can grant you that wish. But before you die, I will let you suffer torture."
"You've seen the Gong family corpses right? I will make you several times more miserable than them." A flash came from Chu Fengs sleeve and a sharp dagger appeared.
*gulp*
After seeing the dagger which glared, the powerful Gong family person couldn't help but swallow some saliva. He recalled the Gong family members who were killed by Chu Feng before. Indeed, they were extremely miserable. Just by looking at their corpses, one would tremble even though it wasn't cold. It could be imagined how they were tormented before they died.
"If I tell you, can you spare my life?" The Gong family member's gaze glittered and as he trembled, he said those words.
"I can spare your life." In response, Chu Feng unhesitatingly promised.
"Truly?" The Gong family member was a bit suspicious.
"I have always spoke the truth." Even though Chu Feng's face was concealed, one could still see the sincerity in his gaze.
"Luyun was invited to the Valley of Hundred Bends to participate in the Heroic Hunt that that happens once every year in the Azure Province. The peak disciples of the many schools in the Azure Province went to participate in this hunt." The Gong family member said in a low voice.
Chu Feng had heard of the Heroic Hunt before. It was a huge thing that happened once a year in the Azure Province and only the top disciples of various schools could participate in it. So, Gong Luyun being able to be invited made Chu Feng a bit surprised.
Because those who were able to be invited to the Heroic Hunt were mostly top disciples of first-rate schools. Almost no disciples from second-rate schools received invitations.
"How many days are left to the Heroic Hunt?" Chu Feng quickly asked.
"There are three more days until it starts. The Valley of Hundred Bends is very far from here, and after the hunt starts, schools from various places will work together to seal the entrance. You won't get there in time." The Gong family member reminded.
"No need to worry about that."
Chu Feng sneered and the dagger in his hand flashed past. The Gong family member's face instantly changed greatly and he quickly covered his neck area, but he could not stop the blood that was gushing out from his neck. He said with a furious face, "YouYouYou went back on your word!"
"If you had to blame something, you could only blame your foolishness." Chu Feng's gaze became even more eerie and a boundless attraction forced surged out from his body and rushed into the body of that Gong family member.
"Ahh~~~~~~~~" At that instant, the Gong family member opened his mouth and started to painfully scream because he could feel that the most important thing in his body was being absorbed by a terrifying power.
Source energy. His Source energy was being absorbed by Eggy who was in Chu Feng's body. The absorption of a dead person's Source energy could not be felt, because they were dead. However, when a person's Source energy was being absorbed when they were alive, it was extremely painful. Even more painful than having their blood all sucked dry from their body.
After killing the Gong family member, Chu Feng collected all the Cosmos Sacks from everyone who was there. However, after some inspection, he extremely displeasedly curled his lips and said, "A bunch of poor bastards!"


MGA Capitulo 219  Gathering Area of Powerful People
The White-headed Eagle was flying in the clouds. With its speed, it wasn't hard for them to arrive at the Valley of Hundred Bends within three days.
Chu Feng sat on the White-headed Eagle, but he wasn't staying idle. He was doing some preparations. Preparations for entering the Valley of Hundred Bends.
The Heroic Hunt in the Valley of Hundred Bends was extremely famous in the Azure Province. The Valley of Hundred Bends was a very special place, being a sacred land of medicines. Not only were the large amounts of spiritual and Origin medicines within it, there were even many Profound medicines.
However, the Valley of Hundred Bends was usually closed off. It would only open once a year for the outstanding disciples from the Azure Province's various schools. They would enter the hunt, and as for how much resources they could get, it all depended on their abilities.
In short, the Valley of Hundred Bends did not belong to any power, but to the entire Azure Province. So, as long as the disciples from various schools had strength, they could enter.
But there was one thing. If someone wanted to enter the Valley of Hundred Bends to participate in the Heroic Hunt that happened once a year, it was a must to have sufficient strength, and they needed to register with their real name.
Chu Feng could not participate in the Heroic Hunt with the identity of Mr. Grey-cloak. So, he had to enter with the identity of Chu Feng. That identity only had the 2nd level of the Origin realm as his cultivation, so even he used all of his battle power, it would still be quite challenging for him to pass the Heroic Hunt exam. So, Chu Feng had to increase his cultivation.
In the past days, he grabbed quite a few belongings from others. To normal people, perhaps they were treasures but to Chu Feng, they weren't much because the only things that assisted his cultivation were only the twenty high-quality Profound medicine that the head of the Void School gave him. Only those had some effect towards him.
*hmm*
A single Profound medicine was refined and the strong Profound power quickly spread throughout his body. However, it couldn't do anything to Chu Feng's dantian. With a single gulp, it swallowed the burst of Profound power.
"These guys must have been born on the year of the wolf! You swallow spiritual energy with one gulp, you swallow Origin power with one gulp, and you still swallow Profound power with one gulp. Damn, what on earth can feed you guys full?"
Chu Feng felt quite helpless. Even though there were only eight Divine Lightning in his dantian, their appetite got bigger and bigger. That made him feel more and more pressure.
Only after Chu Feng refined the fifth high-quality Profound medicine did he feel some change happening to the Origin power in his body. After his cultivation increased by a single level, Chu Feng felt even more helpless.
How precious were Profound medicine? They were greatly beneficial towards powerful people in the Profound realm. But him, a person at a mere 2nd level of the Origin realm, needed to refine five of such treasures in order to have a breakthrough into the 3rd level of the Origin realm. That made him quite speechless.
But luckily, what came after was quite nice. After refining the fifteen other Profound medicine, Chu Feng felt that he was going have a breakthrough again. So, he swallowed everything that he had on him that would help his cultivation into his stomach all at once.
Finally, after nearly exhausting his stock, he successfully made another breakthrough and he entered the 4th level of the Origin realm.
"4th level of the Origin realm. It should be enough to participate in that Heroic Hunt right?"
After some calculations, with his current cultivation and the methods he grasped, it was not a problem for him to fight those at the 8th level of the Origin realm. If he also used the power of the golden-coloured lightning and raised his cultivation to the 5th level of the Origin realm, those at the 9th level of the Origin realm did not even need to be mentioned.
If Chu Feng used all his power and used all his abilities, it was still possible for him to fight a powerful person at the 1st level of the Profound realm.
From what he knew, if one did not receive an invitation, they were required to pass a series of exams in order to be qualified to participate in the Heroic Hunt. However, they still needed at least the power from the cultivation of the 1st level of the Profound realm in order to pass that. So, Chu Feng also felt the pressure. After all, he did not want to expose his other methods too early.
After hurrying for two days, finally, Chu Feng arrived near the Valley of Hundred Bends. To avoid any unnecessary troubles by riding the top-quality White-headed Eagle, he hiddenly landed in a certain area and walked towards the Valley of Hundred Bends.
The Valley of Hundred Bends was actually a huge primitive area. There were valleys, mountain ranges, forests, rivers, swamps, and it was extremely vast, but also extremely beautiful.
However, that beautiful scene in the Valley of Hundred Bends could only be seen for a few days every year. Of course, that treatment was only enjoyable for those who could actually enter the Valley of Hundred Bends.
"Quickly look there! Even a little child is here for the liveliness."
"That's true. Eh? Look carefully at his clothes that he is wearing. I don't recall seeing that before. He wouldn't be a disciple from a second-rate school would he?"
"Whatever, who cares about him? He's not afraid of losing face, so why do we need to mind?"
There was no need to conceal his identity by appearing at that place, so Chu Feng wore the clothing for the Azure Dragon School's core disciples. Something that he was helpless towards and could not be avoided were the mock from people.
Chu Feng already gotten used to that type of mock. In any big occasions when he met some disciples from some first-rate schools, he would always receive their mock. Besides, it was the Heroic Hunt where many excellent disciples from various schools gathered.
Chu Feng followed the two disciples from a first-rate school who mocked him before and entered the same examination location. When they entered, the two people always used gazes of disdain to stare at Chu Feng from start to finish.
However, when the three of them left the examination location, the gazes of the two completely changed. They were not longer gazes of disdain, but gazes of shock. Shock that was extremely complicated and hard to express.
As for why such change happened? That was because the two of them, who were disciples from a first-rate school and also had the cultivation of the 8th level of the Origin realm, both failed the exam.
As for Chu Feng, a disciple from a second-rate school who only had the cultivation of the 4th level of the Origin realm, passed, and he passed very effortlessly.
After that, Chu Feng arrived at a conclusion, and it was that the exam wasn't as hard as it was said to be. Of course, he neglected the fact that he was a monster.
After passing the exam, Chu Feng gained the qualifications to enter the Valley of Hundred Bends. After entering it, he first saw a huge, tall, and magnificent city.
The city was built within mountains and rivers and it was indeed very beautiful. Chu Feng spread out his Spirit power, and at the end, he got a surprising result.
There were a large number of powerful people gathered within the city. People in the Profound realm were uncountable, and there were also many people at the peak of the Profound realm. Indeed, many huge characters from the Azure Province gathered there as well as many peak geniuses from various schools. Not a single person was simple, so at that place, he needed to be careful and cautious. He was not allowed to have half a point of carelessness.


MGA Capitulo 220  Meeting of Enemies
The tall, big, and beautiful city wasn't actually that big, but it was extremely delicate. It was created on the peak of the mountain range, and surrounding it were huge waterfalls that went down the valleys
The sunlight shone through the mist and a seven-coloured rainbow bridge appeared. Cranes circled and passed above the rainbows and it was quite aesthetically pleasing. Looking over at that scene, it seemed just like a realm for saints.
No wonder people said that the scenery in the Valley of Hundred Bends was peerless in the world. At least, in Chu Feng's eyes, it was the most beautiful place that he had ever seen before.
Of course, the scene in front of him was only a corner of the Valley of Hundred Bends. It was truly only a corner because that place was only the outskirts of the Valley of Hundred Bends.
Although everyone who prepared to participate in the Heroic Hunt could temporarily rest there, the luxurious palaces could only be used by the greater characters from various powers. On the other hand, the disciples were waiting in a super-sized plaza that was located on the peak of a cliff.
Chu Feng spread his Spirit power out and he wanted to find the whereabouts of Gong Luyun. As he walked, Chu Feng was actually quite shocked because within the people who gathered there, other than himself, almost everyone were experts in the Profound realm. They were young geniuses of their generation.
In terms of real cultivation, Chu Feng truly wasn't much in the group of people because those people were true geniuses. Almost everyone grasped special methods, and if any one of them came out, Chu Feng would have quite some difficulty if he wanted to defeat them. As for those who could suppress Chu Feng? Innumerable.
However, the relationship of those people weren't too friendly. Most of them formed groups of three or five, but there were also groups with a large number of people. For example, the disciples from the Lingyun School, as well as the young generation from the Qilin Prince's Mansion.
Those two groups of people represented the two strongest powers in the Azure Province. They had the most number of people, so they would have the most number of elites. Every single power would show respect at a distance as they were deeply afraid of offending the endlessly proud people.
"Finally, I found you." Suddenly, two fists in Chu Feng's sleeve tightly clenched and killing intent instantly emerged into his eyes. He quickly walked towards an area in the plaza.
A large group of people gathered in that area. All of them surrounded a young person who were around twenty years old. There were males, and there were females. The females were beauties, but in between their eyebrows was proudness.
The appearances of the males were all different, but the strength they possessed was not ordinary. All of them were at the Profound realm and most of them came from first-rate schools.
But exactly because of that, when a rather handsome male wore the clothing of a second-rate school, he seemed quite off when he was in the group.
As for who that person was, naturally, it was the number one disciple in the Azure Dragon School, the son of the Black Tortoise City's lord who hidden instigated the Five Tiger Village, Gong Luyun.
Although disciples from second-rate schools should have been looked down upon by countless people there, Gong Luyun was not seen by any gazes like that. Instead, within the gazes of males, there was admiration. Within the gazes of females, there was adoration.
The group of people chatted and laughed together, and some people even praised Gong Luyun openedly. From that, the reason why Gong Luyun wasn't looked down was stated there.
"Brother Gong, I really have to congratulate you. You actually became the foster grandson of Mr. Lin Ran! In the future, you need to take care of us more." Some people said with admiration all over their face.
"Brother Li, you're too polite." Gong Luyun courteously smiled.
"Ahh, brother Gong, no need to be so modest. Who doesn't know that Mr. Lin Ran is a powerful person at the peak of the Profound realm? He is the head manager of the Lin clan in the Qilin Prince's Mansion and many people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion want to set up a relationship with that old man, yet they can't."
"But today, he recognized you as his foster grandson. This would arouse the admiration of quite a few people." Another male with a more rougher face chuckled and said.
"What use does admiration have? Mr. Lin Ran recognized Luyun as his foster grandson because his has quite good eyes. Brother Luyun is young but he is already at the 2nd level of the Profound realm. His battle prowess is not ordinary and he can defeat the strong as the weak. Even those at the 3rd level of the Profound realm cannot defeat him, and his future achievements are simply unmeasurable." An alluring female went close to Gong Luyun.
"That's right. Brother Gong is a true genius and we truly admire you from the bottom of our hearts. However, with his talent, it is quite undeserved for brother Gong to enter the Azure Dragon School." Another female went close to him as well.
"Yeah yeah. I heard that there was a brat who did not have eyes in the Azure Dragon School and he dared to challenge brother Gong. Something about taking your life after one year. Ahh, I really don't know where that brat got his confidence from."
"Is it true or false? There's actually something like that? Brother Gong, was what he said true?"
"HoThe world is huge, so there are all sorts of people in it. When facing a person like him, I, Gong Luyun, feel that it is not worthy for me to pay attention to him. However, he was so aggressive that I had to accept his arranged battle. He is but a little minion, so no need to worry everyone." Gong Luyun smiled and waved his hand.
"So that means it's true! Brother Gong, who is that brat called? If you don't feel well to attack those from the same school, I'll give a lesson to him for you."
"Yeah, he came from the same school yet he dares to be disrespectful to the number one disciple. These kinds of people truly aren't educated and they should get a beating." After knowing that such a thing happened, everyone curiously asked more about it.
"Gong Luyun, you're living comfortably huh?" Just at that time, a voice suddenly rang out into the crowd.
As they looked towards the origin of the voice, everyone couldn't help but be taken aback because they discovered, from nearby, a young man stood there. He was indeed a young man, and from his face, he did not seem to be over fifteen years old.
Although the Heroic Hunt was a prospering period for the Azure Province's young generation, most of them were young adults and when such a tender young man appeared in that place, it made everyone quite shocked.
Especially when the young man's clothing was exactly the same as Gong Luyun, being also from the Azure Dragon School. That made people even more shocked. They were also quite curious who he was.
"Even you entered here?" Gong Luyun tightly frowned and surprise appeared in his gaze. Naturally, he recognized who the young man in front of him was. It was Chu Feng who arranged a fight after one year.
When Gong Luyun discovered that Chu Feng's cultivation became the 4th level of the Origin realm, the bit of surprise in his gaze became more serious.
"If even a foster grandson like you can enter, why can't I? Gong Luyun, I came here for no other reason but to remind you. After entering this Valley of Hundred Bends, you better be careful. Careful as after you finish all your evil deeds, you receive retribution." After speaking those words, Chu Feng waved his big sleeve, then turned around and left.
"Brother Gong, who is that person? Why were his words so unpleasant?" Seeing that, everyone quickly questioned.
"Didn't you just ask who the brat who arranged a battle with me was?" Gong Luyun lightly smiled and said.
"It wouldn't be him right? " Everyone was greatly shocked.
"That's right. He's that bastard brat." When Gong Luyun spoke those words, he was gnashing his teeth and a cold glare appeared in his gaze.


MGA Capitulo 221  Falling into a Trap
"He's that brat who doesn't have eyes?" After hearing those words, the surrounding people expressed a bit of shock.
"No wonder he dared to so arrogantly challenge brother Gong. If he is able to mix into the Heroic Hunt with the cultivation of the 4th level of the Origin realm, it seems that this boy still has a bit of skill." But some people also felt that Chu Feng was indeed not simple.
"Hmph." When he heard that someone approved of Chu Feng, Gong Luyun coldly snorted and obvious dissatisfaction appeared on his face.
"Luyun, since this brat dares to come here to challenge you, he is simply looking to walk onto his road of death. I'll help you track him, and after he enters the Valley of Hundred Bends, I'll help you finish off this brat." Seeing that, the alluring female pulled Gong Luyun to the side and said in a low voice.
"Sister Wang is right. He can come in, but he will not come out." Just at that time, the group of people gathered together and some killing intent emerged onto their faces.
"This isn't too good right?" When he saw that, Gong Luyun hesitated a bit, but he did not refuse.
"Brother Gong. When people like him fight with you, you only need one strike to make him disappear like a strand of smoke. Killing him is only a matter of time."
"However, these kinds of people are like dogs. If you don't slaughter him, perhaps he would jump out and bite you. So, do not be too kind towards people like him and it's best to finish him off earlier." Seeing that Gong Luyun had some hesitation, some people started to urge him one after the other.
"Then sorry to trouble all of you. I, Gong Luyun, will remember everyone's loyalty and I will certainly repay all of you in the future." Some people were on friendly terms with Gong Luyun so he didn't push it away anymore. He only clasped his hands together towards the crowd with a touched face.
"Just the work of raising a hand!" After Gong Luyun expressed that, the group of people were incomparably happy. After all, from what they saw, even if Chu Feng had talent, he was only a little character. It was simply too easy for them to kill Chu Feng.
However, if they killed Chu Feng, their relationship with Gong Luyun could be advanced to another stage. That brought along quite a few benefits so naturally, they did not shrink away from it and they wanted to finish off the trouble in Gong Luyun's place.
The Heroic Hunt was quite special. Many hunts started in the morning, but this Heroic Hunt was fixed to start when the sun came down.
After almost a day of long waiting, the sun finally descended from the tall skies down to the west mountains, and the grand occasion that happened once a year in the Azure Province, the Heroic Hunt, was finally going to start.
There were many people who joined the Heroic Hunt and there were at least several thousand people. However, after that number of people entered deep into the Valley of Hundred Bends, they disappeared like a stone thrown into an ocean because the Valley of Hundred Bends was simply that vast.
So, if someone had ill intents towards a certain person, they had to tail that person in the instant they entered the Valley of Hundred Bends. Otherwise, it was like fishing a needle in an ocean if they wanted to find a person in the Valley of Hundred Bends.
Coincidentally, behind Chu Feng were a group of people who were exactly like that. There were roughly twenty people in that group and many of them were at the 1st level of the Profound realm. Several people within the group were even at the 2nd level of the Profound realm. Some people in that group even had Spirit power, so they could lock onto Chu Feng but not expose themselves.
But all of that was useless. Chu Feng already discovered them when they thought that they were tailing him undetectably and were waiting for the time to finish him off. No matter how better their concealment was, they had no way of escaping Chu Feng's Grey-cloak World Spiritist's detection power.
Actually, not only did Chu Feng discover Gong Luyun and the others who were in the young generation, he also discovered some people in the old generation. Those old people secretly followed Gong Luyun and the others. They were undoubtedly there to hiddenly protect Gong Luyun and the others to prevent them from meeting any unnecessary troubles.
Chu Feng was not afraid when he faced that. Rather, everything was within his expectations. The reason why he showed himself to greet Gong Luyun after he discovered where his whereabouts were was because he wanted Gong Luyun to have killing intent towards him. So, that way, Gong Luyun would follow him to a more desolate location before attacking him.
The reason why Chu Feng participated in the Heroic Hunt was not for the Profound medicine. It was to kill Gong Luyun. So, if he wanted to find a place where he would not be disturbed in order to kill Gong Luyun, he had to lead Gong Luyun and the others to a place where he himself felt satisfied, and not where Gong Luyun, who was secret tailing him, felt satisfied.
*whoosh* Feeling that the time was almost right, a flash appeared under Chu Feng's feet and he used the Imperial Sky Technique. Instantly, his speed increased by several times and after a blink, he disappeared from the palms of Gong Luyun and the others.
"Dammit. This brat's speed is too quick and I lost him." Suddenly, the alluring female stopped her steps forward and she lightly frowned.
"Really? Sister Wang, you're a World Spiritist! You lost that damn brat?" Everyone understood what happened after hearing those words.
"Is it possible that we were discovered by him?" Someone suggested that suspicion.
"That's possible. After all, he also has Spirit power and he was accepted as the final disciple by my Azure Dragon School's Zhuge Liuyun. However, I never would have thought that he could discover that sister Wang was following him." Gong Luyun gravely said.
"Now what?" Someone raised a question.
"What else? The person is lost, and in addition, when the sky goes dark, it would be too difficult to try and find him. What we should do now is to go deeper in to find Profound medicine." Someone suggested.
"Mm. It seems that we can only do that." Although they were extremely unwilling to, at that moment, they agreed to break up.
"Brother Gong, don't worry. If that brat meets me, Fu Xiaojie, I will certainly help you finish him off." A male who had a rather rough appearance clasped his hands towards Gong Luyun.
"Thank you brother Fu."
Gong Luyun smiled, but he could not conceal his disappointment. After knowing Chu Feng's extraordinariness, he became more and more uneasy.
Especially after meeting him again. He felt that he could absolutely not give Chu Feng any more time to continue developing. Or else, when the day of the arranged battle arrived, the person who would need to suicide would be himself.
"Everyone, I will take my leave now." The rough-looking male who called himself as Fu Xiaojie clasped his hands again, then hurriedly rushed deeper in.
"Everyone, I, Gong Luyun, have remembered all your good intentions. The Valley of Hundred Bends has ample resources, and since everyone came here, you must have good harvests. Don't waste anymore time here and let us scatter." Even though he was disappointed, Gong Luyun still smiled towards everyone to express his gratitude.
*whoosh* However, just at that time, a strong wind suddenly lifted up and a black silhouette abruptly came flying over. With lightning speed, it rushed out from the forest and at the end, it landed next to Gong Luyun and the others.
"What's this?" Everyone was surprised at that change and they even thought that it was a Monstrous Beast attacking. So, they quickly backed away to the side.
However, when they cast their gazes at the black silhouette, not a single person's face did not change greatly as fear emerged onto their faces.
That black silhouette was not a Monstrous Beast. It was a person, and it was even a person they were familiar with. It was Fu Xiaojie who just left first.
But at that instant, Fu Xiaojie's brain already left his neck. There were several big, bloody holes dug out from his chest and all of the organs in his body were no longer there. As for his brain, it was stuffed into the bloody holes in his chest. His death was abnormally horrifying.


MGA Capitulo 222  Gold-Armored Old Man
"What happened? Who did this?"
Fu Xiaojie's death was too terrifying. Even though the people who were on scene were ruthless, and even though every single person had touched blood before and every single person had life debts that they carried on their backs, when they saw that scene, they would tremble even though it wasn't cold and chills would go down their spines.
Fu Xiaojie was a person at the 1st level of the Profound realm. Who could kill him in such a short period of time with such cruel methods? There wasn't even any cry of pain, so how scary would the person who killed him be?
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
Just at that time, three aged figures rushed out from the forest behind the crowd. They were people from the old generation who hiddenly protected the young generation group.
Since the three of them heard a cry of surprise earlier, they determined that something must have happened. When they saw that scene, they also tightly frowned and their faces changed greatly.
"Lord elders, it's great that you've come! There are dangers in this Valley of Hundred Bends." After seeing the three old people, Gong Luyun and the others quickly went close to them.
Although the three old people came from different schools, all of them had the cultivation of the 5th level of the Profound realm. That kind of strength was not weak within the Azure Province. So, after they appeared, the terrified core disciples were as though they saw their savior.
"What kind of person dares to do this type of thing?" One of the elders yelled his throat out from the direction that Fu Xiaojie flew out from.
*rustle rustle rustle* Immediately after he spoke, stepping sounds gradually rang out. A person was slowly nearing from the dusky forest.
In that instant, everyone's heart were raised to their throats. Gong Luyun and the others stood behind the three elders and without moving their eyes away, they stared forward because they knew that the culprit who killed Fu Xiaojie so cruelly was going to appear.
Under the gazes of the crowd, Chu Feng slowly walked out from the forest. However, the current him already changed his clothes. He put the World Spirit Grey-cloak on himself and he borrowed Eggy's power as he emitted the might of a powerful person in the Profound realm.
It was no longer the petty young man Chu Feng. After a short period of time, he became the great character whose name spread throughout the Azure Province, Mr. Grey-cloak.
"You..You are?!"
After seeing Chu Feng, not to mention the disciples, even the three elders' expression changed greatly because all of them simultaneously thought of the mysterious grey-cloaked person who slaughtered the Shangguan from an earlier period of time, Mr. Grey-cloak.
"Senior, I wonder if you are Mr. Grey-cloak?" One of the elders went up to Chu Feng and paid his respects.
*boom* Without even speaking, Chu Feng raised his hand and palmed. When that palm was thrown out, it sent out the power of three hundred thousand catties. As the old person at the 5th level of the Profound realm was caught off guard, he instantly became a pool of blood and exploded in front of the crowd.
*boom* Another palm went out as Chu Feng palmed again. Similarly, another person became a pool of blood and died violently.
"Senior, we have no grievances nor hatred between us, so why do you attack?"
"Ahh!" Another person loudly yelled, and before even finishing speaking, he exploded from Chu Feng's palm.
From then on, Chu Feng threw out several more palms and every single palm created absolute power. There would always be a person who died from it.
There was no one there who could stop him. They even had no way of dodging as they looked at themselves being split into multiple pieces, and they could not even keep a complete corpse.
"Run!!" After seeing the blood spattered all over their bodies, finally, someone reacted to it, spun around, and wanted to escape.
"Hmph." But how could Chu Feng give them a chance to escape? He turned his hand in the air and grabbed. Strong suction power spread out, like a formless cage, as it bound the disciple who wanted to escape earlier. In an instant, he was pulled towards Chu Feng's palm.
"Ahh~~~~~" This time, he was not directly hit into a pool of blood. He was only forcibly being absorbed by Chu Feng's power that came out from his palm. The pain of his flesh being condensed bit by bit made him endlessly cry out in miserableness as he unceasingly wailed.
"You demon! I'll kill you!" At that moment, from the three elders, only one still survived and the person who was forcibly being refined by Chu Feng was a disciple from his own school.
That made him furious. Not only did he not escape, he even started an extremely strong attack. The strong Profound power was like the tide as it surged out from his body and it condensed into a huge chariot in front of him.
That chariot was as though it pressed down on void. It made rumbling noises and the ground trembled. Flames lit up in the air from friction. The strong might seemed like it could crush everything, and even the mountains could not stop the collision.
However, such a strong martial skill, the full powered strike of a person at the 5th level of the Profound realm, was not even put into Chu Feng's eyes. With the wave of his arm, six Spirit Formations were condensed out and they surrounded from all directions and enveloped the chariot within them.
The Spirit Formations quickly shrunk and the strong pressure finally pressed the Profound power chariot, which had extremely strong might, into dust as it disappeared in the air.
"Heavens, is this guy even a person?"
"This is the power of a Grey-cloak World Spiritist?" As they faced that scene, almost everyone who was there were stupefied because they personally experienced the strength of Mr. Grey-cloak.
*whoosh* But as everyone were staring blankly at that, a figure who was on the ground suddenly leaped out and escaped towards the road that they came from.
Seeing that, Chu Feng's expression changed greatly as well because the person who was escaping was none other than the person who he wanted to kill the most, Gong Luyun.
"A group of trash wants to take my life? All of you should die."
Chu Feng was enraged. He no longer killed them off one by one but with a thought, his entire body became lightning. As the lightning surged, it lit the dark forest into day.
Under the shine of the white light, the boundless lightning finally became a huge lightning python. With a single gulp, it swallowed everyone who still survived. Even the old person who was at the 5th level of the Profound realm was not let off.
After completely burning everyone who was there all at once, Chu Feng used the Imperial Sky Technique and chased after Gong Luyun with extreme speed.
However, after chasing for several miles, Chu Feng's face suddenly changed and he tightly frowned. He discovered that Gong Luyun who used all his power up to escape stopped running and he stood where he was.
At the same time, a person appeared next to Gong Luyun. Obviously, that person was a cultivator. However, Chu Feng could not detect what stage of cultivation he was at.
So, he was clearly a powerful person. A powerful person who Gong Luyun believed could protect him or else he would not have stopped escaping and waited there for Chu Feng.
*whoosh*
As for Chu Feng, he did not stop moving and he continued chasing. Finally, he arrived at the place where Gong Luyun stopped at. At that instant, the figure of an old man also appeared within Chu Feng's line of sight.
That old man had hair as white as snow, and a gaze that was like a torch. He wore golden-coloured armor, and on the chest area of that armor, there was even a domineering Qilin engraved on it.
The current him stood where he was with both of his hands behind his back. He was lightly smiling at Chu Feng, and the slightly squinting gaze was endlessly assessing Chu Feng. Behind him was Gong Luyun who hid there with terror all over his face.


MGA Capitulo 223  The Might of Secret Skills
"I am head manager Lin Ran from the Qilin Prince's Mansion."
"Although I don't know how Luyun and the others offended you, Mr. Grey-cloak, I do hope that you, a person of high status, can forgive the offenses by this person of low status and spare him once."
The old man who named himself as Lin Ran kindly smiled at Chu Feng. As he spoke, he was not humble nor arrogant and he already recognized that the person in front of him was Mr. Grey-cloak who slaughtered the Shangguan family.
When that old man appeared, Chu Feng couldn't help but tightly frown because even he had heard of the name of Lin Ran. He was one of the most powerful people in the Qilin Prince's Mansion, being an expert at the peak of the Profound realm and he was one of the most famous great characters in the entire Azure Province.
Chu Feng did not know why such a character recognized Gong Luyun as his foster grandson and loved and protected him so much, but he knew if Lin Ran was truly going to protect Gong Luyun, this time, it would be difficult for him to even touch Gong Luyun anymore.
However, when he saw the hated enemy who exterminated his family, Chu Feng's fury already won over his reasoning so how could he think about it so much? He did not care about Lin Ran and he raised his palm. Strong Profound power became an invisible huge wave as it slammed towards Lin Ran and Gong Luyun.
The boundless Profound power caused devastation in the air. The strong might shook the nearby trees as if a peak of a mountain was descending from the skies and forcing itself over.
"It seems like Mr. Grey-cloak is unwilling to give me, Lin Ran, face."
But as he faced Chu Feng's palm, Lin Ran only disappointedly shook his head. Following that, a cold glare flashed into his gaze and with a simple flick from his big sleeve, Profound power that was several times stronger than Chu Feng's emanated out and it easily dissolved Chu Feng's palm attack.
After dissolving Chu Feng's strike, Lin Ran did not stop. He lightly pointed at Chu Feng and the Profound power in front of him quickly condensed. They formed into thousands and thousands of arrows that were like rain and explosively shot towards Chu Feng.
It was not a martial skill. When one had complete control over their Profound power, they could freely use Profound power to condense it into actual substances. Originally, it was something that only those at the Heaven realm could do, but some people could also do it if they were at the peak of the Profound realm.
"8th level of the Profound realm."
At that instant, Chu Feng was shocked. Although the 8th level of the Profound realm wasn't truly the peak of the Profound realm, with Chu Feng's current cultivation of the 1st level of the Profound realm, he could really not fight against that person.
*hmm* However, he had no way out. So, with a thought, he condensed several grey-coloured Spirit Formations in front of him to block Lin Ran's attacks.
*boom boom boom boom* But Chu Feng's indestructible Spirit Formation instantly collapsed under Lin Ran's casual attacks. It was as weak as tofu, and it could simply not even take a single strike.
"Chu Feng, quickly escape! The distance in strength is too big and you cannot defeat him!" Eggy's voice rang out in Chu Feng's brain.
However, how could Chu Feng who was filled with bloodlust back away? With a flash under his feet, he was able to use the Imperial Sky Technique however he wished to, and he dodged Lin Ran's attacks with light-like speed.
*waaa* Closely following that, Chu Feng flicked his finger at Lin Ran. The roar of a fierce tiger also came along with it.
The White Tiger Slaughtering Technique. The Secret Skill had already been used by Chu Feng. Although it was only a faint, white-coloured gas, the might it gave out was enough to shake the world at that place.
"This might..It's a Secret Skill?!"
As he faced Chu Feng's White Tiger Slaughtering Technique, Lin Ran's expression changed greatly, but he was not afraid. He was excited. When he faced the Secret Skill which was hard to find in the world, he was endlessly excited.
*whoosh*
Seeming to know the strength of the Secret Skill, or possibly feeling the power of the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique, Lin Ran who was at the 8th level of the Profound realm did not forcefully take Chu Feng's attack head-on. With his big hand, he grabbed Gong Luyun's shoulder and as his body floated, he disappeared and he dodged it.
*rumble rumble* Almost at the same time that Lin Ran and Gong Luyun dodged, the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique landed on the place where Lin Ran was previously.
Although it seemed to be insignificant gas, when it collided with the ground, it instantly became a domineering stream of gas. It destroyed the land and made it into a mess as a finger-wide deep hole extended down. No one knew how many meters it continued for.
"Haha, what a great Secret Skill! Truly, ‘it cannot be found after searching the entire world, but getting it did not require any work'." Just at that time, Lin Ran and Gong Luyun appeared nearby. As he looked at the might caused by the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique, Lin Ran insanely laughed.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh whoosh whoosh* Almost at the same time that the two of them appeared, Chu Feng's Spirit power already locked onto their position. He flicked his fingers at the same time and five white-coloured gases were madly shooting through the air. As it went over from multiple locations, he attacked again.
*roar* If it was said that a single row of gas was like a single claw from a white tiger, the five gases would be like a white tiger's paw.
As the sharp claws slammed out, not only were the five white-coloured gases there hiddenly, one could even see a huge paw of a fierce tiger appearing in the air as it flew towards the two people.
That might was several times stronger than before. Even the ground started to violently tremble and countless cracks appeared. The nearby trees also started to violently sway and some even snapped into two as the fragments they flew away.
"Such strong might! Haha, I like it!"
That might already stupefied Gong Luyun from fear, but Lin Ran got even more and more insane. This time, he did not immediately dodge. He only waved his big sleeve, and kept on swirling it. He wanted to try and block it.
"I'll let you experience my Qilin Prince's Mansion's Qilin Shield!"
As his big sleeve waved around, layers of Profound power also appeared and it became a huge shield in front of him.
That shield was circle-shaped and it had the diameter of ten meters. It seemed to be made out of steel, but it was formed by Profound power. Around the shield were sharp teeth, and in the middle of the shield was a head of a Qilin which had its teeth showing.
After the shield appeared, it started to continue swirling and as it swirled, it caused some hurricanes. Not only was it an indestructible shield, it was also an invincible sharp weapon.
It was a rank 6 defense martial skill. When it was in Lin Ran's hands, it displayed the might that it should have and it was currently forcing the claws of the white tiger back. At that moment, they were going to collide.
In that instant, no matter if it was Chu Feng or Lin Ran, both of their gazes were tightly locked on the Qilin Shield as well as the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique. No matter if it was Chu Feng or Lin Ran, they wanted to experiment which one was stronger and which one was weaker between the Secret Skill and the martial skill.
*boom* Finally, the two of them collided together however, the result was both expected, yet also unexpected. In front of the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique, the strong Qilin Shield did not even remain there for half a second. Instantly, it shattered and the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique was not damaged at all as it continued attacking Lin Ran and Gong Luyun.
*whoosh* At that instant, even Lin Ran's face could not remain calm. As he faced such a powerful White Tiger Slaughtering Technique, he had no choice but to quickly dodge and he did not dare to continue holding it back.
*rumble rumble rumble* This time, when the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique collided with the ground, it formed a huge palm mark. It was not a simple palm mark. It was the palm of a tiger, the paw of a tiger.
The huge paw mark had the diameter of ten meters and it deeply imprinted itself on the ground. However, the deep paw mark was not all. Five small yet deep holes continued extending and the end of them could not be seen.


MGA Capitulo 224  Resisting the Air to Walk
"The might of Secret Skills are indeed peerless in the world. Mr. Grey-cloak, I wonder if you can tell me where you found this Secret Skill?"
This time, Lin Ran appeared behind Chu Feng and he waved his big sleeve. Another Qilin Shield was condensed out and with that terrifying might, it pressed towards Chu Feng from behind.
It had to be said that Lin Ran's speed was too quick. The speed that he condensed a martial skill out surpassed his imagination, and even with Chu Feng's current Spirit power, he couldn't even match his pace.
"Dammit."
As he faced such a strong Qilin Shield, Chu Feng could only fight against it with the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique. However, when he wanted to link with the White Tiger in his body and when he wanted to use the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique again, he discovered that the White Tiger in his awareness disappeared.
"What is happening?" His strongest method, the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique, was currently unable to be used. That made Chu Feng panic as he quickly dodged.
However, just after Chu Feng dodged, the Qilin Shield also abruptly changed directions and pressed towards Chu Feng again. This time, its speed was even quicker.
*whoosh* Under that kind of situation, Chu Feng did not dare to have any bit of hesitation anymore. He used the Imperial Sky Technique to the extreme and rushed deeper into the Valley of Hundred Bends.
"Luyun, you wait here." Seeing that, after telling Gong Luyun that, Lin Ran chased after Chu Feng and he loudly said, "Mr. Grey-cloak, where's the need to leave so quickly? Why not tell me about that Secret Skill?"
"Dammit, what is happening? Why can't I use my Secret Skill?"
Chu Feng was quite anxious. The only thing that Lin Ran was fearful towards was his White Tiger Slaughtering Technique. However, at that moment, he could not use it. That made Chu Feng lose the only thing that made him qualified to fight against Lin Ran.
"Idiot. Secret Skills are extremely special and they have life. They aren't controllable by Profound power. Although your cultivation has been raised to the Profound realm after borrowing my power, in reality, you are still in the Origin realm."
"So, it would not let you abuse its power. Right now, you can only use the Secret Skill to this degree and this is the limit. I'm afraid that for today, it will be impossible for you to use the Secret Skill again." Eggy solemnly reminded.
"So there's actually something like this? Dammit." After knowing the truth, Chu Feng was both angered and annoyed. His hated enemy was so close, but not only did he have no way of killing him, he was even forced to escape. That truly forced him to hold his grievances back.
However, he could not do anything about it. Who told him to have insufficient strength? If he didn't rely on Eggy's power and only used with his own cultivation, not to mention fighting Lin Ran, even Gong Luyun could force him to his current state.
"Chu Feng, this isn't going to work if this goes on. Let me control your body."
Chu Feng used the Imperial Sky Technique to the extreme, but the difference in speed between him and Lin Ran was currently being pulled closer. Lin Ran was too strong. In front of such cultivation, Chu Feng was truly too weak, and in that situation, Eggy wanted to jump in.
"No! I won't let you be injured again because of helping me." When Eggy used the power of Asura, her spirit almost got extinguished so Chu Feng immediately refused.
"You idiot, I won't work my life out as much as before. Quickly give me your body, or else you will die, and I won't live as well." Eggy refuted.
"No. From now on, it will be my turn to protect you. Even if I die, I will die in front of you." Chu Feng was incomparably stubborn, and after speaking, the light under his feet became even more bright and his speed increased even more.
"Mr. Grey-cloak, it's best if you tell me the origin of the Secret Skill before leaving." Seeing that, Lin Ran was not hurried at all. He changed his technique and dissolved the powerful Qilin Shield.
He then turned his hand over and grabbed. Extremely cold gas appeared and the cold air quickly spread everywhere. All the flowers and grasses that it passed were all frozen solid. Even the tall and big trees had a layer of frost on it and it lost its life.
"This aura..It's a rank 6 martial skill!" Chu Feng turned his head to look and he couldn't help but be frightened.
Behind him, vast cold air engulfed everything. It was like an invisible monster and with bone-piercing cold air, it was heading towards Chu Feng to swallow him whole. From the pressure, Chu Feng could feel that it was undoubtedly a rank 6 martial skill or else even Lin Ran could not create an attack with such might.
At that instant, Chu Feng could only activate the golden-coloured lightning in his blood and he raised his cultivation to the 2nd level of the Profound realm from the 1st level of the Profound realm. Then, he put all his power into the Imperial Sky Technique to try to escape once again.
But it was in vain as the area of the cold air was extremely big and its speed was extremely fast. As Lin Ran neared, the cold gas also quickly neared Chu Feng. In that situation, Chu Feng was quickly going to be engulfed by it.
"Give up. It is impossible for you to escape from my Cold Ice Atmosphere." Lin Ran revealed his teeth and showed a face that displayed that he was going to get what he wanted to get.
"Dammit! Will I, Chu Feng, be defeated here?"
"No. I will not be defeated. I still haven't taken revenge. I still haven't found my family. How can I possibly die here and be defeated by such a person? Wouldn't I shame my family?"
Chu Feng yelled in his heart and at the same time, the Profound power in his body revolved and quickly went along special meridians. He was making a breakthrough. A type of breakthrough that he attempted many times, but never succeeded. It was the true obscurity of the Imperial Sky Technique.
"Let me see where you're going to escape to!" Lin Ran neared once again and the cold air followed him. From behind, it surrounded Chu Feng and it also sealed his the path forward. Chu Feng was completely surrounded and he could go nowhere.
*bang* Just at that time, Chu Feng suddenly tapped the ground with his legs. Like an arrow leaving the bow, his entire body shot up into the sky.
"Hmph. You think that you can escape like that? Unless you can fly, you will be engulfed by my cold air."
As he saw Chu Feng leap into the sky, Lin Ran only sneered and without hurry, he controlled the cold air to form a huge net underneath. He waited for Chu Feng to fall back down so he could catch Chu Feng completely.
*ta ta ta*
But then, the magical scene happened. When Chu Feng's legs were in the air, he kept on walking. After every step, his entire body would rise a bit more.
After walking for a while, not only did he not fall back down, he even went higher and higher. The distance between him and the ground was already a hundred meters. How was that even a simple leap into the sky? He walked on air. He resisted the air and walked.
"Lin Ran, I will take your life when we meet next time!" Chu Feng turned his head around and left those words behind with an aged voice before walking on air and quickly heading towards the distant horizon.
The current Lin Ran was already at a loss on the ground. He blankly stared at the night sky which contained bright stars as well as the body that was going further and further away. On his aged face was shock, and only after a good while did he slowly come to his senses as he said quietly, "He..He really can fly!"


MGA Capitulo 225  Temple Hall in the Clouds
Within a certain forest in the Valley of Hundred Bends, a layer of ice condensed on the trees and grasses. Cold air lingered around and it filled the area.
Lin Ran was still standing in the middle of it while raising his head to look at the starry night. His chest rose up and down and his eyes were filled with astonishment. Only after a good while did he slowly calm down.
"He clearly isn't in the Heaven realm yet he can resist the air and walk? Did he grasp the Imperial Sky Sage's unique skill?"
Lin Ran tightly frowned but he did not continue chasing. He only turned around and went back. It wasn't that he didn't want to chase, since after seeing all of Chu Feng's methods, he hated himself for not taking everything that Chu Feng had for himself but sadly, he truly could not do anything about Chu Feng who could walk on air.
Lin Ran returned to where Gong Luyun was. He discovered that the paw marks as well as the huge claw holes were still there. However, compared to before when he left, change happened. Six small water pillars were currently spraying out from the claw holes.
"A single finger contained so much power! These tunnels link to the underground water streams!" Lin Ran tightly frowned and shock filled his gaze.
"Grandfather, did that person really use a legendary Secret Skill?" Seeing that, Gong Luyun went over to ask because he still remembered the terrifying might that Chu Feng displayed earlier.
"Although I haven't personally seen it, I have researched Secret Skills. No matter if you look at it in terms of the might, or the power, what Mr. Grey-cloak used what undoubtedly a Secret Skill."
"Also, not only did that person grasp a Secret skill, he also grasped a very powerful bodily martial skill." Lin Ran's face was full of admiration when he remembered the scene in which Chu Feng walked on air.
Originally, he thought that with his high cultivation, he could have completely suppressed Chu Feng, but it was in vain as the methods Chu Feng grasped were mysterious to the extreme. It truly made his heart itch and it was quite intolerable.
"He grasped other methods? What kind of methods?" Gong Luyun expressed curiosity.
"No need to ask about that. After all, those are the methods of other people. If, in the future, I can get a Secret Skill, I will certainly pass it down to you."
"Luyun, although your talent is not bad, it isn't the best in the continent of the Nine Provinces. When you do things, you must do them to a certain level. That Mr. Grey-cloak would not attack you for no cause or reason. He must have some sort of relationship with Chu Feng, so it's better if you be more careful in the future." Lin Ran reminded.
"That mysterious Mr. Grey-cloak is related to Chu Feng?" He felt that it was quite strange when he thought that Mr. Grey-cloak who grasped so many special methods was related to Chu Feng. Gong Luyun had no way of accepting it.
"Although it's just a guess, it is extremely possible. Even I will find it hard to catch Mr. Grey-cloak if he snuck into this place, and even if I report back to the Prince's Mansion, I'm sure that they can't do anything about him."
"According to the rules, with my status, although I can protect all of you as you come in, I cannot stay for a long time. To avoid anymore attacks on you, it's best for you to abandon this hunt." Lin Ran said.
"Grandfather, this" After hearing those words, Gong Luyun's face greatly changed.
"No this or that. Is you little life important, or is this tiny bit of Profound medicine important? Do you want to become the same as your dog-like friends and become a heap of broken flesh and pool of blood?"
Lin Ran sharply yelled, and then added, "With me here, are you afraid that you won't have any cultivating resources? Don't worry. I have already applied towards the Mansion's lord to let you join my Qilin Prince's Mansion. At that time, I can pass all my abilities down to you."
"Thank you grandfather for your benevolence and kindness." After hearing those words, Gong Luyun went from misery to happiness, and his happiness was quite unexpected. The Qilin Prince's Mansion was the true overlord of the Azure Province!
"Go return, I'll hiddenly protect you." Lin Ran smiled and waved his hand. He was quite kind and his gaze was full of love.
Of course Gong Luyun did not dare to refute. With a happy mood, he went back onto the road that he came from. He who had Lin Ran hiddenly protecting him did not have a single trace of worry.
After Gong Luyun went far away, Lin Ran took out a letter from his chest pocket. After opening the letter, there were a few rows of graceful characters.
"Lord Lin Ran, do you remember a female who saved your life twenty years ago outside of the Black Tortoise City, and also lost her chastity to you?"
"Although I am currently the wife of the Black Tortoise City's lord, Luyun is the child between you and me. He is not the son of Gong Changshan. He is your child."
"Originally I didn't want to mention this matter to you, because after all, to you, a female like me is not even worth mentioning. However, at the end, Luyun is your child."
"Gong Changshan is too stubborn and he had to send Luyun to the second-rate school, the Azure Dragon School, to cultivate and he wasted Luyun's good talent for nothing. I hope that you, lord, can see Luyun as your own flesh and blood to bring Luyun away from the Azure Dragon School and to give him a better future."
After reading it, Lin Ran reluctantly folded the letter back. He did not put it in his Cosmos Sack, but back into his chest pocket and reminiscently said,
"I've searched for you for twenty years, but I never would have thought that you gave me such a surprise in addition to finding you. Don't worry, I won't let our son be someone who will not be known."
As Lin Ran thought about his own lover, Chu Feng was still walking in the air. At that moment, he already arrived in the clouds and he was running within them. He was like a dragon, going up, going down, and endlessly turning over.
"Haha, this is the feeling of walking on the air! It's too refreshing!"
Chu Feng was incomparably joyful. Although it wasn't the first time that he flew into the air, when compared to sitting on the White-headed Eagle, clearly, it was quite a bit better when he himself went towards the horizon as he wished.
"Mm? What's that?" Suddenly, borrowing the light from the moon, Chu Feng discovered a mountain peak, and that mountain peak did not enter the clouds.
Also, on the summit of the mountain peak, Chu Feng saw light. Vaguely, it seemed like a building, and after nearing, indeed, there was a temple hall. Someone lived there.
Chu Feng couldn't avoid being shocked because he discovered that the mountain peak was abnormally steep. It simply rose up perfectly straight like a ladder to the heavens.
That shape. That height. Without a certain cultivation, it would be very difficult to climb to that place, let alone the temple hall built on the summit of the mountain peak.
After all, the Valley of Hundred Bends was a forbidden land. Every year, it would only be opened for a bit over a dozen days. After that, no one was allowed to enter, so who would build a temple hall in that place?


MGA Capitulo 226  Mysterious Expert
"Strange. What kind of person would build a temple hall in this place?"
"This is a forbidden land, so would there really be a person who lives here for long periods of times? Or perhaps it is just a temporary place for resting?"
"But didn't the elders from various schools not permit anyone from going too deep into the Valley of Hundred Bends? This is already quite deep, so normally, there shouldn't be anyone here." As he looked at the fine built temple hall on the far mountain peak, Chu Feng endlessly guessed.
Finally, to satisfy his curiosity in his heart, he concealed himself in the clouds and extended his Spirit power to the extreme as he carefully went forward and he wanted to investigate it to the end.
"This is"
But before even going near the mountain peak, Chu Feng's pupils largened and shock emerged onto his face of curiosity in an instant.
"What a powerful hidden Spirit Formation. The power of this Spirit Formation is far above my grey-coloured Spirit Formation."
Chu Feng discovered a hidden Spirit Formation that was outside of the mountain peak. It was a Spirit Formation mechanism. After touching it, no harm would be done but it would attract the attention of the person who laid it.
That meant something. The master in this place was most likely a World Spiritist, and the most important part was that from the feeling from the Spirit Formation, the owner of that Spirit Formation was far above him in terms of power. Which meant the World Spiritist who laid that Spirit formation was very possibly not a simple Grey-cloak World Spiritist but a...
"It's a blue-coloured Spirit Formation. The master here is undoubtedly a Blue-cloak World Spiritist." Eggy spoke the answer for Chu Feng.
"Blue-cloak World Spiritist. Why is such a character here?" Chu Feng was endlessly shocked.
In the Azure Province, the strongest World Spiritists were Grey-cloak World Spiritists, and there were only two. So, why did a Blue-cloak World Spiritist appear in that place? That was too shocking. How strong were Blue-cloak World Spiritists? They were huge characters who were even rare within the World Spirit Guild.
"Chu Feng, quickly leave. You cannot offend the master here. Quick. Retreat." Eggy's voice became more tense.
Chu Feng did not hesitate after hearing that. He turned around and quickly left. After listening to Eggy's explanation, only then did Chu Feng know why Eggy was so nervous. It was because the strength of a Blue-cloak World Spiritist completely exceeded his expectations.
A Blue-cloak World Spiritist. Putting their Spirit power aside first, the various Spirit Formation methods that they grasped completely surpassed Grey-cloak World Spiritists. In terms of martial cultivation, there were strict requirements as well. According to what Eggy said, the power of blue-coloured Spirit Formation required one to be at least in the Heaven realm in order to gain it.
Which also meant that not only did a Blue-cloak World Spiritist live in that temple hall, he was also simultaneously a Heaven realm expert. The Heaven realm. That was the highest realm in the continent of the Nine Provinces. Why did a character such as him appear in the Azure Province's Valley of Hundred Bends?
Chu Feng could not understand. But he did know something. There was an expert in the Valley of Hundred Bends, and that expert was not someone Chu Feng could offend because he truly could not bear the consequences.
Even if he was invincible in front of people under the Heaven realm, as he was able to escape with the superb martial skill, the Imperial Sky Technique in front of Heaven realm experts, he did not even have the chance to escape.
After distancing himself from the mountain peak, Chu Feng did not use the Imperial Sky Technique anymore. After all, there were limited clouds in the sky and he could not always rely on the clouds to conceal himself. If he was discovered by someone, a huge uproar would be unavoidable.
Besides, there were countless spiritual medicines and Origin medicines, and there were even Profound medicines. Although Chu Feng could not finish Gong Luyun off, since he came, he couldn't leave empty-handedly right?
There was a deadline for the Heroic Hunt. Eighteen days. The eighteen days did not start when they entered deeper into the Valley of Hundred Bends. It started on the day that the Valley of Hundred Bends was opened, so to be more precise, they only had fifteen days.
Chu Feng was going to openly slaughter in the fifteen days. He also wanted to experience how ample the resources in the Valley of Hundred Bends were. Also, normally, there were many Monstrous Beasts within the Valley of Hundred Bends. So, Chu Feng did not mind exchanging some blows with the legendary Monstrous Beasts.
*swoosh swoosh swoosh*
In a deep valley within the Valley of Hundred Bends, there was an area that was covered by trees. However, the branches and leaves were quite lush and there were even vines everywhere. They covered the sky and covered the sun, and it was extremely hard to walk.
However, a person was not affected at all in such an area. Like an agile monkey, he used the tree branches and tree vines to jump here and there in the air. His speed was extremely quick and sometimes, one could only see his silhouette but not his appearance.
Naturally, that person was Chu Feng. Ten days had passed from the beginning of the Heroic Hunt, and with the methods of a Grey-cloak World Spiritist, Chu Feng was like a fish in water when he was in the Valley of Hundred Bends and his harvests were great.
In these days, if he was thirsty, he would drink spring water. If he was hungry, he would roast some meat and eat it. He did not care about spiritual medicines, and only Origin medicines would stop him. Within ten days, he even stamped over and killed dozens of Profound medicines which were like treasures.
Although they were only low-quality Profound medicine and medium-quality Profound medicine, normal people could still not pick them. After all, those Profound medicines already had spiritual nature and the difficulty in catching them was extremely high. Only Chu Feng, a Grey-cloak World Spiritist, could catch them so easily. As long as he found them, he would get them. There would be no fish that could escape his net.
"One high-quality Profound medicine, one Monstrous Beast at the 9th level of the Origin realm, and one human at the 1st level of the Profound realm. It seems like someone attacked first."
As Chu Feng dashed through the forest, he muttered in a low voice. He was currently chasing after a high-quality Profound medicine. However, with his sharp Spirit power, Chu Feng could feel that there wasn't only a high-quality Profound medicine. There was also a Monstrous Beast as well as a human.
*ta*
After going past several trees, finally, Chu Feng landed on a thick and big dry tree. Chu Feng could see everything as he looked down from above.
Dozens of meters away from him, a frightening big battle was happening. Countless thick trees were cut into half and blood covered the entire area. Nothing seemed the same before the battle and it seemed like an area of a disaster.
The young male was powerful person at the 1st level of the Profound realm. As for the huge bear Monstrous Beast and the tree-vined monster, they were only at the 9th level of the Origin realm. However, as they worked together, the young male got forced more and more back and he was going to fall at any moment.
"That's the original body of a high-quality Profound medicine. Quite strong. It's cooperating with the Monstrous Beast to attack humans together, and the combined battle power of the two is comparable to the 1st level of the Profound realm. No wonder that pockmarked male is unable to beat them. "
Fragments were like a rainstorm as they flew all around Chu Feng. However, they were unable to harm him in the slightest. He was observing everything and waiting for the pockmarked male to request for assistance because he had to take that high-quality Profound medicine.
Since that high-quality Profound medicine was first discovered by the pockmarked male and unless the male took the initiative to give it up, if Chu Feng helped him take care of the Monstrous Beast and the Profound medicine, the pockmarked male might not be willing to give the Profound medicine over to Chu Feng and obviously, some disputes would happen. After experiencing all sorts of events, Chu Feng started to restrain his temper. He did not want to easily create enemies. What he needed were friends!


MGA Capitulo 227  Dangerous Land
"Senior, please help me out," Indeed, after the pockmarked male discovered Chu Feng, he quickly asked for assistance.
In order to increase his efficiency, Chu Feng kept on borrowing Eggy's power after entering the Valley of Hundred Bends. However, to avoid any unnecessary troubles, he still disguised himself.
He wore a cloth long robe and wore a conical hat that was made out of grass to conceal his own appearance. A disguise like that was not rare in the Valley of Hundred Bends, but because the pockmarked male could not see Chu Feng's appearance nor could he determine Chu Feng's age, yet he wanted Chu Feng to help him, he called Chu Feng a "senior".
"What about the high-quality Profound medicine after I help you?" Chu Feng changed his voice into a young adult's and directly spoke his goal.
"As long as you help me solve the danger in front of right now, the high-quality Profound medicine and the Monstrous Beast are yours!" The pockmarked male howled.
"Great." Only after that did Chu Feng leap into the air, and like a sharp sword, he stabbed himself into the battle circle of the three.
"Ignorant humans, all of you will die." At the same time that Chu Feng landed on the ground, the huge bear Monstrous Beast pounced towards Chu Feng.
Indeed, the Monstrous Beast had spiritual nature and he could speak the human language. However, its voice was still full of a wild beast's aura. It was also as if he had boundless strength. When his claw came down, it brought the power of three hundred thousand catties along with it.
"Hmph."
However, Chu Feng only coldly snorted at the Monstrous Beast's sudden attack. Not only did he not dodge or avoid it, he even formed a fist with one hand and threw it towards the huge claw of the Monstrous Beast.
"This" That scene completely terrified the pockmarked male. After all, Chu Feng's aura showed that he was only at the 1st level of the Profound realm, being the same as him. In terms of body figure, he was even skinnier than himself.
So, Chu Feng's current actions was like a mantis trying to block a chariot, and he was only searching for his own road of death. However, in the next instant, he was stupefied.
*boom*
When Chu Feng's fist and the huge paw of the Monstrous Beast collided, instantly, a huge boom sounded out. Although Chu Feng's fist wasn't big, the energy it contained was huge. A ripple of energy exploded out and the Monstrous Beast instantly wailed out then quickly retreated.
Its rough skin and thick flesh, which were like iron, were split open everywhere with blood flowing out and it revealed the eerie white bones.
"Heavens, thisis this still the fist of a human?"
At that very instant, the pockmarked male was already dumbstruck and he stared blankly at Chu Feng's fist with disbelief all over his face.
He did exchange some blows with the huge bear Monstrous Beast before so he deeply knew the strength of the huge bear Monstrous Beast's physical body. However, with his own body, Chu Feng destroyed the paw of the Monstrous Beast so he found it quite hard to accept that.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
As the pockmarked male was distracted, the high-quality Profound medicine already leaped into the air. The vines all over it became sharp blade that filled the sky. With lightning fast speed, they shot towards the pockmarked male.
"Crap."
When the pockmarked male reacted to that, it was too late. The vines that filled the sky would stab into his body in the next instant. He could not avoid even if he wanted to, and he couldn't escape from it even he wanted to. He lost his chance.
*swoosh*
But just as the pockmarked male felt that he was going to undoubtedly die, like a ghost, Chu Feng appeared in front of him.
Chu Feng was holding a huge golden-coloured blade in both of his hands. As his arms waved in the air, the golden blade instantly became several glares of golden light. The half-moon golden light kept on appearing in front of his eyes, and when the golden light disappeared, the scary vines were cut into half. The most astonishing thing was that the head of the Profound medicine was also chopped off by Chu Feng at an unknown time.
*aaoo*
The Profound medicine which was beheaded instantly miserably wailed. Its body was like it was shedding skin as it layers by layers fell. At the end, only a human-shaped plant that was the size of a palm appeared. That plant was a high-quality Profound medicine, the Human-shaped Grass.
*ta ta ta*
Just at that time, frantic stepping sounds resounded out, and the heavily injured huge bear Monstrous Beast escaped with its tail between its legs. Although it seemed quite heavy, its speed was not slow. Almost with a blink, it disappeared from Chu Feng's and the other person's line of sight.
At that instant, the pockmarked male even thought that the huge bear Monstrous Beast successfully escaped. As he prepared to shake his head and sigh, he saw Chu Feng throw his golden blade out.
At first, the pockmarked male did not understand why Chu Feng would do that, but when he heard the painful cry that came from the Monstrous Beast deep in the forest, he finally knew how strong Chu Feng really was.
Chu Feng picked up the Human-shaped Grass and threw it into his Cosmos Sack. Normally, he would not even store it and he would have just refined it directly, but since he was in front of someone else, he needed to hold himself back.
"Brother, you have quite good skill even though we are both at the 1st level of the Profound realm. I, Wu Yuanhua, truly admire you to the point that I would kowtow myself." Just at that time, the pockmarked male walked over with a face full of deep respect and he couldn't help but cup his hands towards Chu Feng in admiration.
"Ho" Chu Feng already expected the male's actions so he didn't pay much attention to it. He only lightly smiled and prepared to continue on.
"Brother, I wonder what your great name is?" However, the pockmarked male went in front of Chu Feng to stop him and with a solemn face, he asked.
"I am Asura." Chu Feng randomly said a name.
"Asurawhat a strange name." The pockmarked male seemed to contemplate and felt that the name was very special.
Chu Feng ignored the pockmarked male's reactions, and went past him to continue foward. However, before even walking for a few steps, the pockmarked male caught up. He spread open his arms and stopped Chu Feng once again.
As he faced the pockmarked male's persistency, Chu Feng tightly frowned and said a bit displeasedly, "Yes?"
"Ijust want to invite brother Asura to go along with me." The pockmarked male chuckled and said. His attitude was very sincere.
"Sorry, I'm busy." Chu Feng coldy snorted. He did not want that trash as a burden.
"Ahh, brother Asura, we know a place that contains a large number of high-quality Profound medicine." Seeing that, the pockmarked male quickly explained.
"Is that true?" After hearing that there was a large number of high-quality Profound medicines, Chu Feng couldn't help but be interested.
"Not half a word of lie. But brother Asura, before going, I must let you know that the resources in the Valley of Hundred Bends exist together with danger."
"The place that has a large number of Profound medicine also has a group of tyrannical Monstrous Beasts as guards. The disciples from the Lingyun school has already attacked many times, but they left in defeat and they had heavy losses."
"However, I heard that the number one disciple in the Lingyun School, Dugu Aoyun, has already headed towards that place. All the powerful people in the Lingyun School all gathered at that place, and the Lingyun School also requested for help towards the other powers. They invited disciples from various other schools to work together to attack that Monstrous Beast castle."
"And Iwant to invite, you, brother Asura, to go together and share the profits. What you think about it?" The pockmarked male seriously said and within his gaze, there was even a bit of pleading.
After hearing those words, Chu Feng's heart was already moved. If the disciples of the Lingyun School could not get any results after attacking it many times, it meant that the place was dangerous. But that also meant that there were huger resources. So, Chu Feng did not hesitate and he firmly said, "Lead the way!"


MGA Capitulo 228  Dugu Aoyun
The Valley of Hundred Bends was a magical land. Mountains, creeks, rivers, valleys, plains, everything that should be there was there.
The beautiful scenery was like a saint's realm. That area could simply be said to be a separate world. There were spiritual medicines, Origin medicines, Profound medicines, wild beasts, Fierce Beasts, and Monstrous Beasts.
Being at the top of the food chain, Monstrous Beasts were the kings in that area. They ruled that place, and even Monstrous Beasts needed to cultivation. So, they also needed Origin medicines and Profound medicines.
In order for Origin medicines and Profound medicines to display the effects that they should have, after the Monstrous Beasts found the medicines, they would not immediately hunt them. They would force it to a special place, seal them, and wait for them to grow before using them.
However, every year, there would be a period of time where humans intruded that land. The intrusion of the humans destroyed everything there. They broke the rules there, so to Monstrous Beasts, humans were the invaders and they were the guardians.
At that moment, in a certain location in the Valley of Hundred Bends, there was a fortress just like that. Profound medicine filled the fortress and those outside could feel the strong Profound power as well as the fragrance of the medicines. It was undoubtedly a huge treasure trove.
However, the treasures were not able to be taken so easily because several hundred Monstrous Beasts were densely gathered outside. Every single one of them was in the Profound realm and their cultivations were high. There were some at the 1st level of the Profound realm as well as some at the 6th level of the Profound realm.
One human-shaped Monstrous Beast which was three meters tall even had the cultivation of the 7th level of the Profound realm. The muscles all over its body were like armor. It had a big sharp hammer in his hand and it was currently sitting on a chair made out of human bones as it yawned.
Around that Monstrous Beast were Monstrous Beasts who were still in their Monstrous Beast shape and they were quite lively, as if celebrating, as they defeated the humans again and again.
"Dammit. I really want to immediately go slaughter that group of beasts."
"Wait. Senior Dugu and senior Fenghao will quickly come. After they come, we can exterminate these Monstrous Beasts that ought to die all at once. We will avenge the seniors and juniors who died."
Several thousand meters away from the fortress, within a lush forest, several hundred disciples were gathered there. Most of them were disciples from the Lingyun School, but there were also many disciples from other schools and they were preparing for the final attack on the fortress.
"Look, senior Fenghao has arrived." Suddenly, a group of people appeared. They were from the Lingyun School, and the one who led was a white-faced, prideful male.
After that male appeared, instantly, a huge disturbance was aroused. Not to mention the disciples from the Lingyun School, even the disciples from other schools concentrated their gazes on that male's body. Some female disciples even revealed expressions of adoration.
That male was called Fenghao and he was the number two disciple in the Lingyun School. Although he was only second, his talent and cultivation was far from being comparable by disciples from other schools. He was an expert in the 6th level of the Profound realm, and it could be said that he was one of the best within the young generation in the Azure Province.
"Young lady, I wonder if we can join you guys to work together to defeat those group of Monstrous Beasts?"
At that instant, Chu Feng and the pockmarked male already arrived. However, it wasn't simple to be able to join the group of people who were going to fight against the Monstrous Beasts.
In fact, currently, the strength of Chu Feng and the pockmarked male was being assessed by the female disciple from the Lingyun School. She was seeing if they had the qualifications to share the Profound medicine in the fortress.
But it was useless as after Fenghao appeared, the gaze of that female disciple from the Lingyun School was attracted towards Fenghao and she did not pay attention to Chu Feng and the pockmarked male anymore.
However, that could not be blamed on that female disciple because when compared to Fenghao's girl-like face, the pockmarked male's face was too ugly. No females would be willing to look at him.
"Look over there, senior Dugu has come!"
"Dugu Aoyun? The number one disciple from the Lingyun School, Dugu Aoyun?!"
Just at that time, another person yelled in surprise, and the words Dugu Aoyun caused everyone's gaze on scene to be shifted from Fenghao to the other side.
On that side, another group of disciples from the Lingyun School appeared. The quality of those disciples were much stronger than Fenghao's group.
Especially the one who led. With a pair of dense eyebrows which were like sharp swords and a resolute face like a blade, that male was a lot more handsome and martial-like. When compared to Fenghao's female-like prettiness, that male was filled with manly charm.
He was the number one disciple in the Lingyun School, Dugu Aoyun, and he was an expert at the 8th level of the Profound realm. Not only was he the number one disciple in the Lingyun School, he was even named as the number one person in the Azure Province's young generation.
Closely following Dugu Aoyun was his young brother, Dugu Xiangyu. Dugu Xiangyu's cultivation was not weak as well as he had the cultivation of the 5th level of the Profound realm. He had quite the handsome appearance as well, but as his elder brother was under a halo, obviously, he was not that eye-grabbing.
"Waa, the number one disciple from my Lingyun School is too charming. That's a real man!"
The female disciple from the Lingyun School who had incomparable adoration towards Fenghao earlier only had Dugu Aoyun's figure within her eyes.
"Oi, lady. I want to join you guys to fight together against the Monstrous Beasts. Look at us. Can we?" Just at that time, the pockmarked male untactfully patted the female disciple's shoulder.
"Shoo! Don't pass! Both of you don't pass! Leave right now!!" The pockmarked male who disturbed the female's heart of appreciation got a burst of angry cursing from her.
"Junior, what's wrong?" Her yell naturally attracted the attention of the Lingyun School disciples. In an instant, the large group of Lingyun School disciples aggressively surrounded and concentrated their fierce gazes onto the bodies of the pockmarked male as well as Chu Feng.
"IWe" As he faced that scene, the pockmarked male was terrified. He could not even speak because he did not even know how to explain.
"They wanted to join us to fight against the Monstrous Beasts, but because their strength was too low, I wanted them to leave. However, they kept on nagging me." The female disciple said with grievance.
"What? Something like that happened?" After hearing those words, the normally domineering Lingyun School disciples were instantly enraged and their gazes could eat Chu Feng and the pockmarked male.
"Whatever, fighting against the Monstrous Beasts is more important right now. Let them go." One disciple went out to advise.
"Hmph. You two are lucky. Shoo!" Seeing that, the disciple from the Lingyun School started drive them away.
As he faced that situation, both of Chu Feng's fists tightly clenched and the flames of fury burned in his heart, but he endured because he felt a pair of sharp eyes staring at him, and the owner of those eyes was extremely strong.
So, Chu Feng could only gloomily leave along with the pockmarked male as they were mocked by the crowd.
"Brother, what are you looking at?" Dugu Xiangyu curiously asked.
"Nothing." Dugu Aoyun faintly smiled and retracted the gaze that was aimed towards Chu Feng.


MGA Capitulo 229  Plundering Everything
A short while after Dugu Aoyun appeared, he organized the disciples and started to attack the Monstrous Beasts' fortress.
This time, the Monstrous Beasts who were quite lively before clearly felt the pressure. As they faced the human army led by Dugu Aoyun, they already lost their absolute superiority.
Even the Monstrous Beast commander who held the huge hammer was held down by Dugu Aoyun. Although Monstrous Beasts had a natural advantage from their physical bodies and they were usually stronger than humans in the same realm in terms of battle power, when they faced a peak genius like Dugu Aoyun, their advantage already disappeared. In front of absolute aptitude, the advantage was taken away by the humans.
The Monstrous Beast commander who became half human tightly frowned and endlessly roared. He was being continuously forced back by the number one disciple in the Lingyun School, Dugu Aoyun, and he completely lost his precious grandeur of a king.
"Ahh, dammit. That damn woman" Within a distant forest, the pockmarked male sat on a big tree as he looked at the direction of the fortress while smoke kept on rolling up and he unceasingly muttered.
"Brother Asura, with your strength, if you could have entered, you would have certainly gotten your share." After sighing, he cast his gaze next to him, but he discovered that it was completely empty and Chu Feng's traces were gone.
"Brother Asura, brother Asura?" That made the pockmarked male panic. Clearly, the person who was just there randomly disappeared. As he panicked, he started to look everywhere for Chu Feng's traces.
However, no matter what, he never would have thought that the current Chu Feng already rose into the air. With the Imperial Sky Technique, Chu Feng looked down from above and the fortress was clearly observed by him. Although the defense around the fortress was very good, in order for the Profound medicines be bathed in sunlight for better growth, it was not completely sealed.
Using the smoke that rose from the great battle, Chu Feng could conceal himself as he descended from above. As the battle outside was a mess, he stepped into the fortress first and he wanted to grab all the Profound medicines that were there.
"Wow! This time, I will earn big." After entering the fortress, Chu Feng's excited heart was almost going to jump out.
Within the dense grasses, there were dense lights flickering non-stop. Low-quality Profound medicine, medium-quality Profound medicine, high-quality Profound medicine. In total, there were several thousand. There were even around a hundred of the priceless high-quality Profound medicine.
That amount was too shocking. No wonder the Monstrous Beasts outside would guard this place to their deaths. It was truly a treasure trove! It must have been the result of many years of accumulation.
*ji ji ji*
The instant that Chu Feng stepped onto that place, the several thousand Profound medicines suddenly changed. From little grasses that were buried in the flowers and grasses, they turned into terrifying monsters. They bared their teeth, and with open mouths and extended claws, they started their attack on Chu Feng.
"Heh, my lovely Profound medicines. All of you are truly giving me a hug!"
Chu Feng chuckled, extended his hand, and grabbed. Profound power formed into a huge palm and it slammed down. Even the ground trembled once, and that palm pressed several Profound medicines to death.
He waved his arm and his Profound power swept across. With that, dozens of Profound medicine were swept to death by Chu Feng and turned back into cute little grasses that didn't have spiritual nature.
But even as he killed them so devastatingly, Chu Feng still felt that it was too slow. So, he just used his Spirit Formation power to surround the large area that contained the grasses, then sealed the Spirit Formation and crushed them alive. Only when they returned to their original forms did he stop the shrinking.
*ji ji ji~~~*
As Chu Feng swept across with his power, the preciously fierce Profound medicines started to escape everywhere and they powerfully hit the fortress's walls. That was quite amusing because the Profound medicines were asking for help.
However, it was already a mess outside so how could anyone notice what was happening inside the fortress? Thus, the Profound medicines were helpless. They could only allow Chu Feng to finish them off with a sweep, and be killed bit by bit by him. At the end, they became Profound medicines without spiritual nature and they were all picked up by Chu Feng.
"Haha, refreshing. This is indeed refreshing!"
As Chu Feng madly laughed, he walked towards the remaining hundred or so Profound medicines hiding in the corner. The Profound medicines that usually had an abnormally fierce appearance were like frightened sheeps and they were trembling. Their gazes flickered and obviously, they felt boundless fear.
*boom* Suddenly, an explosion resounded out. Rock fragments filled their air and the fortress was opened by someone.
"Crap." Chu Feng suddenly turned his head and he discovered that a group of people rushed in. It was the disciples from the Lingyun School, and the leader was number two of the Lingyun School, Fenghao, the powerful person at the 6th level of the Profound realm.
"Who are you?"
As Fenghao intruded into that place with a full heart of happiness, he discovered that the treasure trove was completely empty. After seeing the nearby standing person and a group of trembling Profound medicines, his face instantly changed greatly.
Fenghao immediately reacted and he knew what happened inside. That damn person went in first and completely plundered everything in the huge treasure trove!
"Hmph." Chu Feng did not care about Fenghao. He only waved his big sleeve and condensed a Spirit Formation out. He wanted to take the last few Profound medicines in the corner for himself as well.
"You're looking to die!!"
Seeing that not only did Chu Feng not stop and he was even continuing to plunder, it enraged Fenghao. He leaped and arrived in front of Chu Feng, then a fist was thrown towards Chu Feng's back.
That fist was not a small thing. Although he did not use Profound power, a rank 6 martial skill was condensed within his fist. Its power was extremely frightening, and Fenghao wanted to use that punch to determine victory or death instantly, and also to kill Chu Feng.
At the same time, the crowd behind Fenghao attacked simultaneously as well. Every single person used extremely strong martial skills and they did not restrain themselves.
"Shoo!" In critical times like that, Chu Feng did not restrain himself as well. He flicked his fingers towards them and five white-coloured gases explosively shot out.
*roar* An angry roar shook the skies and the ground. Who could even hold the White Tiger back once it came out?
In front of the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique, even Fenghao's face changed greatly. He originally wanted to escape, but he lost the chance. With a bang, the condensed huge paw by the White Tiger already slammed down. At the same time, not a single disciple behind him survived.
*boom*
When the paw came down, instantly, a huge hole appeared. After the dust dispersed, other than Fenghao, the other people who were there become pools of blood. Even Fenghao was half-disabled.
The most important thing was that white-coloured gas already pierced through his chest and he was heavily injured. At that instant, blood was everywhere on his body. His aura was extremely weak and he was on the border of life and death.
*whoosh* After defeating Fenghao and the others with one strike, he waved his sleeve once again. The Profound medicines that were already bound down were called over and stuffed into his Cosmos Sack. He stepped up and he prepared to return where he came from to slip away after being extremely lucky.
*boom*
But just at that time, boundless pressure descended from the skies and sealed Chu Feng's path. He raised his head to look, and even Chu Feng couldnt help but change his expression greatly. A huge hand in the sky came down, and with devastating power, it slammed towards him.


MGA Capitulo 230  I Am Called Asura
That palm was extremely big and it could be said to cover the skies and the sun. It was condensed by golden-coloured radiance, yet it showed real palm patterns. It was not extended by an arm, and only a palm appeared in the sky.
But it had to be said that the power the golden-coloured huge palm contained was indeed, extremely frightening. As for how strong, it was even more terrifying that Lin Ran's Cold Ice Atmosphere.
"Look, it's senior Dugu's unique skill! Rank 6 martial skill, Heaven Descending Divine Palm!!"
At that instant, someone yelled in surprise and it allowed Chu Feng to know the origin of the palm, as well as the user. He also finally knew why the golden-coloured palm came towards him with such huge pressure.
But under situations like that, Chu Feng never thought too much about it. With a thought, he linked with the White Tiger. Following that, he opened his five fingers and explosively palmed towards the sky.
*roar*
When the palm was thrown out, instantly, the white-coloured gas surged out from his palm. After that, the white-coloured gas became a white-coloured tiger's paw in the air.
It was a real tiger's paw. Although it was only condensed by white-coloured gas, one could still see the faint black-coloured stripes. It was vivid and lifelike, and there was even fur. The most important thing was that the state of the tiger's paw was completely different than what Chu Feng displayed earlier.
Before, the tiger's paw was only in a illusionary state, but this tiger's paw was more near an actual substance. As for why such change happened, that was because Chu Feng just recently gained new power. He improved once again in terms of appearance for the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique.
When the White Tiger came out, who could even fight against it? The might of the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique completely surpassed the Heaven Descending Divine Palm, and when the two intersected, it made everyone know what was a true peerless and invincible attack in the world.
*rumble rumble rumble*
As the two collided, even the sky trembled and black-coloured cracks extended in the air as though the sky was going to fall. However, after the huge boom, the white-coloured tiger's paw rushed into the air and straight through the clouds. Even a hole of a tiger's paw was formed in the clouds in the sky, and only the heavens would know how far the paw went for.
Looking back at the golden-coloured huge palm, it already became golden-coloured ripples. It spread in the air, and in front of the White Tiger Slaughtering Technique, the so-called Heaven Descending Divine Palm could not even take a single strike.
"What martial skill is that? It has such power!"
As they looked at the clouds and saw the tiger's paw mark left there, everyone who witnessed that scene were dumbfounded and their eyes were full of shock.
Even Dugu Aoyun tightly frowned and his gaze glittered with seriousness. As he looked at Chu Feng who wore a conical hat, he did not dare to have a single strand of carelessness anymore. He solemnly asked, "Brother, I wonder what your great name is?"
"Asura." Chu Feng's voice was extremely loud and clear.
After dissolving the scary attack, Chu Feng could finally observe the situation at that moment. Only then did he discover that the Monstrous Beasts were all finished off. All of the disciples surged into the fortress, and the one who led them was exactly Dugu Aoyun.
The current him was already surrounded, but it wasn't that he had no more escaping roads to walk on. Since he was already discovered, Chu Feng did not hurry to escape. He took his time to leave his great name. Of course, it wasn't his true name.
"Asura? What a good Asura. We painfully and bitterly fought outside, yet you snuck in here and plundered all the Profound medicines. Not only that, you even killed people from my Lingyun School. Your actions are a bit too dishonest, are they not?"
"If you're still a man, reveal your true appearance. Let us see what kind of person would do such improper things." Dugu Aoyun loudly interrogated. Obviously, he guessed that Asura wasn't Chu Feng's real name.
"Senior Dugu is right. We've fought for our lives outside, yet you stole away everything here. Hand the Profound medicines out and we'll leave you with a complete corpse."
At that instant, the other disciples also put out demands towards Chu Feng. After all, they just had a great battle against Monstrous Beasts and some were injured while some died. However, if all of that was for nothing, no matter who it was, they would not be willing to accept that.
"Truly a joke. The Profound medicines here belong to those who are able to get it. I never told you to fight for your lives outside, and even without any of you, I can still loot everything here."
"Leave me with a complete corpse? Within all of you, who can kill me?" Chu Feng sneered and revealed his gaze of killing intent towards his surroundings.
Even though that it didn't seem important, almost everyone who was on scene, other than Dugu Aoyun, couldn't help but back away one step and they broke out in a cold sweat from fear. From Chu Feng's gaze, they felt icy cold killing intent.
Especially after they saw Chu Feng's terrifying palm, no one knew the depth of Chu Feng's abilities. However, they could be sure that Chu Feng was indeed a dangerous person.
"Dugu Aoyun, you dare? Do you want to come over and give it a go?" Chu Feng threatened.
"You think I don't dare?" Dugu Aoyun coldly said.
"Haha, if you dare, come up and try!"
Chu Feng loudly laughed and leaped up into the sky. When he was in mid-air, he stopped and did not move. He was stepping on air as he hung up in the sky.
"Heavens! He..hehehe is standing on air!"
"How is that possible. He is a person in the Heaven realm?"
At that instant, as they looked at Chu Feng who stood on air with both of his hands behind his back, no one could remain calm anymore. Even though Chu Feng's aura only belonged to the 1st level of the Profound realm, only Heaven realm experts had the special ability to step on the air and walk.
Heaven realm. That was a character that did not even exist in the entire Azure Province. Was the person in front of them truly a Heaven realm expert? Didn't that mean that they angered a super huge character that they should not have angered?
"Where have you come from?" Dugu Aoyun loudly questioned, and even he was shocked by Chu Feng's methods.
"Remember. I am Asura. This name will resonate in the entire Nine Provinces and no one will not know this name!"
After speaking those words, Chu Feng laughed, stepped in the air, and gradually went away. He left the dumbfounded crowds behind who had shocked minds that could not be calmed down for a long time.


MGA Capitulo 231  Number One Beauty in the Azure Province
After Chu Feng left the fortress, he found a more desolate location and started to refine the Profound medicines. This time, Chu Feng's harvest was certainly extremely refreshing. It was several times more than all the Profound medicines that he got from all the past days.
But it was in vain as Chu Feng refined one medicine after the other, the Divine Lightning consumed it mouthful by mouthful. After refining the Profound medicine, Chu Feng discovered that it wasn't that there was no change in his dantian, but the change was too minuscule.
Enduring any actions of cursing, Chu Feng continued refining. Finally, after refining everything that he plundered this time, great change happened to his dantian, but the change only happened for an instant.
That was right. Chu Feng finally successfully arrived into the 5th level of the Origin realm. However, the price of having a breakthrough to that point was a bit heavy. Pretty much, Chu Feng used all the Profound medicines that he had like it was nothing.
*rustle rustle* Suddenly, Chu Feng's eyes flashed and he cautiously cast his gaze towards the east because there were several people there quickly running.
That change attracted Chu Feng's attention. He quickly concentrated his Spirit power over to hear the following words.
"Quick quick quick! I heard that the third lady of the Qilin Prince's Mansion, Lin Yueyue, is as beautiful as a flower. She is the number one beauty in the Azure Province and it is a must to have a look!"
"Are you sure that Miss Lin Yueyue has set up camp in front?"
"Of course! I personally saw it, so how can it be wrong?"
"This is great! If I can see such beauty with my own eyes in my life, it would be worth it even if I die. Butwill the people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion allow us to go near?"
"Don't worry. The Qilin Prince's Mansion isn't as unreasonable as the Lingyun School."
So it turned out that the several males who were madly running with happiness and excitement were only going to look at the beautiful appearance of the Qilin Prince's Mansion's third lady.
"Ahh, these people are truly too bored." As he looked at the actions of those people, Chu Feng helplessly shook his head.
But then, he raise his head to look up. After seeing the colour of the sky, he found out that it was getting quite late and soon, the sky was going to get dark. Since being idle was boring, Chu Feng also followed the steps of the group of people and chased after them...
In a empty space within a forest, a group of young adults with golden-coloured armor were standing around with order. Some males were even setting up a camp and pitching a super luxurious tent.
Other than the group of golden-armored males, there was also group of beautiful females with many styles of grace who were starting up fires and cooking on the side. They were preparing all types of delicious foods.
The group of people was a branch from the Qilin Prince's Mansion. No matter if it were the guards or the servants, all of them were experts in the Profound realm and their strength could not be underestimated.
Some people sighed in admiration as they faced the strength of the Qilin Prince's Mansion. However, the most eye-grabbing thing that was the sedan chair that was in the middle of the empty space. That sedan chair was very beautiful and it was created by carving special types of jades. It was extremely pretty.
Two servants stood near the entrance of the sedan chair and those two servants had quite attractive appearances. With white skin and a tall figure, it made the group of disciples outside of the empty land gulp a few times.
"Tsk. A bunch of bumpkins that haven't seen beauties before." As he looked at the lewd expressions on the group of people, Chu Feng couldn't help but disdainfully shoot them a few glances.
Although those servants' appearances were not bad, it could only be said that they were not bad. It was ordinary to the extreme when they were compared to Eggy who was in Chu Feng's body.
"Look, she's coming out! She's coming out! The number one beauty in the Azure Province is coming!"
Suddenly, someone yelled in surprise. Following that, all the males and females outside of the empty space couldn't help but stand on their tiptoes. Their eyes that were almost going to bulge out all gathered on the entrance of that sedan chair. Their moods also became excited.
At that instant, Chu Feng could clearly see a pair of beautiful white-snow legs that came out after the doors were opened. Those legs were truly pretty. They were long, thin, and straight, and one could simply not find any flaws. They were even comparable to Su Rou's beautiful legs.
Even Chu Feng's heart jumped when he saw those beautiful legs. However, the lustful people behind him all surged in front of Chu Feng and they completely blocked Chu Feng's gaze.
"Damn! Have you guys not seen beauties before?"
As he saw the densely packed backs of the males in front of him, Chu Feng's current emotions were called angry. With a grab, he forcibly pulled several males in front of him to the back.
At that moment, finally, Chu Feng's line of sight could be cast onto Lin Yueyues body. But this time, Chu Feng's face greatly changed. Instantly, from a wonderful expression, it turned into a green-coloured face as if he ate bitter melons.
There was truly nothing one could criticize about the figure of Lin Yueyue. Sticking out both in front and behind, snow-white skin but after seeing her face, it could scare a person to death.
She had a shoehorn-like face, pockmarks everywhere, red phoenix eyes, shrimp-like nose, a big mouth that was like a toad, and her pinkie was even deeply inserted into a nostril. She was "naturally and elegantly" picking her nose.
[TN Red phoenix eyes (from baidu) Very slender eyes, as they curl downwards slightly towards the nose, and curl upwards slightly towards the ears.]
The most important part was her gaze. As she looked at the crowd, it was filled with disdain and pride, as if she truly felt that she was really the number one beauty in the Azure Province and that all males could not enter her divine eyes.
She even thought that the stunned expressions of the crowd were from being stunned by her beauty. But she did not know that the stunned expressions were the results of being terrified by her.
"Waa~~~"
Just at that time, Chu Feng couldn't bear it anymore, and after opening his mouth, he threw up. He truly threw up, and he threw up in front of everyone's faces.
Although Chu Feng wasn't that old, he still had pleased countless females. He had seen quite a few beauties, and he had also seen quite a few uglies. However, he had never seen a person as ugly as that. Lin Yueyues rare appearance truly surpassed Chu Feng's bottomline.
"Insolence! You dare to throw up in my lady's resting area? Do you not want to live anymore?!" After Chu Feng vomited, it instantly caused the guards from the Qilin Prince's Mansion to be displeased as they pointed at Chu Feng and loudly rebuked,
Chu Feng stood up straight again, and after wiping his mouth, he said some words that were filled with contempt, "Your lady's appearance is so disgusting, so can you not let her come to scare people? Even I threw up because of her! How are you going compensate for this?"
After Chu Feng spoke, it was like a explosion of thunder and it shocked everyone greatly. However, within the hearts of the surrounding disciples, all of them raised their thumbs at Chu Feng and hiddenly said, "Brother, you are too correct!" At the same time, they admired Chu Feng quite a bit to be able to dare to speak those words.
"YouWho did you say was disgusting?" Similarly, after Chu Feng spoke, it made Lin Yueyue enraged. Even her fingers were trembling as she pointed at Chu Feng.
"I say. Lady, other than you, who else can I talk about? Please, return to the sedan chair and don't come out to scare people okay?" Chu Feng waved his hands at her, but he did not dare to look at Lin Yueyue again and he only stared at the servants who were next to her.


MGA Capitulo 232  You Dont Need to Compensate With Your Life to Deceive a Person to Death
"You..you bastard! Someone, apprehend this person! I want his eyes scooped out, his tongue cut off, his tendons pulled out, his skin peeled off" Lin Yueyue quivered from anger and she pointed at Chu Feng and insanely started to howl.
At the same time, the guards from the Qilin Prince's Mansion already pounced towards Chu Feng. Although they also felt that Lin Yueyues appearance was really not good as well, when Chu Feng insulted Lin Yueyue in front of the crowd, it meant that they were insulting the Qilin Prince's Mansion. That was something they could not tolerate.
"An ugly girl is guarded like treasure. This is truly sad!"
Naturally, Chu Feng would not obediently stay there and be caught. After taunting the guards who were rushing towards him, with a flash under his feet, he leaped into the forest like light and he quickly disappeared and could not be seen.
No matter how the guards tried to chase after him, they could not catch up to Chu Feng. Finally, they ended up with a conclusion. That boy who wore a conical hat was born in the year of the rabbit because he truly ran too fast.
After leaving the territory of the Qilin Prince's Mansion, Chu Feng caught a little white rabbit. He was truly frightened by Lin Yueyues appearance so he had to eat something to suppress those feelings.
At that moment, the sun had already set and the sky was dark. Chu Feng was alone in the desolate forest and he was preparing to start a fire to cook the rabbit. He extended his finger, and as Profound power condensed, a strand of fire fled out. It was a rank 5 martial skill, but its power was not stronger than the Three Thunder Styles, so Chu Feng could only use it for starting up a fire.
*whoosh*
However, just as the flames started to burn, Chu Feng quickly extinguished it. After that, he nervously looked back because Chu Feng felt that there were people getting close again. Chu Feng already gotten used of that because the area he was in was a place with a lot of Profound medicines and many people gathered there.
Just in case, Chu Feng wanted to change locations, but then he felt that the aura of the person who was getting closer was a bit familiar. So, in order to investigate it, he concealed his aura and secretly went close.
"Damn. This guy is still quite unrestrained and free even in this kind of place." Although he did not expect too much from going close, Chu Feng was instantly shocked.
In the empty land, there was a small tent. Outside of the tent was a bonfire. Over the bonfire were some delicious meat, and next to the bonfire was a male and a female. They were currently hugging one another as well as toasting and drinking
That male was Dugu Aoyun's brother, Dugu Xiangyu, and the female was a disciple in the Lingyun School. At that moment, she was acting cutely, being romantic, and her emotions were going up and down as she was in Dugu Xiangyu's embrace.
At that instant, finally, Chu Feng knew why Dugu Xianyu would come to such a place. He did not come along with the Lingyun School army. Clearly, to have a secret affair with that female disciple, they intentionally distanced themselves from the Lingyun School's group.
As he looked at Dugu Xiangyu, Chu Feng couldn't help but think of Dugu Aoyun, and think of the scene today when Dugu Aoyun gave out demands along with his group. As he thought of that, the corner of Chu Feng's mouth couldn't help but curl up into a evil smile, and after a leap, he went away.
It was deep into the night, and from the wine, Dugu Xiangyu's beast-like nature was greatly displayed. He started to roll around on the grass with his little female junior with all sorts of deep emotions. When he reached the climax, he started to pull his junior's skirt away.
"Senior not..not here." The little female junior was a bit embarrassed and she cast her gaze towards the nearby tent.
"Hehe, fine fine fine. My beauty, I'll listen to you." Dugu Xiangyu chuckled, then carried the beauty into his embrace and went into the tent.
*ta ta ta* But just as the two entered the tent, footsteps rang out from the forest outside.
"Who?" That made Dugu Xiangyu extremely panicky. As his upper body was naked, he rushed out and jumped into the forest. When he came back, there was a little timid rabbit in his hand. He chuckled and said, "It's nothing. Just a little white rabbit."
After speaking, Dugu Xiangyu waved his arm and threw the little white rabbit out, and it was crushed into a pile of meat paste.
"Waa, my junior, you even took off your clothes by yourself!"
After Dugu Xiangyu returned to the tent and extended his palm of evil towards his junior, he shockingly discovered that his junior's clothing was already taken off. Her figure was truly too great. It was simply the best body he had ever seen in his life.
So, Dugu Xiangyu's beastly nature was thoroughly ignited, and love was made with his junior inside the tent. He was not even satisfied after doing it for so long, and he even forgot about the fact that his little female junior did not even make a sound as she was freely played around with.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
However, just as Dugu Xiangyu was absorbed in his actions, suddenly, there were footsteps outside in the forest. Following that, lamps lit up everywhere and a large number of troops surrounded him.
"Who is it that dares to disturb my good occasion?" Dugu Xiangyu who lost himself from the excitement was furious. As he was naked, he jumped out. But when he saw the people who surrounded him, his expression couldn't help but change and the fury on his face couldn't help but be held back a bit.
It was because the people who surrounded him were not simple troops. It was the army of the Qilin Prince's Mansion, and within that group of people, there was even a young male adult who had extremely high cultivation.
That male was quite well-built, and when the Qilin Golden-armor was on his body, he looked like a battle god. He was the number one person within the young generation of the Qilin Prince's Mansion, Lin Xu.
Lin Xu was a first-class person. He had the cultivation of the 7th level of the Profound realm and he was named as the second strongest person in the Azure Province's young generation. He was only slightly weaker than Dugu Aoyun. His identity was very special as well, being the eldest son of the Qilin Prince's Mansion's Lin Ran, and he was also Lin Yueyue's older brother.
At that instant, Lin Xu's face was extremely unkind. It could be seen that he was trying his best to control his anger, and he pointed at Dugu Xiangyu and said, "Dugu Xiangyu, hand my sister back."
"Your sister? I don't understand what you mean?" Dugu Xiangyu had no confidence as he faced Lin Xu and when he was asked like that, he was a bit puzzled.
"Hmph. You still dare to act dumb? Someone, bring the third lady out." Lin Xu coldly snorted and the servants behind him rushed into the tent. Very quickly, a female who wore incomplete clothing was supported out.
"Brother Lin Xu, you can really jest. Where is the third lady here? Inside, it isthisthiswhat is this?"
Dugu Xiangyu chuckled and he originally wanted to explain, but when he saw the female who was supported out, his was dumbfounded and his face instantly became deathly-white.
How was that female even his Lingyun School's junior? She was the infamous number one most ugly female in the Azure Province, Lin Xu's little sister, Lin Yueyue.
"Heavens, how did this happen?"
At that instant, Dugu Xiangyu knelt to the ground with a poof. Both of his hands hugged his head and he knocked his head onto the ground.
To think that he, Dugu Xiangyu, who was handsome, distinguished, casual, at ease, and had played with countless beauties, slept with such a top-level ugly female today. He was even extremely excited as he did it. At that instant, he felt that the sky was falling and the ground was collapsing. Ten thousand hopes all turned into dust, and currently, only a single sentence echoed in his brain.
Finished. He, Dugu Xiangyu, was completely finished for his entire life.


MGA Capitulo 233  Terrifying Formation
Dugu Xiangyu kept on explaining and said that it was a misunderstanding. Who he slept with wasn't Lin Yueyue but his female junior. After hearing Dugu Xiangyu say that, it made Lin Xu furious as he detained Dugu Xiangyu and gave him a good beating.
At the end, the people from the Lingyun School were alerted and Dugu Aoyun led the Lingyun school group and hurried over. However, as he faced the Qilin Prince's Mansion, even Dugu Aoyun did not dare to forcibly take him away. After all, the matter this time was indeed his younger brother's, Dugu Xiangyu's, fault.
"What is happening"
With bruises on his face, Dugu Xiangyu knelt in the corner as he looked at his elder brother who was discussing with Lin Xu and the others about the grievance in his heart. He wanted to throw up when he thought of Lin Yueyue's face.
When he thought he slept with such an ugly female, and he was even so absorbed with pleasure, he really wanted to slap himself two times. But even if he did that, he could not resolve his anger.
"What has happened, happened. What use is there to regret it now?" Dugu Aoyun walked over and he was extremely calm.
"Brother, how will this matter be resolved?" Dugu Xiangyu stood up and quickly asked.
"Marry her." Dugu Aoyun indifferently said.
"What? Marry her? You're talking about Lin Yueyue? You want me to marry Lin Yueyue?" After hearing those words, Dugu Xiangyu was instantly unable to remain calm. His face was even greener than a cucumber and his mouth opened quite big.
"Who else will marry her? Me?" At that instant, Dugu Aoyun face couldn't help but change as well. He pointed at Dugu Xiangyu's nose and reprimanded, "Who do you think you slept with this time? The third lady of the Qilin Prince's Mansion! Her father is head manager Lin Ran of the Qilin Prince's Mansion!"
"You slept with the daughter of one of the Qilin Prince's Mansion's head managers, and you want to get away with it? Right now, marrying her is already the limit for you."
"Brother, is there really no other way? I really don't want to marry that ugly woman" Dugu Xiangyu hopes were all gone so he knelt in front of Dugu Aoyun and begged with pity.
As he looked at his own younger brother, even Dugu Aoyun's heart ached a bit. He couldn't help but close his eyes and said, "If you want to live, then marry. Or else even if the school head appears, he won't be able to save you."
"Dammit! Who set this up?!" Dugu Xiangyu knew that the result was unchangeable and he couldn't help but roar in fury.
"Senior Dugu, senior Liu is back!" Just at that time, a Lingyun School disciple ran over. A female followed behind him, and it was the little female junior who was swapped away from Dugu Xiangyu.
"You damn woman, where did you run off to?" After seeing the little junior, Dugu Xiangyu was furious and he angrily pounced over.
"Stop." But before even letting him go near, he was stopped by the nearby Dugu Aoyun. After that, Dugu Aoyun looked at the little female whose face was filled with fear while not knowing what to do and said, "Junior Liu, where did you go last night?"
"III also don't know what happened. Last night, I suddenly lost consciousness, and when I woke back up, I was already in the forest."
"That's right. When I woke up, there was a letter next to me. It says here to give it to you, senior Aoyun." The little junior handed a letter over while trembling with fear, and on the letter, it said, "Please pass it to Dugu Aoyun".
Seeing that, Dugu Aoyun tightly frowned as he received the letter. After he opened it, Dugu Aoyun's face changed greatly and strong killing intent spread out from his body, because on the letter, it said...
"I gift a beauty for your younger brother. I wish them a hundred years of good love, and loud songs sung every night——Asura."
"Damned Asura. One day, I will cut your corpse into ten thousand pieces." Dugu Aoyun ripped the letter into shreds. At that instant, he was endlessly furious and perhaps even a bit insane.
When he thought about his younger brother who was really framed by someone, and the person who framed him was the person who schemed against them yesterday Dugu Aoyun truly could not endure that resentment. He hiddenly vowed to slaughter the male who called himself as Asura.
From that day forth, as if he was insane, Dugu Aoyun searched the Valley of Hundred Bends and he wanted to try to find the whereabouts of that Asura. But it was useless. The Valley of Hundred Bends was so huge, and it was truly like fishing a needle in an ocean if he wanted to find someone in that place.
So, straight until the end of the Heroic Hunt, he still had no harvests. At the end, he could only leave the Valley of Hundred Bends with a stomach full of fury.
However, when everyone was leaving the Valley of Hundred Bends, Chu Feng chose to stay behind because he discovered that the Valley of Hundred Bends was truly a treasure trove. It was just like that place was a huge treasure itself, and endless Profound medicines were waiting for him to be taken.
If he stayed there for a longer time and waited until the date of the arranged battle, perhaps Chu feng could make several more breakthroughs and use his own body's cultivation to defeat Gong Luyun.
However, when the Heroic Hunt ended, Chu Feng finally knew why everyone knew that it was a treasure trove, yet had no choice but to leave after the predetermined time. At that very instant, terrifying invisible pressure appeared in the entire Valley of Hundred Bends.
That pressure was very strange. It made people unable to breathe, but it only affected humans because Chu Feng discovered that other than him, the plants, animals, including Monstrous Beasts, were same as usual and safe and sound. Only he received the pressure.
"Dammit. Are the people from the Lingyun School and the Qilin Prince's Mansion really this strong? They can seal the entire Valley of Hundred Bends into a dead zone like this?"
The current Chu Feng was already in the air, but it was in vain as after going above the clouds, he only felt a bit of comfortableness but he could not get rid of the strange pressure. In that situation, not to mention continuing to hunt Profound medicines in the Valley of Hundred Bends, it would be hard on top of hard if he even wanted to survive.
"No. This was absolutely not sealed by the many powerful people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion and the Lingyun School. It would be impossible for them to have these kinds of methods." Eggy explained.
"If I'm not mistaken, this Valley of Hundred Bends isn't controlled by the many powers in the Azure Province. The Valley of Hundred Bends itself decides the opening time everywhere because the Valley of Hundred Bends is a huge formation by itself. No matter if it's the Lingyun School or the Qilin Prince's Mansion, neither of them are able to control this formation." Eggy continued saying.
"What? This vast Valley of Hundred Bends is a formation? What kind of methods do you need to lay such a strong formation?" After hearing those words, Chu Feng was endlessly shocked, then he added, "What should we do now?"
"The formation just opened so this strange pressure isn't too strong yet. However, as time passes, it will get more and more scary. When it completely opens, with your cultivation, you will not be able to endure this."
"So, you must quickly leave this place or else even if you are in the air, you will suffocate to death by the pressure." Eggy tensely reminded.
Chu Feng didn't dare to be slow and he quickly flew towards the outsides of the Valley of Hundred Bends. But it was in vain, because just like how Eggy said it was, the pressure became more and more strong. So strong that he could not breath, and if that continued on, he could not leave that place alive.
"That's.." But just as Chu Feng felt that he wasn't going to have much luck, within his line of sight, a mountain peak appeared. It was the mountain peak that he saw before, and one with the mysterious temple.
At that moment, from the temple which was on the summit of the mountain peak, there was faint smoke rising from it. That meant that other than Chu Feng, there was another person who stayed in the Valley of Hundred Bends.


MGA Capitulo 234  Hidden Expert
The Valley of Hundred Bends was a terrifying formation as its range went from the ground to the sky. As long as it was within the scope of the Valley of Hundred Bends, there would be a layer of invisible pressure that engulfed them and started to suppress humans.
That scary pressure was not blockable even if it was Chu Feng. However, in such a place, there was someone staying there. And in that instant, it was right in front of his eyes.
"Hey! Is there anyone? Can you help me out?"
The current Chu Feng was on the border of life and death, but he knew that the master of the temple must have a method to decipher the formation. After all, that person was very possibly a Blue-cloak World Spiritist. His Spirit Formation methods would certainly be incomparable by Chu Feng.
Besides, from the smoke, he could tell that there was indeed someone there, and that person was not affected by the strange pressure, or else how would he be so peaceful as to cook there?
So, Chu Feng used all his power to rush near the temple hall. At that instant, he didn't care who the master of the temple hall was or whether it was dangerous or not. He knew that if the master there helped him, he would have a string of chance to live. If he didn't help, he would undoubtedly die.
*whoosh* Just as Chu Feng was going to get near, a person jumped out from the temple hall and landed on the summit of the mountain peak.
It was an old man who had white hair and a face full of wrinkles. However, his eyes were bright and lively. The most important thing was that the old man wore a golden-coloured robe. On the chest section of that robe, there was even a Qilin. He was a person from the Qilin Prince's Mansion.
When the old man saw that Chu Feng could stand in air, he couldn't help but tightly frown and a hint of shock emerged onto his face. After a while, he calmed back down and indifferently asked, "Who are you?"
"Senior, I am a disciple from the Azure Dragon School and I came to participate in the Heroic Hunt."
"However, since I was unable to leave the Valley of Hundred Bends in time, I am being restricted by strange pressure. Right now, I cannot breathe so I hope that you can save my life." Chu Feng went straight into the main topic because he really did not have time to speak any useless words.
"My apologies. I am not the master here so I cannot decide. How about this. Wait a while and I'll go ask. As for whether he is willing to help you or not will depend on your luck." The old man left those words, then after assessing Chu Feng with surprise, his body leaped and he rushed back into the temple hall.
At that moment, within the temple hall, an old man with a lively face while wearing clothing that was roughly made by cloth was sitting in front of a stove. He had one leg over the other while humming a little tune as he cooked soup in high spirits. As he saw the white-haired old man return, the cloth-clothed old man very casually asked, "Fengyang, what kind of person intruded into my territory?"
"A boy at the 1st level of the Profound realm." The white-haired old man said.
"A boy at the 1st level of the Profound realm? Fengyang, what kind of joke is that? Clearly, that person came over while walking on air. How can he have the cultivation of the 1st level of the Profound realm? He should be in the Heaven realm." The cloth-clothed old man suspiciously curled his lips.
"You knew yet you told me to go, and at the end, I told you yet you don't believe. You're a Blue-cloak World Spiritist, so wouldn't you know who that person is if you check?" The white-haired old man helplessly glared at the cloth-clothed old man.
At that instant, the cloth-clothed old man already closed his eyes, and when he reopened them, a bit of shock also appeared emerged into his gaze as he said, "Impressive. 1st level of the Profound realm and he already grasped a method to walk on air. It seems that he cultivated a special bodily martial skill and he isn't that old. I say, Fengyang, it seems that your Azure Province has a good seedling huh."
"But sadly, he is unable to endure the pressure from this formation. I'm afraid that his little life will be hard to be kept alive." The cloth-clothed old man shook his head and continued humming the little tune and cooking the meat soup on the stove.
"Brother Hengyuan, in my Azure Province, there aren't many martial skills that allow someone to walk on air. This person must got the inheritance of the Imperial Sky Sage. It's quite hard to see the Imperial Sky Sage's unique skill, for walking on air that disappeared for a hundred years, reappear."
"I wonder if brother Hengyuan can give me face and save his life?" The white-haired old man pleaded.
"Brother Fengyang, martial skills for walking on air are hard to get treasures in any of the Nine Provinces. However, what does that have to do with me?"
"I hiddenly live in this place because I don't want anyone to disturb me. Since he discovered this area, in the future, it would be hard for him to keep this a secret and he would leak it out. Not to mention if he doesn't die from the formation pressure here, even if he lives, I will not let him leave alive." The cloth-clothed old man faintly smiled.
"Brother Hengyuan, are you truly not going to save a life?" The white-haired old man slightly frowned.
"It seems like you don't understand me enough." The cloth-clothed old man smiled and he was not moved.
*whoosh* At that instant, the white-haired old man did not waste any words anymore. He leaped out of the temple hall and arrived on the summit of the mountain peak once again.
As he looked at Chu Feng who stood on air, had a deathly-white face, and was going fall down at any moment, he tightly frowned as if doing a hard decision.
But at the end, he still grinded his teeth and took out a crystal-like badge from his chest pocket. He threw it towards Chu Feng and said, "Catch."
*bang* Seeing that, Chu Feng quickly extended his hand to receive it, and after getting the badge, the invisible pressure that circled around Chu Feng instantly disappeared. The air and Profound power that vanished before reappeared around Chu Feng.
In that instant, Chu Feng was incomparably happy because he was finally saved. He first closed his eyes and deeply breathed for a few moments. For the first time, he felt that breathing was quite a comfortable thing.
"Thank you senSenior, what's wrong?"
Chu Feng originally wanted to thank him, but he discovered with astonishment that the white-haired old man's face was a bit pale-white and it was a bit ugly. He looked just like how Chu Feng was earlier.
"I only have one of the badges. After giving it to you, I have to bear the formation pressure here as well." The white-haired old man calmly smiled and said.
"What? This.." After hearing those words, Chu Feng was instantly greatly shocked. He never would have thought that the old man who met him for the first time and were complete strangers would sacrifice his life in order to save him.
That put Chu Feng in a difficult situation. He could see that the master of that area was not willing to save him and that the old man decided this on his own. He gave his own object of protection to Chu Feng, but from that, he himself sank into danger.
Although Chu Feng really wanted to continue living, he was not willing to let an old man who he met for the first time lose his life in order to save him.
"Chu Feng, quickly remember the formation in this badge. As long as you remember it, I can help you recreate a protection badge like this. At that time, naturally, you can hold the formation pressure off." Just at that time, Eggy's pleasing voice rang out in Chu Feng brain.
At that instant, Chu Feng suddenly realized what to do. Without hesitating, he quickly imbued his Spirit power into the crystal-like badge and he studied the formation in the badge.
After a while, he raised his head with a flash of enlightenment and he discovered that the white-haired old man's face was getting more and more ugly. So, he said, "Senior, I am Chu Feng. What would your great name be? In the future, I will certainly repay this life-saving favour."
"Ho..Little friend, you're called Chu Feng? That is quite a good name." Qi Fengyang forced a light smile out, but he could not conceal the pain of having trouble breathing.
"Big favours are not thanked with words. In the future, I will repay this favour with actions. Senior, I hope we will meet again." After saying those words, Chu Feng threw the badge in his hand back to Qi Fengyang.
"Chu Feng, you" At the same time that Qi Fengyang caught the badge, he discovered that Chu Feng already turned around and left. At that instant, he originally wanted to chase, but he could not as he who was not able to walk on air was powerless.
"This boy is quite courageous. But that's good. If he did not give the protective badge back to you, I would have personally taken it back. It is always better for him to take the initiative to hand it back rather than me killing him."
Just at that time, faint laughter rang out. The lively cloth-clothed old man already appeared next to Qi Fengyan without any voice. However, he was not standing on the peak of the mountain. He was standing on air.


MGA Capitulo 235  7th Level of the Origin Realm
"Ahh...Since he did that, it also meant that sacrificing myself to save him was not in vain."
"However, if he lost his life just like that, it would really be quite a pity. Can you truly not help him out?" Qi Fengyan looked at the cloth-clothed old man next to him and his gaze brought a bit of pleading.
"Did you really sacrifice yourself to save him just now? You just took your life to threaten me. You knew that I would save you if you were going to die." The cloth-clothed old man sharply said, then added,
"Oh Fengyang. in this Azure Province, I only have you as a friend. I don't want the feelings between us to be affected by a boy like him." After saying that, the cloth-clothed old man patted Fengyang's shoulder and walked back into his own temple.
As he looked at the departing back, a bitter smile appeared on Qi Fengyang's face. He understood the meaning behind the cloth-clothed old man's words. Also, he was very clear that in front of that person, it was already an honor to speak to him as equals. He truly had no qualifications to ask that person to help him do anything.
"Young man, I hope that you have good luck and fate to be able to use your own abilities to leave this place." After that, Qi Fengyang regrettably looked at the direction Chu Feng left in, and also returned back to the temple.
*whoosh* As Qi Fengyang felt pity for Chu Feng, Chu Feng arrived on top of another mountain peak and he started to lay the Spirit Formation to condense the protective badge that would able him to hold the formation pressure away.
"That didn't work, it's too complicated. Although I know the method of condensing it, I can't condense it out quickly." Chu Feng tightly frowned. He discovered that the methods of Blue-cloak World Spiritists was indeed very challenging for him, who was a Grey-cloak World Spiritist.
"Chu Feng, keep on going. I believe that you can. You understand this method of condensation very clearly, but you just don't have a good enough quality Spirit Formation. However, I believe that you can do it. You have to continue on or else not only will you die, even I will die with you."
As she faced that situation, Eggy was completely helpless as well. Although she was clear on how to do it, she had no way of helping Chu Feng to do it. Although she could borrow Chu Feng's body, she could only use her own power to fight but not use the Spirit Formation of her own. So, at that moment, Chu Feng only only rely on himself.
"Right, I must succeed. I cannot fail. I still have too many things to do, and besides, even if I die I can't let Eggy die with me."
After hearing Eggy's words, Chu Feng instantly found the force. He did not even know where he got the power from, but at that moment, it wasn't as hard to bear as before. Even if there was no air to breathe, he could still concentrate and lay the formation with his full power to condense the badge.
Under a situation like that, like a miracle, Chu Feng lasted for an hour. He did not breathe for an hour, and that was quite a big test on the heart. If he was a normal person, he would have already died. But Chu Feng was able to last that long.
Although the current him had a pale-white face like paper, his gaze was abnormally burning as he tightly stared at the Spirit Formation in front of his eyes. Layer by layer, he merged his Spirit Formation power into it and with clever methods, they combined into one.
*hmm* Finally, hot light spread out from it and the boundless Spirit Formation quickly started to condense. Finally, with four symbols as the shrinking point, it became a small and delicate Spirit Formation badge.
That Spirit Formation badge was as translucent as crystal and it was very beautiful. However, it was filled with Spirit Formation power inside it, and the Spirit Formation power was currently revolving around in complicated paths. It was the formation that Chu Feng condensed out.
At the same time, when he had the badge in his hand, the pressure that lingered around Chu Feng instantly disappeared like smoke and clouds. That meant something. It meant that Chu Feng succeeded.
"Chu Feng, you've succeeded. You've really succeeded! This is great, you're able to do something that only Blue-cloak World Spiritists can do!" At that instant, Eggy's smile was called sweet, and she was skipping and bouncing in the World Spirit Space as she excitedly cheered.
She was truly happy from the bottom of her heart for Chu Feng. Not only did that mean that Chu Feng saved his own life as well as hers since Chu Feng could do that, it also meant that his potential was extremely exceptional and he had extremely high talent.
"I still have to thank that senior. If he didn't help me by lending the badge to me so I could learn the condensation method for the badge, I'm afraid that I would have been in some huge troubles" Chu Feng bitterly chuckled and a bit of gratitude emerged onto his face.
From then on, Chu Feng who had the badge in his hands was like a fish in water as he was in the Valley of Hundred Bends. Before, he was sharing the treasures along with the young generation of the Azure Province.
But now, he was free to use anything in the Valley of Hundred Bends. Not only the Profound medicines, but even the exquisite fragrant animal meat and also the sweet and tasty spring water there. Chu Feng truly loved that place.
In addition, other than the Valley of Hundred Bends, Chu Feng did not know if he could find another area where he could plunder a large amount of Profound medicines.
So, when Chu Feng stayed in the Valley of Hundred Bends, he stayed for an entire half year. In that period of time, Chu Feng plundered countless Origin medicines and countless Profound medicines, but the Valley of Hundred Bends was truly too big. Even if he searched every day, Profound medicines were as though they were endless and Chu Feng could not find the end to them.
But what Chu Feng was helpless towards was no matter how much stronger his Spirit power was and how many more Profound medicines he refined, it would never be enough for the Divine Lightning in his body to engulf. After half a year of time, Chu Feng's cultivation only rose by two levels and he only entered the 7th level of the Origin realm.
Although that cultivation did not seem that strong, with Chu Feng's methods, there was no need to talk about those at the 3rd level of the Profound realm. Only those at the 4th level of the Profound realm could fight with him. So, he felt that with his own cultivation, it was no longer a problem to take care of Gong Luyun.
However, although Chu Feng's cultivation increased by a bit in the half year, since Eggy could not absorb any strong Source energy, her cultivation had not increased at all and she still remained in the 1st level of the Profound realm.
But knowing that Chu Feng wanted to defeat Gong Luyun with his own strength, Eggy did not blame Chu Feng at all. Rather, she encouraged Chu Feng to cultivate in that place. After all, after the arranged battle, Chu Feng had plenty of time to search for Source energy for Eggy.
On that day, Chu Feng counted the dates a bit and there was less than a month until the arranged battle. As he thought about some things he wanted to take care of before the arranged battle, Chu Feng decided to leave the Valley of Hundred Bends.
It was because the battle would not be as simple as he imagined it to be. After all, on that day, Lin Ran from the Qilin Prince's Mansion would protect Gong Luyun, so if Chu Feng killed Gong Luyun, after that day, Lin Ran would absolutely not just let it go.
So, Chu Feng had to do some preparations. Or at least before he stirred up a disaster, his family would not be affected by him again.
At the same time that Chu Feng was preparing to leave, on the mountain peak, the cloth-clothed old man and Qi Fengyan were currently playing chess in the temple hall.
"Brother Hengyuan, thanks to you these days, I already feel the critical point for a breakthrough. If this continues, before half a year, I can make a breakthrough from the 9th level of the Profound realm to enter the Heaven realm." Qi Fengyan gratefully said.


MGA Capitulo 236  Worth a Help
"Brother Fengyan, in the past years in the Azure Province, I also have to thank you for taking care of me. With the relationship between us two, these words are too polite."
"But, coming from the Qilin Prince's Mansion and as the chief of the Qi clan, will there really be no problems after leaving the Prince's Mansion for so long?" The cloth-clothed old man made his next move with a smile.
"As long as I enter the Heaven realm, I can stand shoulder-to-shoulder with the lord of the mansion. Even if the Lin clan and that old thing suppresses my Qi clan when I'm not there, when I get back, they can only yield to me." As he mentioned that matter, Qi Fengyang had proudness all over his face.
"Right now, in the Nine Provinces, the Heaven realm is no longer a legend but in your Azure Province, only the lord of the Qilin Prince's Mansion and the head of the Lingyun School entered that realm. No wonder the Azure Province is the weakest out of of the Nine Provinces." The cloth-clothed old man shook his head.
"Ho ho." Qi Fengyang could only bitterly smile at the cloth-clothed old man's mocking words and he did not refute.
To think that at first, the Azure Province had the most powerful people and it was always the strongest province in the Nine Provinces, but at first, was at first. Currently, it was truth that the Azure Province was in decline. Of course, the reason why the Azure Province was in decline was because their generation was too mediocre.
Thinking to that point, even Qi Fengyang couldn't help but sigh, "Looking over at the current young generations in the Azure Province, there aren't many people who are too exceptional. Dugu Aoyun is not bad in the Azure Province, but within the young generations in the entire Nine Provinces, he is a bit too mediocre. Does the heavens really want my Azure Province to die out?"
"It won't. A quite outstanding person in the young generation in your Azure Province has appeared. Just give him a bit of time, and he will certainly surpass Dugu Aoyun." The cloth-clothed old man indifferently smiled and said.
"Brother Hengyuan, what do you mean by that?" After hearing those words, Qi Fengyang's calm expression couldn't help but change and he quickly questioned.
"There isn't only two people in the Valley of Hundred Bends. Other than you and me, there's another person who stayed in the Valley of Hundred Bends for a good half a year."
"Also, within this half a year, he has gotten quite a good harvest. He stole the Profound medicines from the Monstrous Beasts' treasure trove for breeding, and he went wherever he wished in the entire Valley of Hundred Bends. The most important thing is that he is a Grey-cloak World Spiritist, and he's even a young man. If he can do such things at such an age, his future truly is unlimited." The cloth-clothed old man smiled once again.
"A young man with the abilities of a Grey-cloak World Spiritist?" At that instant, Qi Fengyang was truly unable to remain calm. He excitedly and suddenly stood up because to the Azure Province, a Grey-cloak World Spiritist was certain quite a character.
A young man? A young man being able to become a Grey-cloak world Spiritist was certainly quite an impressive thing and he had to value that.
But after some more detailed thinking, Qi Fengyang felt that something was wrong. So, he said, "Brother Hengyuan, but this is the Valley of Hundred Bends! You said unless it's a Blue-cloak World Spiritist or someone in the Heaven realm with extremely strong power, no one can hold the pressure back after the formation opened in the Valley of Hundred Bends. How can a Grey-cloak World Spiritist survive for half a year in this place?"
"Haha, isn't that the outstandingness of that young man? On that topic, the reason why he can survive is all thanks to you, brother Fengyang. On that day, if you didn't give the protective badge over to him, it would not be possible for him to remember the formation to condense the badge."
"However, even so, I do have to admit that this child is quite exceptional. After all, if you weren't a Blue-cloak World Spiritist, you had no way of condensing my formation. But he did it. Say for yourself, isn't he quite an outstanding person in the young generation?" The cloth-clothed old man lightly smiled and said
"Brother Hengyuan, you're saying that the young man who lived in the Valley of Hundred Bends for half a year was Chu Feng from that day?" At that instant, Qi Fengyuan finally realized who it was and his gaze was filled with shock.
"Naturally, it's him." The cloth-clothed old man nodded his head.
"I said that the young man was a rare genius! But I never would have thought that he would be a genius to this stage. No wonder he could get the inheritance of the Imperial Sky Sage." Also at that moment, Qi Fengyuan finally understood and at the same time that he was stunned, he smiled as if he was enlightened and more and more, he felt that the action he did that day was correct.
"What is even the Imperial Sky Sage? He was just a person at the peak of the Profound realm and he could never even touch the Heaven realm in his life. The reason why he was able to create the air-walking martial skill was certainly because of chances in addition to luck."
"That young man is a lot more outstanding than him because half a year ago, a mysterious character appeared in the Azure Province Mr. Grey-cloak. Not only did that Mr. Grey-cloak alert the Lingyun School, he even alerted your Qilin Prince's Mansion. Even though he disappeared for half a year, he is still a person who is discussed in the free time of the people in the Azure Province."
"If I'm not mistaken, this Mr. Grey-cloak should be the young man called Chu Feng." The cloth-clothed old man continued saying.
"There is actually such things... It seems that this Chu Feng is quite a restless boy."
After hearing the cloth-clothed old man's narration, the smile on Qi Fengyan's face got more and more wider. His heart was endlessly excited, because if a person was more restless, that meant that they would be more able to become a great character.
After all, within the peak powerful people in history, which one of them did not show their abilities when they were young and looked down upon the people from their own generation? Right now, a young man like that appeared in the Azure Province, so Qi Fengyang was as though he saw the light. Naturally, he would be incomparably joyful.
"However, this boy might face a calamity." Suddenly, the cloth-clothed old man suddenly said.
"Calamity? Brother Hengyuan, what do you mean?" After hearing that, Qi Fengyuan's expression changed greatly.
"This child has set a life and death battle with a person and the date of it is nearing. His opponent is the son of the Black Tortoise City's lord and he receives deep love from Lin Ran from your Qilin Prince's Mansion's Lin clan. In the past half year, in order to develop him, he did not exhaust a small amount of your Qilin Prince's Mansion's resources."
"As for that young man, even though he has extraordinary talent, he doesn't have any background in the Azure Province. So, I feel that he won't have much luck in his battle." The cloth-clothed old man explained.
After hearing those words, Qi Fengyuan tightly frowned, then he said to the cloth-clothed old man, "Brother Hengyuan, I"
"Go ahead. I know that you want a presentable young generation in the Azure Province. This boy is quite worthy for you to help." Before even letting Qi Fengyang finish his words, the cloth-clothed old man waved his hand at him.
"Indeed, you know me well. Brother Hengyuan, I'll take my leave." As he spoke, Qi Fengyan wanted to leave, but he stopped his steps when he was at the entrance. He turned around, clasped his hands, and said, "Brother Hengyuan, thank you for leaving this child with his life. I thank you in his place."
After Qi Fengyang left, the face of the cloth-clothed old man became more solemn. Worry filled his gaze, and as he stood on the mountain peak, he looked at the distant sky and faintly said,
"It has been six years, so why haven't you appeared yet? A Divine Body should not stay so silent and unknown right? Is it possible that some accident truly happened?"
At that instant, the cloth-clothed old man couldn't help but sigh as he gradually closed his eyes and his thoughts floated towards the night that happened six years ago.
On that night, above the silver rivers of the nine heavens, a nine-coloured divine lightning appeared. It shook the entire continent, but at the end, it shot towards the Azure Province.
On that night, the several tens of thousands of dynastical experts from the Jiang Dynasty headed towards the Azure Province. They vowed to find the Divine Body, but they returned empty-handedly.


MGA Capitulo 237  Chu Guyu Meets Trouble
After Chu Feng left the Valley of Hundred Bends, the first place he headed towards was the number one school in the Azure Province, the Lingyun School.
His goal was to find his elder brother, Chu Guyu. After the Chu family gathering a year ago, Chu Feng hadn't seen his elder brother even once.
However, his elder brother, undoubtedly, was the person Chu Feng cared about the most in the Chu family. If Chu Feng had to say who was the most important person in the Chu family, other than his father Chu Yuan, it would be Chu Guyu. They were the two persons that Chu Feng felt any family feelings from.
Currently, as the battle between Chu Feng and Gong Luyun was nearing, there would certainly be troubles in the future. Although Chu Guyu was a disciple from the Lingyun School, after all, he had a petty status and with his strength, he had no way of protecting himself.
It was too easily for the Gong family to harm him if they wished to. So, Chu Feng wanted to bring Chu Guyu away to a more safer place.
"You said that Chu Guyu isn't in the Lingyun School? Where did he go?" As he was in front of the Lingyun School's entrance, Chu Feng looked at the Lingyun School's outer court disciple with a bit of shock.
"How should I know? You're his relative, so if you don't know, how should I know?"
The disciples from the Lingyun School were very prideful. Even the outer court disciples were like that. He could not see what cultivation Chu Feng had, so he even thought that Chu Feng was a commoner. Therefore, the gaze he looked at Chu Feng was filled with disdain, and the big word "annoyance" was written all over his face.
After knowing that Chu Guyu left the Lingyun School, Chu Feng's heart was like tangled hemp and he didn't even bother with that disciple. However, after some more careful thinking, where would Chu Guyu possibly go after leaving the Lingyun School? After all, at that moment, the Chu family did not exist anymore, and Chu Guyu would not leave the Lingyun School, which was a huge shelter, for no cause or reason.
"Brother, what kind of relationship do you have with senior Chu?" However, as Chu Feng prepared to leave the Lingyun School, a male walked over.
He was also a disciple from the Lingyun School, but he was just an outer court disciple. His age was similar to Chu Guyu's, and at that instant, he appeared in front of Chu Feng. Not only did he not have the arrogance like the other Lingyun School disciples, rather, his face was full of smiles.
"I am Chu Guyu's younger brother, and I'm called Chu Feng. Senior, do you know where my elder brother went?" Chu Feng felt that the male would not randomly come over to talk to him, so he must know some hidden things.
"Brother Chu Feng, come over here to speak." After the male looked around him, he pulled Chu Feng to a corner where there was no one. Only then did he speak, "I entered the Lingyun School at the same time with your elder brother. When we were in the outer court, we were good brothers."
"He had better talent than me and became an inner court disciple before me. However, that still did not affect the relationship between us two."
"Your elder brother did have quite good talent, and if he continued to cultivate, even if he could not become a core disciple, he would have become an elder in the Lingyun School."
"However, half a year ago, something happened in your family right?" The male suddenly asked.
"Mm. There was an incident in the family, and our father passed away." Chu Feng did not say the truth, because a family being exterminated was never good when said.
"Ahh, no wonder. After getting hold of that news, he instantly became another person. He contacted me even less and his temper was abnormally violent. Exactly because of that, him, who usually followed the rules, offended the grandson of an inner court elder."
"Not only was your elder brother heavily injured, he was even kicked out of the Lingyun School." The disciple sighed and said.
"My elder brother got kicked out of the Lingyun School? Who was it? Who harmed my elder brother?" After hearing those words, Chu Feng was endlessly furious, and he was even a bit mad.
"Whatever, it wouldn't be useful even if I told you. However, I can tell you where your elder brother is right now." The male spoke.
Five hundred miles away from the Lingyun School, there was a small tavern. There were no waiters in the tavern and there was only one boss. That boss was none other than Chu Feng's elder brother, Chu Guyu.
The current Chu Guyu was exactly eighteen years old and it was the great age of being at one's prime. However, the heroic spirit from the past could not be seen anymore.
The current him was wearing a roughly made cloth-clothing, and huge changes happened on his gloomy and dispirited face. As he walked, he was also limping. He became a cripple.
"Oi oi oi, Chu Guyu, god damn! Can't you be a bit faster? Don't you know I'm hungry?"
"Where's the beer? Where's the beer? Quickly bring the beer! Damn, if you don't be faster, I'll smash your broken tavern up."
Within the tavern, three tables were filled with guests. There were roughly six people per table, and all of them were inner court disciples from the Lingyun School. As they drank beer, they pointed at Chu Guyu and loudly cursed at him.
Chu Guyu already got used to that scene. He could not offend the group of people, because he didn't dare to offend the group of people. However, it wasn't for himself. He thought about his younger brother.
"Senior Zhao, this Chu Guyu can endure quite a bit. Every month, we come here to break his tavern, yet he still remains here and doesn't leave." A disciple spoke to a male who had a white face as well as a goatee.
"He doesn't dare. Although his Chu family was exterminated, Chu Guyu still has a younger brother called Chu Feng. Right now, that Chu Feng is in the Azure Dragon School cultivating. If he dares to leave this place, I will make his younger brother even more miserable than him." The goatee male sneered and said.
"It seems that Chu Guyu has quite deep feelings towards his younger brother. He can do such sacrifices for the safety of his younger brother. However, senior Zhao, from what I see, you should just kill him. Since he dares to offend you, he should not be living in his world." Another disciple agreed and said.
"Heh..It's extremely simple to kill him, but that would be too good for him. I want him to continue living so pettily. More poor than any person, and more miserable than any person. Today, I will destroy his cultivation, and he will thoroughly become a cripple."
The goatee male drank a mouthful of beer and coldness appeared in his eyes. After that, with some shattering noises, the cup was thrown onto the floor.
*clatter clatter* Seeing that, the disciples from the other two tables also suddenly flipped the tables over. Then, they cast their gazes of ill intent towards Chu Guyu who walked out from the kitchen.
At that moment, there was a dish of food on one of Chu Guyu's hands, and beer in the other. He already expected the scene in front of his eyes. He helplessly looked at the goatee male, and indifferently said,
"Zhao Di, isn't it enough? I am no longer a Lingyun School disciple and I also did not leave your line of sight. No matter how you say it, I am still a cultivator. Even if I don't have the halo of being a disciple from the Lingyun School, I still have my achievements."
"I know that you don't want me to be well, so I pettily opened this tavern here. But even so, you are still not willing to let me go? What do you want me to do?"
"Hmph. Let you go? If I let you go, I wouldn't be Zhao Di. What I want you to do? I want you to be even more miserable. It seems that you aren't clear where you belong. A cultivator? Today, you will not longer be a cultivator. You will not even be a commoner."
As he spoke, the goatee male suddenly stood up. He took out a dagger that flashed with coldness from his sleeve, and aggressively walked towards Chu Guyu.


MGA Capitulo 238  The Burning Flames of Fury
As the goatee male held the dagger, he went closer to Chu Guyu with a fierce face. He already emanated the pressure of the 1st level of the Origin realm.
"Kneel." The goatee male explosively yelled, and the pressure formed by Origin realm surged towards Chu Guyu like the tide.
At that instant, Chu Guyu wanted to resist, but how could he, who only had the cultivation of the 7th level of the Spirit realm, resist the pressure of a person in the Origin realm? With a poof, he knelt down.
*bang bang* After he arrived in front of Chu Guyu, the goatee male spread open his arms and gave Chu Guyu two loud and clear slaps. The strong power forcibly threw Chu Guyu to the ground and blood sprayed out from his mouth. Two big lumps swelled up from the sides of his face.
"Heh" Chu Guyu only chuckled at the goatee male's slap. He already gotten used to it. He already gotten used to the various types of humiliation from them. However, he never fought back.
It wasn't that he didn't dare to fight back, it was that he didn't want to fight back. He knew that he had an outstanding younger brother. As long as he gave his young brother a certain amount of time, he could certainly grow up well. At that time, all the humiliation that he suffered could all be given back, and the great hatred of the extermination of his Chu family could also be avenged.
"Ha? You laugh? God damn, you can still laugh?"
"I'll let you laugh. I'll let you laugh! Let me see if you can still laugh."
The goatee male was enraged by Chu Guyu's laugher. He raised his leg, and stepped onto Chu Guyu's other feet. With a cracking sound, Chu Guyu's other perfect leg was snapped by the goatee male.
The pain of his leg breaking engulfed him, but Chu Guyu tightly bit his teeth together and didn't make a sound. At the same time, he did not beg for forgiveness either, because he knew that begging was useless towards these kinds of people.
"Laugh! If you laugh again, you'll never be able to laugh again in your life." The goatee male kept on sneering, and he raised the dagger in his hand. Insanely, he stabbed towards Chu Guyu's dantian, and he was truly prepared to destroy Chu Guyu's cultivation.
"No!!!" At that instant, even Chu Guyu's expression greatly changed. He couldn't help but yell out loud. No matter how the goatee male treated him, he could endure it. However, he could not tolerate his own cultivation being destroyed. That was his life! How could he let the power exchanged from eight years of martial cultivation be taken away by someone just like that?
However, not only did his yell not reduce the speed of the dagger's descent, it even increased the goatee male's determination in destroying Chu Guyu's cultivation.
The cold glare flashed past, and blood sputtered from Chu Guyu's body. The dagger deeply stabbed into Chu Guyu's dantian.
At that instant, Chu Guyu's face was deathly-white like paper. The piercing pain in his dantian caused his entire body to tremble, but he did not wail. His eyes were just widened into a circle as he stared at his own dantian without looking away. He personally saw the spiritual energy that he accumulated for eight years quickly flow away, until all of it left his body.
"Ah~~~~"
"I'll kill you!"
Suddenly, Chu Guyu loudly yelled, and like a fierce tiger that exploded, he stood up with endless fury and leaped towards the goatee male.
*bang* However, how could he, who lost his cultivation, defeat the goatee male? With a casual raise of his foot, he kicked Chu Guyu away like a sandbag and he ferociously collided at the tavern's wall.
"Ahh!"
When he landed, Chu Guyu sprayed out a mouthful of blood. Innumerable bones were broken from that, but even so, Chu Guyu still climbed up with everything he had and fiercely stared at the nearby goatee male. But it did nothing, as he did not have any strength. He didn't even have any strength to stand back up. Pretty much his entire body was shattered and crippled.
"From now on, you will be a diseased dog and you can only forever climb in front of me. Hahaha..." The goatee male looked at Chu Guyu madly with laughter, and his laughter was abnormally happy.
As they faced that scene, the group of dog legs behind him also laughed, but their hearts couldn't help but tremble because the goatee male's methods were too cruel. Truly, those who offended him were better off dead than alive.
[TN Dog legs -&gt "People who help their master do evil things"]
At the same time that the goatee male was abusing Chu Guyu, a White-headed Eagle descended from the sky and neared the small tavern. The person who sat on the White-headed Eagle was none other than Chu Feng.
The current Chu Feng already extended his Spirit power to the maximum and that made his hearing power very sensitive as well. So, when he heard a miserable cry, his face couldn't help but greatly change.
He jumped off from the White-headed Eagle, and with the Imperial Sky Technique, he quickly rushed into the little tavern because he heard the miserable cry. He could tell that the cry was his elder brother's, Chu Guyu's, voice.
*boom*
Chu Feng rushed into the tavern like lightning, and when he entered, he also brought along strong wind. When the wind rushed in, instantly, the tavern was stirred into a mess. Even the Lingyun School disciples in the tavern rolled around on the floor by the wind.
"Brother!"
After entering the tavern, Chu Feng's gaze was immediately locked onto Chu Guyu's body. As he looked at him who laid on the floor with injuries everywhere on his body, Chu Feng's heart almost jumped out and he quickly went forward to prop him up.
"Brother, brother!" Chu Guyu lost his cultivation so he was in extreme pain, but Chu Feng's voice woke him up. When he raised his head and discovered that Chu Feng was right in front of him, he was even more shocked.
However, when he swept with his gaze towards the goatee male and the others who climbed back up behind Chu Feng, he pushed Chu Feng away and loudly said, "Run! Brother, run!!"
"Brother? This person wouldn't be your trash younger brother who cultivates in the second-rate school, Chu Feng, right?"
The corner of the goatee male's mouth brimmed into a strange and evil smile. At the same time, the dog legs behind him also understood the goatee male's meanings. They already blocked the entrance of the tavern to prevent Chu Feng from escaping.
"Zhao Di, the person who offended you was me. If you have anything, do it towards me. I beg you, I beg you, please let my younger brother go!"
When he saw that the goatee male cast his fierce gaze towards Chu Feng, Chu Guyu knew that everything was not going well. He who was supported up by Chu Feng wanted to kneel back down to plead towards the goatee male.
*bang* However, before even letting Chu Guyu kneel down, a powerful big hand pulled him back up. It was Chu Feng.
As Chu Feng supported his elder brother up, his pair of eyes were glaring at the goatee male who was sneering. He coldly asked, "Was it you who did this to my brother?"
"That's right. I did it. What do you want to do? You, a mere second-rate school trash, can do what to me?" The goatee male mocked and laughed, but his laughter was unusually sinister.
As the goatee male admit it, both of Chu feng's eyes turned into a blood-red colour and the ice cold bloodlust that lingered all around his body instantly filled the entire tavern. He fiercely stared at the goatee male, and while gnashing his teeth, he said eight words, "I will make you wish you were dead."


MGA Capitulo 239  Blood Splattered All Over the Floor
Chu Feng's bloodlust was as bone-piercing as chilly air and it could take away one's soul. Everyone who was on scene, from outside to inside, were frozen straight to the heart. They quivered from fear and they kept on backing away. Some people's legs even softened and knelt on the ground by that bloodlust.
"What is happening? This aura, scary"
"Is this boy even a person?"
Some people trembled as they said those words, and those words were echoed by everyone who were there. They were terrified by that killing intent. They were truly fearful. The fear came from their own hearts.
"What is there to be afraid of? He is but a trash from a second-rate school. Any one of us can pinch him to death with one finger." Just at that time, the goatee male angrily bellowed.
His words did indeed increase quite a bit of confidence towards the dog legs behind him because they were not aware what lingered around Chu Feng was bloodlust.
They only knew that it wasn't pressure, so they could not determine Chu Feng's cultivation. However, subconsciously, they felt that Chu Feng's cultivation would not be too high. At least, he should not have entered the Origin realm.
So, the group of people stablized their hearts and endured the fear in the hearts. Not only did they no longer back away, they even walked towards Chu Feng with malicious intents. They wanted to finish Chu Feng who made them uneasy.
"Brother, I know you can escape. Run! Leave me and run! As long as you live, my Chu family will have hope. You cannot die!" Seeing that, Chu Guyu beared the pain in his body and roared at Chu Feng.
The reason why he endured the abuse for half a year was because he didn't want his younger brother, Chu Feng, to have anything happen to him. However, at that moment, Chu Feng sent himself here. That made him unceasingly panic because to him, he could be humiliated, his cultivation could be destroyed, but what he could not accept was anything happening to his younger brother.
"Run? He no longer has that chance!" But just at that time, the goatee male suddenly attacked. A strong and powerful fist, with layers of Origin power, was thrown towards Chu Feng.
When that fist came, ten thousand of Chu Guyu's hopes turned into dust. He felt that his own younger brother was undoubtedly dead. He felt that his Chu family was completely finished. However, in the next second, he was thoroughly shocked.
Chu Feng only barely raised his palm, and with a clear bang, he held the goatee male's fist into his hand. After that, his fist was completely crushed into pieces. Following that, Chu Feng waved his arm, and with a tearing sound, the goatee male's entire arm was pulled off.
"Ahh~~~~~~~~" Blood and flesh flew everywhere and it sprayed into the air. The bloody scene made people frightened and horrified, however the one who was most scared was none other than the goatee male. He was in incomparable pain. His miserable cries were like wolves, ghosts, and a pig being slaughtered.
"Youyouyou"
At that instant, the expressions of everyone who was there greatly changed and they were stunned. Although the goatee male wasn't that strong, at least he was in the Origin realm. How could his arm forcefully be ripped off by a second-rate school's disciple?
But in the next instant, they finally saw Chu Feng's methods. It wasn't Chu Feng's powerful strength. It was the torturing methods that completely surpassed the goatee male's. They saw what true cruelty was.
Chu Feng picked up the dagger that the goatee male dropped on the ground and started to cut the flesh away from his body, bit by bit. He was not even finished when eerie bones appeared after he cut his entire body to the point where no flesh was complete.
At that moment, the heart-tearing lung-splitting miserable cries rose up and down in the tavern. The goatee male painfully wailed as Chu Feng's methods were too much. It was too terrifying. The most terrifying methods were not be killed by people. It was the pain that one felt when they were still awake. Right in front of their eyes, Chu Feng was doing that.
As they looked at the goatee male, who was completely bloody everywhere on his body, and other than the head, almost every single part of his body was forcibly cut into a skeleton, the faces of the Lingyun School disciples who looked already greened because they saw what a true demon was.
"Ah~~~~~"
There was already someone who was unable to bear all that and they turned around to run. However, they were not able to run out of the tavern. Rather, those who dared to go near the entrance of the tavern were instantly turned into a pool of blood as they sprayed all over the entrance. At that instant, blood formed rivers in the entrance of the tavern.
"MaMaMaster"
"Pleapleaplease spare us. We were forced! Please spare our lives!"
At that instant, the people who were still in the tavern did not dare to advance nor did they dare to retreat. All of them knelt on the ground and they were almost going to collapse. However, Chu Feng paid no attention to them and he continued exerting his violence towards the goatee male.
At the same time, as he looked at the enemy who he was incomparably fearful towards before being made into such an unrecognizable state by his younger brother, and as he looked at the people who bullied him many times before kneeling in front of his younger brother while endlessly begging, Chu Guyu's face was already filled with shock.
He finally understood why his younger brother did not have any intentions to retreat earlier. It was because his younger brother already grew up. He was able to easily kill those at the Origin realm, and he was so strong that he could protect him, his elder brother.
At that instant, tears filled Chu Guyu's face. He cried from being moved. He was not crying because of his pain, nor crying because of his grievances. He was crying because he was emotional. His Chu family finally saw the hope. The hope that he was always waiting for.
"Brother, it's enough. Let them go."
Suddenly, Chu Guyu spoke. When he looked at his brother who made his great enemy into that state, his fury already disappeared and the hatred in his heart already faded away.
The kind him could not bear seeing the goatee male tormented like that. Even if he injuried him to that state, he also felt that the current actions by his younger brother already gave the goatee male a multiplied punishment.
"Brother." After hearing Chu Guyu's call, Chu Feng's blood-red eyes suddenly glittered. He who was filled by fury before finally came back to this senses.
When he looked at his elder brother who was still bleeding and still enduring pain, Chu feng didn't bother with the goatee male. He quickly went in front of his elder brother, took out a medicinal pill, and stuffed it into Chu Guyu's mouth.
"ThaThank you brother Guyu. Thank you brother Guyu."
Seeing that, the ones who were most happy were none other than the people who were still kneeling in the tavern. They first kowtowed at Chu Guyu, then as they stumbled, they started to run out the tavern.
To them at that very instant, the little tavern, the tavern that they knocked their heads on the ground for many times was just like an arena of carnage. It was so terrifying as it almost killed them.
So, when they ran outside, it was as though they returned to the human world. How blessed was that feeling. How peaceful.
*bang bang bang bang bang* However, just as they thought that they escaped a calamity, with a thought from Chu Feng, they exploded and died like blood-coloured fireworks one after the other and became many pools of blood.


MGA Capitulo 240  Forbidden Spirit Formation
"Brother, it's my fault. I'm useless. If I didn't come late, you wouldn't have"
As he hugged Chu Guyu, he looked at his own elder brother's broken legs and pierced dantian. From the corner of Chu Feng's eyes, two streams of hot tears rolled down. He knew how important cultivation was to Chu Guyu, and he knew how painful he felt when his cultivation was destroyed.
"I'm fine, don't worry. Only youare my Chu family's hope." Chu Guyu's face was deathly-white but a smile still hung on his face. After speaking those words, he closed his eyes, and fainted away.
"Brother, brother!" Chu Feng was very anxious. He kept on shaking Chu Guyu, and he was truly afraid that Chu Guyu would sleep like that and never wake again, and that his closest family member would leave him just like that.
"Chu Feng, don't panic,. Don't forget, you are a Grey-cloak World Spiritist." Just at that time, Eggy's voice rang out.
"Eggy, is there anyway to save my elder brother? I can't let him become a cripple. Absolutely not." Chu Feng nervously asked. Although he was a Grey-cloak World Spiritist, the methods he knew were limited. So, he put all his hope onto Eggy.
"They are only broken bones. With your current methods, it is very easy to fix them. On the other hand, there is quite some difficulty to recover one's cultivation. However, it is not like there isn't any method."
"However, the chance of success for this is very small. But right now, you can only give it a try." Eggy said.
"What method? Eggy, quickly say it." Seeing that there was a way, Chu Feng was clearly a bit stirred up because no matter how distant the hope was, it was better than no hope at all.
"In the Asura World, there is a forbidden Spirit Formation. It can take away one's cultivation and transfer it to another person. Because this Spirit Formation is too cruel and the success rate is extremely low, and if it fails, he might not even keep his life, it is forbidden in my Asura World. World Spirits are forbidden to pass this formation down to World Spiritists."
"However, this forbidden Spirit Formation is the only method to help your elder brother recover his cultivation. Luckily, that guy over there hasn't died yet so his cultivation can be taken. If it succeeds, your elder brother can become a person in the Origin realm. However, if it fails, your elder brother will" Eggy explained.
"Eggy, can this forbidden formation be done after a day?" Chu Feng asked.
"It can, however, if it fails, your elder brother's life would be lost. Are you prepared for that?" Eggy responded with a question.
"I understand my elder brother very well. To him, cultivation is extremely important. If he did not have any cultivation, if he was unable to cultivate, it would be more painful for him to live than to die."
"I'll make this decision for my elder brother. Since this has to be done, I might as well do it more thoroughly." As Chu Feng looked at the goatee male, resolution emerged into his gaze.
At first, Eggy didn't even understand Chu Feng's meaning. However, after Chu Feng brought the goatee male's objects back to the Lingyun School, and when an inner court elder hurriedly rushed towards the tavern, she understood Chu Feng's intentions.
"Dier, Dier! Damn, who did this to you? Ahh~~~~~"
That old man was a Lingyun School's inner court elder, but at the same time, he was the goatee male's grandfather. He was the person who kicked Chu Guyu out of the Lingyun School.
At that moment, the goatee male did not die yet. However, he could not even speak. His body already became a skeleton but the internal organs were still undamaged. However, his appearance was abnormally terrifying.
Seeing that his grandson was tortured to that state, the old man was both sorrowful and furious. At the same time that he was devastatingly grieved, he angrily went insane. He swore that if the person who tormented his grandson dared to appear in front of his face, he was absolutely going to cut that person's corpse into ten thousand pieces.
"Who? Who did it?! Get the hell out of here! I will skin you, pull your tendons, and cut your corpse into ten thousand pieces!" That old man furiously howled. He emanated the aura of the 1st level of the Profound realm and it shook the ground to the point where it trembled.
"How did you know that I will skin you, pull your tendons, and cut your corpse into ten thousand pieces?" Just at that moment, like a ghost, Chu Feng stood in front of the old man. At the same time, the strong pressure descended from the skies and forced the old man to kneel on the ground.
"YouYou...Who are you? My Zhao family has no grievances nor hatred towards you, so why did you need to treat my grandson like that?"
The old man roughly gasped from Chu Feng's pressure. On his face that was previously full of anger, instantly, it was replaced by fear and panic. He knew how strong the young man in front of him was, but he did not know when he made such a big enemy.
After hearing the old man's question, Chu Feng only faintly smiled and said, "I'm Chu Guyu's younger brother."
"What? You" At that instant, the old man suddenly understood and at the same time, he was endlessly shocked. He never would have thought that Chu Guyu who was so petty in the Lingyun School had such a strong younger brother. So strong that even he was powerless in front of him.
At that moment, the old man's face was like ash. He already gave up on resistance because when he saw the miserable state that his grandson was in as well as the nearby bloodstains, he already knew that this time, he angered a killing star. Begging was useless. The only thing he could do was to wait for death.
Chu Feng slowly walked in front of the old man, then looked at the goatee male who was barely living and indifferently said, "Remember. In your next life, have better memory. You can touch some people, but those from my Chu family cannot be touched." After speaking, with a thought, two rows of blood were released and it sprayed over that land.
Several days later, a group of people came into one of the cities in the Azure Province. They were a young group. There were males and females, and the oldest were only young adults. Many were still teenagers.
They bought a mansion in that place. That mansion was very luxurious, so luxurious that even the local rich families endlessly admired them because they who were viewed as wealthy didn't even have enough money to buy a mansion like that.
Chu Guyu laid in a certain room in the mansion. Chu Yue, Chu Xue, Chu Cheng, Chu Zhen, Chu Wei, and all of the people from the Chu family's young generation were next to his bed. Even Chu Xun and Chu Hongfei were there. Pretty much other than Chu Feng, all of the Chu family's young generation who were still alive were there.
Currently, they were gathered within that room and they lingered in front of Chu Guyu's bed. With faces full of worry, they stared at Chu Guyu and silently awaited his awakening.
"He's awake! He's awake!" Suddenly, Chu Xue loudly yelled, and at that instant, everyone was stirred up. Some people even jumped in excitement, and many people went up to call Chu Guyu's name.
"Chu Wei, Chu Yue, Chu Xue, you..Why are you here? IWhere is this place?" As he looked at the familiar faces in front of him, Chu Guyu was a bit lost on what he should do.
Seeing that, Chu Yue explained everything to Chu Guyu. It turned out that Chu Feng was afraid that the young generation of the Chu family would be in more danger. So, he told all of them to leave their schools and gather here. He bought the mansion and told them to change their names to live in that place. At that moment, Chu Feng already arranged everything. So, the Chu family's young generation also agreed with Chu Feng's thoughts and agreed to leave their schools. They peacefully remained in that area and concealed their identities.


MGA Capitulo 241  The Strong Younger Brother
"So it's like that. That's fine because this way, we, as a family, can reunite again."
After knowing that everything was his own younger brother's arrangements, Chu Guyu felt quite relieved because it proved his younger brother's abilities.
He was even more happy when he saw that every single family member was brimming with happy smiles as if all of them walked out from the pain of losing their families.
That proved that his Chu family was very strong. Also, after the current Chu family experienced that change, they did not have barriers between one another like before. They understood the preciousness of family, and from that, they became more close. That was something that he wanted to see.
"Brother Guyu, you need to get better quickly! We will need to rely on your protection!" Chu Yue giggled and said.
"Yeah Guyu, the current Chu family will be managed by you. We will need to rely on you." Chu Wei also happily smiled.
After hearing the words of the two people, Chu Guyu was first at a loss, and quickly, the happy face instantly gloomed down as he bitterly smiled and said,
"If it was before, indeed, I could rebuild the Chu family along with everyone. But the current me is already a cripple. I can't even use any strength, so don't mention about protecting all of you, and even more, don't mention about managing the Chu family."
"Brother Guyu, what kind of joke are you making? You became a cripple? Didn't a miracle happen and you became a powerful person in the Profound realm?" Chu Xue sweetly smiled and said.
"Yeah Guyu, don't tease us anymore. Everyone knows all about it, hehe" At the same time, the crowd behind him all laughed, as if from their perspectives, what Chu Guyu just said was truly only a joke.
"A miracle happened? Became a powerful person in the Profound realm? Chu Xue, what are you talking about? What nonsense is everyone talking about?"
At that instant, Chu Guyu's face changed greatly as he pointed at the crowd and angrily bellowed. From what he saw as a cripple, it was just as though he was being mocked when he was being described by them in such a way.
"Brother Guyu, you" As she saw that Chu Guyu was actually angrily, Chu Xue frightenedly backed away and she didn't know what to do.
Also, all the Chu family members who were on scene put away their previous smiles and fog filled their heads. Fear even emerged onto their faces.
Chu Yue was the first to react to that, and she lightly smiled at Chu Guyu and said, "Brother Guyu, we know that at the same time that you met the miracle, you also received a rebound. However, Chu Feng said that as long as you peacefully rest for a while, everything will be fine."
"Right now, you are already an expert of the 1st level of the Profound realm. Two days ago, when you had a nightmare, the Profound power from your body was emanated out. Everyone felt it. If you don't believe me, you can feel your own body for a moment."
"Yeah, Guyu, we really felt it. On that day, I almost got crushed to death by your pressure!" At the same time, Chu Hongfei and the others nodded and agreed.
As he looked at the serious expressions of the crowd, although Chu Guyu still had a foggy head, he still went and felt his own body. Although he did not expect anything, his bewildered expression instantly greatly changed, and it was replaced with indescribable shock.
Sky flipping and ground turning change happened in his dantian, and it was completely different than what his previously understood. At that very instant, layers of endlessly strong aura kept on overflowing from his dantian and swept throughout his body.
That aura was far above spiritual energy, and even Origin power was left behind in the dust. It was Profound power. He became an expert of the Profound realm.
Chu Guyu felt as though he was in a dream and felt that it was so inconceivable. Even his body was trembling. Clearly, his cultivation was already destroyed, so how did he so mysteriously become someone in the Profound realm?
*whoosh* To confirm his current body, Chu Guyu suddenly leaped off the bed, and tapped the feet with his toes. Like an arrow leaving a bow, he shot and flew out like the wind. The lightning fast speed pretty much made everyone in the room shocked, and following that, mad joy appeared on their faces as they followed out.
At that instant, Chu Guyu was standing in the courtyard. As he raised his hands and feet, Profound power moved. Suddenly, he threw his fist towards the sky. Strong Profound power condensed into a huge fist and rushed up.
"II'm really in the Profound realm! This isn't a dream right?"
After confirming his own strength, although Chu Guyu was extremely joyful, he also had his doubts because he discovered that not only did great change happen to his cultivation, even his broken legs recovered, and it was as if it was even more powerful and agile than before.
"Brother Guyu, all of this is true! You really became a person in the Profound realm." As she saw that, Chu Yue giggled and said.
At the same time, all of the Chu family's young generation couldn't help but cheer. Before, the strongest person in the Chu family was only Chu Yuanba who was at the 1st level of the Origin realm. Yet at that moment, someone in the 1st level of the Profound realm appeared, and he was even so young. How could they not be happy?
Besides, not only did Chu Guyu's cultivation make them happy. Other than Chu Guyu, there was even Chu Feng in the Chu family who had terrifying cultivation and was currently building himself up. Also, even they did not need to worry about cultivation anymore, because at that moment, the Chu family could truly not be comparable to the past. No matter how mediocre their talent was, they could have certain achievements.
After that, Chu Yue told Chu Guyu to go into a room by himself. She told him that she didn't know what happened to him, but what Chu Feng said was that Chu Guyu had a miracle, and because of the rebound, he was in a coma and didn't wake up.
However, he only needed a period of time to rest and then he would be healed. Chu Guyu at that moment would be an expert in the 1st level of the Profound realm, and also at that moment, Chu Guyu would be the master of the Chu family.
At that instant, Chu Guyu finally understood something. Although it was quite unbelievable, he still guessed that the reason why both of his legs recovered and he had the cultivation of the 1st level of the Profound realm was all because it was bestowed by his younger brother, Chu Feng.
"Chu Yue, actually, I'm quite curious. What methods did Chu Feng use to make the young generation of my Chu family willing to leave their schools and to all gather here?" Chu Guyu curiously asked.
He understood the young generation of the Chu family extremely well. He knew that they were not such obedient people, and especially after the extermination of their family and the pain of losing them, they would not become that friendly. They would harbour deep grudges towards Chu Feng and it would possibly even last forever.
Yet now, they were able to be so united and every single person was so happy, as if the future was filled with hope. They didn't even have half a word of hatred towards Chu Feng, rather, there was even hidden respect from their words. That did not make sense at all, so it meant that Chu Feng must have done something.
"About that..It could be said that Chu Feng used his strength to convince everyone."
"Of course, he showed that strength by promising a large amount of cultivating resources to everyone. Oh, that's right! These cultivating resources will need to be handled by you. Every month, distribute some to everyone at the same time, because right now, you are the master of my Chu family!" As Chu Yue smiled, she handed a Cosmos Sack over to Chu Guyu.
As he received the Cosmos Sack, he was even muttering in his heart. How would the cultivating resources be able to turn the Chu family into that state?
"Heavens, this" After he checked the resources in the Cosmos Sack, his face instantly changed greatly and he was thoroughly shocked.
He discovered with astonishment that there were simply innumerable spiritual medicines in the Cosmos Sack. Origin medicines were even counted by tens of thousands, and there were even several thousand Origin beads as well as many priceless Profound medicines. Those resources were truly too terrifying. It was not even imaginable by him before.
Everything that happened today shook Chu Guyu's soul again and again. He only calmed down after a good while, and he sighed and said, "What stage has my younger brother grown to?"


MGA Capitulo 242  The Day of the Arranged Battle
Today was a grand day for the Azure Province's second-rate school, the Azure Dragon School.
Almost all of the outer court disciples, inner court disciples, and even core disciples all stopped their cultivation outside and returned to the Azure Dragon School.
Because on the same day one year ago, a nameless young male who just entered the core zone challenged the number one disciple in the Azure Dragon School, Gong Luyun, and also arranged for a life and death battle that was going to happen today.
Normally, such a nameless young man would not be seen as important by Gong Luyun, nor valued by the elders and disciples from the Azure Dragon School.
However, that young man couldn't avoid but be seen as important because he became the direct disciple of the only World Spiritist in the Azure Dragon School, Zhuge Liuyun.
Also, over half a year ago, that young man was able to use the cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm to easily kill off an expert of the 5th level of the Origin realm, and his name was, Chu Feng.
If it was said that Chu Feng that year was unknown and was the laughing stock in countless number of people's eyes, then the current Chu Feng already became the genius that no one did not know within several miles of the Azure Dragon School. Almost no one dared to be disrespectful towards him anymore.
At that moment, half a year had passed and no one knew what stage Chu Feng had developed into. However, the one thing that could be confirmed was that the young man who was lowly thought of before was valued by many people now. Some people even felt that the outcome of today's battle was unanticipatable.
After all, Gong Luyun said the grand words of, as long as Chu Feng was able to block three of his strikes, Chu Feng would be the one who won. Although Gong Luyun was indeed very strong as the number one disciple in the Azure Dragon School and he was quite famous within many number one disciples in various second-rate schools, Chu Feng's methods were very special as well and his battle powers completely exceeded people's imagination. So, many people felt that if he only needed to block three of Gong Luyun's strikes, perhaps Chu Feng really could do it if he gave it his all.
All in all, that battle raised the interest of everyone in the Azure Dragon School, and in order to let many more people see that fight, the higher-ups of the Azure Dragon School specially built a huge arena on one of the Azure Dragon School's mountain peaks.
The construction of the arena started half a year ago. It was large enough to contain a million people, and it was separated into viewing seats for elders, viewing seats for core disciples, viewing seats for inner court disciples, and even viewing seats for outer court disciples. In short, everyone in the Azure Dragon School could comfortably watch the arranged battle.
"I never would have thought that the arranged battle that seemed insignificant would cause such a sensation."
"HoLooking at my Azure Dragon School's disciple's excited faces, perhaps this arranged battle is a good thing."
"I do hope so. However, it would not be good if either Gong Luyun or Chu Feng dies."
"In the critical moments, I believe that lord school head will appear. After all, he has hid himself for so many years, and it's time for him to show himself. Also, with the scene today, if things really gets out of control, only he would be able to stabilize it."
The Azure Dragon School's Six Protectors sat within the viewing seats for elders. As they looked at the disciples who formed mountains and oceans in the arena while being in high spirits, they were both moved, yet worried.
The head of the Azure Dragon School was a mysterious character. Other than them and Zhuge Liuyun, almost no one else knew who the head of the Azure Dragon School was. The authority over the Azure Dragon School was always in their hands. So today, the pressure they received increased by several times as well.
"Milords, this isn't good."
Just at that time, the door to the viewing seats for the elders was suddenly opened by someone. A core disciple hurriedly ran in and panic was all over his face.
"Don't panic, what happened? Speak slowly." The Six Protectors were the current people who led the Azure Dragon School. So, they were quite calm and experienced in a situation like this, so with a simple sentence, the disciple's anxious emotions were calmed.
"Milords, school heads and manager elders from many other schools are currently coming towards the Azure Dragon School." That core disciple nervously said.
"How many people?" After hearing those words, the Six Protectors also tightly frowned and they felt that the matter was a bit strange.
"There are a lot of people. The nearby second-rate schools are coming, and from early estimations, there are at least people from over twenty schools." That disciple replied.
"There's something like that? Quickly, go." At that instant, the Six Protectors also could no longer remain calm. With the wave of their big sleeves, they quickly hurried towards the entrance of the Azure Dragon School to investigate what was happening.
When the Six Protectors arrived at the Azure Dragon School's entrance, they shocking discovered that there was indeed a huge group of people grandly heading towards the Azure Dragon School.
That group of people were absolutely not to be underestimated. They were formed by the heads of over twenty nearby schools, as well as the manager elders and the strongest disciples. There were already dozens of Profound realm experts within them.
As they saw that formation, even the Six Protectors were frightened. After all, the average strength of the six of them was only the 3rd level of the Profound realm. If that group of people really had ill intents towards the Azure Dragon School, clearly, they would be defeated.
But luckily, after the school heads saw the Six Protectors, they brought smiles onto their faces. That couldn't help but make the Six Protectors calm down, because as they looked at their attitudes, obviously, they were not there to attack the Azure Dragon School. Rather, there seemed to be a good occasion.
Later on, the Six Protectors found out that they came for the arranged battle between Gong Luyun and Chu Feng. As for how they got hold of that news, it was because several days ago, all of them received an invitation, and that invitation was sent out by the guest elder of the Azure Dragon School, Zhuge Liuyun.
Although it was said like that, the Six Protectors were completely unprepared. However, they could naturally not lock the grand characters outside, so they quickly changed the viewing seats for elders in the arena into viewing seats for guests to welcome them.
"What is Zhuge Liuyun doing? Without even notifying us, he sent out such invitation with the name of the Azure Dragon School." After arranging the group of people, the old lady within the Six Protectors was a bit angry.
"Perhaps he was afraid that Gong Luyun would go back on the rules of the arranged battle made back then so he wanted to invite the people from these schools to witness this battle. After all, no matter how much stronger Zhuge Liuyun gets, he can't get any stronger than the entire Black Tortoise City. After all, behind the Black Tortoise City, there is even a Lin Ran. He's the head manager of the Lin clan in the Qilin Prince's Mansion!" Another elder smiled and said.
"I've already heard of this before. If the selfish old Zhuge Liuyun can do all this for Chu Feng, it could be seen that he treats Chu Feng quite well."
"However, if a character like Lin Ran protects Gong Luyun no matter what, it would most likely be useless even if Zhuge Liuyun invited some great character from first-rate schools. In the Azure Province, who would dare to offend Lin Ran?"
"Ahh, that's true. However, this counts as Zhuge Liuyun giving Chu Feng, his only disciple, a bit of help right?" After guessing Zhuge Liuyun's intentions, the Six Protectors sighed for Zhuge Liuyun's painstaking efforts.


MGA Capitulo 243  Mysterious Powers
After that,, many second-rate school heads, manager elders, and strongest disciples continuously arrived. From more estimations, there were almost a hundred second-rate schools who went to watch the arranged battle. So many second-rate schools gathering together was already a hard to see occasion.
So, when all those esteemed big characters came there, naturally, a commotion would be risen in the Azure Dragon School and all of the disciples from the Azure Dragon School became excited.
Putting aside whether the arranged battle today was going to be entertaining or not, as so many strong school head level characters were only there to observe some fight between Azure Dragon School's disciples, that already showed the Azure Dragon School's influential power. Naturally, it made them, as the Azure Dragon School's disciple, feel incomparably proud.
"Isn't that the city lord of the Vermilion Bird City, Su Hen? Even he came?"
If it was said that the arrival of various schools was already quite unexpected, then the arrival of Su Hen along with a group of powerful people from the Vermilion Bird City was even more unexpected.
The Vermilion Bird City was quite well-known within first rate cities, and Su Hen was already a powerful person in the 6th level of the Profound realm. Within the city, there were also some people in the Profound realm. That strength really was quite superior to many schools who were on scene.
However, the most eye-grabbing appearance in the arranged battle was the army from the Black Tortoise City. Their arrival was completely expected. However, their formation was completely unexpected.
The city lord of the Black Tortoise City, Gong Luyun's father, Gong Tianping, was a cultivator in the 7th level of the Profound realm. Within the many manager elders from the Black Tortoise City, there were thirty that entered the Profound realm. Even some first-rate schools were inferior to that. So, that was why the current Black Tortoise City was publicly recognized as the number one city within all the Azure Province's first-rate cities.
This time, the Black Tortoise City pretty much sent out all their powerful people from their city. However, the most shocking thing was that other than the people from the Black Tortoise City, there were also some first-rate school heads behind them as well as some manager elders. They chatted with Gong Tianping, as they arrived to the Azure Dragon School.
One of the main characters of this arranged battle, Gong Luyun, also had some first-rate school disciples around him. Some chatted and some laughed as they appeared within people's line of sight.
"The Gong family actually got close to some first-rate school heads! It seems that Chu Feng won't have much luck this time." After the Black Tortoise City people appeared, the various second-rate school heads started to gather together to have discussions.
Even they were stunned by the Black Tortoise City's formation because no matter if it was the Black Tortoise City itself, or those first-rate school, neither one of them could be held back by the Azure Dragon School, let alone all those strong powers gathered together.
"Ahh, the distance is too big. Not to mention the powers behind senior Gong, just senior Gong himself is a rare genius. I heard a few days ago, even the number one disciple from the first-rate school, the Wind Listener School, was even defeated by him. Right now, senior Gong is already an expert of the 4th level of the Profound realm, and he is one of the leading characters of the Azure Province's young generation."
"Really? That is quite exceptional! One year ago, senior Gong just entered the Profound realm. With the time of one year, he actually made breakthroughs for three levels and entered the 4th level of the Profound realm! That rate of improvement is too terrifying."
"As expected from senior Gong. His talent is indeed peerless. That poor brat Chu Feng wants to fight against senior Gong? He doesn't know his limits."
"It can't be said that way. No matter how you say it, Chu Feng still has extremely good talent. He is a genius that has battle power which allows him to defeat those who are four levels above him. Don't forget that he easily defeated Wu Jiu who was at the 5th level of the Origin realm with his cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm. Besides, it's not like Chu Feng has no background. My Azure Dragon School's Elder Zhuge is his master right?"
"Hmph. So what if Chu Feng has Elder Zhuge as his master? He thinks that he found someone to rely on just like that? He can do whatever he wish just like that? Know that senior Gong's foster grandfather is the head manager of the Lin clan of the Qilin Prince's Mansion, Lin Ran."
"That's right. Although Zhuge Liuyun is indeed quite a character in my Azure Dragon School, when compared to lord Lin Ran, he isn't even fart. There is no doubt in today's battle. Senior Gong can certainly kill Chu Feng with one slap."
After Gong Luyun appeared, the arena was instantly turned into a mess. Everyone sighed in admiration towards Gong Luyun's cultivation and background, and at that instant, some elders and disciples who had expectations towards Chu Feng also lost confidence in him.
"Aoooo~~~~~" Just at that time, a cry suddenly rang out from the sky. Following that, several ear-piercing cries endlessly came from the sky and it completely reverberated in that place.
Change like that made people stunned and everyone on scene couldn't help but raise their head to look. They wanted to see what was happening, and even though they did not expect much, after looking, they were instantly dumbfounded and stupefied by the scene in the sky.
In the sunny and clear sky, several hundred silhouettes appeared. They were White-headed Eagles. White-headed Eagles that were extremely precious.
White-headed Eagles' preciousness meant that even first-rate schools only had a dozen or so, and many second-rate schools didn't even have any. Yet at that moment, several hundred appeared, and all of them were priceless, top-quality, White-headed Eagles. Naturally, that made people endlessly shocked.
"Heavens, who are they to show such a grand appearance?" Many people involuntarily yelled in surprise.
"Would it be the people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion? After all, Lin Ran is Gong Luyun's foster grandfather, and as his grandfather, naturally he would not ignore Gong Luyun's life and death battle with someone."
"It isn't. Even if the Qilin Prince's Mansion is wealthy, after all, Lin Ran is only the head manager of the Lin clan and even he cannot gather so many White-headed Eagles."
"What kind of people are coming to the Azure Dragon School? From this grand scene, it would certainly be super huge characters from a super huge power. Is it possible that even the Lingyun School was moved?"
As they looked at the scene in the air, everyone kept on guessing yet they could find the answer. They could only keep on staring in the air while awaiting for the answer to reveal itself.
Under the gazes of near a million people, a single White-headed Eagle that was circling around in the air suddenly descended from the sky. Following that, every single other White-headed Eagle dropped down as well, and at the end, landed in the middle of the arena.
After those people landed, the originally endlessly shocked crowded even widened their mouths in shock. There were even many people who forgot to breathe. Some people even laid on the floor after be frightened and their bodies even started to twitch.
It was because the people on the several hundred White-headed Eagles all had long cloaks with symbols. From their appearances, it was clear that they were World Spiritists. There was a good several hundred World Spiritists, and grey-coloured long cloaks were even on the bodies of twenty of them. They were Grey-cloak World Spiritists.
How rare were World Spiritists? Yet several hundred them appeared there. How outstanding were Grey-cloak World Spiritists? At that moment, only three appeared in the Azure Province, but at that very instant, at that place, twenty of them appeared. When such people came to that place, undoubtedly, it shook everyone who was there.
No matter if they appeared in the second-rate school, the Azure Dragon School, or if they appeared in the Qilin Prince's Mansion or the Lingyun School, the same commotion would still have happened.


MGA Capitulo 244  Its Actually Chu Feng
"Who are they? They are all World Spiritists! There are even people wearing grey-coloured cloaks, so are they the legendary Grey-cloak World Spiritists? Why are there twenty? There are twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists!!"
A disciple who was slightly knowledgeable yelled out in surprise, and after that, more yells came out. Everyone who was on scene were stunned by the World Spiritists who had unknown origins.
The Six Protectors of the Azure Dragon School had black lines all over their foreheads and their hearts were filled with uneasiness. They were extremely afraid that the group of World Spiritists came there with malicious intents.
If it was said that a single second-rate school could be used by a White-cloak World Spiritist, then several first-rate schools could be used by a single Grey-cloak World Spiritist.
What did the current several hundred White-cloak World Spiritists and twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists represent? Although they were only several hundred people, if they wanted to, they could use the entire Azure Province's schools and they would be able to move an army of several tens of millions, or even several hundred millions. That rallying power was unimaginable. How could the little Azure Dragon School offend such a group of great characters?
Not only were the people from the Azure Dragon School uneasily. Almost everyone was very uneasy. Even the city lord of the Black Tortoise City, Gong Tianping, and the other first-rate school heads were no exception. All of them were guessing where such a group of big characters came from. Everyone was also guessing why the group of big characters came.
"Look! The symbol on their chests! They're people from the World Spirit Guild!" Suddenly, a first-rate school head cried in surprise.
"World Spirit Guild? The organization that gathers the most outstanding World Spiritist in the Nine Provinces and is the main power in the Spirit Province? Are they really people from the World Spirit Guild?"
After hearing those words, the people in the guest viewing seats couldn't help but inhale a breath of cool air. On their originally uneasy faces, shock emerged again.
What was the World Spirit Guild? Perhaps normal people did not know, but the school heads of the various powers naturally knew. Not only was the World Spirit Guild the overlord power in the Spirit Province, they were also one of the several strongest powers in the entire Nine Provinces.
Since the strongest World Spiritists in the Nine Provinces gathered in the World Spirit Guild, strong powers from many places tried their best to befriend the World Spirit Guild. Even the overlord of the Nine Provinces, the Jiang Dynasty, secretly had dealings with the World Spirit Guild.
If it was said that the Lingyun School was the number one school in the Azure Province, when compared to the World Spirit Guild, they weren't even fart. The World Spirit Guild was truly a huge monster, and it was one of the biggest powers in the continent.
The most shocking thing was why did such a group of powerful characters come to the Azure Province? Why did they come to the Azure Dragon School? Didn't they look down on the Azure Province and felt disdain towards the Azure Province?
As countless people yelled in surprise, and as they were stared by nearly a million gazes, the crowd from the World Spirit Guild stood just like that on the huge stage. Every single person was tightly covered by their World Spirit Cloak and no one could see their appearances clearly.
Suddenly, a White-cloak World Spiritist went a few steps forward and walked in front of all the World Spiritists. In front of the crowd, he slowly raised his hand and took off the hood that covered his face.
At that instant, everyone's gazes were tightly staring at him and even their heartbeats rose up and down according to his movements. They truly wanted to know what kind of face would be under that hood, and what appearance did the character from the World Spirit Guild have.
"This... It's him?" After the hood was taken off, everyone from the Azure Dragon School couldn't help but yell in surprise because they saw a very familiar face.
But compared to the shock and confusion of the disciples and elders, Gong Luyun's expression was quite a bit more wonderful. His eyebrows were tightly frowning, his gaze was tightly locked, his fists were tightly clenched, and his body was trembling. A single word was revealed all over his body. Unacceptable.
"This..Who is this young man?" Under the yells of disbelieving surprise from innumerable people, and under the incomparably shocked gazes of innumerable people, some people who were unclear curiously asked.
"HeHeHe's the young man who challenged Gong Luyun one year ago! A core disciple of the Azure Dragon School, one of the main characters in today's arranged battle, Chu Feng!!"
"What? He's Chu Feng? He became a World Spiritist at such an age? Has he even joined the World Spirit Guild at such an age?"
"Is this true or false? You aren't lying to me right? Wasn't it said that Chu Feng was garbage? How can he have such status? How can he have such background?"
"It won't be wrong. He is the disciple of my Azure Dragon School, Chu Feng, without a doubt!"
When the name Chu Feng was spread out, the people who never even seen Chu Feng before sank into shock. When another White-cloak World Spiritist walked out, took off his hood, and spoke the following sentences, everyone on scene were shocked once again.
"Six Protectors, what are you thinking about? Why aren't you quickly welcoming my Azure Dragon School's esteemed guests, friends from the World Spirit Guild?!" It was Zhuge Liuyun. The current him also had the symbol for the World Spirit Guild and very highly, he pointed at the Six Protectors and roared.
At that instant, the Six Protectors were already bewildered. Even though they controlled the Azure Dragon School, when have they ever seen such a grand formation? They were blankly standing there and they didn't know what to do.
"Six old things, why aren't you quickly welcoming the guests?!" Seeing that, Zhuge Liuyun roared again.
"Yes sir!" This time, the Six Protectors finally reacted and they did not dare to hesitate anymore. As they ran while stumbling, they grovelingly ran over and respectfully led the World Spirit Guild crowd as well as Zhuge Liuyun to the most optimal guest viewing seats.
Even though the faces of the various powerful people from the World Spirit Guild were covered and people could not see their appearances, from them nodding to the Six Protectors, it could be seen they did not look down on the Six Protectors, and they didn't look down on the Azure Dragon School. Rather, they were quite polite and they truly came to the Azure Dragon School as a guest.
"Heavens, they are really the Azure Dragon School's guests! But how could the Azure Dragon School invite such characters over? Did they come for the arranged battle? They came for Chu Feng?"
"Impressive. This is too impressive. Many people said that Chu Feng was trash, yet he already became a World Spiritist and even joined into one of the strongest powers in the continent, the World Spirit Guild."
"Many people said that Chu Feng had no background, but now he moved the overlord power of the Spirit Province over. In front of the World Spirit Guild, not to mention the Black Tortoise City, even the various first-rate schools, including the Qilin Prince's Mansion, and the Lingyun School would not dare to be too wild. Is this called no background? Is this called no strength?"
At that instant, people kept on sighing and kept on surprisingly yelling. Many people even started praising without restraint. The people who belittled Chu Feng and felt that he could not win lowered their heads and did not speak.
Especially on the face of the Vermilion Bird City's lord, Su Hen, there was regret. He hiddenly sighed in his heart, "I never would have thought that Chu Feng would be so outstanding. Not only did he become a World Spiritist, he even got into a relationship with the overlord of the Spirit Province, the World Spirit Guild. If I knew that his talent would be so heaven-defying, I really shouldn't have kept little Rou and little Mei away from him."


MGA Capitulo 245  One Year Ago
With a heart filled with regret, it made Su Hen cast his gaze toward the two daughters next to him. Only then did he discover that Su Rou and Su Mei filled their faces with joy, and their smiles they had were called happy. It could be seen that the two of them really had been moved by Chu Feng.
At that instant, Su Hen truly wanted to go over to his two daughters and say, "Chu Feng is a really rare genius, and he also has feelings towards you. He also said that he wanted to marry you two, so you should have more relations with Chu Feng. If he still wants to marry you two and become my Su family's daughter's husband, in the future, my Su family would certainly move up and my Su family wouldn't be as simple as only being the ruler of the Vermilion Bird City."
However, Su Hen could only think about that, because as long as he remembered when he told his two daughters to stay away and don't interact with Chu Feng anymore at the time when Chu Feng's family was exterminated a few months ago, as well as at the time that Chu Feng most needed help, even he could not do it.
At first, he felt that Chu feng was in danger. So, to avoid being dragged down by him, he let his own daughters stay away from Chu Feng. Yet now, he discovered that Chu Feng had quite a future. So, in order to let the Su family develop, he wanted his daughters to get closer to Chu Feng. Even he felt that those words were unspeakable.
Of course, the reason why did he did not say anything was not only completely because he didn't feel good about it. He also suddenly remembered Mr. Grey-cloak who exterminated the Shangguan family, and remembered the letter that Mr. Grey-cloak gave him. As he thought of the cruel methods from Mr. Grey-cloak, he had no choice but to dispel the thoughts of letting his daughters marry Chu Feng.
Under the gazes of countless people, and after the big characters from the World Spirit Guild were welcomed to the guest viewing seats, only Chu Feng remained on the huge fighting stage in the middle of the arena.
*whoosh*
Suddenly, Chu Feng took off his World Spirit White-cloak and revealed the clothing for the Azure Dragon School's core disciple. At that instant, Chu Feng seemed abnormally domineering. As he stood on the stage, he was not afraid, and he was not panicking in from the gazes of the crowd. His eyes were like torches, and as he looked around, he loudly said,
"One year ago today, I, Chu Feng, stepped into the Azure Dragon School's core zone for the first time and became a core disciple in the Azure Dragon School. That was a day that I, Chu Feng, felt honored and proud because I proved myself. I proved that I had the qualifications to become a core disciple in the Azure Dragon School."
"However, also on that day, I was bullied by a disciple. He did whatever he wished without fear, and with the status of being the number one disciple in the Azure Dragon School, and with the cultivation of the 1st level of the Profound realm, he stamped on us new disciples' dignity and forced us to break apart our alliance."
"When pressured by him, many people chose to obey. However, I, Chu Feng, was not willing to. Creating alliances is an action allowed by the school. The school head did not restrict it. The elders did not restrict it. On what basis did he, a mere disciple, restrict it on?"
"However, my resistance attracted his retaliation. He ignored the school rules, he ignored the relationship of being from the same school, and he attacked me in front of the crowd of disciples."
"He, who was 20 years old and had the cultivation of the Profound realm, attacked me, who was only 15 years old and had the cultivation of the Spirit realm. He forced me to kneel and to beg for forgiveness. He stepped on my dignity, and even wanted to take my life."
"If it wasn't for the assistance of the school's Elder Li, I, Chu Feng, would have already died by his hands. I would have been miserably killed by this disciple who did not care about the laws of the school."
"However, when he committed such a crime in front of the crowd, no one felt that he was wrong. Rather, they looked at me with gazes of mock. They felt that me, a petty little new disciple, should die as punishment after offending the number one disciple. They felt that being humiliated was also reasonable."
"However, I, Chu Feng, was not willing to accept that. If he wasn't older than me, if his time of cultivation wasn't longer than me, my cultivation would not be weaker than him. My strength would not be weaker than him. Why did I need to be humiliated, to be killed, before I even had the time to grow? And everyone felt that I was inferior to him?"
"So, under the taunting gazes of everyone, I challenged the so-called number one disciple. I wanted him to fight me again one year later. At that time, I would cleanse myself of all the humiliations. I would let him know, that if I had a certain amount of time, I would certainly not be any weaker than him."
"As for him, not only did he promise that, he even spoke arrogantly and said that as long as I could take three of his strikes, he would kill himself. He would take his own life."
"Today, one year has passed, and it is time to fulfill the arrangement from one year ago. I, Chu Feng, am already standing here. The so-called number one disciple. Where are you?!"
Every single word from Chu Feng was loud and clear, and every single word was like thunder. He reiterated the causes of the battle today, and successfully pointed all the criticisms towards Gong Luyun.
After knowing the truth, many people admired Chu Feng's courage quite a bit. As he faced the unreasonable strength, he did not lower his head and he even set an arranged battle to wash away shame. Not just any person dared to do that.
At the same time, a huge blow was dealt to Gong Luyun image. Although people respected this world's powerful people, they would still dislike people who ignored rules and casually killed those from the same school.
"Hmph. Chu Feng, those are truly shameless words of boasting!!"
At the same time, an angry bellow also rang out from a certain place in the guest's viewing seats. After that, a body explosively shot out and landed on the fighting stage like a meteorite. The person who stood in front of Chu feng was none other than Gong Luyun.
"Chu feng. I, Gong Luyun, will not be the same as you to attack with words. Today, I am only here to respect the arranged battle from one year ago, and to take care of something that should have been taken care one year ago. I'm here to take care of you."
"But if you're afraid, you can kneel and beg right now. For the sake of the faces of the many esteemed guests right now, I can spare your life." Gong Luyun had a tall and straight body, with a handsome yet cold face. He did indeed have the airs of being the number one disciple, and it caused many females to hiddenly have feelings towards him.
"Gong Luyun, no need to waste any time on useless words. Go ahead and attack. It's only three attacks, and see how I, Chu Feng, take them on." Chu Feng lightly smiled and stuck his middle finger up to Gong Luyun.
"Since you want to die so fast, today, I'll grant you that wish."
"Haa!"
Gong Luyun first yelled and invisible Profound power exploded from his body like a volcano. After that, he threw a fist at Chu Feng. The Profound power that came from his body became an invisible huge first, and with terrifying might, it flew towards Chu Feng.
"What a strong method. Such strong Profound power. Gong Luyun really entered the 4th level of the Profound realm!"
"He's too strong. It seems like the rumour that Gong Luyun defeated the number one disciple from the Wind Listener School was true. If he entered the 4th level of the Profound realm at such an age already, how outstanding would he be in the future?"
Gong Luyun completely revealed the cultivation of the 4th level of the Profound realm. At the same time that he made many experts sigh in admiration, even more gazes were cast towards Chu Feng. They were all thinking, could such a weak Chu Feng truly block that punch?


MGA Capitulo 246  The Might of Three Fists
Profound power lingered, and like a dragon's roar and a tiger's howl, the fist came flying over along with strong wind.
As he faced such a powerful fist from Gong Luyun, even Chu Feng tightly frowned and he couldn't help but back one step away. He did not dare to underestimated that attack, and he quickly displayed the unique methods for World Spiritists by condensing a translucent Spirit Formation in front of him.
*boom*
However, when the Profound power fist came flying over, the Spirit Formation wall that was just condensed out shattered and it had no way of blocking Gong Luyun's fist.
"Crap, Chu Feng can't block the fist!"
At that instant, those who had relationships with Chu Feng and hoped that he would win were incomparably frightened and they deeply broke into cold sweat for Chu Feng, because Gong Luyun's fist was truly strong. After breaking the Spirit Formation, not only did its power not diminish, it even arrived in front of Chu Feng.
"Ah~"
At that instant, the experts who saw the situation clearly couldn't avoid but feel some regret. Gong Luyun was truly too strong, and he should not be staying in the Azure Dragon School. Even the number one disciple in the first-rate school, the Wind Listener School, was defeated by him. Some school heads even sighed and felt that they were inferior when they saw that strength.
As for Chu Feng? He was in the Spirit realm one year ago, and even if he had Spirit power, even if he was a World Spiritist, even if his talent broke all common sense, what stage could he develop into with only the time of one year? How could he block the attack of a powerful person at the 4th level of the Profound realm? So, many people felt that Chu Feng could not stop that attack.
*whoosh*
However, when a large portion of the people felt that Chu Feng was undoubtedly dead and felt pity for the rare genius, Chu Feng operated the Mysterious Technique in his body. Lightning rose from his feet, and as he body floated, he slid to the side like light and dodged Gong Luyun's attack.
"Look! He dodged it! Chu Feng dodged it! He actually dodged Gong Luyun's attack?"
"Heavens! How is that possible? He is clearly only in the 7th level of the Origin realm, so how is it possible that he dodged the attack from a person in the 4th level of the Profound realm? Does Chu Feng really defy common sense?"
"Wait, wait! Wasn't Chu feng only in the Spirit realm a year ago? How is he in the 7th level of the Origin realm today? Did he make several breakthroughs in one year?" After seeing that Chu Feng successfully dodged it, many people widened their eyes, opened their mouths, and couldn't help but yell in surprise.
"Hmph. All of you really find it strange since you find it rare. You only know that Gong Luyun is a genius, but you don't know that Chu Feng is a monster. Remember. Exactly one year ago, Chu Feng was in the 7th level of the Spirit realm. So, Chu Feng didn't make several breakthroughs through levels. with one year, he jumped over an entire realm."
"Also, don't feel surprised since he was able to dodge Gong Luyun attack of the 4th level of the Profound realm with the cultivation of the 7th level of the Origin realm. His battle power is indeed this shocking."
"Half a year ago, Chu Feng beheaded a person in the 5th level of the Origin realm with the cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm, and he even did it so casually. So, this boy's high battle power does completely defy common sense, and it exceeds your imaginations."
At the same time, some people who understood the situation better started to proudly announce Chu Feng's overpowering past achievements.
After knowing everything, some people even doubted whether it was true or false. However, those who had no suspicions dropped their jaws straight to the ground, and with a face full of shock, they said five words, "Is he even a person?"
However, Chu Feng didn't even have time to listen to the various cries of surprise from the crowd. At that instant, sweat was everywhere on his forehead because the fist just now really did not allow for any underestimation. When compared to others, Gong Luyun did indeed have some ability.
However, even though the fist just now was quite dangerous, Chu Feng who successfully dodged it still smugly smiled, and said to Gong Luyun, "There are two more strikes! If you can't kill me, your life will have to be thrown away!"
"Hmph. I only used a tenth of my power for the first attack and I just wanted to test your capabilities. I won't be merciful for the second fist!"
As he was being taunted by Chu Feng, Gong Luyun's face slightly changed and he felt that he had no more face. So, he operated the Mysterious Technique and threw another fist at Chu Feng.
*boom*
That fist was even quicker than before, and stronger than before. No matter if he truly only used a tenth of his power for his previous strike or not, it had to be admitted that Gong Luyun's second fist was indeed a lot fiercer that the first one.
However, after experiencing the power of the first fist, Chu Feng became a lot more careful and he didn't waste any time to truly block it. At the instant that the second fist came out, he used his Spirit power to confirm the direction of the attack. Immediately, he used his bodily martial skill and dodged the attack just as it arrived in front of him.
"He dodged itHe dodged it again."
"This is too impressive. He really dodged it! If the first time was luck, then the second time was certainly skill."
Chu Feng dodged Gong Luyun's attack again and everyone made ear-piercing yells of surprise again. It was a lot more exciting than before, because people truly felt speechless towards Chu Feng's talent and strength, They were shocked by his battle power, but compared to the observers who were entertained, the people who were close to Gong Luyun tightly frowned and started to get nervous.
The arranged battle of one year. Gong Luyun had to kill Chu Feng within three strikes, or else he would suicide on scene. Those were the bold words said by himself, so naturally, he could not take them back.
Yet right now, after two strikes, not only was Chu Feng not dead, he was not even harmed in the slightest. If Chu feng could not be killed after the third strike by Gong Luyun, the person who had to die was himself.
In reality, even Gong Luyun himself tightly frowned. Droplets of sweat as big as beads appeared on his forehead. Actually, he was hesitating. Hesitating how much power he should use to take care of Chu Feng. After all, there was such a difference in cultivation between him and Chu Feng, and he was indeed one of the top-level characters in the young generation in the Azure Province.
If he had to use his full strength in order to take care of Chu Feng who was only in the Origin realm, even if he won, he would be degraded into a laughing stock. So, he did not use his full power before. But now he knew that he could not leave anything with the last fist. He had to use his full power, or else he would truly become a laughing stock.
"Gong Luyun, it's the last strike! Have you prepared to suicide?" As Chu Feng looked at the nearby hole in the fighting stage made by Gong Luyu, he first wiped the cold sweat on his forehead first, then he formed his hand into a hook and provoked Gong Luyun.
"Chu Feng, don't be too full of yourself. I'll let you experience my true strength. Die!!"
*whoosh*
Gong Luyun angrily yelled but he did not immediately attack. He stepped forward, and his entire body disappeared. When he reappeared, he was behind Chu Feng.
He tightly clenched his right fist and on it, radiance appeared. Dense Profound power was quickly surging, and terrifying Profound power gathered on his fist. At that instant, he already threw it towards Chu Feng. The most important thing was that the pressure of the 4th level of the Profound realm already locked Chu Feng and sealed his escape. With such a distance, Chu Feng could no longer escape.


MGA Capitulo 247  Kill Yourself
At that instant, everyone broke into cold sweat for Chu Feng because under unavoidable situations, no one felt that Chu Feng was able to hold Gong Luyun's fist back.
In reality, even Gong Luyun himself felt that. He felt that the reason why Chu Feng was able to dodge his attacks were because his attacks were too simple. If Chu Feng grasped even stronger bodily martial skills, he could indeed dodge that attack. After all, one year ago, Chu Feng used the same bodily martial skill to dodge his attack.
However, he did not doubt his attacking power at all. So, he dared to be sure that as long as Chu Feng was unable to dodge that attack, with his current power, he was absolutely able to take Chu Feng's little life away. So, he did not use any martial skills, and for the last strike, he also only punched out.
As he saw his fist near Chu Feng more and more, and bit by bit, an expression of fear became even clearer on Chu Feng's face.
Gong Luyun's smug smile became wider and wider. However, he did not notice that as his fist was going to land on him, a smirk which showed that his scheme was going to be successful brimmed from the corner of Chu Feng's mouth.
*boom*
Without any more accidents, that strike hit. A boom like thunder exploded, and the oppressive Profound power swept everywhere. As Chu Feng was surrounded by Profound power, he flew out in a straight line, yet he slowly stopped near the border of the fighting stage.
"It hit! It really hit! Is Chu Feng dead?"
At that instant, almost everyone who was there couldn't help but stand up and cast their glittering gazes towards Chu Feng who was enveloped by the white-coloured fog which interweaved with Profound power.
Although a large portion of people felt that Chu Feng already died, they still wanted to see how Chu Feng died and what kind of destruction was dealt to Chu Feng's body under the might of Gong Luyun's fist.
Finally, all the gases dispersed and Chu Feng's body reappeared within people's line of sight. However, the current Chu Feng did not turn into a pile of meat paste as expected. His body was still completely fine and undamaged.
But even so, the current Chu Feng laid on the floor like a dead dog and did not move at all. On any part of his body, he did not emanate any aura at all.
"Defeated. At the end, Chu Feng was still defeated. Although he was quite strong and he was a rare genius, after all, he has not developed well yet. To be able to tangle around with the current Gong Luyun with his cultivation of the 7th level of the Origin realm showed that he was already quite exceptional."
"But sadly, will such a genius die just like that? The people from the World Spirit Guild doesn't seem to have any movements. Will they truly just allow a World Spiritist from their own power be killed by someone just like that?"
As they saw that, almost everyone felt that Chu Feng already died. They felt that the outcome of the arranged battle was already determined, and even Su Hen who had hopes towards Chu Feng sighed with pity.
Su Mei even hugged her own elder sister and she was endlessly painful. Every single person who heard the painful weeping ached in their hearts. If Su Rou wasn't there to stop her, she would have already ran and rushed out immediately to hug Chu Feng who was on the fighting stage. After all, in her heart, Chu Feng was the one who she loved.
On the other hand, Su Rou who understood Chu Feng's abilities lightly frowned as she looked at Chu Feng on the stage and hiddenly cursed in her heart, "Damn Chu Feng, what are you doing? If you don't hurry and get back up, little Mei will die from crying for you!!"
However, other than Su Rou, within the million people who were on scene, how many completely understood Chu Feng? How many knew his abilities? In reality, the simple exchange between him and Gong Luyun before already made them unceasingly shocked, and they already felt that Chu Feng was an outstanding genius.
So, almost everyone felt that Chu Feng was dead. Even Gong Luyun who stood on the fighting stage looked at Chu Feng for a few times, and he also confirmed that Chu Feng breathed no more.
So, he happily laughed loudly, He spun around and looked around. He clasped his hands towards the people everywhere who formed mountains and oceans, and he said with a loud and clear voice,
"Everyone, thank you for coming to this place to witness the battle between me and Chu Feng. However, the result of today's battle exceeded my expectations a bit, yet it was also regretful and dull."
"At first, for the sake of being from the same school, I, Gong Luyun, did not use my full power. I was intentionally restraining myself for the first two fists. I wanted to warn Chu Feng with the pressure of those fists, and I wanted him to back away from the danger and give up the life and death arranged battle with me. Actually, if he was willing to concede, I would have certainly gave him the chance to continue living."
"However, I could not do anything about Chu Feng as he was stubborn. Not only did he not give up, he even kept on provoking me, and because of the rules set on that day, I had no choice but to finish him off on the third strike."
"I had no choice but to do it, and they were not actions that I wanted to do. However, I want to tell everyone that I, Gong Luyun, won today's arranged battle. I, Gong Luyun, won!!"
At that instant, the smile on Gong Luyun's face rose to the extreme, so he roared the last two sentences abnormally loudly, as if he was displaying the airs of a king.
However, after his voice finished resonating, there were no cheers or yells that he expected. Rather, the entire arena was deathly gloomy. That strange atmosphere made him not know what to do and he was quite puzzled.
However, after another voice rang out, instantly, his heartbeat quickened and his face changed greatly. His felt like someone pounded his brain with a huge hammer that weighed ten thousand catties. It truly buzzed and it was truly like a thunder in a clear sky.
"Gong Luyun! Three strikes has been finished. Kill yourself!" A loud and clear voice rang out behind Gong Luyun, and it was like a formless sharp blade that pierced Gong Luyun's heart.
With an uneasy mind, Gong Luyun slowly turned his head around. Only then did he discover with astonishment that Chu Feng, who originally did not breath anymore, was standing on the fighting stage. Not only was he not dead, he was even smiling while looking at him.


MGA Capitulo 248  Battle Power That Destroys Common Sense
"YouYouYou faked death!!"
The current Gong Luyun was so angry that his heart could explode. He finally knew why the atmosphere was so strange. It turned out that Chu Feng did not die, and he actually took the three fists.
He clearly lost the battle, however, he did not discover that. He even made vows and said bold words in front of almost a million people as he announced his victory.
At that very instant, he could really find an ant's hole and drill into there because he was fooled around with. He was fooled by Chu Feng, and he was completely fooled.
He slapped himself in front of his father in front of his family in front of his friends in front of the near a million people, and he even slapped himself so loudly and so clearly. He lost all face, and his wiseness was destroyed.
All of that was bestowed by Chu Feng. So, in Gong Luyun's current heart, his fury truly rose to the heavens, and he hated himself to be unable to rip Chu Feng's corpse into ten thousand pieces.
As he looked at Gong Luyun who had a green face, who as gnashing his teeth from anger, who had smoke coming out of his seven facial orifices, Chu Feng chuckled and indifferently said,
"Gong Luyun, according to the agreement from one year ago, I have already took three of your strikes. It's not that I, Chu Feng, have no sympathy, but the words that you said that year were said by youself. Kill yourself!!"
After Chu Feng spoke, almost everyone's heart violently jumped two times. They were thinking "Is Gong Luyun really going to suicide? Today, will such an exceptional genius going to suicide in this place?!"
But at the next instant, they discovered that they were wrong. They overrated Gong Luyun. He did not immediately fulfill the bold words he said that year. He only pointed at Chu Feng and fiercely said,
"Chu feng, don't worry. I, Gong Luyun, will pay the price for my own words. However, even if I, Gong Luyun, will die, I will die after you!!"
*whoosh* Just as he finished speaking, Gong Luyun leaped forward like an arrow leaving a bow, and with lightning speed, he arrived in front of Chu Feng and threw a punch out.
Not only did he not fulfill the promise he made that year, he even attacked Chu Feng again and started to fatally strike.
As they looked at Gong Luyun's fatal attacks that were aggressive and full of killing intent, everyone's face greatly changed. However, it was not because of Gong Luyun's breaking his promise.
It was because as Chu Feng faced such a fierce attack, he did not make any move to dodge it. He only blankly stayed there, as though he was silently waiting for Gong Luyun's attack.
As he looked at that situation, some people even started to suspect whether Chu Feng was completely frightened by Gong Luyun's strong attack. However, after another second, the people who had suspicions were completely dumbfounded.
As Gong Luyun's fist that was several times fiercer than before was going to land on Chu Feng's face, Chu Feng attacked with lightning speed. He also threw out a fist, and he aimed it towards the one Gong Luyun was sending towards Chu feng.
That punch was like a mantis's arm trying to stop a chariot. That punch was simply suicidal. From the perspectives of the outsides, Chu Feng could only be completely insane for him to throw such a punch out.
However, when the two fists collided, and after a boom exploded out, the most unexpected scene happened. From the strong force, Gong Luyun flew out. On the other hand, Chu Feng did not shift for an inch.
Chu Feng who was only at the 7th level of the Origin realm pushed Gong Luyun who was at the 4th level of the Profound realm away. The fist that seemed to be suicidal and like a mantis's arm blocking a chariot won. How could the people who saw that scene accept it?!
At that very instant, at that very place, the shock in people's hearts was indescribable with words because deep within their hearts, a sentence echoed in their brains, "Has Chu Feng's battle power really defied all common sense?"
However, the current Chu Feng ignored all the stunned gazes. He clenched his fists as he wished to continue, turned his neck around, and moved his body around.
Then, after crackling explosive noises rang out from his body, Chu Feng said a sentence that made everyone on scene stupefied. Words that almost scared people to death.
"I already knew that you were a person who went back on his words. So, I really shouldn't have let you attack me three times. Whatever, it's better if I attack myself. I will personally kill you!"
After speaking those words, Chu Feng already strided forward with huge steps. Under the gazes of innumerable people, he gradually walked towards Gong Luyun.
At that moment, people were already so shocked that they could not care for themselves. They thought in their hearts, "What? I haven't heard wrong right? Chu Feng wants to kill Gong Luyun? With his cultivation of the 7th level of the Origin realm?"
After listening to Chu Feng's words, at the same time that they were shocked, they were also filled with doubt. If it was said that Chu Feng was a genius, almost everyone would believe that. They would even believe that Chu Feng was a genius who only appeared once every thousand years, because Chu Feng's performances were right in front of their eyes.
However, if it was said that Chu Feng wanted to use the cultivation of the 7th level of the Origin realm to defeat Gong Luyun who was at the 4th level of the Profound realm, that was simply unbelievable. The Profound realm was incomparable to the Spirit realm or the Origin realm. The distance between every single level in the Profound realm was huge.
So, people felt that if Chu Feng's limit was using the cultivation of the 1st level of the Origin realm to kill people in the 5th level of the Origin realm, then in the future, when he arrived at the 1st level of the Profound realm, he would certainly have no way of killing those in the 5th level of the Profound realm. So, almost everyone felt that Chu Feng was a madman speaking his dreams. Many people felt that Chu Feng went insane.
"You want to kill me? You?"
Gong Luyun who already hated Chu Feng straight to the bones was so furious that his blood and Qi boiled when he heard that Chu Feng was going to personally kill him. So, he operated the Mysterious Technique and charged towards Chu Feng again.
This time, he brought the strong might of the 4th level of the profound realm along with him. Even the ground trembled and rumbled, and even the air howled as it was being compressed. He truly, unrestrainedly, showed his might.
"Hmph. Good time to come."
However, Chu Feng only loudly yelled as he faced Gong Luyun's counterattack. He also stepped forward and quickly rushed towards Gong Luyun.
*boom boom boom*
The two of them battled, and fists and kicks turned into afterimages. Punching with fists, and whipping with legs. Attacks flew everywhere, and Origin power and Profound power were mixed together. Oppressive ripples kept on going wild like fireworks, and the two of them truly fought into a lump.


MGA Capitulo 249  Absolute Control
"Heavens! Chu Feng can really use the cultivation of the 7th level of the Origin realm to match Gong Luyun? My eyes are fine right?"
At that instant, many people did not dare to believe the scene in front of their eyes. If it was said that Chu Feng being able to block Gong Luyun's attack before meant that his battle power was extraordinary, then currently, the battle between him and Gong Luyun was simply defying logic.
So, many people were not willing to believe that. They had no way of believing that, and with the difference in quality that was like the difference between the sky and the earth, how could the Origin power that could not even be compared to Profound power be able to resist against Profound and not even be disadvantaged? It did not make sense at all!
Some people even suspected that their eyes were a bit broken and they kept on rubbing them. When those people opened their eyes once again and looked at the fighting stage, they were instantly dumbfounded.
They discovered with astonishment that as Chu Feng and Gong Luyun were on the fighting stage, Origin power suppressed Profound power. And as their fists and kicks intersected, Gong Luyun was currently retreating while Chu Feng was advancing well. Chu Feng had the advantage!
"The 4th level of the Profound realm is only so-so. It seems that this title of the number one disciple is a bit empty eh?"
Chu Feng used Origin power to pressure Profound power. He used the Origin realm to pressure the Profound realm. As he forced Gong Luyun to that state, he did not forget to taunt his opponent.
"What did you take to gain such strange battle power?"
Gong Luyun was also abnormally dispirited by Chu Feng. He did not believe it. He did not believe that it was Chu Feng's own strength. He suspected that Chu Feng used some special medicine, or some Forbidden Methods.
"That's right! What Gong Luyun is saying isn't unreasonable. The battle power that Chu Feng has right now does indeed surpass normality. It's very possible that he used some Forbidden Medicines, or some Forbidden Methods."
After Gong Luyun spoke, many people started to agree with him. They always felt that Chu Feng's battle power was abnormal, and it just so happened that Gong Luyun gave them a reasonable explanation.
"Speak! Did you use Forbidden Medicine or Forbidden Methods unique to World Spiritists? In order to defeat me, you dare to use such lowly methods? You are truly despicable and extremely shameless!"
Seeing that his own guesses gained the agreement from everyone, the shameless Gong Luyun went along with it and loudly yelled. He redirected all the despicableness and shamelessness from him, to Chu Feng.
"Hmph. You really think that everyone in this world is as shameless as you? Time will prove if I, Chu Feng, used any Forbidden Medicines or Forbidden Methods."
"However, your shameless actions of not suiciding after losing has already been witnessed by everyone here." Chu Feng coldly snorted, and formlessly, he explained himself.
"Chu Feng is correct. No matter if he took Forbidden Medicines or used Forbidden Methods, although his cultivation could greatly increase in a short amount of time, there is a time limit."
"After that time passes, not only will the gained power be all lost, there will also extremely serious rebounds. Light injuries would be heavy injuries, and heavy injuries would be being crippled and all cultivation lost."
"If Chu Feng truly used Forbidden Medicine, or Forbidden Methods, sooner or later, he would return to his original form and everything would be revealed. He would not be able last for a long time. But looking at his confident appearance, did he truly not use any Forbidden Medicine, and what he relied on was truly his own strength?" After hearing Chu Feng's words, everyone felt that it was reasonable as well and they couldn't help but nod their heads.
"Hmph, you shameless person who used Forbidden Medicine, so what? I, Gong Luyun, can still use my own true cultivation to defeat you. Die!!"
In response, Gong Luyun was a bit uneasy and he suddenly felt that Chu Feng did not use any Forbidden Medicine after all. So, he changed his style and he no longer fought with his own body's battle power. He displayed a very strong martial skill.
After the martial skill was used, the power of Profound power was truly displayed, and Chu Feng's physical body had no way of fighting against that. However, Chu Feng was not afraid. He revolved the Origin power in his body and many illusionary palms appeared. Many people's eyes were truly dazzled by that and they could not figure out which ones were real, and which ones were false. Again, he suppressed Gong Luyun.
"This Chu Feng is really quite strong. It is the first time that I've seen someone use my Azure Dragon School's Illusionary Palm to this state."
As they saw the Illusion Palms being displayed by Chu Feng, the elders in the Azure Dragon School endlessly praised him. Chu Feng's Illusionary Palm was extremely profound and he had already thoroughly comprehended the essence of the martial skill. Even they had no hopes of reaching his state and they sighed to themselves, showing that they were inferior.
"It is only a mere rank 3 martial skill. You dare to play around with this in front of me? I'll let you experience the strongest martial skill in my Azure Dragon School!"
Seeing that he could not match Chu Feng in terms of rank 3 martial skills, Gong Luyun changed his style and used a rank 5 martial skill. He wanted to rely on the strength of the martial skill itself to defeat Chu Feng.
"It is only a rank 5 martial skill. You think that only you have it?"
But could Chu Feng possibly be afraid of him? The third style of the Three Thunder Styles. Lightning surged out and it could become anything. Although it was a rank 4 martial skill, no matter if it was form or might, the third style was comparable to rank 5 martial skills.
The most important thing was that the so-called strongest martial skill in the Azure Dragon School was forcibly suppressed by Chu Feng's third style of the Three Thunder Styles again. Once more, Gong Luyun was extremely dispirited.
"Chu Feng, you rely on those evil methods to fight against me? Sooner or later, you will bear the consequences. However, you won't need to feel the pain of the rebound. I will finish your life before that happens."
For three continuous times, Gong Luyun was suppressed by Chu Feng. It made him, who was in the 4th level of the Profound realm him, who defeated the number one disciple in the first-rate school, the Wind Listener School, have no more face. As anger and fury combined together, he wanted to quickly finish Chu Feng off more and more.
So, he displayed a bodily martial skill and leaped several thousand meters back. At the same time, his body changed as well and a burst of extremely strong Profound power was changing his in body.
"Chu Feng, I will let you experience a strong martial skill that you have not seen before! The top-quality martial skill within rank 5 martial skills, Ten Thousand Galloping Horses!"
*boom*
Suddenly, within Gong Luyun's body, extremely strong Profound power exploded out. There was so much Profound power that it almost rose into the air, but then quickly dropped back down. It formed formless waves and they surged. At the end, from formless, it formed. It formed into a muscular fine horse.
That horse was vivid and lifelike, but both of its eyes were blood-red. There was a pointy and sharp horn on its forehead, and it was emanating strong might. That might did not belong to ordinary horses. Even normal Monstrous Beasts did not have it.
The most important thing was that there were several thousand of such terrifying horses. That might truly caused the ground to sway and violently tremble. If the fighting stage wasn't created with special materials, as the horses passed, the ground would have certainly shattered and countless cracks would have appeared. In that instant, even a city could instantly be stamped into nothing by the group of horses.


MGA Capitulo 250  Broaden Your Horizons
"What a strong martial skill! This mightIt is a rank 6 martial skill?"
"No, it's not a rank 6 martial skill. It's the rank 5 martial skill from the Qilin Prince's Mansion, the extremely famous Ten Thousand Galloping Horses!!"
"It's a martial skill from the Qilin Prince's Mansion? The martial skills there are the best of the best, but they never pass it down to outsiders! Yet Gong Luyun learnt it?"
"Your news is truly not too efficient. Right now, Gong Luyun has an extremely outstanding foster grandfather. It's Lord Lin Ran from the head manager of the Lin clan from the Qilin Prince's Mansion! With him, which martial skill can Gong Luyun not learn?"
"So there's actually something like thatSo this means that Gong Luyun's background is quite terrifyingly deep. But then, why does such a character need to stay in the Azure Dragon School?"
"The important part is not whether Gong Luyun is able to learn this Ten Thousand Galloping Horses or not. The important thing is that Gong Luyun can so perfectly grasp this martial skill. To know that even though this martial skill is strong, the cultivating difficulty is extremely high."
"This martial skill is too impressive. Normal martial skills can simply not fight against it. How will Chu Feng respond this time?"
Gong Luyun's Ten Thousand Galloping Horses made people endlessly sigh in admiration. At the same time, people also locked their gazes onto Chu Feng. They wanted to see how Chu Feng was going to fight against the martial skill that pressured with might.
"Such Ten Thousand Galloping Horses. Then I, Chu Feng, will use ‘Shooting Ten Thousand Horses with Arrows'!"
Chu Feng put one leg forward and slightly bent it up, then his other leg backwards and slightly bent it down. He formed a bow in his left hand, and formed an arrow in his right. Then, as his left hand swung, his right hand was like a blade. Countless golden-coloured arrows shot towards the galloping horses like a rainstorm.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh whoosh*
*neigh neigh neigh neigh*
Truly, not a single arrow that Chu Feng shot was useless. In the instant that the golden-coloured arrows shot into the horses, the horses with strong might all fell one after the other and miserable cries rang out. After that, they formed into layers of Profound power and disappeared in the sky. The so-called strongest rank 5 martial skill from the Qilin Prince's Mansion was so easily defeated by Chu Feng's Bow of Hundred Transformations.
"Tsk tsk tsk, the so-called Ten Thousand Galloping Horses is only that? You don't learn the martial skills from your own school, and you had to learn someone else's martial skills. It seems like you truly shame my Azure Dragon School's ancestor!" Chu Feng mockingly smiled and said.
"So that means that what Chu Feng just used was a martial skill from the Azure Dragon School? Strong. Truly strong! Although the might of that martial skill did not seem to be strong, in Chu Feng's hands, it showed exceeding power and it easily killed off Gong Luyun's Ten Thousand Galloping Horses!"
"So like the legends said, no matter how much stronger martial skills are, they must be used by the appropriate person. Even garbage martial skills can be used to display extremely strong power in the hands of experts?"
Chu Feng's words made everyone think again. Everyone kept on praising Chu Feng. If Chu Feng's battle power was raised by relying on some special method, then the use and comprehension towards martial skills were undoubtedly his own talent and ability.
"Quite a bit of useless words. People like you can only stay within the Azure Dragon School for your entire life. You will never know what martial skills are truly strong."
"Today, I will let you broaden your horizons. I will let you experience a martial skill that you have never experienced before. A legendary rank 6 martial skill!"
Gong Luyun was really forced into anxiety by Chu Feng. He waved his big sleeve, and the air around him quickly flowed and interweaved with the Profound power in his body. At that instant, icy-cold, bone-piercing gas started to speedily spread. Even the people who were watching the arena felt a bit of the coldness.
The cold air lingering on the fighting stage was even more terrifying. Frost had already been condensed out on the stage and it was currently surrounding and getting closer to Chu Feng. At that instant, the fighting stage was like a land of ice and snow.
"This bone-piercing coldness. This terrifying might. Is this one of the fortification martial skills in the Qilin Prince's Mansion, the rank 6 martial skill, Cold Ice Atmosphere?"
[TN Again, "fortification" {something} means that it is used to "fortify" their position. In this case, the martial skill only belongs to the Prince's Mansion and it is something that no one else has.]
"Rank 6 martial skill! It's a real rank 6 martial skill! This is undoubtedly the might of a true rank 6 martial skill! Truly impressive. Gong Luyun actually grasped such a strong martial skill!"
The might of a rank 5 martial skill and the might of a rank 6 martial skill was completely different. When he used the Cold Ice Atmosphere, everyone in the arena felt a type of pressure. The experts on scene were quite fine, but many of the Azure Dragon School's inner and outer court disciples could not resist that coldness. They had no choice but to quickly leave. Many people even fainted.
"Your foster grandfather treats you quite well. He even passed the thing that he usually hides to you" As he felt the engulfing Cold Ice Atmosphere, Chu Feng couldn't help but think of the scene in which Lin Ran also used the Cold Ice Atmosphere to attempt to kill him in the Valley of Hundred Bends on that day.
Lin Ran's Cold Ice Atmosphere was indeed strong, and even if Chu Feng fought against it again right now, he did not dare to fight it directly. However, Gong Luyun's Cold Ice Atmosphere lacked a bit of maturity. At least, to Chu Feng, it was not enough to make him afraid of it.
"Hmph. You do know quite a bit, but from what I see, it seems like your life is over. No matter how much stronger your body is, it will not be able to endure the bone-piercing cold air from my Cold Ice Atmosphere. Everything is finished. Die!"
Gong Luyun coldly snorted. He had enough of that battle. Even if he could win today's fight, he would have no face when the news of him being forced to that state by someone in the 7th level of the Origin realm got spread out. So, he really wanted to quickly finish Chu Feng off, and the Cold Ice Atmosphere was his strongest trump card.
*silalala*
The Cold Ice Atmosphere unexpectedly solidified and formed into several cold air fierce beasts. They bared their teeth, and from all directions, they surrounded Chu Feng and attacked. The bone-piercing cold air even condensed frost in the air and cracks even appeared.
"This is too scary. When the might of a rank 6 martial skill is in Gong Luyun's hands, it displays extreme power. Even we cannot resist against a martial skill like that. This time, it seems like Chu Feng won't have much luck."
"Indeed. Although Chu Feng's talent is quite terrifying and abnormal, and although Chu Feng's battle power is extraordinary, as he faces this rank 6 martial skill, he cannot only rely on battle power and talent to make up for that. Unless Chu Feng also grasps a rank 6 martial skill, he will have no way of holding this Cold Ice Atmosphere back!"
As the Cold Ice Atmosphere was being moved by Gong Luyun's full force, even many school heads on scene felt the power and pressure. They looked forward whether Chu Feng also grasped a rank 6 martial skill as well to fight against Gong Luyun's Cold Ice Atmosphere.
Especially as Chu Feng created miracles again and again, and as he stunned their souls again and again, many people did not doubt that Chu Feng grasped a rank 6 martial skill.
But what they could confirm was that if Chu Feng did not grasp a rank 6 martial skill, today's arranged battle would truly end and it would be finished.


MGA Capitulo 251  The Outcome of the Battle is Already Determined
"You used your full power now? It seems that you really want to finish this battle soon. But that's fine, because I've played around with you enough as well. I'll let you know the distance between you and me right now."
As he swept his gaze towards the cold air fierce beasts around him, a cold smile was raised from the corner of Chu Feng's mouth. He did not move, and he only slowly closed his eyes.
"Look, what is Chu Feng doing? Did he give up? As he faces the Cold Ice Atmosphere from Gong Luyun, he is powerless to reverse the situation, and he is preparing to die?"
Chu Feng's actions were seen by some people, and they felt that Chu Feng wanted to give up. But at the next instant, they discovered that they could not be more wrong.
*whoosh*
Suddenly, Chu Feng suddenly widened his eyes that were closed. At the same time, incomparably strong pressure spread out from within his body and it engulfed the entire fighting stage.
After that pressure descended onto the fighting stage, with the border of the stage as the end, the sky and ground within the zone started to tremble, and the Cold Ice Atmosphere immediately crumbled and disappeared in the air.
At the same time that the Cold Ice Atmosphere disappeared, Gong Luyun also knelt onto the ground with a poof. He who had a mad smile before had a face as white as paper. His eyes were filled with fear, and his entire body was trembling.
"Heavens! What happened? Why did the Cold Ice Atmosphere suddenly disappear? What is happening to the sky and ground over there? Why is the air trembling above the fighting stage?!"
Everyone was shocked by the sudden change. They couldn't feel the pressure at that place, but they could still see the scene in which the air was trembling, as if some pressure forced the area over there to yield.
Even if they were beaten to death, they never would have thought that it was a martial skill that had been lost for many years. It was a rank 7 martial skill. The Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry that Chu Feng got from the Void School.
For the past half a year, Chu Feng did not always search for Profound medicines in the Valley of Hundred Bends. He fought Monstrous Beasts every day, and it caused his battle power to rise. He also found the time to cultivate the rank 7 martial skill, the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry.
As he cultivated, he unexpectedly discovered that the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry was truly a very mysterious martial skill. The cultivation difficulty was extremely high, but its power was extremely strong as well. If it was mastered, it wouldn't be a rank 7 martial skill. It would be a rank 8 martial skill.
As the Blade of the Void Dragon's Cry was quite difficult to cultivate, even Chu Feng only grasped the first step of it, Void. Although it was only the first step, it still had the power of a rank 7 martial skill.
What he was using at that moment was Void Pressure. With formless pressure, one could do whatever he wished in that area. It could shatter any formless attacks, or any formed attacks. Without even moving, it could force the enemy to yield and crush the enemy to death.
"This feeling..It is absolutely not simple pressure, nor would it be some sort of treasure. There is Origin power lingering around it, so it must be a martial skill! A very profound martial skill! It seems that this Chu Feng really grasps a rank 6 martial skill, and it's even a rank 6 martial skill that's more profound than the Cold Ice Atmosphere!"
Finally, people who had sharp eyes saw that the distorted space was caused by the martial skill Chu Feng was using. After that person spoke, an uproar was risen.
Although they could not feel the pressure in that area, just by looking at the distorted scene, they could imagine how strong the martial skill was. Even many big characters who were in the arena never heard or seen it before, let alone the disciples.
At that instant, everyone was already completely dumbfounded by the strength Chu Feng displayed. Even though they knew that Chu Feng was strong and that he was a genius, they never would have thought that Chu Feng's strength would reach that state. Truly, with the cultivation of the 7th level of the Origin realm, he defeated Gong Luyun who was in the 4th level of the Profound realm. Chu Feng simply did an unprecedented action, and created an impossible miracle.
"Dammit! How did this happen? I, Gong Luyu, am defeated by this brat? How is this possible?"
Gong Luyun knelt on the floor, and even if he wanted to stand up while using the power from his entire body, it was impossible for him to fight against the formless pressure. That made him feel powerless, and even fear.
For the first time, he recognized Chu Feng's powerful strength, and Chu Feng's powerful strength was something that he did not want to see, especially at this time when it related to his own life.
Step by step, the current Chu Feng walked towards Gong Luyun. As he looked at Gong Luyun who knelt in front of him, he lightly smiled and said,
"Gong Luyun, one year ago, have you ever thought you would kneel in front of me today?"
"Ha! Chu Feng, if you want to kill or cut me, feel free. But I'm warning you. If you dare to even touch one of my fingers, I guarantee that you will not leave this place alive."
"The million disciples from the Azure Dragon School will die! Even your World Spirit Guild dog legs will be affected be you and all die in this place!" Gong Luyun had no strength to stand up by the formless pressure. He could only kneel in front of Chu Feng. However, not only did he not give in, he even threatened with malicious words.
"Oh? Even right now, you dare to threaten me? Do you think you're qualified? Knock your head to the ground and admit your wrongs!!"
Suddenly, Chu Feng's expression became incomparably sinister. The fury that he hiddenly endured in his heart was all instantly revealed. The humiliation that he suffered that year was not much, but the great hatred of his family's extermination had to be avenged.
Chu Feng grabbed Gong Luyun's hair, and powerfully pushed it down. With a bang, Gong Luyun's brain fiercely slammed onto the incomparably hard ground. When his head was pulled back up by Chu Feng, blood flowed from his forehead.
"This is for my grandfather."
"This is for my father."
But that was not all, Chu Feng strongly grabbed Gong Luyun's hair and kept on slamming it to the ground. For every hit, he would say the name of a Chu family member who died.
Knocks like that were done several hundred times. After all the names of the Chu family member who died were spoken, Chu F1eng still did not stop because it was not possible for that to drain away the hatred towards Gong Luyun.
After all that, nothing was the same on Gong Luyun's face as blood and flesh were mixed all together. Even a deep hole was formed on the hard ground, and countless cracks spread from that hole.
"This"
People's souls were shaken as they looked at that scene. From Chu Feng's actions, they could tell that the two of them must have some hatred between them, or else Chu Feng would not have humiliated Gong Luyun like that.
However, at the same time, they had an answer in their hearts. It was that the outcome of today's arranged battle was already determined, and the victor was Chu Feng, who no one had expectations from.
Although they felt disbelief, they did indeed personally witness everything. They saw Chu Feng suppress Gong Luyun step by step. They had no choice but to admit that when Gong Luyun was kneeling and when his head was endlessly slamming onto the ground.
Chu Feng was a true genius. A terrifying monster, to the point that it surpassed people's imaginations. Certainly, in the future, such a person would not be confined to the little Azure Dragon School. The young man had the potential to move unobstructedly in the continent of the Nine Provinces in the future.
At that instant, the disciples started to cast gazes of worship towards Chu Feng. Even the peak disciples of other schools were no exception. They admired Chu Feng's frightening battle power.
As for the school heads and elders from other schools, they endlessly admired the Azure Dragon School since such an outstanding disciple appeared. As long as Chu Feng was there, the future Azure Dragon School would absolutely not be as unknown and as silent as right now. Sooner or later, it would become a huge summit in the Azure Province, and perhaps with Chu Feng, it could even return to its flourishing past.


MGA Capitulo 252  Breaking the Rules
"Gong Luyun, I cannot disperse the hatred towards you even if I killed you ten thousand times because of the evils that you committed by killing my Chu family. You alone cannot eradicate my hatred towards you. I will send everyone related to you, down with you."
Chu Feng said as he tightly grabbed Gong Luyun's hair and saw his bloody and disfigured face. Even though the current Gong Luyun seemed abnormally frightening, it was not comparable to the fierceness on Chu Feng's face.
The anger that he suppressed in his heart for a long time all emerged today. It was truly not removable by a few simple words or killing a few people. A debt of blood must be paid in blood. Naturally, the debt of blood of the Chu family's extermination was going to be paid back several times. The price would be all of Gong Luyun's relatives, and Chu Feng wanted all of them to die with him.
"Ho.. Chu Feng, you truly think too highly of yourself. Do you really think you can kill me? If you feel you can, go ahead and try!" Gong Luyun actually smiled, and his smile was full of confidence.
"You feel that I can't? That's fine. I'll let you see whether I can or not!"
Chu Feng flung his leg up and it kicked Gong Luyun's jaws. Strong power threw Gong Luyun into the air, and after a few flips, he fell back down.
"Ahh!" After landing back down, Gong Luyun miserably cried out. Chu Feng's kick caused his jaw to shatter and the pain was unendurable.
*hmm* At the same time, Chu Feng raised his foot and stamped on Gong Luyun's arm. He clenched his right hand, and a golden-coloured big chopper blade condensed in his hand. His face was sinister, and the corner of his mouth formed an evil cold smile. He looked at Gong Luyun and indifferently said,
"You said that if I dare to touch one of your fingers, there would be a calamity? That's fine, I'll touch five of your fingers."
*whoosh* After speaking, the big blade in Chu Feng's hand formed into a golden blur, and it landed on Gong Luyun's hand, forcibly cutting off five of his fingers.
"Ahh~~~~~~~"
The pain of a finger being cut off made Gong Luyun who just calmed down to wretchedly scream again. As the proverbs said, "The ten fingers connect to the heart". That pain was certainly not imaginable by normal people.
The most important thing was the importance of fingers to a person like Gong Luyun. He could simply not endure as he had his five fingers cut off. To him, most likely the pain in his heart was greater than the pain from his body.
The current Gong Luyun could not speak anymore. He could only unceasingly howl in pain, but within his eyes, killing intent overflowed everywhere and cold glares surged. He fiercely glared at Chu Feng, as if saying, "You're dead. You're dead! You dare to do this to me? You are absolutely dead!!"
"What? You like it very much? Okay, I'll help you out. I'll let you become a person with no fingers." However, would Chu Feng be afraid of him? The big blade in his hand sliced down again, and the other five fingers from Gong Luyun's other hand were chopped off again.
"Heavens! This this this"
The scene on the stage caused everyone's soul to be frightened. Although they knew who won and who lost and the result had already been set, they never would have thought that Chu Feng did not quickly kill Gong Luyun. Instead, bit by bit, he destroyed Gong Luyun's body in front of the crowd.
To Gong Luyun, not only was it physical torture. It was also mental torture. Although he, Gong Luyun, was quite a character in the Azure Province, Chu Feng was only famous in the Azure Dragon School. In reality, in the Azure Province, he was an unknown little character.
However, at that moment, a big character like him, who he recognized himself as unordinary, was being ruined by a small character like Chu Feng. To him, that was undoubtedly the biggest humiliation possible.
"Chu Feng's methods are really ruthless. If today's matter gets spread out, it would not be possible for Gong Luyun to raise his head up again in the Azure Province."
"If I had to say something, it would be that this Chu Feng is too insane. Has he forgotten about Gong Tianping? Has he forgotten about Lin Ran? Will those people allow Chu Feng to torment Gong Luyun like that, and will they just ignore it?"
"Today, Lin Ran isn't even here. Although Gong Tianping is indeed strong, have you not seen the big characters from the World Spirit Guild? If Gong Tianping dares to break the rules and interfere, I think that he will need to check what he has, and whether he is able to offend the people from the World Spirit Guild or not."
At that very instant, the observing people went into a mess. When the battle arrived at that state, people yearned to see how it would end, and whether the two huge powers behind the two geniuses would have any actions or not.
Many people looked forward to a good show, and they looked forward to the protection from the powers behind the two geniuses.
However, some people felt that it was impossible as well. Although the two powers were extremely strong, exactly because their status was high, they could not ignore and break the rules of the life and death battle. Only Chu Feng and Gong Luyun were the main characters in today's arranged battle. Everyone else were only observers on the side.
But some people also felt that for the sake of family affection, anything was possible. Gong Tianping would absolutely not only stare as his own son was dying and not save him. As long as Chu Feng really intended to kill, even if Gong Tianping gave up his life, he would have actions.
As for Lin Ran, he doted on Gong Luyun so much that he even passed all of the unique martial skills from the Qilin Prince's Mansion down to Gong Luyun. How could he only look and do nothing as his foster grandson was being tormented and killed like that?
"Stop!!"
Finally, an angry bellow exploded out from a certain area in the guest's viewing seats. Following that, a large number of people stood up from those seats and charged towards the fighting stage. Those people were exactly the people from the Black Tortoise City, and the person who yelled out was Gong Luyun's father, the city lord of the Black Tortoise City, Gong Tianping.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
At the same time that the people from the Black Tortoise City moved, Zhuge Liuyun and the Six Protectors also suddenly rushed down from the viewing seats and stopped in front of the Black Tortoise City's army.
"Gong Tianping, this is a life and death stage. In this place, life and death will depend on themselves and no one can interfere. From your current actions, do you plan to break the rules?" Zhuge Liuyun loudly questioned.
"Screw your damn rules! Today, I will take my son away. I kill anyone who blocks me, and I won't even give face to god!"
However, Gong Tianping was as though he lost all rationality. He waved his big sleeve, and strong gale flew Zhuge Liuyun and the Six Protectors away. He was truly determined to take Gong Luyun away no matter what.
But quickly after, soft wind descended from the sky and slowly allowed Zhuge Liuyun and the others who were in the air to land, and they were not harmed in any way.
"Look, what's happening?"
Everyone was shocked at that sudden scene. Even Gong Tianping wouldn't help but be taken aback, because clearly, there was an expert who saved Zhuge Liuyun and the others.
At that instant, everyone cast their gazes towards the people from the World Spirit Guild, but they discovered that the group of people were still sitting where they were and they didn't even move. Looking at how they were, it seemed that they did not plan to interfere with the matter in front of them.
As everyone was guessing who helped Zhuge Liuyun and the others, an aged voice rang out in that area.
"Gong Tianping, if you want to ignore my Azure Dragon School's rules, it will need to depend whether you are capable or not."


MGA Capitulo 253  Arrival of the School Head
Such a powerful voice successfully became the focus of everyone. After they cast their gazes towards that person, everyone who was on scene couldn't help but be stunned. Especially the core disciples and the core elders from the Azure Dragon School. Their faces were full of shock, and their expressions were as wonderful as they could get.
From the corner, a familiar figure was slowly walking about. An old man who barely had any hair and had a camel back. His clothing was very sloppy and his appearance was quite unsightly as well.
However, at that instant, his body emanated the aura of the 7th level of the Profound realm. He was the person who saved Chu Feng from Gong Luyun that day. Elder Li.
"Elder Li, how can it be him? He's an expert of the 7th level of the Profound realm?"
At that instant, not to mention others, even Chu Feng who was saved by Elder Li before was greatly surprised because no one could have thought that an elder who guarded the entrance in the Azure Dragon School had that kind of strength. Some first-rate school heads did not even have cultivation at that level.
"Who are you?" Naturally, Gong Tianping did not recognize Elder Li, but the aura that was emanating from Elder Li's body forced him to seriously treat it.
Although they were both in the 7th level of the Profound realm, the aura on Elder Li's body was thicker. It could be seen that the old man stepped into that realm for a long period of time already.
"I am Li Zhangqing." Elder Li lightly smiled and said.
"What? Li Zhangqing? Isn't that the name of the head of the Azure Dragon School?"
"Does this mean that this Elder Li is my Azure Dragon School's head? But as a school head, why did he become an elder who guarded entrances?"
After Elder Li spoke, not to mention the people from the Azure Dragon School, even outsiders were endlessly shocked. The head of the Azure Dragon School was a very mysterious person. Very few people saw his real appearance, and he also very rarely showed himself. However, people knew that he had a name, and it was Li Zhangqing.
"He is indeed the school head of our Azure Dragon School. In order to dig up some more exceptional disciples, he did not always sit on the high position of the school head. Rather, he concealed his identity and took the position of being an elder guard for the entrance to the Azure Dragon School's core zone."
"On that day, Gong Luyun wanted to kill Chu Feng. So, he personally stopped it. The arranged battle between the two could also be said to be witness by him one year ago as well."
Just at that time, the old lady from the Six Protectors spoke. The other five people did not have any expressions of surprise, and Zhuge Liuyun was also faintly smiling. It could be seen that the several people already knew Elder Li's true identity.
As they saw that scene, everyone also believed the identity of Elder Li. However, even more people were shocked as the head of the Azure Dragon School was an expert in the 7th level of the Profound realm. With that strength, it could certainly lead the Azure Dragon School to become a first-rate school. So, it turned out that the Azure Dragon School was not a second-rate school from the start!
"Haha, on this topic, I was also dragged into the arranged battle from a year ago. On that day, I wagered that Chu Feng would win. So, Gong Luyun said that as long as he won, Chu Feng and I would need to kneel down in front of him and admit that we were wrong."
"Even I worried about that. After all, I am still the head of this school. If I really needed to kneel and admit my wrongs in front of a disciple from my own school, I would truly lose face."
"But luckily, Chu feng did not disappoint me!" Seeing that his own identity was revealed, Elder Li did not bother hiding anything. With a light smile and as he stroked several of his dried out strands of beard on his chin, he made a joke about the beginning of the arranged battle.
"Li Zhangqing, as the head of a school, you handle things in such an unfair way. You lean towards Chu Feng like this and work together to suppress my son. Do you think you are even qualified to be the head of a school?" Seeing that Li Zhangqing talk about his own son in such a way, Gong Tianping pointed at Li Zhangqing's nose and angrily rebuked.
"I'm unfair? On that day, if I did not come out, your son would have killed a genius from my Azure Dragon School. None of the guests today would be able to see this genius's grandeur."
"Gong Tianping. I have seen every single thing that your son has done. I named him as the number one disciple because of his talent. However, his character truly makes my heart cold."
"Although in this world, one's cultivation is extremely important, their character is even more important. Or else, no matter how much stronger your cultivation gets, it would only be harmful for the world. Gong Tianping. As Gong Luyun's father, don't you feel that you've taught your son to be unfair, and don't you feel that your son has committed grave sins?" Li Zhangping counter-asked.
"Hmph. This is your territory, so whatever you say will be justified. I won't bother wasting my words on you. Quickly let my son go, or else my Black Tortoise City will not be finished with your Azure Dragon School." Gong Tianping angrily yelled.
"Don't even think about it. This life and death battle was personally witnessed by me. The one who loses will be the one who dies. Chu Feng, Gong Luyun is not righteous, so you don't need to be benevolent. Go ahead!" Li Zhangqing did not even put Gong Tianping in his eyes. He waved his hands at Chu Feng and indicated him to kill Gong Luyun.
"Yes sir!" Chu Feng did not hesitate. He raised the golden-coloured blade in his hand and he made motions to chop Gong Luyun's neck.
"If you dare to touch my son, I will kill you first!" Seeing that, Gong Tianping's expression changed greatly and he exploded his cultivation of the 7th level of the Profound realm out. Layers of Profound power kept on spreading out and it attacked Chu Feng who was on the fighting stage.
*boom* However, just as the Profound power that was like tide surged out, it was completely engulfed by another wave of Profound power and it was held back.
"If you dare to touch my school's disciple, don't blame me for anything that happens!"
It turned out that Li Zhangqing did it. Not only did he stop Gong Tianping's attack, he even pushed the boundless Profound power from his body towards Gong Tianping and the many Black Tortoise City experts and attacked all of them at the same time.
"You old bastard! If anything happens to my son, I will demolish your Azure Dragon School!" Gong Tianping was also completely furious. As he gnashed his teeth, he pounced towards Li Zhangqing, and at the same time, the Black Tortoise City army behind him simultaneously attacked as well.
At that instant, Zhuge Liuyun and the Six Protectors originally wanted to help out, but their thoughts were in vain as Li Zhangqing waved his hand at them and said, "No need to help. I myself am enough against a mere Black Tortoise City!"
After Li Zhangqing spoke, instantly, a commotion was raised. Many people even suspected that he was boasting. After all, he was also only in the 7th level of the Profound realm, and in terms of cultivation, he was fairly equal to Gong Tianping. A single Gong Tianping could fight against him, so on what basis was he going to fight against the entire Black Tortoise City?
However, later on, the people who had doubts discovered that they were wrong. Elder Li did not have overly beautiful martial skills, but every single strike and style were quite bold. He emanated strong power, and as his Profound power was being controlled by him, occasionally it would form a screen to block attacks, and occasionally it would form sharp blades to harm an enemy.
The old man who gave off a feeling that he could not even fight against the wind truly relied on his own power to hold the many experts from the Black Tortoise City away, and looking at his appearance, he even seemed so casual and he did not even seem to be using any strength.


MGA Capitulo 254  Arrival of the Great Army
"The head of the Azure Dragon School is this strong?!"
At that instant, on the faces of the surrounding observers, other than shock, it was shock. Not to mention those from second-rate schools, even the first-rate school heads that came together with the Black Tortoise City could not remain calm, because the strength that Li Zhangqing displayed was completely superior to theirs.
"I never would have thought that the Azure Dragon School had such a top-level character hidden within it! With his cultivation, the Azure Dragon School could undoubtedly enter the ranks of first-rate schools."
"Yeah, this Li Zhangqing is quite impressive. So it seems that he already discovered a good seedling like Chu Feng a year ago."
"Right now, for Chu Feng's sake, Li Zhangqing decided to fight the Gong family. Although it does not seem reasonable on the surface, in reality, it is an extremely powerful method. He is putting everything on Chu Feng. By helping Chu Feng like this, naturally, Chu Feng would feel endlessly touched, and as long as Chu Feng can develop well, the Azure Dragon School would naturally rise as well."
"You are correct. So it turns out that within the Azure Dragon School, not only did a genius like Chu Feng appear, there was even an old monster like Li Zhangqing. It seems like the Azure Dragon School is fated to rise greatly, and another outstanding first-rate school will appear in the Azure Province."
Li Zhangqing's strength and methods were seen by everyone. So, everyone felt that since Chu Feng and Li Zhangqing, one young monster and one old monster, appeared in the Azure Dragon School, the school was certainly going to rise quickly in ranks.
The various powers had to reevaluate the Azure Dragon School in order to hiddenly calculate whether to befriend the Azure Dragon School or not. They had to decide if they should do that or not before it completely rose in power and before its potential was not discovered by many people.
*waa~~~~~~~~~*
But just at that moment, an abnormally loud and clear horn sound rang out from outside of the arena. That sound was extremely strong. It was like a scream, yet also like a dragon's cry. The atmosphere it emitted had boundless awe, and even the sky trembled.
"This soundIt's the Qilin Horn from the Qilin Prince's Mansion!!" Suddenly, a first-rate school disciple yelled in surprise.
"What? You said the Qilin Horn from the Qilin Prince's Mansion? Isn't it the horn that only gets blown when the Qilin Prince's Mansion has an emergency or when they attack? Has the people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion come?"
After those words were spoken, instantly, the crowd went into chaos. What was the Qilin Prince's Mansion? It was the true overlord of the Azure Province, and even the Lingyun School did not dare to offend them because there was the huge monster behind the Qilin Prince's Mansion.
*rumble rumble rumble rumble rumble*
Soon after the horn was rang, the entire mountain peak started to violently tremble. Large rocks started to roll down the slopes and at the foot of the mountain, a large group of people and horses were approaching.
"This old guy really did come." At that instant, even Chu Feng lightly frowned. He did not do anything to Gong Luyun yet because he knew that the strongest guy behind Gong Luyun had arrived.
As for Gong Luyun, at that moment, he was heavily wounded and bruised. He could not even speak, but when he heard the horn, a peaceful smile brimmed on the corner of his mouth.
Indeed, rows of golden light started to encircle the rolling dust. As they blocked the dazzling golden light, people discovered that there were indeed people and horse.
There were several tens of thousands of people. All of them wore golden-coloured armor, and on the chest section of the armor, there was an aggressive Qilin. The horses that they were riding on also wore golden-coloured armor.
They were very well ordered as well. They advanced in a huge formation and they emitted a frightening atmosphere. That group of people and horses were indeed the true overlord of the Azure Province, the Qilin Prince's Mansion.
"They're from the Qilin Prince's Mansion! Isn't the person who is leading the head manager from the Lin clan in the Qilin Prince's Mansion, Lord Lin Ran?"
"It is indeed him. I never would have thought that even someone like him would arrive to this arranged battle."
"Of course he needs to come! Don't you know how much Lin Ran dotes on Gong Luyun? A good show is coming up. I wonder what expression Lin Ran will have as he sees his precious foster grandson being abused to this state."
The golden armor on Lin Ran's body as well as the horse under him was not different when compared to the other people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion. However, as he stood there, the atmosphere of his entire person was completely different. It wasn't from his cultivation. It was the atmosphere that his own body emitted out.
Even if a person like him did not cultivate, within commoners, he could still become a leader. He had inborn, unordinary leading abilities, and an unordinary atmosphere.
At that instant, Lin Ran already saw Gong Luyun who was on the fighting stage. His snow-white sword-like eyebrows slightly rose and a roll of flame already appeared in his heart. It was not his foster grandson. It was his own son.
How could Lin Ran not be furious when he saw as his own son got beaten up so wretchedly? However, he endured. He did not immediately speak because he still saw a group of unknown World Spiritists in a certain area in the guest viewing seats.
Naturally, he, Lin Ran, recognized the people from the World Spirit Guild. In front of that group, he did not dare to act wildly because if he offended the World Spirit Guild, the entire Qilin Prince's Mansion would be affected as well.
"My friend on the fighting stage. Are you Chu feng?" After organizing his emotions, Lin Ran spoke.
"I am!" Chu Feng replied.
"Friend, you are quite good to be able to force my grandson to his state." Lin Ran smiled, then asked Lin Zhangqing, "Brother, are you the head of the Azure Dragon School, Li Zhangqing?"
"I am." After the army of the Qilin Prince's Mansion appeared, Ling Zhangqing stopped fighting with the people from the Black Tortoise City.
"School Head Li, truly, zhenren don't show their appearances, and I never would have thought that you would be an expert of the 7th level of the Profound realm. With your cultivation, you can send an application so that the Azure Dragon School becomes a first-rate school. Tomorrow, you can send people to the Qilin Prince's Mansion to apply. I will be responsible approving it, and I can add your Azure Dragon School into the list for first-rate schools."
Lin Ran smiled, but his tone had a few implications of threat. He was hiddenly indicating Li Zhangqing. No matter how much stronger he got, he would still be far away from his Qilin Prince's Mansion. Whether the Azure Dragon School could become a first-rate school or not would depend whether Lin Ran approved it or not.
"The Azure Dragon School isn't concrete enough, so I don't want to have the title of being a first-rate school. Therefore, no need to worry, milord."
Li Zhangqing wasn't a person who was afraid of matters as he indifferently smiled. But in reality, he was telling Lin Ran that he had no interest in the title of first-rate schools, so he should not even think of using that to threaten him.
"Haha, School Head Li, you are indeed an ambitious person. It seems like I, Lin Ran, has been nosy." Lin Ran laughed, then he looked towards Chu Feng and said, "My friend Chu Feng, hatred will only stack up more and more."
"You don't really have any deep hatred with Luyun, and on that year, you only arranged this battle because of some little thing. There is no need to really fight until one lives and one dies."
"Quite a lesson has already been given by you and it's enough. How about you sell me some face and spare him?"
"Ho" After hearing Lin Ran's words, Chu Feng first mockingly chuckled, then fiercely glared at him and said, "Is the hatred of family extermination a little thing?"
"What? Family extermination?!" After Chu Feng spoke, it was like a huge rock thrown into a lake and the crowd went into an uproar.


MGA Capitulo 255  Beheading Gong Luyun
"Hatred of family extermination? What actually happened? There's a deep hatred of family extermination between Chu Feng and Gong Luyun?"
"I know, I know! I heard that roughly half a year ago, an absolutely tragic massacre happened in the Golden-purple City. In a single night, everyone in the Golden-purple City was completely annihilated."
"As for Chu Feng's family, incidentally, they were also the people who died the most miserably in the Golden-purple City. Almost every single Chu family member were beheaded and their heads were hung to deter the public. Accordingly, there were even words of blood written in the Golden-purple City, and it stated that the people who died in the Golden-purple City all died because of Chu Feng."
"I've also heard of the incident from the Golden-purple City, but I didn't know that the Chu family was in it. Were the words of blood real? If they were real, then the Golden-purple City massacre was really caused by the Chu family."
"How did Chu Feng anger such a huge enemy at such an age? Is it possible that the Golden-purple City's massacre really were Gong Luyun's actions?"
A few words, "family extermination hatred", caused emotions to abruptly rise. Some people who were quite well informed immediately associated the Golden-purple City's bloody case with Gong Luyun. However, even though the connection did not seem significant, after joining the two together, they were quite frightened. They couldn't help but cast strange gazes towards Gong Luyun.
The massacre in the Golden-purple City was truly too cruel. Every single person in the city the old, young, female, children none of them lived. That heartless killing method made one's hair stand up. If it was truly caused by Gong Luyun, then he was a bit too ruthless.
"My friend Chu Feng, you can eat whatever you want to eat, but you cannot say whatever you want to say. The incident in the Golden-purple City has already been clearly investigated. It was done by the Five Tiger Village, and the Five Tiger Village has already gotten the punishment that it should have gotten. The truth has already been known and clear. You cannot accuse someone else unfairly." When he heard that Chu Feng gave his son some crimes, Lin Ran's tone started to turn cold.
"I'm sure everyone here knows what kind of place the Five Tiger Village is. If they were not hired by anyone, why would they attack my Chu family for no cause or reason? And I can tell everyone that the person who hired the Five Tiger Village was Gong Luyun." Chu Feng ignored Lin Ran and he loudly yelled at the crowd.
"Rubbish! Do you have evidence for your words?" Lin Ran was all muddled up by anger, and at the same time, Gong Tianping and the others started to angrily howl at Chu Feng.
"Evidence? I don't need evidence. Right now, Gong Luyun's life is in my hands. I can take it whenever I want to take it. Why do I need evidence?" Chu Feng kept on sneering, and as he spoke, he couldn't help but clench the big blade in his hand.
"You dare?! If you dare to even touch him, I'll stamp over your Azure Dragon School!"
Lin Ran was completely angered. After he spoke, the army from the Qilin Prince's Mansion behind him all prepared for battle. A single furious roar shook the sky and the earth. They emanated unstoppable might. They were the true masters of kings.
"I don't dare? I'll let you see whether I dare or not right now!!"
Chu Feng only laughed, then the golden blade in his hand became into a half-moon golden blur and it chopped towards Gong Luyun's neck.
"No"
Seeing that, Lin Ran and Gong Tianping were shocked. Even Gong Luyun's face who was brimming with smiles from the corner of his mouth changed greatly. His eyes were widened so big that they were round and his gaze was filled with fear. At that instant, he truly felt the taste of death.
*whoosh*
A golden blur swept past, and with a poof, blood sprayed over a large area and Gong Luyun's head, under the dumbfounded gazes of the crowd, flew off as it was chopped by Chu Feng.
*bang* After slicing, Chu Feng reached and grabbed. He took Gong Luyun's brain from mid-air, and threw it towards Lin Ran who was still outside of the arena and howled, "Have it back!"
"Heavens, this"
"Chu Feng really killed Gong Luyun, and he even killed him in front of Lin Ran!"
"His nerves are a bit too big aren't they? Does he truly not fear the heavens or the earth?"
Chu Feng's actions caused everyone in the arena to tremble. After Chu Feng's blade sliced down, not only did Gong Luyun feel the pain. almost everyone's hearts were moved along with it. They were frightened by Chu Feng's actions.
If it was said that Chu Feng killing Gong Luyun was completely reasonable, that would be because it was a life and death battle, and the victor had the right to kill the loser.
However, when Lin Ran already spoke, and said that if Chu Feng dared to touch Gong Luyun again, he would stamp the Azure Dragon School flat, everything turned by 180 degrees.
What status did Lin Ran have? What position? What strength? In front of the old man, the rules of the Azure Dragon School weren't even rules, yet Chu Feng still dug his face away like that.
At that moment, it wasn't already as simple as Chu Feng killing Gong Luyun. He went against Lin Ran's wishes, and slapped his face in front of a million people. That matter had been made into a huge thing!
"YouYou"
Lin Ran held Gong Luyun's head, and as he looked at his eyes which were not shut, it was as though he was looking as his own son. His body was violently quivering, and indescribable fury was surging in his body.
"Ahh~~~~~~~~~~~~" Suddenly, Lin Ran angrily roared towards the sky and it caused the earth to tremble. After that, he pointed towards the people in the arena, pointed towards Chu Feng, pointed towards everyone, and coldly yelled, "I want every single person here dead and no one alive!!"
"Yes sir!" At the same time that he finished speaking, the people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion behind him gave a thunder-like response. Under Lin Ran's lead, and with killing intent that rose to the heavens, they charged into the arena.
"Really? What is happening? Killing everyone here... Does that mean we need to be killed as well?"
At that instant, everyone in the arena panicked. Not only the people from the Azure Dragon School. Even the expressions of the people from the other schools changed greatly.
They could tell how furious the current Lin Ran was. With his blood-red eyes, clearly, he had already lost all reason. The Qilin army behind him also followed his command, so it seemed that they were truly going to start a massacre.
The Qilin army was too strong. Putting aside Lin Ran's cultivation of the 8th level of the Profound realm which could already kill every single person on scene, the people within the Qilin army which had several tens of thousands of people were not mediocre. The weakest were at the 5th level of the Origin realm, but many people already entered the Profound realm. With that formation, it could certainly demolish the Azure Dragon School and kill every single person on scene.
"We're finished. We're dead. Chu Feng completely angered Lin Ran, and we have been dragged down by him as well!"
At that instant, many people's faces were like ashes as they powerlessly sat on the ground limply. As they faced the Qilin army who had golden armor while riding golden horses, they only thing they could do was to wait for death. Many people even lost consciousness from the might of the Qilin army. They felt that they were near death. They felt that they would undoubtedly die.
"As the ruler of the Azure Province, you view human life as though it was grass. The Qilin Prince's Mansion is truly trash!"
Just at that time, an aged voice suddenly rang out. Following that, from a certain place in the guest viewing seats, twenty blurs abruptly rushed out, and at the end, they solidly landed near the entrance to the arena, and they stopped in front of the Qilin Prince's Mansion's huge army of several tens of thousands.


MGA Capitulo 256  Corrupt Methods
"They're the twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists from the World Spirit Guild! What are they doing? Do they not want their lives?" Cries of surprise kept on ringing out from the arena, and some sharp-eyed people already recognized the origin of the twenty figures.
The twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists stood across like a one (一). In front of the army of tens of thousands, they clearly seemed to be so weak that even the wind could blow them away, yet they did not move an inch from there. They allowed their grey-coloured World Spirit Cloak to flutter left and right, and they did not plan to back away in the slightest.
That terrified everyone, and they were thinking what the group of World Spiritists were planning to do. Were they looking to die? Although people knew that World Spiritists were strong and Grey-cloak World Spiritists were even stronger, however, in front of them was an army of tens of thousands! It was even the army from the Qilin Prince's Mansion! The army from the Qilin Prince's Mansion was famous for extremely strong battle power, and they people in the army were absolutely not comparable by disciples and elders from various other schools. They were the true masters of kings.
Besides, the commander of the Qilin army was Lin Ran. The old man who was in the 8th level of the Profound realm. One of the famous big characters in the entire Azure Province, and his battle power was so strong that was terrifying!
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
Suddenly, both of the hands of the twenty World Spiritists quickly changed unpredictably. Layers of grey-coloured gas started to circle around their bodies, and it formed a surging shield. Also, the gas got more and more dense, and at the end, it almost completely surrounded them.
"Hundred Dragon Heaven Sealing Formation!"
Finally, the twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists attacked at the same time. The grey-coloured gas that encircled them became grey-coloured huge dragons.
The grey-coloured huge dragons roared in the air. If one counted them, there would be a hundred of them. Every single one was several hundred meters long, and they were truly, undoubted, huge dragons.
The hundred huge dragons rushed towards the army from the Qilin Prince's Mansion at the same time. They widened their fierce mouths, as if within their eyes, the Qilin army wasn't a terrifying army but a delicious dinner.
No matter how much more training the Qilin army got, they were still scared by the hundred huge dragons. Immediately, they stopped going forward and fear was revealed on their faces because they could feel the threat from the huge dragons.
"Empty might!"
At that time, Lin Ran stood out. He stood on the golden horse and he threw several palms towards the air. Every single palm contained golden-coloured light, and like shooting meteorites, they flew towards the hundred huge dragons in the air.
*boom boom boom boom*
As they howled through the air, the golden-coloured light palms shattered the hundred huge dragons and completely destroyed them. The originally huge dragon body became grey-coloured gas that went everywhere. The gas floated in the air and it did not go away.
"Ohh~~~~~~" At that instant, the Qilin army couldn't help but cheer as they celebrated their victory.
"This Lin Ran is too strong. With the cultivation of the 8th level of the Profound realm and the comprehension and use of martial skills, he is close to breaking logic, and no matter how much stronger the World Spiritist methods get, they would have no way of blocking him off. This is the strength of cultivators. As long as one had absolute battle power, no matter what corrupt methods someone else used, they would still have no ways of resisting."
When the twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists attacked, and especially after the appearance of the hundred huge dragons, many people were as if they saw hope. But when that hope was shattered, what they faced was even deeper disappointment.
However, they did not discover that after the hundred grey-coloured huge dragons were shattered, not only did the twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists not have a single trace of worry, rather, within their aged eyes, faint joy appeared.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
Suddenly, all of them extended their arms, intersected them, and did a strange hand seal. After that, all of them yelled at the same time, "Seal!!"
*hu hu hu*
After they spoke, the sky and the earth trembled, and the grey-coloured gases that were originally floating in the air were as though they heard a summon and they became hurricanes as they charged towards the Qilin army once again.
"Hmph. No matter how many times you come, I will be able to shatter you."
Seeing that, Lin Ran was not afraid as well. He threw out several golden palms again towards the air, but this time, the golden palms were unable to break the grey-coloured gas. Instead, they went straight through them.
"Waa~~"
Quickly after that, the boundless grey-coloured gas entered the Qilin army. Like a rainy cloud, they tightly enveloped them and they quickly started to surge. Strong force blew them to the point that both human and horses were rolling, and in an instant, the master of kings were already completely defeated.
"What a strong method! It is truly too terrifying. They are only twenty people, yet they could so easily cause the army of several tens of thousands to collapse. Is this the methods of Grey-cloak World Spiritists?"
As they looked at the grey-coloured gas that were like black clouds engulfing the Qilin army of several tens of thousands, everyone was dumbfounded. Their gazes were filled with astonishment. That grey-coloured gas was too strange. No matter what attack was thrown out, it would be unable to damage the gas and it would only go straight through and at the end, harm their own people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion.
However, they were also real substances and they could affect the Qilin army. They blew them to the point in which they were rolling and climbing on the ground, and the army lost all battle power. The people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion could not even walk out of the grey-coloured gas and they were completely sealed within it. Perhaps it sounded quite bad, but they could really only wait to die.
"Quickly dissolve this dirty and corrupt formation or else I will not care whether you come from the World Spirit Guild or not. I will certainly not allow you to return."
Suddenly, a figure leaped out from the grey-coloured gas. It was Lin Ran. At that instant, Lin Ran's hair was in complete chaos and he was like a mad demon. Even his clothes were incomplete. Clearly, he suffered quite a bit of damage when he was in the grey-coloured gas.
However, his current aura was abnormally strong as well. Without restraint, he emanated the pressure of the 8th level of the Profound realm and attacked the twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists.
*rumble rumble rumble*
His strike was condensed by Profound power. Although it was only simple Profound power, it was abnormally strong. The Profound power first rushed into the sky, then descended back down. It enveloped the twenty World Spiritists and at the same time, locked their escape. He wanted to defeat all of them with one strike.
"Heavens! How much power do you need for such limitless Profound power? Is this Lin Ran's true strength? Although it isn't a martial skill, it has surpassed martial skills. This is truly too terrifying."
As they looked at the limitless Profound power, everyone couldn't help but inhale a break of cool air and they were deeply stunned by the terrifying might. At the same time, they also deeply wiped away some sweat for the World Spiritists.
Although they had no relation at all with the World Spiritists, at that moment, Lin Ran wanted to take everyone's lives so the World Spiritists were their only hope. Naturally, they did not want anything happening to the World Spiritists.
"You are only the 8th level of the Profound realm, yet you dare speak such wild words and want to take our lives? Truly shameless big words!"
However, as the Profound power was going to land, at the same time, boundless Profound power exploded from the bodies of the twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists. Their Profound power rushed straight up into the air and interweaved with Lin Ran's attack. Instantly, it dissipated Lin Ran's Profound power.
At that instant, almost everyone could feel the aura of the twenty World Spiritists. All of them couldn't help but widen their mouths and even their bodies were excitedly trembling as they yelled out in surprise, "Theyare all experts in the 8th level of the Profound realm!!"


MGA Capitulo 257  Black-Coloured Forbidden Medicine
The twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists were martial cultivation experts in the 8th level of the Profound realm. As they emanated their auras, instantly, they suppressed Lin Ran's because every single one of their auras were no weaker than Lin Ran's, let alone the twenty of them together.
"So these are the people from the World Spirit Guild? Strong. If people in the 8th level of the Profound realm are already peak-level big characters in the Azure Province, these twenty experts in the 8th level of the Profound realm are quite a bit scary."
"It's said that in the Spirit Province, experts are like the clouds, and it seems like that is indeed true. I don't believe that these twenty people are the peak-level people in the World Spirit Guild, but when they are in the Azure Province, they are indeed peak-level. It could be seen how big of a difference there is between the Azure Province's cultivators and the cultivators from other provinces."
The cultivation of the twenty World Spiritists frightened everyone. Even Lin Ran tightly frowned and his face became strangely ugly.
"Leave. Seeing that all of you came from the Qilin Prince's Mansion, today, we will spare you."
"But remember, don't think about harming Chu Feng. He is a part of my World Spirit Guild, and if you dare to touch him, my World Spirit Guild will not ignore it." One of the Grey-cloak World Spiritists waved his hand at Lin Ran, indicating them to quickly leave.
"Hehhehehehahahaha" However, at that moment, Lin Ran suddenly loudly laughed.
His laughter was extremely strange. Although, from his voice, he was indeed laughing, his expression was abnormally sinister and terrifying.
Suddenly, he stopped laughing. He cast his abnormally evil gaze towards the twenty World Spiritists from the World Spirit Guild and fiercely said, "Today, I must kill Chu Feng. No matter who it is, those who block me will die!!"
After speaking, the Cosmos Sack on his waist lit up, and a purplish-black pill appeared in his hand. Then, he swallowed it.
After the pill entered his body, change instantly happened to Lin Ran. Both of his eyes turned black, and his mouth also turned black. Black-coloured gas kept on flowing out from his body. At that instant, his aura was rising. With a blink, he arrived in the 9th level of the Profound realm, and he was still climbing.
"Crap, he used a Forbidden Medicine!" Seeing that, the people from the World Spirit Guild also instantly became tense.
"That's a Forbidden Medicine? Quite scary! I heard that Forbidden Medicine allowed a cultivator's cultivation to rise, but after the power disappears, they will get the rebounds."
"I heard that according to the medical powers, the colours of the Forbidden Medicines are different as well. The black colour is one of the strongest ones! Look, Lin Ran's aura already reached the peak of the 9th level of the Profound realm, but it is still increasing! If this goes on, he wouldn't make a breakthrough into the Heaven realm right?"
"How is it possible? No matter how much more powerful Forbidden Medicines are, it would be impossible for him to go from the 8th level of the Profound realm to the Heaven realm. If there is truly a Forbidden Medicine like that, after the powers disappear, the user would certainly die from the rebound."
"It stopped, it stopped. However, he has already infinitely neared the Heaven realm. He is no longer in the simple Profound realm. He is truly at the peak of the Profound realm. The Profound realm that endlessly nears the Heaven realm."
"Has Lin Ran gone insane? So in order to kill Chu Feng, he took such a powerful Forbidden Medicine? Although the Forbidden Medicine wouldn't be enough to take his life, but he would still receive extremely powerful rebound right?"
As they looked at Lin Ran who had black gas lingering around him, everyone was endlessly terrified. They knew how scary the current Lin Ran was. Even the twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritist in the 8th level of the Profound realm could not stop him.
"Today, I must take Chu Feng's head! If there is anyone who dares to stop me, I will start an annihilation!"
Lin Ran angrily yelled as he walked towards Chu Feng step by step. The ground would tremble after every step. A deep footprint would be left behind as countless cracks spread out from them.
"If you want to kill Chu Feng, you must pass through us first."
However, just at that time, the twenty World Spiritists from the World Spirit Guild rushed forward again and arrived in front of Lin Ran.
Simultaneously, they spread their arms open and layers of strong grey-coloured Spirit Formation power surged out and became incomparably thick huge Spirit Formation Walls and they surrounded Lin Ran within them.
"Hmph. You still dare to use such crooked methods against me? All of you truly are looking to die!"
Lin Ran coldly snorted, then waved his big sleeve. The black-coloured gas swirled like a hurricane and it completely shattered the huge Spirit Formations and instantly, all of them crumbled.
After the Spirit Formation Wall was destroyed, the black-coloured gas pounched towards the twenty World Spiritists. At that instant, the World Spiritists also used everything they had to lay Spirit Formations in order to hold the gas back.
One layer. Two layers. Ten layers. A hundred layers. As they proficiently controlled the Spirit Formations, hundreds of Spirit Formation walls kept on condensing in front him them and the numbers were still rising.
However, in front of the black-coloured gas, they were useless. The Spirit Formations that were originally incomparably firm, the Spirit Formations that were titled as the strongest defense methods, were like tofu as they could not even take a single strike. They already crumbled because of the black-coloured gas.
"Ahh~~~"
The twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists flew several hundred meters back before falling back down after they were struck by the black-coloured gas. After landing, their auras became extremely feeble, and even the grey-coloured gas that enveloped the Qilin army quickly dissipated. It could be seen that they were quite heavily injured.
"Elders!" As they saw that, the several hundred White-cloak World Spiritists on the guest view stage quickly rushed down and they wanted to support the twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists.
"Move!!"
However, Lin Ran saved his big sleeve, and the several hundred White-cloak World Spiritists were like scarecrows as they flew up high, then they quickly fell back down and ferociously landed on the floor.
At that instant, the World Spiritists that came from the World Spirit Guild were laying on the ground as they painfully howled. They did not even have any strength to stand back up.
"Chu Feng, run!!" Just at that time, another figure rushed out. It was Chu Feng's master, Zhuge Liuyun
"Die!" Lin Ran's gaze turned cold as he raised his palm. Strong Profound power flew towards Zhuge Liuyun. The huge power was enough to destroy Zhuge Liuyun into pieces.
*whoosh* But when that Profound power was going to hit Zhuge Liuyun, Li Zhangqing stood in front of him, and he used his entire body's Profound power to lay a defense in order to block Lin Ran's attack.
However, it was useless. With a huge boom, violent energy ripples engulfed them. The two of them flew back, and when they fell back on the floor, blood filled their mouths and they were seriously internally wounded.
At that instant, no one was able to defeat Lin Ran. He who used Forbidden Medicine was near invincible and not a single person could take any one of his strikes. His cultivation already reached the 9th level of the Profound realm, and he was infinitely near the Heaven realm. The most important part though, was his horrifying bloodlust. He was unable to dispel it if he did not quickly kill.


MGA Capitulo 258  Castrate Yourself
The current Lin Ran had black gas lingering around him and his bloodlust rose straight to the sky. As for the aura that he was emitting, other than strong, there was another word that summarize it. Coldness.
Everyone was afraid because at that moment, Lin Ran was truly too terrifying. A whole twenty Grey-cloak World Spiritists in the 8th level of the Profound realm could not even block one of his attacks. People truly suspected whether he already entered the Heaven realm or not.
In addition, the Qilin army of tens of thousands that were suppressed freed themselves. At that moment, they aggressively entered the arena, and everyone felt despair.
"Lin Ran, the person who killed Gong Luyun was me. If you have any hatred, aim them at myself!!"
As he saw the people next to him rolling around on the ground, and as he looked at the gazes of fear from the strangers around him, Chu Feng unhesitatingly jumped off the fighting stage and walked towards Lin Ran.
"Chu Fenghe..he!"
As they looked at that scene, everyone was shocked. Even though Lin Ran's fury was indeed caused by Chu Feng, at that instant, for the safety of the crowd, Chu Feng was willing to sacrifice himself. That still deeply shocked everyone's hearts.
In this world, most people were selfish and there were too little people who were willing to be selfless. Even they could not do it. But for some strangers, Chu Feng, such a young man, could sacrifice himself. Other than fear in their hearts, emotions of gratitude rose from deep within their hearts.
"Don't worry. Even if you don't come, I will still skin you alive before taking your little life away."
"Soldiers and generals of the Qilin Prince's Mansion, listen to my command! Today, I want the Azure Dragon School to be rinsed with blood! Other than people from my Prince's Mansion, kill every single other person without mercy!!"
However, Lin Ran, who was filled with killing intent, did not even plan to forgive any person in the arena. Immediately after he spoke, the Qilin army of tens of thousands behind him spread everywhere and they charged towards the observing crowd.
"Ah~~~~Run!!"
Instantly, all sorts of panicked cries kept on ringing out, and everyone did their best to escape. However, there was only one entrance to the arena, and at that moment, it was already sealed shut by the Qilin army. They were like turtles in a jar, and they had no roads to escape.
"We're dead. We're dead. Originally, there was a good show here to watch, but I never would have thought that we would become sacrifices in order to dissolve Lin Ran's hatred."
Compared to the people who panicked, those who had were thoughtful were even more gloomy. Ten thousand of their hopes turned into dust, and after closely analyzing the situation in front of their eyes, they got a conclusion. They were undoubtedly dead.
The current Chu Feng did not care about the people who randomly ran and randomly yelled. He first looked at Zhuge Liuyun and Li Zhangqing, then looked at the World Spirit Guild crowd, then looked at a certain area in the guest viewing seats. After seeing two familiar, beautiful figures, his heart couldn't help but violently jump two times.
Because those two were two women whom he loved. They were the sisters, Su Rou and Su Mei. Although the sisters were strictly guarded by the people from the Vermilion Bird City, Chu Feng knew that in front of the insane Qilin army, both of them were still in danger.
After experiencing the family extermination calamity, after feeling the pain of losing his family, Chu Feng hiddenly made a vow and he could not let anyone close to him be harmed because of himself. At that moment, there was only one method to protect them. It was to sacrifice himself.
Suddenly, he raised one of his fists, and a golden-coloured dagger appeared in his hand. As he walked towards Lin Ran, he loudly yelled,
"Lin Ran, there is absolutely no reason for you to do this. If you have anger, you can charge towards myself and throw all of it onto myself. How do you want me to torment myself? Speak. As long as you can say it, I, Chu Feng, can do it. There is no need for you to do it yourself. I, Chu Feng, will torture myself!"
After Chu Feng spoke, even Lin Ran couldn't help but be taken aback. He lightly frowned, but tightly stared at Chu Feng. After a while, an abnormally cold, evil, and strange smile rose on the corners of his mouth. He raised his hand and said, "Everyone, stop!!"
After speaking, the Qilin army who just charged into the observing seats quickly stopped. They did not started to kill the innocent people, and they only obediently waited for Lin Ran's orders.
"Chu Feng, you are quite courageous, but I don't really know whether you can do what you say." Lin Ran squinted his eyes and looked at Chu Feng with an eerie gaze.
"As long as you can say it, I can do it." Chu Feng grasped the golden-coloured dagger and there wasn't a trace of fear on his face.
"Good! Straightforward! In order to express your sincerity, first, let me see you castrating yourself!" Lin Ran yelled.
"Chu Feng, don't! Are you an idiot? Although he used Forbidden Medicine, that does not mean that we have no chances of winning. Lend your body to me, and let me take care of him. Even if I cannot defeat him, I can still help you safely escape. You don't need to give up right now!" At that instant, Eggy who was in Chu Feng's body howled with everything she had.
"Chu Feng, you must not! Don't do anything to yourself! This Lin Ran is an old fox, and he will not let us go even if you torment yourself!"
At the same time, Su Rou and Su Mei who were on the guest stage yelled out at the same time, but immediately after they yelled out, their mouths were covered by people on Su Hen's orders. He did not want to anger Lin Ran anymore under those circumstances.
"Chu Feng, do not do stupid things! You still have a great future!" Li Zhangqing yelled.
"Chu Feng, what are you thinking about? Quickly escape right now! This is an order from your master! Are you not even going to listen to the words of your master?!" Zhuge Liuyun angrily howled.
"Lin Ran, if anything happens to Chu Feng today, my World Spirit Guild will stamp your Qilin Prince's Mansion flat!" Even the elders from the World Spirit Guild threatened.
"Don't even think of scaring me. You think that I, Lin Ran, grew up from fear? No matter how much more powerful your World Spirit Guild is, it is only a power from a single area. Can you be even stronger than the Jiang Dynasty? The Jiang Dynasty is supporting my Qilin Prince's Mansion. Do you want to try and dare to even touch my Prince's Mansion?"
However, the current Lin Ran was near insanity. He was not afraid of the threats from the World Spirit Guild, and he only pointed at the guest stage in which Su Rou and Su Mei were on and said to Chu Feng,
"Chu Feng, you better quickly castrate yourself, or else I will pull those two girls here and let my Qilin army of tens of thousands take turns~~"
"You" At that instant, Chu feng gnashed his teeth in anger. He never would have thought that even under the current circumstances, Lin Ran still closely observed and he discovered that Su Rou and Su Mei worried about Chu Feng. From that, he discovered that their relationship was not ordinary.
However, under those situations, Chu Feng did not have a choice as well. He could only slowly raised the golden-coloured dagger in his hand and prepared to stab down.


MGA Capitulo 259  Ill Let You Be So Full Of Yourself
"Chu Feng you bastard! In order to save those two, are you going to not care about my life? If you die, I can't live as well!" Seeing that Chu Feng really wanted to do some idiotic thing, Eggy insanely howled.
"Eggy, no need to lie to me. I've already inquired about it. After the World Spiritist dies, the contract will indeed get dissolved, but the World Spirit won't disappear. They'll just return to the Spiritual World." Chu Feng smiled, but then his tone was filled with guilt.
"Nonsense! They only know fart. I was sealed in your body. If I could have returned to the Spiritual World, I would have already left! Why would I always be locked in your Spiritual World?" Eggy angrily rebuked.
[TN The translation above should be correct, but the context just doesn't really fit.]
"Eggy, don't speak anymore. I have already decided. You can blame me, because I am indeed, a useless master." Chu Feng bitterly chuckled, then the golden-coloured dagger in his hand formed a golden-coloured blur, and it headed towards his groin.
"No~~~~~~~"
At that instant, everyone who worried about Chu Feng widened their mouths and yelled out, as if their hearts were torn and their lungs were split. Even those who were not related to Chu Feng couldn't help but close their eyes and they couldn't bear continue looking. Chu Feng's actions could be said to be a sacrifice for everyone there.
*bang*
However, just as the golden blur was going to land, an aged hand suddenly appeared and tightly grabbed Chu Feng's wrist. It stopped Chu Feng's movements, and at the same time, an old laughing voice also rang out,
"Ho... You are quite heartless to even yourself. You don't even want your jewels? You don't want to do it with woman, and you don't want to carry any sons?"
After hearing that voice, Chu Feng's expression couldn't help but greatly change. After he clearly saw the old man, he even instantly rejoiced.
The old man wore golden-coloured armor and he had a kind smile on his face. Everything seemed quite familiar, because he was the mysterious senior Chu Feng saw that day in the Valley of Hundred Bends.
"Who is this?"
At the same time, everyone in the arena were shocked. The old man appeared way too fast and no one could even tell when he came. He appeared just like a ghost.
The reason why they were shocked was not only because of the unfathomable high cultivation. It was also because he wore armor that belonged to the Qilin Prince's Mansion, yet he saved Chu Feng.
"QiQi Fengyang!!" Finally, someone yelled in surprise and that person recognized that old man. The person who yelled out was none other than the person who wanted to kill Chu Feng. Lin Ran.
"What? Qi Fengyang?! He's the chief of the Qi clan in the Qilin Prince's Mansion?"
After hearing the name Qi Fengyang, almost everyone on scene couldn't help but inhale a breath of cool air. Who was Qi Fengyang? He was one of the true peak characters of the Azure Province.
In the Qilin Prince's Mansion, there were two clans. The Qi clan and the Lin clan. the one who ruled the two clans was the lord of the Qilin Prince's Mansion. So, in the Qilin Prince's Mansion, the lord of the mansion had the highest position.
Other than the mansion lord, the ones with the highest strength and position in the Qilin Prince's Mansion was the chief of the Qi clan and the chief of the Lin clan. Lin Ran was only a head manager in the Lin clan, and he was one step lower than being chief. However, Qi Fengyang was the chief of the Qi clan, so his position was one step higher than Lin Ran.
The most important thing was that Qi Fengyang already entered the 9th level of the Profound realm many years ago. He was truly in the peak of the Profound realm. No matter if it was status, position, or strength in terms of cultivation, he was a character who was stronger than Lin Ran. Why did such a character appear at that place?
If it was said that Lin Ran's appearance was to help his foster grandson, Gong Luyun, then why did Qi Fengyang appear in that place for? Why did he save Chu Feng? Did he come to help Chu Feng?
At that instant, various guesses kept on echoing in people's brains, but not one of them could think of the answer. On the other hand, Qi Fengyang indifferently smiled, then swept his gaze over to Lin Ran and calmly said, "Lin Ran. You've got quite big nerves! You dare to ignore the mansion rules and kill the innocent?!"
"Qi Fengyang. This Chu Feng killed my foster grandson. Why is it not right for me to take his life?" Clearly, Lin Ran was slightly afraid of Qi Fengyang, and as he spoke, he wasn't as forceful as before.
"Oh? A foster grandson is only a foster grandson. Is it worth it for you to have such big movements? If a mere foster grandson caused you to start a massacre, then I will need to take care of today's matter even more, because Chu Feng is my close friend!" Qi Fengyang pulled Chu Feng closer and as he stuck his chest out and raised his head as he patted Chu Feng's shoulder.
"What? I didn't hear wrong did I? Senior Qi Fengyang is Chu Feng's close friend? This"
After Qi Fengyang spoke, another ruckus was brought up by the crowd. Even Li Zhangqing, Zhuge Liuyun and the others were so shocked that their jaws fell to the ground.
A young person like Chu Feng was a close friend with Qi Fengyang, who was such a huge character? That news was truly too explosive!
However, there was no one who had an even more wonderful expression than Su Hen. Qi Fengyang was a huge character that even he did not get a chance to interact with. He was an old senior who he wished to have connections to, but could not.
However, that old senior was Chu Feng's close friend. Yet before, he even told his daughters to stay away from Chu Feng. Right now, he could really fiercely slap himself two times because god damn, he did not have eyes.
"Qi Fengyang. Today, I must kill Chu Feng. Don't think that I wouldn't dare to attack you just because you're the chief of the Qi clan."
Seeing that Qi Fengyang was determined to protect Chu Feng, Lin Ran did not speak anymore rubbish. Again, he emanated his boundless aura and the black gas rose into the air once again.
"Oh oh oh? You think you're so good now? After taking that pill, you feel like you can do it?"
"Come come come! You can come and try. I would quite like to see how capable you are after taking the Forbidden Medicine!" Qi Fengyang was not a person who was fun to anger. After pulling his sleeve and revealing his arm, he quickly ran towards Lin Ran.
"Qi Fengyang, you forced me!"
Suddenly, Lin Ran angrily roared as he became black light and leaped. Instantly, he arrived in front of Qi Fengyang, and the fist that was covered by black gas and had devastating power kept on increasing in size in front of Qi Fengyang's eyes.
"Damn you. Get down."
However, Qi Fengyang did not dodge or avoid it. Rather, he stuck one hand out, and formed it into a claw. He grabbed the fist that Lin Ran threw towards him, and with the wave of his arm, he spun Lin Ran who was in the air.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh*
Lin Ran was like a circular sandbag, and after being spun ten whole circles in the air by Qi Fengyang, he was pulled down from the air, and with a bang, he fell onto the ground. Strong power caused rocks to fly in all directions, and a huge hole was formed by that.
But that was not the end. Qi Fengyang raised his right leg, and he kicked Lin Ran who was in the hole at random places. As he kicked, he even cursed,
"God damn. You dare to be so cocky with me after you ate some broken pill? You want to be so full of yourself? I'll let you be so full of yourself!!"


MGA Capitulo 260  Strange Old Man
*bang bang bang*
Qi Fengyang, after he pulling his sleeved back and revealing his arm, fiercely kicked Lin Ran as he also added some cursing.
As people saw that scene, their souls were shocked. They grimaced, they were dumbfounded, they wanted to stop looking, yet they could not. They thought in their hearts They were both in the 9th level of the Profound realm, but that difference was a bit too great wasn't it?
In reality, it was indeed so. Even Chu Feng widened his mouth in shock because he could tell that it wasn't only the distance in terms of cultivation realms. It was purely the distance in terms of battle power. Similarly as he could use the cultivation of the 7th level of the Origin realm to defeat Gong Luyun who was in the 4th level of the Profound realm.
Although Qi Fengyang at that moment didn't have such twisted battle power as Chu Feng, he was still clearly not on the same level as Lin Ran. He was far above him. Beating Lin Ran was like beating a child. Lin Ran did not have any room to fight back nor did he have a chance to fight back because Qi Fengyang's battle power was completely above his, and he absolutely crushed him.
"ThisWhat should we do about this? Qi Fengyang is as abnormal as usual, and even Lord Lin Ran who ate Forbidden Medicine cannot defeat him"
"What else can we do? Quickly retreat! This old guy has disappeared for a long time, and during this period of time, the Qi clan has been quite miserably suppressed by my Lin clan. Right now, since he suddenly appeared, he will certainly not forgive us."
Seeing that their own family's Lord Lin Ran was being so violently beaten up like that, the Qilin army from the Lin clan tightly frowned and they kept on shivering. They secretly turned around, and they wanted to secretly leave.
However, how was it possible for such a huge army with such huge numbers not attract attention when they wanted to leave? So, when the first person turned around and retreated, Qi Fengyang immediately loudly yelled.
"God damn, all of you stand right there! I will break three legs from the people who dare to leave this arena!!"
[TN Three legs. One on the right, one on the left, and one in the middle )]
"Huaa~~~" After yelling, everyone in the Qilin army did not dare to move from fear. Every single one of them stood where they were while their bodies were trembling and their legs quivering.
They were too afraid of Qi Fengyang. The Qi clan and the Lin clan were not on friendly terms, and when Qi Fengyang was in the Prince's Mansion, he suppressed the Lin clan. At that time, Qi Fengyang was a name that caused the Lin clan to be fearful just by hearing it. Even the chief of the Lin clan had headaches because of him.
Later on, Qi Fengyang suddenly disappeared. The Qi clan was like a group of dragons without a head, so the Lin clan started their counterattack. During that period of time, the Qi clan were indeed quite miserably suppressed by the Lin clan. However, the king of hell returned, and they could completely imagine what situations their Lin clan was going to face.
"Damn. You really think you're so good now? In the period of time that I wasn't here, all of you were quite arrogant huh? Not only did you bully my Qi clan in the mansion, you even bully my close friend's school outside of the mansion. God damn! Who gave you these nerves?"
"Kneel!!"
"Huaa~"
Qi Fengyang explosively yelled, and without even hesitating, the Lin clan's army kneeled simultaneously. Their former arrogance and unshakable dignity, after doing so much, it was only fart in front Qi Fengyang. They very decisively threw them away.
Qi Fengyang took that scene as normal, but the outsiders in the arena were joyful beyond expectations and they were endlessly shocked. Not only was the army from the Qilin Prince's Mansion kneeling to Qi Fengyang, the army was also kneeling to them.
How much face would be given if one said that the people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion knelt before them? Even if they could not become some big character in the future, at least, they would be able to brag to their grandsons and later generations right?
"What are you thinking? Slap yourself a hundred times!!" Qi Fengyang stepped on Lin Ran's head, then he yelled at the Lin clan while pointing at them.
"ChiChiChief Qi, we only followed the commands of our superior! We were truly forced!" This time, someone hesitated, and with a full face of grievance, that person yelled and complained to Qi Fengyang.
At the same time, the tens of thousands people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion nodded with faces of grievances as well. They really hoped that Qi Fengyang could spare them once.
"Screw your damn being forced." However, Qi Fengyang did not buy that. He first loudly cursed, then took off a shoe that he was wearing and waved his arm. He threw that shoe towards the face of the one who begged.
No matter how you said it, other people's shoes were still shoes. However, Qi Fengyang's shoe was a ferocious weapon. After that shoe landed, the person who begged cried out in pain. His nose was crooked, and his face was smashed in, and not only did he get knocked out from that, his face even got paralyzed.
After seeing the person who got his face smashed by a shoe, the Lin clan army of tens of thousands all hesitated for 0.001 seconds, then raised their palms, waved their arms, and sent huge slaps towards their own faces with bangs. Putting aside how much power they used to slap themselves, but without even slapping themselves for a hundred times, no one dared to stop.
People were completely stupefied when they looked at that scene. Their mouths and eyes were crooked, and they were so shocked that they could not care for themselves. The Qilin army that was so aggressive with boiling killing intent earlier was taken care by someone to that state. They truly saw something new.
Even shock was filled on Eggy's sweet little face in Chu Feng's Spiritual World. As she was stunned, her little mouth couldn't help but slightly open and she couldn't help but yell in surprise,
"This old man is quite strange. I recall how righteous he seemed in the Valley of Hundred Bends. I never would have thought that when facing the enemy, he would not care what methods he use and he would be so despicable and shameless."
"Ahh, luckily he isn't the enemy because he is even more terrifying than Lin Ran."
As for Chu Feng, a faint smile was hung on the corner of his mouth. He was very glad that he met such a noble person like Qi Fengyang. Not only did he save himself, he even saved the people close to him.
At the same time, he was even more glad that Qi Fengyang wasn't his enemy because he knew that if the old man was currently his enemy, right now, he would have certainly been played around to death by the old man.
Finally, after a hundred slaps, the several tens of thousands Lin clan members from the Qilin Prince's Mansion had swelled up and red faces. Deep palm marks were left, and it could be seen that they were quite fierce to themselves.
Of course, they did not dare to not be fierce. In front of Qi Fengyang, how could they dare to play any tricks? If they were discovered, Qi Fengyang could certainly play around with them until they were dead.
"Brother Chu Feng, this group of dogs came here to stir up trouble and they ruined your originally fine life and death battle. Speak. How should they be punished? I'll help you out with it."
Qi Fengyang arrived in front of Chu Feng and heroically patted Chu Feng's shoulder. Looking at how he acted, he really did not seem to be facing a junior. It was more like he was facing a brother.
Chu Feng was always grateful towards Qi Fengyang. His life was saved by him in the Valley of Hundred Bends and Chu Feng already owned him a huge favour then. Before he could even pay that back, his life was saved once again by him.
Also, not only did he save Chu Feng's life, he even saved the near a million people's lives in the arena. Chu Feng was already endlessly grateful, so he clasped his hands and said, "Senior Qi, I will not forget your benevolence and kindness and I will undoubtedly pay it back in the future."
"Tsk. What are you talking about?" However, it was unexpected that Qi Fengyang did not want Chu Feng's words. He curled his lips, widened his eyes, and said to Chu Feng, "Who are you calling senior? Call me brother!"


MGA Capitulo 261  Mysterious Passerby
As he looked at Qi Fengyang who was full of smiles, Chu Feng hesitated for a bit, but he still laughed, smiled, and said to Qi Fengyang, "Brother!"
"Ahh, that's right!" After hearing Chu Feng's response, Qi Fengyang's smile was even more dazzling. He raised his head, looked around, then loudly said,
"Everyone listen up! From today on, Chu Feng is my brother. Whoever dares to bully Chu Feng means that they are bullying me, Qi Fengyang. As long as I, Qi Fengyang, am still breathing, I will absolutely not forgive him."
"Also, the Azure Dragon School is already qualified to become a first-rate school. Not for any other reason, but my brother being here is a reason enough. Besides, School Head Li's cultivation is already qualified to be the school head for a first-rate school."
"Therefore, School Head Li, I, Qi Fengyang, shall boldly ask. Why not take this chance and start an assembly in the Azure Dragon School for a school promotion, and to raise the Azure Dragon School from a second-rate school, to a first-rate school?" Qi Fengyang smiled and said to Li Zhangqing.
"Everything can be arranged by you, Lord Qi." Let alone that Li Zhangqing did not dare to go against Qi Fengyang's wishes, actually, he himself also wanted to raise the Azure Dragon School to a first-rate school. Since there was a chance like that right now, and it was even personally hosted by the number two person in the grand Qilin Prince's Mansion, naturally, he would not miss that chance.
"Haha! Good! Today, this thing will be set. In order to celebrate the promotion of the school that my younger brother is in, my Qilin Prince's Mansion will contribute. Two days later, also in this place, the Azure Dragon School will host a school promotion assembly for a new start!"
"Anyone who come are guests, so everyone, no need to leave. Stay for an extra two days, and why not join this Azure Dragon School's school promotion assembly as well?"
Qi Fengyang was extremely happy, and as for the people in the arena, naturally, they were endlessly excited as well. It was quite an honorable thing to participate in the school promotion assembly that Qi Fengyang hosted.
Besides, the current Azure Dragon School did indeed have the strength for them to set up a relationship. Not to mention the Azure Dragon School's head, Li Zhangqing's strength, and not to mention Chu Feng's potential, just by looking at Qi Fengyang, the supporter behind them, it was enough to make various schools seriously treat them.
However, some people were quite depressed as well, and one of them would be Gong Tianping who was bearing the pain of losing his son. His own son was killed, but he had no way of avenging him. That caused him to be depressed to the extreme. So, he did not stay behind to participate in the Azure Dragon School's school promotion assembly. He only led the people from the Black Tortoise City and gloomily left.
As for the elders and heads from first-rate schools which he brought along, they did not choose to leave. In front of Qi Fengyang's mighty name, they decisively threw Gong Tianping away and chose to rely on the Azure Dragon School. They decided to befriend the Azure Dragon School.
That made Gong Tianping even more depressed. As he was in pain because his own son was lost, his allies abandoned him and threw themselves towards the enemy. That was truly adding frost onto snow, and the date of his revenge was so distant and far.
But the most depressed people were the Lin clan from the Qilin Prince's Mansion. Under Qi Fengyang's command, the big characters who had well-known statuses became physical labour for the Azure Dragon School's promotion.
They laid the space, arranged tables and chairs, swept the ground, organized, prepared goods and supplies... Everything were their responsiblities, and even though they felt wronged in their stomachs, they did not dare to speak even half a word of complaint because they truly feared Qi Fengyang too much.
As they faced a situation like that, at first, many people did not get used to the people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion pouring tea for them. It made them feel extremely frightened and they were deeply afraid that they would take revenge on them for that. But gradually, they still got used to it.
It was because Qi Fengyang said one sentence. If anyone on scene had anything happen to them, no matter if it was done by the Lin clan or not, in the future, he would still collect debts from the Lin clan. So naturally, the people from the Lin clan would not dare to have any plans.
However, Qi Fengyang wasn't a person who didn't know when to stop. Although most of the Lin clan members stayed behind for physical labour, he still let twenty Lin clan members who had decent cultivation leave.
The reason why they were let go was naturally to send the heavily injured Lin Ran back to the Qilin Prince's Mansion. Although Qi Fengyang felt very displeased towards Lin Ran, after all, he was still in the Lin clan. A lesson could be given, but a life could not be taken.
"Cough cough cough..."
On the road back to the Qilin Prince's Mansion, twenty experts from the Qilin Prince's Mansion rode golden horses, and they were escorting a luxurious carriage while hurrying on the road. Heart-tearing and lung-splitting huge coughs occasionally came from the carriage, and occasionally, bursts of unceasingly miserable moans came from the carriage."
"This Qi Fengyang has gone too far by beating Lord Lin Ran like this. After returning to the Prince Mansion, we must report this to the lord of the mansion and let him punish Qi Fengyang." A young guard aggrievedly said.
"What do you even know? Even the chief can't do anything about Qi Fengyang. Do you really think that mansion lord will listen to you? Do you think that he knows nothing? Who do you think is more important to the Prince Mansion, Qi Fengyang, or Lord Lin Ran?"
"Besides, the current injuries that Lord Lin Ran has right now was not caused by Qi Fengyang. They are internal injuries resulted from the rebounds of that Forbidden Medicine." A middle-aged guard reminded.
"It's the Forbidden Medicine? This type of rebound is really too painful and I can truly not bear seeing Lord Lin Ran endure this type of torture." Worry and unwillingness filled the young guard's face.
"There's someone in front!!"
But just at that time, the guard who was at the very front suddenly loudly yelled. Quickly after, the twenty Prince's Mansion guards entered a high alert state.
Indeed, a figure appeared on the road in front. That person was sitting in the middle of the road while wearing a conical hat. His appearance was unclear, but he blocked the road forward.
"We are Lin clan members from the Qilin Prince's Mansion! The person in front, quickly move!" One of the guards howled.
However, the person who preventing them from continuing still sat in the middle of the road. He did not have any reactions, as though he didn't hear the guard's words.
"Oi! I'm speaking to you! Do you not hear me?" Seeing that there were no reactions, that guard howled again. But yet again, that person still ignored him.
"God damn, you are truly looking to die." Seeing that, the guard who already had a stomach of anger jumped and leaped off the horse, then quickly walked towards that person.
At that instant, a smile of ridicule appeared on the faces of the other guards because they knew what the guard planned to do. If he truly wanted to kill the person on the road, he would have just directly attacked and sent a strike through the air. It would have been enough to break him into pieces, so there was no need to walk over.
The reason why he walked over was because he wanted to torture the guy who did not have eyes for a while. Incidentally, all of them had a stomach full of anger, so they wanted to vent it out on the passerby who didn't have eyes.
"You, stand up." The guard walked next to the person on the road, extended his hand, and he wanted to grab his clothes.
*whoosh*
However, a half-moon shaped cold glare slid across his wrist. Blood sprayed, and the hand that the guard extended was already cut off. Following that, another cold glare streaked past, and the guard's head already flew into the air, then landed onto the ground.


MGA Capitulo 262  Torturing Lin Ran
"YouYouWho are you? You dare to attack people from my Qilin Prince's Mansion?!"
That scene terrified the other guards, because after all, the guard who was just killed was still an expert in the Profound realm. If a person like that was so easily beheaded, it meant that the person on the road was not ordinary.
At that instant, the person on the road slowly stood up and took the conical hat on his head off. A handsome and young face was revealed, and he smiled and said to the crowd indifferently, "I came here to slaughter the people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion."
"YouYouYou are Chu Feng?!"
After seeing that face, the colours of the guards' faces were instantly all gone because at that very instant, the person who stopped in front of them was none other than Chu Feng.
However, they remembered that Chu Feng was clearly only in the 7th level of the Origin realm, yet he was emanating the aura of the 1st level of the Profound realm. That change truly was unimaginable, and some didn't even dare to be sure whether the person in front of them was Chu Feng or not.
"Chu Feng?!" After hearing the name "Chu Feng", Lin Ran stepped out of the carriage and came out.
The current Lin Ran was heavily sweating and his face was slightly green. His eyes were deeply caved in, and in addition to the chaotic hair, that appearance terrified people as much as they could be terrified. The most important part was that his aura was extremely petty. He dropped down to the 6th level of the Profound realm, and it could be seen that the rebound of the Forbidden Medicine was indeed quite strong.
However, after seeing Chu Feng, he was not only shocked. Instantly, boiling bloodlust also surged out, and he pointed at Chu Feng and said, "I never would have thought that you would dare to send yourself here. Kill him!!"
"Kill!!" After the order, the remaining guards did not dare to be slow and every single one of them let the aura of the Profound realm out. The strong pressure forced its way towards Chu Feng.
Simultaneously, twenty various strong martial skills were also thrown out. Not only did they not block Chu Feng's escape, that attack showed that they wanted to take Chu Feng's life.
*swoosh swoosh swoosh*
However, light flashed under Chu Feng's feet and his entire body became a row of light. He quickly dodged the densely packed martial skills, and with a blink, he arrived in front of the guards.
*whoosh whoosh whoosh* Following that, Chu Feng clenched both of his hands and two big blades appeared in his palm. They became two golden-coloured blurs as they endlessly flew everywhere.
After the golden blurs stopped, the twenty Profound realm experts from the Qilin Prince's Mansion were all beheaded and killed by Chu Feng.
"YourYour aura, that bodily martial skillYou are Mr. Grey-cloak!!"
At that instant, Lin Ran could finally not remain calm anymore because he astonishingly discovered that Chu Feng's current aura, Chu Feng's current battle power, and Chu Feng's mysterious bodily methods he displayed were exactly the same as Mr. Grey-cloak's who chased after Gong Luyun in the Valley of Hundred Bends.
He suddenly thought of a terrifying possibility. Mr. Grey-cloak who chased after Gong Luyun and killed the others did not have connections with Chu Feng, because Chu Feng was Mr. Grey-cloak. Half a year ago, Chu Feng already had the strength to kill Gong Luyun!
"Heh, you found out about it. It seems that you aren't stupid huh."
"However, do you remember what I said in the Valley of Hundred Bends that day? Next time we meet, I will take your life!" Chu Feng had a light smile on his face, but his gaze was icy cold.
"Hmph. If you want to take my life, you need to have that strength. On that day, I was able to force you to escape for your life. Today, I can cut your corpse into ten thousand pieces."
Lin Ran was furious. As he insanely howled, he extended his hand towards his Cosmos Sack. A black-coloured Forbidden Medicine appeared in his palm once again.
He who received the rebound of the Forbidden Medicine no longer had the battle power that he previously had. So, if he wanted to defeat the current Chu Feng, he had to use Forbidden Medicine again. Although it would greatly harm him, it was the only thing he could do at that moment.
*whoosh*
"Ahh!"
But how could Chu Feng give that chance to him? The light under Chu Feng's feet flashed, and he already dashed in front of Lin Ran. Following that, the big blade in his hand mercilessly sliced down, and after a glare swept past, with snapping noises, blood sprayed out and Lin Ran's hand that was holding the Forbidden Medicine was already chopped off by Chu Feng.
After cutting his hand off, Chu Feng held the Forbidden Medicine in his hand. As he looked at the Forbidden Medicine which was filled with strange power, Chu Feng curled his lips and said, "Although this thing harms people quite a bit, it should still be worth something. I'll take it."
As he spoke, Chu Feng put the Forbidden Medicine away. After that, he looked at the disconnected palm under Lin Ran's legs, spit on it, and said, "As for this thing... Even dogs won't eat it, so it is useless to keep it." After speaking, Chu Feng raised his feet, and stamped Lin Ran's disconnected palm into meat paste.
"Ahh~~~~I will skin you alive!!"
As he saw his own palm being stamped into meat paste by Chu Feng, Lin Ran truly saw it with his eyes, but ached in his heart. He madly pounced towards Chu Feng.
However, because of the rebound from the Forbidden Medicine, his current cultivation was restricted to the 6th level of the Profound realm. It was even extremely petty, so how could he possibly defeat Chu Feng?
"Damn you." Chu Feng kicked out and directly kicked Lin Ran to the ground. He looked at Lin Ran and said, "You really like seeing other people castrate themself huh? Today, I show you how you get castrated by someone else." After speaking, Chu Feng's big leg was suddenly raised.
"No!!" At that instant, Lin Ran was terrified as he hysterically screamed out.
But would Chu Feng listen to his words? Chu Feng's foot ruthlessly stamped down, and with a "puchi", on Lin Ran's pants, blood splattered around his crotch section. His genitals were stamped into meat paste by Chu Feng.
"Hehehe, why is it so small? I couldn't even feel anything." Chu Feng smacked his lips, and as he looked at Lin Ran with a lifeless expression, he felt quite refreshed in his heart.
At that instant, Lin Ran's face was like ash. The pain he felt from his body was not comparable to the pain in his heart. He had no son, as he was decapitated by Chu Feng. He had no genitals, as they were stamped into meat paste by Chu Feng. He truly was not going to have a later generation, as he had no sons or grandsons.
"I say, you are still the head manager of the Lin clan from the Qilin Prince's Mansion. What are you so poor? You only have a few dozen high-quality Profound medicine on you. These aren't even enough to fill my teeth." Chu Feng took Lin Ran's Cosmos Sack off and he was currently searching inside it.
"Kill me." Lin Ran deathly-gloomily said those words.
"What did you say?" Chu Feng acted as if he didn't hear them.
"Kill me!!" Lin Ran loudly howled.
"Oh? You want to die?" Chu Feng chuckled, then bent down and quietly said to Lin Ran, "You want to reunite with your son?"
"YouYouWhat do you mean?" After hearing Chu Feng's words, Lin Ran's face greatly changed once again because in this life, he had no sons. His only son was Gong Luyun, but no one should have known that Gong Luyun was his son. Obviously, Chu Feng's words meant that he knew something already.
"Heh, I don't mean anything. If you want to reunite, I will grant you that wish. However, before that, I haven't tortured you enough." Chu Feng strangely smiled, and a sharp dagger appeared in his hand. He stabbed towards one of Lin Ran's eyes.
"Ahh~~~~~~~" After that, on the little road, various types of painful cries kept on ringing out. Only after a good while did they gradually quiet down.


MGA Capitulo 263  Avenged Hatred
The school promotion assembly for the Azure Dragon School was held as scheduled. Other than the powerful people from various places that stayed behind, many nearby powers heard the news, and went over to congratulate.
However, when the people who went to congratulate saw that the people who welcomed them were guards from Qilin Prince's Mansion who wore golden armor, all of them were quite frightened.
But when they found out that the guards from the Qilin Prince's Mansion were ordered by Qi Fengyang to do such strange jobs because they offended Chu Feng, they were even more shocked.
Chu Feng became brothers with Lord Qi Fangyang. That news was too explosive and quite inconceivable to many people. In addition to the miracle in which Chu Feng, who was in the 7th level of the Origin realm, defeated Gong Luyun, who had the cultivation of the 4th level of the Profound realm, people felt that Chu Feng was quite brilliant and mysterious.
So, even more people wanted to see Chu Feng. They wanted to see the grandeur of the genius. But it was in vain, as on the important day of the school promotion assembly, Chu Feng did not show himself. No one knew where he went, but they only heard that he secluded himself for cultivation.
At the same time, Gong Tianping and the other people from the Black Tortoise City already returned to the Black Tortoise City. The current Gong Tianping was enduring the pain of losing his son, so he isolated himself and he was not willing to see anyone. However, when several big characters from the Qilin Prince's Mansion led a huge army to visit, he had no choice but to come out to meet them.
"What? Lord Lin Ran hasn't returned to the Prince's Mansion yet? This isn't right.. Looking at the distance, he should have already returned back." Within a guest hall, Gong Tianping had a nervous face as he looked at the several old people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion's Lin clan.
"Yeah, that's why we're worried. Perhaps some incident happened on the road. The other Lin clan members who went to the Azure Dragon School are being pressured by Qi Fengyang in the Azure Dragon School so we cannot understand the situation. That is why we came to you to find out about more things."
The old people's strength were not weak and they were all in the 7th level of the Profound realm. However, their auras were all stronger than Gong Tianping's, and they were the backbones of the Lin lan in the Qilin Prince's Mansion.
"Milords, on that day, Qi Fengyang injured Lord Lin Ran quite heavily, and he also has some special relationship with Chu Feng. Do you think that it's possible Qi Fengyang intentionally allowed Lord Lin Ran to returned, then hiddenly imprisoned him again?" Gong Tianping guessed.
"He wouldn't. Although Qi Fengyang does things quite madly, he does things quite openly and just. He is extremely loyal to the Prince's Mansion, and even though he is on bad terms with my Lin clan, he would absolutely not kill people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion. I feel that this matter wasn't done by Qi Fengyang." The several old people shook their heads.
"Let me in, let me in!!"
"Milady wait! Milady! Milady!!"
But just at that time, there was some clamoring outside the guest hall. Following that, the closed doors were suddenly kicked opened by someone. A woman with tears all over her pale-white face intruded under the accompany of several guards.
"What are you doing in here? Don't you know that I'm receiving some guests? Quickly get out of here!!" After seeing that woman, Gong Tianping rose and angrily yelled. That woman was none other than Gong Tianping's wife, and Gong Luyun's mother.
If it was under normal circumstances, after being yelled at like that by Gong Tianping, she would have already been so terrified and she wouldn't dare to speak anymore. However, she was like a completely different person today. Not only did she not leave, she even used her trembling hands to point at Gong Tianping, and she said while grinding her teeth,
"Gong Tianping! You are quite a heartless person! Even if Luyun wasn't born from you and me, you didn't need to kill him so coldheartedly! After all, he still called you ‘father' for twenty years, and in his heart, you are truly his father!!"
"And also Lord Lin Ran. So what if he's Luyun's blood-related father? Luyun wasn't born from secret affairs between me and him! We already knew each other before I even knew you!"
"ButBut you killed him, and you even so insanely tortured him to such a wretched state! Are you even a person? Are you a demon?!" After speaking to that point, tears fell like rain, and her voice was already hoarse. Her trembling body trembled even more intensely.
"YouWhat nonsense are you speaking?!" At that instant, fog filled Gong Tianping's head because of her. He walked up, he strongly slapped the woman's face, and she was thrown dozens of meters away.
"Hit me. Hit me to death! Since Luyun is dead, I don't want to live anymore. But before I die, I must tie an insane demon like you with the ropes of the law!"
"Milords, Lord Lin Ran has already been killed by this mad Gong Tianping. His body is in Gong Tianping's room right now." The woman cried her complaints out to the several old people, and at the same time, she climbed up from the ground and started to walk out while stumbling.
The other old people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion had tense expressions. They looked at one another, then quickly followed the woman.
"Milords, do not listen to her incoherent nonsense. Because my son died, she received mental blows so that is why she spoke such insane words. Normally, she isn't like this." Seeing that, Gong Tianping also quickly explained, but the several old people did not care about him.
Under the lead of the woman, the group of people quickly arrived to the room that Gong Tianping lived in. After opening the room, other than the woman, not a single person who looked wasn't stunned.
Inside the room, a naked body was hung there. That body was incomplete. It did not have any hands nor feet, and it didn't even have its "third leg". However, the face of that corpse was still complete, and it was Lin Ran from the Qilin Prince's Mansion.
However, both of Lin Ran's eyes were scooped out. His tongue was cut, and there was a sign hung from his neck. On the sign, the big word "adulterer" was written on it.
"Gong Tianping, look! Look at what you have done! Even if Luyun was born from me and Lord Lin Ran, you did not need to torture him like this! You are truly too heartless!!" After seeing Lin Ran in such a wretched state, the woman miserably cried again.
"Heavens! Thisthis" Gong Tianping even knelt to the ground with a poof, and he was completely stupefied by the scene in front of him.
"Gong Tianping! My Qilin Prince's Mansion has developed your Gong family in such a way, yet you dare to harm Lord Lin Ran like this because of some personal grudges?!" One of the old people pointed at Gong Tianping and loudly reprimanded.
"Men, men! Take this Gong family down! Kill all these bastards that ought to die, and not a single chicken or dog will remain!!" Another old person directly ran out, and yelled at the Qilin army who set up camp outside the Black Tortoise City.
As for the third old man, he was even more straightforward. He just bluntly attacked Gong Tianping, and slammed his palm down on Gong Tianping's brain. After all seven of his facial orifices bled, he still yelled, "If I don't split your corpse into eight pieces, my hatred in my heart cannot be dispelled, and I would not be able face Lord Lin Ran's soul in the heavens!"
After knowing about what happened, the Qilin army that set up camp outside had fury that rose to the skies. Mercilessly, they started a massacre in the Gong family, because without doing that, they could not soothe the flames of fury in their hearts.
Because of Lin Ran's death, the Gong family sank into a desperate situation. Immediately, miserable cries kept on ringing out, and bit by bit, they were being annihilated by the Qilin army. They were being removed from the Azure Province.
As the Gong family were being annihilated, on the peak of a certain palace in the Black Tortoise City, a young man was standing there. It was Chu Feng.
As he looked at the Gong family who was being massacred, there was not a trace of pity on Chu Feng's face. He only looked towards the sky, and sorrowfully said, "Father, the people who harmed you have already gotten a suitable punishment. You can close your eyes in peace!"


MGA Capitulo 264  Reunited Family
The news of the Azure Dragon School leaping to become a first-rate school quickly spread throughout the Azure Province. Within the borders of the Azure Province, suddenly, another first-rate school appeared. That was a huge news, and naturally, it caught the attention of various powers in the Azure Province.
At the same time, something that caught the attention of people was Chu Feng. Chu Feng became the number one disciple in the Azure Dragon School. Not only did he behead Gong Luyun who was in the 4th level of the Profound realm with the cultivation of the 7th level of the Origin realm, he also became sworn brothers with the chief of the Qi clan from the Qilin Prince's mansion, Qi Fengyang. His strength and status was terrifyingly strong.
The various rumours about Chu Feng were simply like legends. So, that caused many people to not blindly believe everything, and they remained a suspicious attitude. But no matter what, the name Chu Feng already spread throughout the Azure Province and became the topic of excited discussion by various people.
At the same time, another news made people feel shocked. It was that the city lord of the Black Tortoise City, Gong Tianping, cruelly killed Lin Ran when he was heavily injured. That caused the Qilin prince's Mansion to be enraged, and they completely annihilated the Gong family.
"Chu Feng, you've finally returned. We've already heard of the news about you defeating Gong Luyun. You are simply too outstanding and you are truly the pride of our Chu family!"
"Yeah, Chu Feng, I even heard that our Azure Dragon School became a first-rate school, and you also became the number one disciple in the Azure Dragon School. Is that true?"
Chu Feng's arrival to where the young generation of the Chu family hid caused everyone to be joyful. They were all excited, because the current Chu Feng was no longer the little brat whom they looked down upon. He became a genius who gave them glory and pride. A family member who they were extremely proud of.
"Ho..That's less significant. Today, I came here to announce some good news to everyone." Chu Feng sat in the hall, and said while smiling at the crowd.
"What good news?" Everyone started to get excited. Several gazes tightly stared at Chu Feng and their eyes were full of expectation.
"In order to allow everyone's cultivation to increase to another stage, I helped you guys apply for some martial skills as well as some Mysterious Techniques from the school head, and he has already agreed."
As he spoke, Chu Feng threw a Cosmos Sack out. After the radiance spread out from the Cosmos Sack, several books appeared on the table in the hall.
"Waa, Chu Feng, I simply love you to death!"
As they looked at those books, the Chu family crowd instantly went mad. Even Chu Guyu's eyes glittered and joy surged into his eyes.
It was because those were not normal books. They were Mysterious Techniques and martial skills. Mysterious Techniques were things that only core disciples could cultivate, and there were also rank 1 to rank 5 martial skills there. The things that they did not even dare to think about in the past, the things that they would have never gotten the chance to even touch, were all displayed in front of them at that instant. How could they not be excited?
At the same time that they were excited and joyful, they couldn't help but gratefully look at Chu Feng because the reason why they could enjoy all of that today was because all of it was bestowed by Chu Feng.
"Also, I have another news. I want to tell everyone that the culprit who harmed my Chu family has already been found, and I already let him paid the appropriate price." Suddenly, Chu Feng seriously spoke.
"Really? Chu Feng, who was the culprit?" As he mentioned that, everyone stood up, and their emotions were a bit stirred up.
"The culprit was Gong Luyun!" Chu Feng said.
"What? It was him?" After knowing that, everyone was shocked. But after they were shocked, some people also relievedly said, "Gong Luyun has already been killed by you, and the Gong family has also been massacred by the Qilin Prince's Mansion. On that topic, they did indeed get the punishment that they deserved."
"They committed crimes, and they deserved to be punished. But sadly, I can't personally kill them, or else I would feel a lot more refreshed." Chu Cheng fiercely said.
"Although his Gong family wasn't killed by me personally, they still died because of me." Chu Feng lightly smiled, then also said how he killed Lin Ran, and how he used Gong Luyun's mother to frame Lin Ran's death on Gong Tianping.
"Chu Feng, you are simply too brilliant! As expected from you to think of such a ‘borrowing a knife to kill' method."
"Yeah, his Gong family is protected by the Qilin Prince's Mansion, so if we really kill them, the Qilin Prince's Mansion would not forgive us. However, this way, the Qilin Prince's Mansion took the initiative to exterminate the Gong family. That is simply too impressive."
After knowing the truth, everyone was madly happy and joy was written on their faces.
"Chu Feng, the relationship between Lin Ran and Gong Luyun's mother was so hidden, and even Gong Tianping nor Gong Luyun did not know about it. How did you know?" Chu Guyu curiously asked.
"Heh. At first, after knowing that Gong Luyun let the Five Tiger Village massacre my Chu family, I went to the Black Tortoise City and observed Gong Luyun mother for a good while since I wanted to know where Gong Luyun was."
"I discovered that although Gong Luyun's mother did not know where Gong Luyun was, every day, she would go the riverside by herself and mutter some past things to herself, and many times, a name would be mentioned. Lin Ran's name."
"In addition, Lin Ran was abnormally kind to Gong Luyun, so I felt that something was fishy. Before killing Lin Ran, I tested it and I asked him whether Gong Luyun was his family, and from his reactions, I determined that Gong Luyun was his privately born son." Chu Feng smiled and explained.
"Chu Feng, your observation power is a bit crazy isn't it?" At that instant, as the crowd looked at Chu Feng, their gazes had a bit more respect, because Chu Feng had the abilities that none of them had. Not only was it martial cultivation talent, it was also a careful heart.
After that, Chu Feng left a large amount of cultivating resources for Chu Guyu and the others. He left the resources he stole from Lin Ran, the people from the Qilin Prince's Mansion, as well as from the Black Tortoise City over to Chu Guyu and the others.
That caused their tongues to be tied into a knot because such a huge amount of cultivation resources was enough for them to use for over a dozen years, even if they used them whenever they wished to.
As for Chu Feng, the reason why he left all those cultivation resources to the Chu family and not use them himself was because the required resources for the current him to make a breakthrough for one level was too terrifying. Although the resources were great wealth for Chu Guyu and the others, to Chu Feng, they were truly only enough for him to fill the cracks between his teeth.
After knowing everything, the people in the Chu family were extremely excited, and Chu Feng also specially stayed for a night. He happily drank through the night with his family. Originally, a reunion of family was already happy, and what about in addition to an avenged hatred? So, on that night, everyone in the Chu family were extremely joyful, and the huge rock that was pressed against their hearts was finally lifted.
"Chu Feng, where should we go now? Your Chu family's hatred has already been avenged, so it should be time to find some Source energy for me right?"
"From last time, after absorbing the Source energy from that White Tiger Villa's ancestor, I couldn't meet any tasty ones and my cultivation has not really improved." After leaving the city in which the Chu family were hiddenly living in, Chu Feng rode Little White and headed back to the Azure Dragon School. As for Eggy, she kept on aggrievedly nagging.
"When the White Tiger Villa's ancestor lived, he was an expert in the Heaven realm. So naturally, it would hard to have any improvements after absorbing his Source energy, then absorbing Source energy from those in the Profound realm. But don't worry. I think that this time, you will have good harvests." Chu Feng smiled.
"What do you mean?" Eggy expressed confusion.
"I think that it is time to open the Thousand Bone Graveyard." Chu Feng lightly smiled, then urged Little White under him to quicken the speed back to the Azure Dragon School.
